Only very few have ever attempted it, and they have been exterminated; the world knows them no more.
The only exception is Liu Bei, who did not understand the conditions and vigorously contended against him, with the result that he is now at Jiangxia in a very parlous state.
To submit is to secure the safety of wives and children, to be rich and honored.
But the dignity of the country would be left to chance and fate—however, that is not worth consideration.” Lu Su interrupted angrily, “Would you make our lord crook the knee to such a rebel as Cao Cao?” “Well,” replied Zhuge Liang, “there is another way, and a cheaper; there would be no need to 'lead the sheep and shoulder wine pots' for presents, nor any need to yield territory and surrender seals of office.
It would not even be necessary to cross the river yourselves.
All you would require is a simple messenger and a little boat to ferry a couple of people across the river.
If Cao Cao only got these two persons under his hand, his hordes and legions would just drop their weapons, furl their banners, and silently vanish away.” “What two persons could cause Cao Cao to go away as you say?” asked Zhou Yu. “Two persons who could be easily spared from this populous country. They would not be missed any more than a leaf from a tree or a grain of millet from a granary.
But if Cao Cao could only get them, would he not go away rejoicing?” “But who are the two?” asked Zhou Yu again.
“When I was living in the country, they told me that Cao Cao was building a pavilion on the River Zhang; it was to be named the Bronze Bird Tower.
It is an exceedingly handsome building, and he has sought throughout all the world for the most beautiful women to live in it. For Cao Cao really is a sensualist.
“Now there are two very famous beauties in Wu, born of the Qiao family. So beautiful are they that birds alight and fishes drown, the moon hides her face and the flowers blush for shame at sight of them. Cao Cao has declared with an oath that he only wants two things in this world:
the imperial throne in peace and the sight of those two women on the Bronze Bird Terraces. Given these two, he would go down to his grave without regret.
This expedition of his, his huge army that threatens this country, has for its real aim these two women.
Why do you not buy these two from their father, the State Patriarch Qiao, for any sum however large and send them over the river? The object of the army being attained, it will simply be marched away.
This is the use that Fan Li of Yue made to the king of Wu of the famous beauty Xi Shi.” “How do you know Cao Cao so greatly desires these two?” said Zhou Yu.
“Because his son Cao Zhi, who is an able writer, at the command of his father wrote a poem 'An Ode to the Bronze Bird Terrace,' theme only allowing allusions to the family fitness for the throne.
He has sworn to possess these two women.
I think I can remember the poem, if you wish to hear it.
I admire it greatly.” “Try,” said Zhou Yu. So Zhuge Liang recited the poem: “Let me follow in the footsteps of the enlightened ruler that I may rejoice, And ascend the storied terrace that I may gladden my heart, That I may see the wide extent of the palace, That I may gaze upon the plans of the virtuous one.
He has established the exalted gates high as the hills, He has built the lofty towers piercing the blue vault, He has set up the beautiful building in the midst of the heavens, Whence the eye can range over the cities of the west.
On the banks of the rolling River Zhang he planned it, Whence abundance of fruits could be looked for in his gardens.
The two towers rise, one on either flank, This named Golden Phoenix, that Jade Dragon.
He would have the two Qiaos; these beautiful ladies of Wu, That he might rejoice with them morning and evening.
Look down; there is the grand beauty of an imperial city, And the rolling vapors lie floating beneath.
He will rejoice in the multitude of scholars that assemble, Answering to the felicitous dream of King Wen.
Look up; and there is the gorgeous harmony of springtime, And the singing of many birds delighting the ear; The lofty sky stands over all.
The house desires success in its double undertaking, That the humane influence may be poured out over all the world, That the perfection of reverence may be offered to the Ruler.
Only the richly prosperous rule of Kings Wu and Huan Could compare with that of the sacred understanding That fortune!
What beauty!
The gracious kindness spreads afar, The imperial family is supported, Peace reigns over all the empire, Bounded only by the universe.
Bright as the glory of the sun and moon, Ever honorable and ever enduring, The Ruler shall live to the age of the eastern emperor, The dragon banner shall wave to the farthest limit.
His glorious chariot shall be guided with perfect wisdom, His thoughts shall reform all the world, Felicitous produce shall be abundant, And the people shall rest firm.
My desire is that these towers shall endure forever, And that joy shall never cease through all the ages.
Zhou Yu listened to the end but then suddenly jumped up in a tremendous rage. Turning to the north and pointing with his finger, he cried, “You old rebel; this insult is too deep!” Zhuge Liang hastily rose too and soothed him, saying, “But remember the Khan of the Xiongnu People.
The Han emperor gave him a princess of the family to wife although he had made many incursions into our territory. That was the price of peace. You surely would not grudge two more women from among the common people.” “You do not know, Sir,” replied Zhou Yu.
“Of those two women of the Qiao family you mentioned, Elder Qiao is the widow of Sun Ce, our late ruler, and Younger Qiao is my wife!” Zhuge Liang feigned the greatest astonishment and said, “No indeed; I did not know.
I blundered; a deadly fault; a deadly fault!” “One of us two has to go, either the old rebel or I; we shall not both live. I swear that,” cried Zhou Yu.
“However, such a matter needs a good deal of thought,” replied Zhuge Liang.
“We must not make any mistake.” Zhou Yu replied, “I hold a sacred trust from my late lord, Sun Ce; I would not bow the knee to any such as Cao Cao.
What I said just now was to see how you stood.
I left Poyang Lake with the intention of attacking the north, and nothing can change that intention, not even the sword at my breast or the ax on my neck.
But I trust you will lend an arm, and we will smite Cao Cao together.” “Should I be happy enough not to be rejected, I would render such humble service as I could.
Perhaps presently I might be able to offer a plan to oppose him.” “I am going to see my lord tomorrow to discuss this matter,” said Zhou Yu.
Zhuge Liang and Lu Su then left.
Next day at dawn Sun Quan went to the council chamber, where his officials, civil and military, were already assembled.
They numbered about sixty in all. The civil, with Zhang Zhao at their head, were on the right; the military, with Cheng Pu as their leader, were ranged on the left. All were in full ceremonial dress, and the swords of the soldiers clanked on the pavement.
Soon Zhou Yu entered and, when Sun Quan had finished the usual gracious remarks, Zhou Yu said, “I hear that Cao Cao is encamped on the river and has sent a dispatch to you, my lord; I would ask what your opinion is.” Thereupon the dispatch was produced and handed to Zhou Yu.
After reading it through he said, smiling, “The old thief thinks there are no people in this land that he writes in this contemptuous strain.” “What do you think, Sir?” asked Sun Quan.
“Have you discussed this with the officials'“ asked Zhou Yu.
“We have been discussing this for days. Some counsel surrender and some advise fight.
I am undecided, and therefore I have asked you to come and decide the point.” “Who advise surrender?” asked Zhou Yu.
“Zhang Zhao and his party are firmly set in this opinion.” Zhou Yu then turned to Zhang Zhao and said, “I should be pleased to hear why you are for surrender, Master.” Then Zhang Zhao replied, “Cao Cao has been attacking all opponents in the name of the Emperor, who is entirely in his hands. He does everything in the name of the government.
Lately he has taken Jingzhou and thereby increased his prestige.
Our defense against him was the Great River, but now he also has a large fleet and can attack by water.
How can we withstand him?
Wherefore I counsel submission till some chance shall offer.” “This is but the opinion of an ill-advised student,” said Zhou Yu.
“How can you think of abandoning this country that we have held for three generations?” “That being so,” said Sun Quan, “where is a plan to come from?” “Though Cao Cao assumes the name of the Prime Minister of the empire, he is at heart a rebel.
You, O General, are able in war and brave. You are the heir to your father and brother. You command brave and tried soldiers, and you have plentiful supplies. You are able to overrun the whole country and rid it of every evil. There is no reason why you should surrender to a rebel.
“Moreover, Cao Cao has undertaken this expedition in defiance of all the rules of war. The north is unsubdued; Ma Teng and Han Sui threaten his rear, and yet he persists in his southern march. This is the first point against Cao Cao.
The northern soldiers are unused to fighting on the water; Cao Cao is relinquishing his well-tried cavalry and trusting to ships. That is the second point against him.
Again, we are now in full winter and the weather is at its coldest so there is no food for the horses. That is the third point against.
Soldiers from the central state marching in a wet country among lakes and rivers will find themselves in an unaccustomed climate and suffer from malaria. That is the fourth point against.
Now when Cao Cao's armies have all these points against them, defeat is certain, however numerous they may be, and you can take Cao Cao captive just as soon as you wish.
Give me a few legions of veterans and I will go and destroy him.” Sun Quan started up from his place, saying, “The rebellious old rascal has been wanting to overthrow the Hans and set up himself for years.
He has rid himself of all those he feared, save only myself, and I swear that one of us two shall go now. Both of us cannot live.
What you say, Noble Friend, is just what I think, and Heaven has certainly sent you to my assistance.” “Thy servant will fight a decisive battle,” said Zhou Yu, “and shrink not from any sacrifice.
Only, General, do not hesitate.” Sun Quan drew the sword that hung at his side and slashed off a corner of the table in front of him, exclaiming, “Let any other person mention surrender, and he shall be served as I have served this table.” Then he handed the sword to Zhou Yu, at the same time giving him a commission as Commander-in-Chief and Supreme Admiral, Cheng Pu being Vice-Admiral. Lu Su was also nominated as Commanding Assistant.
In conclusion Sun Quan said, “With this sword you will slay any officer who may disobey your commands.” Zhou Yu took the sword and turning to the assembly said, “You have heard our lord's charge to me to lead you to destroy Cao Cao; you will all assemble tomorrow at the river-side camp to receive my orders.
Should any be late or fail, then the full rigor of military law—the seven prohibitions and the fifty-four capital penalties—there provided, will be enforced.” Zhou Yu took leave of Sun Quan and left the chamber; the various officers also went their several ways.
When Zhou Yu reached his own place, he sent for Zhuge Liang to consult over the business in hand. He told Zhuge Liang of the decision that had been taken and asked for a plan of campaign.
“But your master has not yet made up his mind,” said Zhuge Liang.
“Till he has, no plan can be decided upon.” “What do you mean?” “In his heart, Sun Quan is still fearful of Cao Cao's numbers and frets over the inequality of the two armies.
You will have to explain away those numbers and bring him to a final decision before anything can be effected.” “What you say is excellent,” said Zhou Yu, and he went to the palace that night to see his master.
Sun Quan said, “You must have something of real importance to say if you come like this at night.” Zhou Yu said, “I am making my dispositions tomorrow; you have quite made up your mind?” “The fact is,” said Sun Quan, “I still feel nervous about the disparity of numbers. Surely we are too few.
That is really all I feel doubtful about.” “It is precisely because you have this one remaining doubt that I am come.
And I will explain. Cao Cao's letter speaks of a million of marines, and so you feel doubts and fears and do not wait to consider the real truth. Let us examine the case thoroughly.
We find that he has of central regions' soldiers, say, some one hundred fifty thousand troops, and many of them are sick.
He only got seventy or eighty thousand northern soldiers from Yuan Shao, and many of those are of doubtful loyalty.
Now these sick men and these men of doubtful loyalty seem a great many, but they are not at all fearsome.
I could smash them with fifty thousand soldiers.
You, my lord, have no further anxiety.” Sun Quan patted his general on the back, saying, “You have explained my difficulty and relieved my doubts. Zhang Zhao is an old fool who constantly bars my expeditions.
Only you and Lu Su have any real understanding of my heart.
Tomorrow you and Lu Su and Cheng Pu will start, and I shall have a strong reserve ready with plentiful supplies to support you.
If difficulties arise, you can at once send for me, and I will engage with my own army.” Zhou Yu left; but in his innermost heart he said to himself, “If that Zhuge Liang can gauge my master's thoughts so very accurately, he is too clever for me and will be a danger.
He will have to be put out of the way.” Zhou Yu sent a messenger over to Lu Su to talk over this last scheme. When he had laid it bare, Lu Su did not favor it.
“No, no,” said Lu Su, “it is self-destruction to make away with your ablest officer before Cao Cao shall have been destroyed.” “But Zhuge Liang will certainly help Liu Bei to our disadvantage.” “Try what his brother Zhuge Jin can do to persuade him.
It would be an excellent thing to have these two in our service.” “Yes, indeed,” replied Zhou Yu.
Next morning at dawn, Zhou Yu went to his camp and took his seat in the council tent.
The armed guards took up their stations right and left, and the officers ranged themselves in lines to listen to the orders.
Now Cheng Pu, who was older than Zhou Yu but was made second in command, was very angry at being passed over, so he made a pretense of indisposition and stayed away from this assembly. But he sent his eldest son, Cheng Zi, to represent him.
Zhou Yu addressed the gathering, saying, “The law knows no partiality, and you will all have to attend to your several duties.
Cao Cao is now more absolute than ever was Dong Zhuo, and the Emperor is really a prisoner in Xuchang, guarded by the most cruel soldiers.
We have a command to destroy Cao Cao, and with your willing help we shall advance.
The army must cause no hardship to the people anywhere.
Rewards for good service and punishments for faults shall be given impartially.” Having delivered this charge, Zhou Yu told off Han Dang and Huang Gai as Leaders of the Van, and ordered the ships under his own command to get under way and go to the Three Gorges. They would get orders by and bye. Then he appointed four armies with two leaders over each:
the first body was under Jiang Qin and Zhou Tai; the second, Pan Zhang and Ling Tong; the third, Taishi Ci and Lu Meng; the fourth, Lu Xun and Dong Xi.
Lu Fan and Zhu Zhi were appointed inspectors, to move from place to place and keep the various units up to their work and acting with due regard to the general plan.
Land and marine forces were to move simultaneously. The expedition would soon start. Having received their orders, each returned to his command and busied himself in preparation.
Cheng Zi, the son of Cheng Pu, returned and told his father what arrangements had been made, and Cheng Pu was amazed at Zhou Yu's skill.
Said he, “I have always despised Zhou Yu as a mere student who would never be a general, but this shows that he has a leader's talent.
I must support him.” So Cheng Pu went over to the quarters of the Commander-in-Chief and confessed his fault.
He was received kindly and all was over.
Next Zhou Yu sent for Zhuge Jin and said to him, “Evidently your brother is a genius, a man born to be a king's counselor. Why then does he serve Liu Bei?
Now that he is here, I wish you to use every effort to persuade him to stay with us. Thus our lord would gain able support and you two brothers would be together, which would be pleasant for you both. I wish you success.” Zhuge Jin replied, “I am ashamed of the little service I have rendered since I came here, and I can do no other than obey your command to the best of my ability.” Thereupon he went away to his brother, whom he found in the guest-house.
The younger brother received him; and when he had reached the inner rooms, Zhuge Liang bowed respectfully and, weeping, told his experiences since they parted and his sorrow at their separation.
Then Zhuge Jin, weeping also, said, “Brother, do you remember the story of Bo Yi and Shu Qi, the brothers who would not be separated?” “Ah, Zhou Yu has sent him to talk me over,” thought Zhuge Liang.
So he replied, “They were two of the noble people of old days; yes, I know.” “Those two, although they perished of hunger near the Shouyang Hills, yet never separated.
You and I, born of the same mother and suckled at the same breast, yet serve different masters and never meet.
Are you not ashamed when you think of such examples as Bo Yi and Shu Qi?” Zhuge Liang replied, “You are talking now of love, but what I stand for is duty.
We are both men of Han, and Liu Bei is of the family.
If you, Brother, could leave the South Land and join me in serving the rightful branch, then on the one side we should be honored as Ministers of Han, and on the other we should be together as people of the same flesh and blood should be. Thus love and duty would both receive their proper meed.
What do you think of it, my brother?” “I came to persuade him and lo!
It is I who is being talked over,” thought Zhuge Jin.
He had no fitting reply to make, so he rose and took his leave.
Returning to Zhou Yu, he related the story of the interview.
“What do you think?” asked Zhou Yu.
“General Sun Quan has treated me with great kindness, and I could not turn my back on him,” replied Zhuge Jin.
“Since you decide to remain loyal, there is no need to say much; I think I have a plan to win over your brother.” The wisest people see eye to eye, For each but sees the right; But should their several interests clash, They all the fiercer fight.
The means by which Zhou Yu tried to get the support of Zhuge Liang will be described in the next chapter. CHAPTER 45.
In The Three Gorges, Cao Cao Loses Soldiers; In The Meeting Of Heroes, Jiang Gan Is Lured Into A Ruse. Zhou Yu was very annoyed by the words of Zhuge Jin, and a fierce hatred for Zhuge Liang took root in his heart.
He nourished a secret resolve to make away with Zhuge Liang. He continued his preparations for war, and when the troops were all mustered and ready, he went in for a farewell interview with his lord.
“You go on first, Noble Sir,” said Sun Quan.
“I will then march to support you.” Zhou Yu took his leave and then, with Cheng Pu and Lu Su, marched out with the army. He invited Zhuge Liang to accompany the expedition, and when Zhuge Liang cheerfully accepted, the four embarked in the same ship.
They set sail, and the flotilla made for Xiakou.
About twenty miles from Three Gorges the fleet anchored near the shore, and Zhou Yu built a stockade on the bank near the middle of their line with the Western Hills as a support. Other camps were made near his. Zhuge Liang, however, took up his quarters in a small ship.
When the camp dispositions were complete, Zhou Yu sent to request Zhuge Liang to come and give him advice.
Zhuge Liang came; and after the salutations were ended, Zhou Yu said, “Cao Cao, though he had fewer troops than Yuan Shao, nevertheless overcame Yuan Shao because he followed the advice given by Xun You to destroy Yuan Shao's supplies at Wuchao.
Now Cao Cao has over eight hundred thousand troops while I have but fifty or sixty thousand.
In order to defeat him, his supplies must be destroyed first.
I have found out that the main depot is at the Iron Pile Mountains.
As you have lived hereabout, you know the topography quite well, and I wish to entrust the task of cutting off supplies to you and your colleagues Guan Yu, Zhang Fei, and Zhao Yun. I will assist you with a thousand soldiers. I wish you to start without delay.
In this way we can best serve our masters.” Zhuge Liang saw through this at once.
He thought to himself, “This is a ruse in revenge for my not having been persuaded to enter the service of the South Land.
If I refuse, I shall be laughed at. So I will do as he asks and trust to find some means of deliverance from the evil he intends.” Therefore Zhuge Liang accepted the task with alacrity, much to the joy of Zhou Yu.
After the leader of the expedition had taken his leave, Lu Su went to Zhou Yu secretly and said, “Why have you set him this task?” “Because I wish to compass his death without appearing ridiculous. I hope to get him killed by the hand of Cao Cao and prevent his doing further mischief.” Lu Su left and went to see Zhuge Liang to find out if he suspected anything.
Lu Su found him looking quite unconcerned and getting the soldiers ready to march.
Unable to let Zhuge Liang go without a warning, however, Lu Su put a tentative question, “Do you think this expedition will succeed?” Zhuge Liang laughingly replied, “I am an adept at all sorts of fighting, with foot, horse, and chariots on land and marines on the water. There is no doubt of my success.
I am not like you and your friend, only capable in one direction.” “What do you mean by our being capable only in one direction?” said Lu Su. “I have heard the street children in your country singing:
“To lay an ambush, hold a pass, Lu Su is the man to choose; But when you on the water fight, Zhou Yu is the man to use.
“You are only fit for ambushes and guarding passes on land, just as Zhou Yu only understands fighting on the water.” Lu Su carried this story to Zhou Yu, which only incensed him the more against Zhuge Liang.
“How dare he flout me, saying I cannot fight a land battle?
I will not let him go.
I will go myself with ten thousand troops and cut off Cao Cao's supplies.” Lu Su went back and told this to Zhuge Liang, who smiled and said, “Zhou Yu only wanted me to go on this expedition because he wanted Cao Cao to kill me.
And so I teased him a little. But he cannot bear that. Now is the critical moment, and Marquis Sun Quan and my master must act in harmony if we are to succeed.
If each one tries to harm the other, the whole scheme will fail.
Cao Cao is no fool, and it is he who usually attack enemies through cutting off their supplies. Do you not think Cao Cao has already taken double precautions against any surprise of his own depot?
If Zhou Yu tries, he will be taken prisoner.
What he ought to do is to bring about a decisive naval battle, whereby to dishearten the northern soldiers, and then find some other means to defeat them utterly.
If you could persuade him what his best course was, it would be well.” Without loss of time, Lu Su went to Zhou Yu to relate what Zhuge Liang had told him.
Zhou Yu shook his head when he heard it and beat the ground with his foot, saying, “This man is far too clever; he beats me ten to one.
He will have to be done away with or my country will suffer.” Said Lu Su, “This is the moment to use people; you must think of the country's good first of all.
When once Cao Cao is defeated, you may do as you please.” Zhou Yu had to confess the reasonableness of this.
Liu Bei had ordered his nephew Liu Qi to hold Jiangxia while he and the bulk of the army returned to Xiakou.
Thence he saw the opposite bank thick with banners and flags and glittering with every kind of arms and armor. He knew then that the expedition from the South Land had started. So he moved all his force from Jiangxia to Fankou.
Then he assembled his officers and said to them, “Zhuge Liang went to Wu some time ago, and no word has come from him, so I know not how the business stands.
Will any one volunteer to go to find out?” “I will go,” said Mi Zhu.
So presents were prepared and gifts of flesh and wine, and Mi Zhu prepared to journey to the South Land on the pretext of offering a congratulatory feast to the army.
He set out in a small ship and went down river.
He stopped opposite the camp, and the soldiers reported his arrival to Zhou Yu, who ordered him to be brought in.
Mi Zhu bowed low and expressed the respect which Liu Bei had for Zhou Yu and offered the various gifts.
The ceremony of reception was followed by a banquet in honor of the guest.
Mi Zhu said, “Zhuge Liang has been here a long time, and I desire that he may return with me.” “Zhuge Liang is making plans with me, and I could not let him return,” said Zhou Yu.
“I also wish to see Liu Bei that we may make joint plans; but when one is at the head of a great army, one cannot get away even for a moment.
If your master would only come here, it would be very gracious on his part.” Mi Zhu agreed that Liu Bei might come and presently took his leave.
Then Lu Su asked Zhou Yu, “What is your reason for desiring Liu Bei to come?” “Liu Bei is the one bold and dangerous man and must be removed.
I am taking this opportunity to persuade him to come; and when he shall be slain, a great danger will cease to threaten our country.” Lu Su tried to dissuade him from this scheme, but Zhou Yu was deaf to all Lu Su said. Zhou Yu even issued orders:
“Arrange half a hundred executioners to be ready to hide within the lining of the tent if Liu Bei decides to come; and when I drop a cup, that will be a signal for them to fall on and slay him.” Mi Zhu returned and told Liu Bei that his presence was desired by Zhou Yu. Suspecting nothing, Liu Bei at once ordered them to prepare a fast vessel to take him without loss of time.
Guan Yu was opposed to his going, saying, “Zhou Yu is artful and treacherous, and there is no news from Zhuge Liang. Pray think more carefully.” Liu Bei replied, “I have joined my forces to theirs in this attack on our common enemy.
If Zhou Yu wishes to see me and I refuse to go, it is a betrayal.
Nothing will succeed if both sides nourish suspicions.” “If you have finally decided to go, then will I go with you,” said Guan Yu.
“And I also,” cried Zhang Fei.
But Liu Bei said, “Let Guan Yu come with me while you and Zhao Yun keep guard.
Jian Yong will hold Exian.
I shall not be away long.” So leaving these orders, Liu Bei embarked with Guan Yu on a small boat. The escort did not exceed twenty. The light craft traveled very quickly down the river.
Liu Bei rejoiced greatly at the sight of the war vessels in tiers by the bank, the soldiers in their breastplates, and all the pomp and panoply of war. All was in excellent order. As soon as he arrived, the guards ran to tell Zhou Yu.
“How many ships has he?” asked Zhou Yu.
They replied, “Only one; and the escort is only about a score.” “His fate is sealed,” said Zhou Yu.
Zhou Yu sent for the executioners and placed them in hiding between the outer and inner tents, and when all was arranged for the assassination he contemplated, he went out to receive his visitor. Liu Bei came with his brother and escort into the midst of the army to the Commander's tent.
After the salutations, Zhou Yu wished Liu Bei to take the upper seat, but he declined saying, “General, you are famous through all the empire, while I am a nobody. Do not overwhelm me with too great deference.” So they took the positions of simple friends, and refreshments were brought in.
Now by chance Zhuge Liang came on shore and heard that his master had arrived and was with the Commander-in-Chief. The news gave Zhuge Liang a great shock, and he said to himself, “What is to be done now?” He made his way to the reception tent and stole a look therein.
He saw murder written on Zhou Yu's countenance and noted the assassins hidden within the walls of the tent.
Then he got a look at Liu Bei, who was laughing and talking quite unconcernedly.
But when he noticed the redoubtable figure of Guan Yu near his master's side, he became quite calm and contented.
“My lord faces no danger,” said Zhuge Liang, and he went away to the river bank to await the end of the interview.
Meanwhile the banquet of welcome proceeded. After the wine had gone around several times, Zhou Yu picked up a cup to give the signal agreed upon. But at that moment Zhou Yu saw so fierce a look upon the face of the trusty henchman who stood, sword in hand, behind his guest, that Zhou Yu hesitated and hastily asked who he was.
“That is my brother, Guan Yu,” replied Liu Bei.
Zhou Yu, quite startled, said, “Is he the slayer of Yan Liang and Wen Chou?” “Exactly; he it is,” replied Liu Bei.
The sweat of fear broke out all over Zhou Yu's body and trickled down his back. Then, nearly spilling it, he poured out a cup of wine and presented it to Guan Yu.
Just then Lu Su came in, and Liu Bei said to him, “Where is Zhuge Liang?
I would trouble you to ask him to come.” “Wait till we have defeated Cao Cao,” said Zhou Yu, “then you shall see him.” Liu Bei dared not repeat his request, but Guan Yu gave him a meaningful look which Liu Bei understood and rose, saying, “I would take leave now; I will come again to congratulate you when the enemy has been defeated and your success shall be complete.” Zhou Yu did not press him to remain, but escorted him to the great gates of the camp, and Liu Bei left.
When he reached the river bank, they found Zhuge Liang awaiting them in their boat.
Liu Bei was exceedingly pleased, but Zhuge Liang said, “Sir, do you know in how great danger you were today?” Suddenly sobered, Liu Bei said, “No; I did not think of danger.” “If Guan Yu had not been there, you would have been killed,” said Zhuge Liang. Liu Bei, after a moment's reflection, saw that it was true.
He begged Zhuge Liang to return with him to Fankou, but Zhuge Liang refused. “I am quite safe,” said Zhuge Liang.
“Although I am living in the tiger's mouth, I am as steady as the Taishan Mountains.
Now, my lord, return and prepare your ships and soldiers.
On the twentieth day of the eleventh month, send Zhao Yun with a small ship to the south bank to wait for me. Be sure there is no miscarriage.” “What are your intentions?” said Liu Bei.
“When the southeast wind begins, I shall return.” Liu Bei would have questioned him further, but Zhuge Liang pressed him to go. So the boat started up river again, while Zhuge Liang returned to his temporary lodging.
The boat had not proceeded far when appeared a small fleet of fifty ships sweeping down with the current, and in the prow of the leading vessel stood a tall figure armed with a spear. Guan Yu was ready to fight.
But when they were near, they recognized that was Zhang Fei, who had come down fearing lest his brother might be in some difficulty from which the strong arm of Guan Yu might even be insufficient to rescue him.
The three brothers thus returned together.
After Zhou Yu, having escorted Liu Bei to the gate of his camp, had returned to his quarters, Lu Su soon came to see him. “Then you had cajoled Liu Bei into coming, why did you not carry out your plan?” asked Lu Su. “Because of that Guan Yu; he is a very tiger, and he never left his brother for a moment.
If anything had been attempted, he would certainly have had my life.” Lu Su knew that Zhou Yu spoke the truth.
Then suddenly they announced a messenger with a letter from Cao Cao. Zhou Yu ordered them to bring him in and took the letter.
But when he saw the superscription “The First Minister of Han to Commander-in-Chief Zhou Yu", he fell into a frenzy of rage, tore the letter to fragments, and threw them on the ground. “To death with this fellow!” cried he.
“When two countries are at war, their emissaries are not slain,” said Lu Su.
“Messengers are slain to show one's dignity and independence,” replied Zhou Yu.
The unhappy bearer of the letter was decapitated, and his head sent back to Cao Cao by the hands of his escort. Zhou Yu then decided to move.
The van under Gan Ning was to advance, supported by two wings led by Han Dang and Jiang Qin.
Zhou Yu would lead the center body in support.
The next morning the early meal was eaten in the fourth watch, and the ships got under weigh in the fifth with a great beating of drums. Cao Cao was greatly angered when he heard that his letter had been torn to fragments, and he resolved to attack forthwith.
His advance was led by the Supreme Admiral Cai Mao, the Vice-Admiral Zhang Yun, and others of the Jingzhou officers who had joined his side.
Cao Cao went as hastily as possible to the meeting of the three rivers and saw the ships of the South Land sailing up.
In the bow of the foremost ship stood a fine figure of a warrior who cried, “I am Gan Ning; I challenge any one to combat.” Cai Mao sent his young brother, Cai Xun, to accept the challenge; but as Cai Xun's ship approached, Gan Ning shot an arrow and Cai Xun fell.
Gan Ning pressed forward, his crossbowmen keeping up a heavy discharge which Cao Cao's troops could not stand.
The wings of Han Dang from the left and Jiang Qin from the right also joined in.
Cao Cao's soldiers, being mostly from the dry plains of the north, did not know how to fight effectually on water, and the southern ships had the battle all their own way. The slaughter was very great. However, after a contest lasting till afternoon, Zhou Yu thought it more prudent, in view of the superior numbers of his enemy, not to risk further the advantage he had gained.
So he beat the gongs as the signal to cease battle and recall the ships.
Cao Cao was worsted, but his ships returned to the bank, where a camp was made and order was restored.
Cao Cao sent for his defeated leaders and reproached them, saying, “You did not do your best.
You let an inferior force overcome you.” Cai Mao defended himself, saying, “The Jingzhou marines have not been exercised for a long time, and the others have never been trained for naval warfare at all.
A naval camp must be instituted, the northern soldiers trained and the Jingzhou force drilled.
When they have been made efficient, they will win victories.” “If you know what should be done, why have you not done it?” said Cao Cao. “What is the use of telling me this?
Get to work.” So Cai Mao and Zhang Yun organized a naval camp on the river bank.
They established twenty-four “Water Gates,” with the large ships outside as a sort of rampart, and under their protection the smaller ships went to and fro freely. At night when the lanterns and torches were lit, the very sky was illuminated, and the water shone red with the glare.
On land the smoke of the camp fires could be traced for one hundred mile without a break.
Zhou Yu returned to camp and feasted his victorious fighting force. A messenger bore the joyful tidings of victory to his master Sun Quan.
When night fell, Zhou Yu went up to the summit of one of the hills and looked out over the long line of bright lights stretching toward the west, showing the extent of the enemy's camp. He said nothing, but a great fear came in upon him.
Next day Zhou Yu decided that he would go in person to find out the strength of the enemy. So he bade them prepare a small squadron which he manned with strong, hardy men armed with powerful bows and stiff crossbows. He also placed musicians on each ship. They set sail and started up the stream.
When they got opposite Cao Cao's camp, the heavy stones that served as anchors were dropped, and the music was played while Zhou Yu scanned the enemy's naval camp. What he saw gave him no satisfaction, for everything was most admirable. He said, “How well and correctly built is that naval base! Any one knows the names of those in command?” “They are Cai Mao and Zhang Yun,” said his officers.
“They have lived in our country a long time,” said Zhou Yu, “and are thoroughly experienced in naval warfare.
I must find some means of removing them before I can effect anything.” Meanwhile on shore the sentinels had told Cao Cao that the enemy crafts were spying upon them, and Cao Cao ordered out some ships to capture the spies.
Zhou Yu saw the commotion of the commanding flags on shore and hastily gave the order to unmoor and sail down stream. The squadron at once got under way and scattered; to and fro went the oars, and each ship seemed to fly.
Before Cao Cao's ships could get out after them, they were all far away. Cao Cao's ships took up the chase but soon saw pursuit was useless. They returned and reported their failure.
Again Cao Cao found fault with his officers and said, “The other day you lost a battle, and the soldiers were greatly dispirited.
Now the enemy have spied out our camp. What can be done?” In eager response to his question one stepped out, saying, “When I was a youth, Zhou Yu and I were fellow students and pledged friends.
My threeinch tongue is still good, and I will go over and persuade him to surrender.” Cao Cao, rejoiced to find so speedy a solution, looked at the speaker.
It was Jiang Gan of Jiujiang, one of the counseling staff in the camp.
“Are you a good friend of Zhou Yu?” said Cao Cao.
“Rest content, O Prime Minister,” replied Jiang Gan.
“If I only get on the other side of the river, I shall succeed.” “What preparations are necessary?” asked Cao Cao.
“Just a youth as my servant and a couple of rowers; nothing else.” Cao Cao offered him wine, wished him success, and sent him on his way.
Clad in a simple white robe and seated in his little craft, the messenger reached Zhou Yu's camp and bade the guards say that an old friend Jiang Gan wished to see him.
The commander was in his tent at a council when the message came, and he laughed as he said to those about him, “A persuader is coming.” Then he whispered certain instructions in the ear of each one of them, and they went out to await his arrival. Zhou Yu received his friend in full ceremonial garb.
A crowd of officers in rich silken robes were about him.
The guest appeared, his sole attendant a lad dressed in a simple blue gown.
Jiang Gan bore himself proudly as he advanced, and Zhou Yu made a low obeisance. “You have been well I hope since last we met,” said Jiang Gan.
“You have wandered far and suffered much in this task of emissary in Cao Cao's cause,” said Zhou Yu.
“I have not seen you for a very long time,” said the envoy much taken aback, “and I came to visit you for the sake of old times.
Why do you call me an emissary for the Cao Cao's cause?” “Though I am not so profound a musician as Shi Kuang of old, yet I can comprehend the thought behind the music,” replied Zhou Yu.
“As you choose to treat your old friend like this, I think I will take my leave,” said Jiang Gan.
Zhou Yu laughed again, and taking Jiang Gan by the arm, said, “Well, I feared you might be coming on his behalf to try to persuade me.
But if this is not your intention, you need not go away so hastily.” So they two entered the tent; and when they had exchanged salutes and were seated as friends, Zhou Yu bade them call his officers that he might introduce them.
They soon appeared civil and military officials, all dressed in their best.
The military officers were clad in glittering silver armor and the staff looked very imposing as they stood ranged in two lines. The visitor was introduced to them all.
Presently a banquet was spread, and while they feasted, the musicians played songs of victory and the wine circulated merrily.
Under its mellowing influence, Zhou Yu's reserve seemed to thaw and he said, “Jiang Gan is an old fellow student of mine, and we are pledged friends. Though he has arrived here from the north, he is no artful pleader so you need not be afraid of him.” Then Zhou Yu took off the commanding sword which he wore as Commander-in-Chief and handed it to Taishi Ci, saying, “You take this and wear it for the day as master of the feast.
This day we meet only as friends and speak only of friendship, and if any one shall begin a discussion of the questions at issue between Cao Cao and our country, just slay him.” Taishi Ci took the sword and seated himself in his place.
Jiang Gan was not a little overcome, but he said no word.
Zhou Yu said, “Since I assumed command, I have tasted no drop of wine, but today as an old friend is present and there is no reason to fear him; I am going to drink freely.” So saying he quaffed a huge goblet and laughed loudly.
The rhinoceros cups went swiftly round from guest to guest till all were half drunk. Then Zhou Yu, laying hold of the guest's hand, led him outside the tent.
The guards who stood around all braced themselves up and seized their shinning weapons.
“Do you not think my soldiers a fine lot of fellows?” said Zhou Yu.
“Strong as bears and bold as tigers,” replied Jiang Gan. Then Zhou Yu led him to the rear of the tent whence he saw the grain and forage piled up in mountainous heaps.
“Do you not think I have a fairly good store of grain and forage?” “Your troops are brave and your supplies ample; the world's rumor is not unfounded.” Zhou Yu pretended to be quite intoxicated and went on, “When you and I were students together, we never looked forward to a day like this, did we?” “For a genius like you, it is nothing extraordinary,” said the guest. Zhou Yu again seized his hand and they sat down.
“A man of the time, I have found a proper lord to serve. In his service, we rely upon the right feeling between minister and prince outside, and at home we are firm in the kindly feeling of relatives. He listens to my words and follows my plans. We share the same good or evil fortune.
Even when the great old persuaders like Su Qin, Zhang Yi, Lu Jia, and Li Yiji lived again, even when their words poured forth like a rushing river, their tongues were as a sharp sword, it is impossible to move such as I am!” Zhou Yu burst into a loud laugh as he finished, and Jiang Gan's face had become clay-colored.
Zhou Yu then led his guest back into the tent, and again they fell to drinking.
Presently Zhou Yu pointed to the others at table and said, “These are all the best and bravest of the land of the south; one might call this the 'Meeting of Heroes.'“ They drank on till daylight failed and continued after lamps had been lit. Zhou Yu even gave an exhibition of sword play and sang this song:
When a man is in the world, O, He ought to do his best.
And when he's done his best, O. He ought to have his rest.
And when I have my rest, O, I'll quaff my wine with zest.
And when I'm drunk as drunk can be, O, I'll sing the madman's litany.
A burst of applause greeted the song. By this time it was getting late, and the guest begged to be excused.
“The wine is too much for me,” said Jiang Gan.
His host bade them clear the table; and as all the others left, Zhou Yu said, “It has been many a day since I shared a couch with my friend, but we will do so tonight.” Putting on the appearance of irresponsible intoxication, he led Jiang Gan into the tent and they went to bed.
Zhou Yu simply fell, all dressed as he was, and lay there emitting uncouth grunts and groans, so that to the guest sleep was impossible. Jiang Gan lay and listened to the various camp noises without and his host's thunderous snores within.
About the second watch he rose and looked at his friend by the dim light of the small lamp.
He also saw on the table a heap of papers, and coming out and looking at them furtively, he saw they were letters. Among them he saw one marked as coming from Cai Mao and Zhang Yun, Cao Cao's Supreme Admiral and Vice-Admiral. He read it and this is what it said:
“We surrendered to Cao Cao, not for the sake of pay but under stress of circumstances.
Now we have been able to hold these northern soldiers into this naval camp but, as soon as occasion offers, we mean to have the rebel's head to offer as a sacrifice to your banner.
From time to time there will be reports as occasions serve, but you may trust us.
This is our humble reply to your letter.” “Those two were connected with the South Land in the beginning,” thought Jiang Gan, so he secreted the letter in his dress and began to examine the others.
But at that moment Zhou Yu turned over, and so Jiang Gan hastily blew out the light and went to his couch.
Zhou Yu was muttering as he lay there as if dreaming, saying, “Friend, I am going to let you see Cao Cao's head in a day or two.” Jiang Gan hastily made some reply to load on his host to say more.
Then came, “Wait a few days; you will see Cao Cao's head.
The old wretch!” Jiang Gan tried to question him as to what he meant, but Zhou Yu was fast asleep and seemed to hear nothing.
Jiang Gan lay there on his couch wide awake till the fourth watch was beating.
Then some one came in, saying, “General, are you awake?” At that moment as if suddenly awakened from the deepest slumber, Zhou Yu started up and said, “Who is this on the couch?” The voice replied, “Do you not remember, General?
You asked your old friend to stay the night with you; it is he, of course.” “I drank too much last night,” said Zhou Yu in a regretful tone, “and I forgot. I seldom indulge to excess and am not used to it. Perhaps I said many things I ought not.” The voice went on, “A man has arrived from the north.” “Speak lower,” said Zhou Yu, and turning toward the sleeper, he called him by name.
But Jiang Gan affected to be sound asleep and made no sign.
Zhou Yu crept out of the tent, while Jiang Gan listened with all his ears.
He heard the man say, “Cai Mao and Zhang Yun, the two commanders, have come.” But listening as he did with straining ears, he could not make out what followed.
Soon after Zhou Yu reentered and again called out his companion's name.
But no reply came, for Jiang Gan was pretending to be in the deepest slumber and to hear nothing.
Then Zhou Yu undressed and went to bed.
As Jiang Gan lay awake, he remembered that Zhou Yu was known to be meticulously careful in affairs, and if in the morning Zhou Yu found that a letter had disappeared, he would certainly slay the offender.
So Jiang Gan lay there till near daylight and then called out to his host.
Getting no reply, he rose, dressed, and stole out of the tent. Then he called his servant and made for the camp gate.
“Whither are you going, Sir?” said the watchmen at the gate.
“I fear I am in the way here,” replied Jiang Gan, “and so I have taken leave of the Commander-in-Chief for a time. So do not stop me.” He found his way to the river bank and reembarked.
Then, with flying oars, he hastened back to Cao Cao's camp.
When he arrived, Cao Cao asked at once how he had sped, and he had to acknowledge failure.
“Zhou Yu is very clever and perfectly high-minded,” said Jiang Gan.
“Nothing that I could say moved him in the least.” “Your failure makes me look ridiculous,” said Cao Cao.
“Well, if I did not win over Zhou Yu, I found out something for you.
Send away these people and I will tell you,” said Jiang Gan.
The servants were dismissed, and then Jiang Gan produced the letter he had stolen from Zhou Yu's tent. He gave it to Cao Cao. Cao Cao was very angry and sent for Cai Mao and Zhang Yun at once.
As soon as they appeared, he said, “I want you two to attack.” Cai Mao replied, “But the soldiers are not yet sufficiently trained.” “The soldiers will be well enough trained when you have sent my head to Zhou Yu, eh?” Both commanders were dumb-founded, having not the least idea what this meant. They remained silent for they had nothing to say.
Cao Cao bade the executioners lead them away to instant death. In a short time their heads were produced.
By this time Cao Cao had thought over the matter, and it dawned upon him that he had been tricked. A poem says:
No one could stand against Cao Cao, Of sin he had full share, But Zhou Yu was more treacherous, And caught him in a snare. Two commanders to save their lives, Betrayed a former lord, Soon after, as was very met. Both fell beneath the sword.
The death of these two naval commanders caused much consternation in the camp, and all their colleagues asked the reason for their sudden execution. Though Cao Cao knew they had been victimized, he would not acknowledge it.
So he said, “These two had been remiss, and so had been put to death.” The others were aghast, but nothing could be done.
Two other officers, Mao Jie and Yu Jin, were put in command of the naval camp. Spies took the news to Zhou Yu, who was delighted at the success of his ruse.
“Those two Cai Mao and Zhang Yun were my only source of anxiety,” said he.
“Now they are gone; I am quite happy.” Lu Su said, “General, if you can continue like this, you need not fear Cao Cao.” “I do not think any of them saw my game,” said Zhou Yu, except Zhuge Liang.
He beats me, and I do not think this ruse was hidden from him. You go and sound him.
See if he knew.” Zhou Yu's treacherous plot succeeded well, Dissension sown, his rivals fell.
Drunk with success was he, but sought To know what cynic Zhuge Liang thought. What passed between Lu Su and Zhuge Liang will next be related. CHAPTER 46.
Using Strategy, Zhuge Liang Borrows Arrows; Joining A Ruse, Huang Gai Accepts Punishment.
Lu Su departed on his mission and found Zhuge Liang seated in his little craft.
“There has been so much to do that I have not been able to come to listen to your instructions,” said Lu Su.
“That is truly so,” said Zhuge Liang, “and I have not yet congratulated the Commander-in-Chief.” “What have you wished to congratulate him upon?” “Why Sir, the matter upon which he sent you to find out whether I knew about it or not.
Indeed I can congratulate him on that.” Lu Su turned pale and gasped, saying, “But how did you know, Master?” “The ruse succeeded well thus played off on Jiang Gan.
Cao Cao has been taken in this once, but he will soon rise to it. Only he will not confess his mistake.
However, the two men are gone, and your country is freed from a grave anxiety. Do you not think that is a matter for congratulation?
I hear Mao Jie and Yu Jin are the new admirals, and in their hands lie both good and evil for the fate of the northern fleet.” Lu Su was quite dumbfounded; he stayed a little time longer passing the time in making empty remarks, and then took his leave.
As he was going away, Zhuge Liang cautioned him, saying, “Do not let Zhou Yu know that I know his ruse.
If you let him know, he will seek some chance to do me harm.” Lu Su promised; nevertheless he went straight to his chief and related the whole thing just as it happened.
“Really he must be got rid of;” said Zhou Yu, “I have quite decided to put the man out of the way.” “If you slay him, will not Cao Cao laugh at you?” “Oh, no; I will find a legitimate way of getting rid of him so that he shall go to his death without resentment.” “But how can you find a legitimate way of assassinating him?” “Do not ask too much; you will see presently.” Soon after all the officers were summoned to the main tent, and Zhuge Liang's presence was desired. He went contentedly enough.
When all were seated, Zhou Yu suddenly addressed Zhuge Liang, saying, “I am going to fight a battle with the enemy soon on the water:
what weapons are the best?” “On a great river arrows are the best,” said Zhuge Liang. “Your opinion and mine agree.
But at the moment we are short of them. I wish you would undertake to supply about a hundred thousand arrows for the naval fight.
As it is for the public service, you will not decline, I hope'“ “Whatever task the Commander-in-Chief lays upon me, I must certainly try to perform,” replied Zhuge Liang.
“May I inquire by what date you require the hundred thousand arrows?” “Could you have them ready in ten days?” “The enemy will be here very soon; ten days will be too late,” said Zhuge Liang.
“In how many days do you estimate the arrows can be ready?” “Let me have three days; then you may send for your hundred thousand.” “No joking, remember!” said Zhou Yu. “There is no joking in war time.” “Dare I joke with the Commander-in-Chief?
Give me a formal military order; and if I have not completed the task in three days, I will take my punishment.” Zhou Yu, secretly delighted, sent for the secretaries and prepared the commission then and there.
Then he drank to the success of the undertaking and said, “I shall have to congratulate you most heartily when this is accomplished.” “This day is too late to count,” said Zhuge Liang.
“On the third from tomorrow morning send five hundred small boats to the river side to convey the arrows.” They drank a few more cups together, and then Zhuge Liang took his leave.
After he had gone, Lu Su said, “Do you not think there is some deceit about this?” “Clearly it is not I!
It is he who has signed his own death warrant,” said Zhou Yu. “Without being pressed in the least, he asked for a formal order in the face of the whole assembly.
Even if he grew a pair of wings, he could not escape.
Only I will just order the workers to delay him as much as they can, and not supply him with materials, so that he is sure to fail.
And then, when the certain penalty is incurred, who can criticize?
You can go and inquire about it all and keep me informed.” So off went Lu Su to seek Zhuge Liang, who at once reproached him with having blabbed about the former business.
Zhuge Liang said, “He wants to hurt me, as you know, and I did not think you could not keep my secret.
And now there is what you saw today and how do you think I can get a hundred thousand arrows made in three days?
You will simply have to rescue me.” “You brought the misfortune on yourself, and how can I rescue you?” said Lu Su.
“I look to you for the loan of twenty vessels, manned each by thirty people. I want blue cotton screens and bundles of straw lashed to the sides of the boats.
I have good use for them.
On the third day, I have undertaken to deliver the fixed number of arrows.
But on no account must you let Zhou Yu know, or my scheme will be wrecked.” Lu Su consented and this time he kept his word.
He went to report to his chief as usual, but he said nothing about the boats. He only said, “Zhuge Liang is not using bamboo or feathers or glue or varnish, but has some other way of getting arrows.” “Let us await the three days' limit,” said Zhou Yu, puzzled though confident.
On his side Lu Su quietly prepared a score of light swift boats, each with its crew and the blue screens and bundles of grass complete and, when these were ready, he placed them at Zhuge Liang's disposal.
Zhuge Liang did nothing on the first day, nor on the second.
On the third day at the middle of the fourth watch, Zhuge Liang sent a private message asking Lu Su to come to his boat.
“Why have you sent for me, Sir?” asked Lu Su.
“I want you to go with me to get those arrows.” “Whither are you going?” “Do not ask; you will see.” Then the twenty boats were fastened together by long ropes and moved over to the north bank.
The night proved very foggy and the mist was very dense along the river, so that one person could scarcely see another.
In spite of the fog, Zhuge Liang urged the boats forward as if into the vast fairy kingdom.
There is a poem on these river fogs: Mighty indeed is the Great River!
Rising far in the west, in the Omei and Min Mountains, Plowing its way through Wu, east flowing, resistless, Swelled by its nine tributary streams, rolling down from the far north, Aided and helped by a hundred rivulets swirling and foaming, Ocean receives it at last welcoming, joyful, its waters.
Therein abide sea nymphs and water gods, Enormous whales a thousand fathoms long, Nine-headed monstrous beasts, reptiles and octopi, Demons and uncouth creatures wondrous strange.
In faith it is the home and safe retreat Of devils and sprites, and wondrous growths, And eke the battle ground of valiant humans.
At times occur strange strife of elements, When darkness strives on light's domains that encroach, Whereat arises in the vaulted dome of blue White wreaths of fog that toward the center roll. Then darkness falls, too dense for any torch Illumine; only clanging sounds can pass.
The fog at first appears, a vaporous wreath Scarce visible.
But thickening fast, it veils The southern hills, the painted leopard's home.
And spreads afar, until the northern sea Leviathans are amazed and lose their course.
And denser yet it touches on the sky. And spreads a heavy mantle over the earth.
Then, wide as is the high pitched arch of heaven, Therein appears no single rift of blue.
Now mighty whales lead up their spouses to sport Upon the waves, the sinuous dragons dive Deep down and, breathing, swell the heaving sea, The earth is moist as with the early rains, And spring's creative energy is chilled.
Both far and wide and high the damp fog spreads, Great cities on the eastern bank are hid, Wide ports and mountains in the south are lost, Whole fleets of battle ships, a thousand keels, Hide in the misty depths; frail fishing boats High riding on a wave are seen—and lost.
The gloom increases and the domed sky Grows dark and darker as the sun's light fails.
The daylight dies, dim twilight's reign begins, The ruddy hills dissolve and lose their hue.
The skill of matchless King Yu would fail to sound The depth and height; and Li Lou's eye, though keen, Could never pierce this gloom. Now is the time, O sea and river gods, to use your powers.
The gliding fish and creeping water folk Are lost; there is no track for bird or beast.
Fair Penglai Isles are hidden from our sight, The lofty gates of heaven have disappeared.
Nature is blurred and indistinct, as when A driving rain storm hurries over the earth.
And then, perhaps, within the heavy haze, A noisome serpent vents his venom foul And plagues descend, or impish demons work Their wicked wills.
Ills fall on humans but do not stay, Heaven's cleansing breath sweeps them sway, But while they last the mean ones cry, The nobler suffer silently.
The greatest turmoil is a sign Of quick return to state benign.
The little fleet reached Cao Cao's naval camp about the fifth watch, and Zhuge Liang gave orders to form line lying prows west, and then to beat the drums and shout. “But what shall we do if they attack us?” exclaimed Lu Su.
Zhuge Liang replied with a smile, “I think their fleet will not venture out in this fog; go on with your wine and let us be happy.
We will go back when the fog lifts.” As soon as the shouting from the river was heard by those in the camp, the two admirals, Mao Jie and Yu Jin, ran off to report to Cao Cao, who said, “Coming up in a fog like this means that they have prepared an ambush for us. Do not go out, but get all the force together and shoot at them.” He also sent orders to the ground camps to dispatch six thousand of archers and crossbowmen to aid the marines.
The naval forces were then lined up shooting on the bank to prevent a landing.
Presently the soldiers arrived, and ten thousand and more soldiers were shooting down into the river, where the arrows fell like rain.
By and bye Zhuge Liang ordered the boats to turn round so that their prows pointed east and to go closer in so that many arrows might hit them.
Zhuge Liang ordered the drums to be kept beating till the sun was high and the fog began to disperse, when the boats got under way and sailed down stream.
The whole twenty boats were bristling with arrows on both sides.
As they left, Zhuge Liang asked all the crews to shout derisively, “We thank you, Sir Prime Minister, for the arrows.” They told Cao Cao, but by the time he came, the light boats helped by the swift current were seven miles long down the river and pursuit was impossible.
Cao Cao saw that he had been duped and was very sorry, but there was no help for it.
On the way down Zhuge Liang said to his companion, “Every boat must have five or six thousand arrows and so, without the expenditure of an ounce of energy, we must have more than ten myriad arrows, which tomorrow can be shot back again at Cao Cao's army to his great inconvenience.” “You are really superhuman,” said Lu Su.
“But how did you know there would be a thick fog today?” “One cannot be a leader without knowing the workings of heaven and the ways of earth. One must understand the secret gates and the interdependence of the elements, the mysteries of tactics and the value of forces.
It is but an ordinary talent. I calculated three days ago that there would be a fog today, and so I set the limit at three days.
Zhou Yu would give me ten days, but neither artificers nor material, so that he might find occasion to put me to death as I knew; but my fate lies with the Supreme, and how could Zhou Yu harm me?” Lu Su could not but agree.
When the boats arrived, five hundred soldiers were in readiness on the bank to carry away the arrows.
Zhuge Liang bade them go on board the boats, collect them and bear them to the tent of the Commander-in-Chief.
Lu Su went to report that the arrows had been obtained and told Zhou Yu by what means.
Zhou Yu was amazed and sighed sadly, saying, “He is better than I; his methods are more than human.” Thick lies the fog on the river, Nature is shrouded in white, Distant and near are confounded, Banks are no longer in sight.
Fast fly the pattering arrows, Stick in the boats of the fleet. Now can full tale be delivered, Zhuge Liang is victor complete.
When, shortly after his return, Zhuge Liang went to the tent of the Commander-in-Chief, he was welcomed by Zhou Yu, who came forward to greet him, saying, “Your superhuman predictions compel one's esteem.” “There is nothing remarkable in that trifling trick,” replied he.
Zhou Yu led him within and wine was brought.
Then Zhou Yu said, “My lord sent yesterday to urge me to advance, but I have no master plan ready; I wish you would assist me, Master.” “But where should I, a man of poor everyday ability, find such a plan as you desire?” “I saw the enemy's naval camp just lately, and it looked very complete and well organized. It is not an ordinary place to attack.
I have thought of a plan, but I am not sure it will answer.
I should be happy if you would decide for me.” “General,” replied Zhuge Liang, “do not say what your plan is, but each of us will write in the palm of his hand and see whether our opinions agree.” So brush and ink were sent for, and Zhou Yu first wrote on his own palm, and then passed the pen to Zhuge Liang who also wrote.
Then getting close together on the same bench, each showed his hand to the other, and both burst out laughing, for both had written the same word, “Fire.” “Since we are of the same opinion,” said Zhou Yu, “there is no longer any doubt. But our intentions must be kept secret.” “Both of us are public servants, and what would be the sense of telling our plans?
I do not think Cao Cao will be on his guard against this, although he has had two experiences.
You may put your scheme into force.” They finished their wine and separated.
Not an officer knew a word of the general's plans.
Now Cao Cao had expended a myriad arrows in vain and was much irritated in consequence. He deeply desired revenge.
Then Xun You proposed a ruse, saying, “The two strategists on the side of the enemy are Zhou Yu and Zhuge Liang, two men most difficult to get the better of.
Let us send some one who shall pretend to surrender to them but really be a spy on our behalf and a helper in our schemes. When we know what is doing, we can plan to meet it.” “I had thought of that myself,” replied Cao Cao.
“Whom do you think the best person to send?” “Cai Mao has been put to death, but all his clan and family are in the army, and his two younger brothers are junior generals.
You have them most securely in your power and may send them to surrender.
The ruler of the South Land will never suspect deceit there.” Cao Cao decided to act on this plan, and in the evening summoned Cai Zhong and Cai He to his tent, where he told them, saying, “I want you two pretend to surrender to the South Land so that you can gather intelligence and sent it back. When all done, you will be richly rewarded.
But do not betray me.” “Our families are in Jingzhou, and that place is yours,” replied they. “Should we dare betray? You need have no doubts, Sir.
You will soon see the heads of both Zhou Yu and Zhuge Liang at your feet.” Cao Cao gave them generous gifts; and soon after the two men, each with his five hundred soldiers, set sail with a fair wind for the opposite bank.
Now as Zhou Yu was preparing for the attack, the arrival of some northern ships was announced. They bore the two younger brothers of Cai Mao, who had come as deserters.
They were led in and, bowing before the general, said, weeping, “Our innocent brother has been put to death, and we desire vengeance.
So we have come to offer allegiance to you.
We pray you appoint us to the vanguard.” Zhou Yu appeared very pleased and made them presents.
Then he ordered them to join Gan Ning in leading the van.
They thanked him and regarded their scheme as already a success.
But Zhou Yu gave Gan Ning secret orders, saying, “They have come without their families, and so I know their desertion is only pretense. They have been sent as spies, and I am going to meet their ruse with one of my own.
They shall have some information to send.
You will treat them well, but keep a careful guard over them.
On the day our soldiers start the offense, they shall be sacrificed to the flag.
But be very careful that nothing goes wrong.” Gan Ning went away; and Lu Su came to tell Zhou Yu, saying, “Every one agrees in thinking the surrender of Cai Zhong and Cai He feigned and they should be rejected.” “But they wish to revenge the death of their brother,” said the General. “Where is the pretense?
If you are so suspicious, you will receive nobody at all.” Lu Su left much piqued and went to see Zhuge Liang to whom he told the story.
Zhuge Liang only smiled.
“Why do you smile?” said Lu Su. “I smile at your simplicity. The General is playing a game. Spies cannot easily come and go, so these two have been sent to feign desertion that they may act as spies. The General is meeting one ruse with another. He wants them to give false information.
Deceit is not to be despised in war, and his scheme is the correct one to employ.” Then Lu Su understood.
That night as Zhou Yu was sitting in his tent, Huang Gai came to see him privately.
Zhou Yu said, “You have surely some wise plan to propose that you come at night like this.” Huang Gai replied, “The enemy are more numerous than we, and it is wrong to delay.
Why not burn them out?” “Who suggested that to you?” “I thought of it myself, nobody suggested it,” replied Huang Gai.
“I just wanted something like this, and that is why I kept those two pretended deserters. I want them to give some false news.
The pity is that I have no one to feign desertion to the other side and work my plan.” “But I will carry out your plan,” said Huang Gai. “But if you cannot show some injury, you will not be believed,” said Zhou Yu.
“The Sun family have been very generous to me, and I would not resent being crushed to death to repay them,” said Huang Gai.
The General thanked him saying, “If you would not object to some bodily suffering, then our country would indeed be happy.” “Kill me; I do not mind,” repeated Huang Gai as he took his leave.
Next day the drums called all the officers together to the General's tent, and Zhuge Liang came with the others.
Zhou Yu said, “The enemy's camps extend about one hundred miles so that the campaign will be a long one.
Each leader is to prepare supplies for three months.” Scarcely had he spoken when Huang Gai started up, crying, “Say not three months; be ready for thirty months, and even then it will not be ended.
If you can destroy them this month then all is well.
If you cannot, then it were better to take Zhang Zhao's advice, throw down your weapons, turn to the north and surrender.” Zhou Yu's anger flared up and he flushed, crying, “Our lord's orders were to destroy Cao Cao, and whoever mentioned the word surrender should be put to death.
Now, the very moment when the two armies are to engage, you dare talk of surrender and damp the ardor of my army! If I do not slay you, how can I support the others?” He ordered the lictors to remove Huang Gai and execute him without delay.
Huang Gai then flamed up in turn, saying, “This is the third generation since I went with General Sun Jian, and we overran the southeast; whence have you sprung up?” This made Zhou Yu perfectly furious, and Huang Gai was ordered to instant death.
But Gan Ning interfered. Said he, “He is a veteran officer of the South Land; pray pardon him!” “What are you prating about?” cried Zhou Yu.
“Dare you come between me and my duty?” Turning to the lictors, Zhou Yu ordered them to drive Gan Ning forth with blows. The other officials fell on their knees entreating pity for Huang Gai.
“He is indeed most worthy of death, but it would be a loss to the army; we pray you forgive him.
Record his fault for the moment, and after the enemy shall have been defeated then put him to death.” But Zhou Yu was implacable.
The officers pleaded with tears.
At length he seemed moved, saying, “Had you not interceded, he should certainly have suffered death.
But now I will mitigate the punishment to a beating. He shall not die.” Zhou Yu turned to the lictors and bade them deal the culprit one hundred blows.
Again his colleagues prayed for remission, but Zhou Yu angrily pushed over the table in front of him and roared to the officers to get out of the way and let the sentence be executed.
So Huang Gai was stripped, thrown to the ground, and fifty blows were given.
At this point the officers again prayed that he be let off.
Zhou Yu sprang from his chair and pointing his finger at Huang Gai said, “If you dare flout me again, you shall have the other fifty. If you are guilty of any disrespect, you shall be punished for both faults!” With this he turned into the inner part of the tent, growling as he went, while the officers helped their beaten colleague to his feet.
He was in a pitiable state.
His back was cut in many places, and the blood was flowing in streams. They led him to his own quarters and on the way he swooned several times. His case seemed most pitiable. Lu Su went to see the suffering officer and then called on Zhuge Liang in his boat. Lu Su related the story of the beating and said, “Though the other officers have been cowed into silence, I think thought you, Sir, might have interceded.
You are a guest and not under Zhou Yu's orders.
Why did you stand by with your hands up your sleeves and say never a word?” “You insult me,” said Zhuge Liang smiling.
“Why do you say that?
I have never insulted you; never since the day we came here together.” “Do you not know that terrible beating was but a ruse?
How could I try to dissuade Zhou Yu?” Then Lu Su began to perceive, and Zhuge Liang continued, saying, “Cao Cao would not be taken in unless there was some real bodily suffering.
Zhou Yu is going to send Huang Gai over as a deserter, and Zhou Yu will see to it that the two Cao Cao's spies duly tell the tale. But when you see the General, you must not tell him that I saw through the ruse.
You say that I am very angry like the others.” Lu Su went to see Zhou Yu and asked, “Why have you so cruelly beaten a proved and trusty officer?” “Do the officers resent it?” asked Zhou Yu.
“They are all upset about it.” “And what does your friend think?” “Zhuge Liang also resents it in his heart, and thinks you have made a mistake.” “Then I have deceived him for once,” said Zhou Yu gleefully.
“What mean you?” cried Lu Su.
“That beating that Huang Gai got is part of my ruse. I am sending him to Cao Cao as a deserter, and so I have supplied a reason for desertion.
Then I am going to use fire against the enemy.” Lu Su kept silence, but he recognized that Zhuge Liang was again right.
Meanwhile Huang Gai lay in his tent, whither all his colleague officers went to condole with him and inquire after his health.
But Huang Gai would say never a word; he only lay sighing deeply from time to time.
But when the Strategist Kan Ze came, Huang Gai told them to bring him to the room where he lay.
Then he bade the servants go away, and Kan Ze said, “Surely you must have some serious quarrel with the General.” “I have none,” said Huang Gai.
“Then this beating is just part of a ruse?” “How did you guess?” said Huang Gai.
“Because I watched the General, and I guessed about nine tenths of the truth.” Huang Gai said, “You see I have been very generously treated by the Sun family, all three of them, and have no means of showing my gratitude except by offering to help in this ruse.
True I suffer, but I do not regret that.
Among all those I know in the army, there is not one I am intimate with except yourself.
You are true and I can talk with you as a friend.” “I suppose you wish me to present your surrender letter to Cao Cao; is that it?” “Just that; will you do it?” said Huang Gai.
Kan Ze consented joyfully.
Even the warrior's body is but a stake in the game, The friend so ready to help him proves that their hearts are the same.
Kan Ze's reply will be read in the next chapter.
CHAPTER 47. Kan Ze Presents The Treacherous Letter; Pang Tong Suggests Chaining The Ship Together. Kan Ze was from Shanyin, a son of a humble family.
He loved books, but as he was too poor to buy, he used to borrow.
He had a wonderfully tenacious memory, was very eloquent and no coward.
Sun Quan had employed him among his advisers, and he and Huang Gai were excellent friends.
Now Huang Gai had thought of Kan Ze to present the treacherous letter to Cao Cao, as Kan Ze's gifts made him most suitable.
Kan Ze accepted with enthusiasm, saying, “When you, my friend, have suffered so much for our lord, could I spare myself?
No; while a person lives, he must go on fulfilling his mission, or he is no better than the herbs that rot in the field.” Huang Gai slipped off the couch and came over to salute him.
“However, this matter must speed;” continued Kan Ze, “there is no time to lose.” “The letter is already written,” said Huang Gai. Kan Ze received it and left.
That night he disguised himself as an old fisherman and started in a small punt for the north shore, under the cold, glittering light of the stars.
Soon he drew near the enemy's camp and was captured by the patrol.
Without waiting for day, they informed Cao Cao, who said at once, “Is he not just a spy?” “No,” said they, “he is alone, just an old fisherman; and he says he is an adviser in the service of the South Land named Kan Ze, and he has come on secret business.” “Bring him,” said Cao Cao, and Kan Ze was led in.
Cao Cao was seated in a brilliantly lighted tent. He was leaning on a small table, and as soon as he saw the prisoner, he said harshly, “You are an adviser of East Wu; what then are you doing here?” “People say that you greedily welcome people of ability; I do not think your question a very proper one.
O Friend Huang Gai, you made a mistake,” said Kan Ze.
“You know I am fighting against East Wu and you come here privately.
Why should I not question you?” “Huang Gai is an old servant of Wu, one who has served three successive rulers. Now he has been cruelly beaten, for no fault, before the face of all the officers in Zhou Yu's camp.
He is grievously angry about this and wishes to desert to your side that he may be revenged.
He discussed it with me, and as we are inseparable, I have come to give you his letter asking whether you would receive him.” “Where is the letter? said Cao Cao.
The missive was produced and presented. Cao Cao opened it and read:
“I, Huang Gai, have been generously treated by the Sun family and have served them single-heartedly.
Lately they have been discussing an attack with our forces on the enormous army of the central government.
Every one knows our few are no match for such a multitude, and every officer of the South Land, wise or foolish, recognizes that quite well.
However, Zhou Yu who, after all, is but a youth and a shallow minded simpleton, maintains that success is possible and rashly desires to smash stones with an egg.
Beside, he is arbitrary and tyrannical, punishing for no crime, and leaving meritorious service unrewarded.
I am an old servant and for no reason have been shamed in the sight of humans. Wherefore I hate him in my heart.
“You, O Prime Minister, treat people with sincerity and are ready to welcome ability and so I, and those under my leadership, desire to enter your service whereby to acquire reputation and remove the shameful stigma.
The commissariat, weapons, and the supply ships that I am commanding will also come over to you.
In perfect sincerity I state these matters; I pray you not to doubt me.” Leaning there on the low table by his side, Cao Cao turned this letter over and over and read it again and again.
Then he smacked the table, opened his eyes wide with anger, saying, “Huang Gai is trying to play the personal injury trick on me, is he?
And you are in it as the intermediary to present the letter.
How dare you come to sport with me?” Cao Cao ordered the lictors to thrust forth the messenger and take off his head.
Kan Ze was hustled out, his face untroubled. On the contrary, he laughed aloud.
At this Cao Cao told them to bring him back and harshly said to him, “What do you find to laugh at now that I have foiled you and your ruse has failed?” “I was not laughing at you; I was laughing at my friend's simplicity.” “What do you mean by his simplicity?” “If you want to slay, slay; do not trouble me with a multitude of questions.” “I have read all the books on the art of war, and I am well versed in all ways of misleading the enemy.
This ruse of yours might have succeeded with many, but it will not do for me.” “And so you say that the letter is a vicious trick?” said Kan Ze.
“What I say is that your little slip has sent you to the death you risked. If the thing was real and you were sincere, why does not the letter name a time of coming over?
What have you to say to that?” Kan Ze waited to the end and then laughed louder than ever, saying, “I am so glad you are not frightened but can still boast of your knowledge of the books of war.
Now you will not lead away your soldiers.
If you fight, Zhou Yu will certainly capture you.
But how sad to think I die at the hand of such an ignorant fellow!” “What mean you?
I, ignorant?” “You are ignorant of any strategy and a victim of unreason; is not that sufficient?” “Well then, tell me where is any fault.” “You treat wise people too badly for me to talk to you.
You can finish me and let there be an end of it.” “If you can speak with any show of reason, I will treat you differently.” “Do you not know that when one is going to desert one's master and become a renegade, one cannot say exactly when the chance will occur?
If one binds one's self to a fixed moment and the thing cannot be done just then, the secret will be discovered. One must watch for an opportunity and take it when it comes. is it possible to know exactly when?
But you know nothing of common sense; all you know is how to put good humans to death.
So you really are an ignorant fellow!” At this Cao Cao changed his manner, got up, and came over to the prisoner bowing, “I did not see clearly; that is quite true.
I offended you, and I hope you will forget it.” “The fact is that Huang Gai and I are both inclined to desert to you; we even yearn for it as a child desires its parents.
Is it possible that we should play you false?” “If you two could render me so great a service, you shall certainly be richly rewarded.” “We do not desire rank or riches; we come because it is the will of Heaven and the plain way of duty.” Then wine was set out, and Kan Ze was treated as an honored guest.
While they were drinking, some one came in and whispered in Cao Cao's ear.
He replied, “Let me see the letter.” Whereupon the man pulled out and gave him a letter, which evidently pleased him. “That is from the two Cai brothers,” thought Kan Ze.
“They are reporting the punishment of my friend, and that will be a proof of the sincerity of his letter.” Turning toward Kan Ze, Cao Cao said, “I must ask you to return to settle the date with your friend; as soon as I know, I will have a force waiting.” “I cannot return; pray, Sir, send some other one you can trust.” “If some one else should go, the secret would be discovered.” Kan Ze refused again and again but at last gave way, saying, “If I am to go, I must not wait here; I must be off at once.” Cao Cao offered him gold and silks, which were refused.
Kan Ze started, left the camp, and reembarked for the south bank, where he related all that had happened to Huang Gai.
“If it had not been for your persuasive tongue, then had I undergone this suffering in vain,” said Huang Gai. “I will now go to get news of the two Cai brothers,” said Kan Ze.
“Excellent,” said Huang Gai.
Kan Ze went to the camp commanded by Gan Ning; and when they were seated, Kan Ze said to his host, “I was much distressed when I saw how disgracefully you were treated for your intercession on behalf of Huang Gai.” Gan Ning smiled.
Just then the two Cai brothers came, and host and guest exchanged glances.
Gan Ning said, “The truth is Zhou Yu is over confident, and he reckons us as nobody. We count for nothing.
Every one is talking of the way I was insulted.” And he shouted and gritted his teeth and smacked the table in his wrath.
Kan Ze leaned over toward his host and said something in a very low voice, at which Gan Ning bent his head and sighed.
Cai He and Cai Zhong gathered from this scene that both Gan Ning and Kan Ze were ripe for desertion and determined to probe them. “Why, Sir, do you anger him? Why not be silent about your injuries?” said they.
“What know you of our bitterness?” said Kan Ze.
“We think you seem much inclined to go over to Cao Cao,” said they.
Kan Ze at this lost color; Gan Ning started up and drew his sword, crying, “They have found out; they must die to keep their mouths shut.” “No, no,” cried the two in a flurry.
“Let us tell you something quite secret.” “Quick, then,” cried Gan Ning.
So Cai He said, “The truth is that we are only pretended deserters, and if you two gentlemen are of our way of thinking, we can manage things for you.” “But are you speaking the truth?” said Gan Ning.
“Is it likely we should say such a thing if it were untrue?” cried both at the same moment.
Gan Ning put on a pleased look and said, “Then this is the very heavengiven chance.” “You know we have already told Cao Cao of the Huang Gai affair and how you were insulted.” “The fact is I have given the Prime Minister a letter on behalf of Huang Gai, and he sent me back again to settle the date of Huang Gai's desertion,” said Kan Ze.
“When an honest person happens upon an enlightened master, his heart will always be drawn toward him,” said Gan Ning.
The four then drank together and opened their hearts to each other.
The two Cai Zhong and Cai He wrote a private letter to their master saying Gan Ning has agreed to join in our plot and play the traitor, and Kan Ze also wrote and they sent the letters secretly to Cao Cao. Kan Ze's letter said: “Huang Gai has found no opportunity so far.
However, when he comes, his boat can be recognized by a black, indented flag.
That shall mean he is on board.” However, when Cao Cao got these two letters, he was still doubtful and called together his advisers to talk over the matter. Said he, “On the other side Gan Ning has been put to shame by the Commander-in-Chief whom he is prepared to betray for the sake of revenge.
Huang Gai has been punished and sent Kan Ze to propose that he should come over to our side. Only I still distrust the whole thing.
Who will go over to the camp to find out the real truth?” Then Jiang Gan spoke up, saying, “I failed in my mission the other day and am greatly mortified.
I will risk my life again and, this time, I shall surely bring good news.” Cao Cao approved of him as messenger and bade him start.
Jiang Gan set out in a small craft and speedily arrived in the Three Gorges, landing near the naval camp.
Then he sent to inform Zhou Yu, who hearing who it was chuckled, saying, “Success depends upon this man.” Then Zhou Yu called Lu Su and told him to call Pang Tong to come and do certain things for him.
This Pang Tong was from Xiangyang. And he had gone to the east of the river to get away from the strife. Lu Su had recommended him to Zhou Yu, but he had not yet presented himself.
When Zhou Yu sent Lu Su to ask what scheme of attack he would recommend against Cao Cao, Pang Tong had said to Lu Su, “You must use fire against him.
But the river is wide and if one ship is set on fire, the others will scatter unless they are fastened together so that they must remain in one place.
That is the one road to success.” Lu Su took this message to the General, who pondered over it and then said, “The only person who can manage this is Pang Tong himself.” “Cao Cao is very wily;” said Lu Su, “how can Pang Tong go?” So Zhou Yu was sad and undecided.
He could think of no method till suddenly the means presented itself in the arrival of Jiang Gan.
Zhou Yu at once sent instructions to Pang Tong how to act and then sat himself in his tent to await his visitor Jiang Gan.
But the visitor became ill at ease and suspicious when he saw that his old student friend did not come to welcome him, and he took the precaution of sending his boat into a retired spot to be made fast before he went to the General's tent.
When Zhou Yu saw Jiang Gan, Zhou Yu put on an angry face and said, “My friend, why did you treat me so badly?” Jiang Gan laughed and said, “I remembered the old days when we were as brothers, and I came expressly to pour out my heart to you.
Why do you say I treated you badly?” “You came to persuade me to betray my master, which I would never do unless the sea dried up and the rocks perished.
Remembering the old times, I filled you with wine and kept you to sleep with me.
And you, you plundered my private letters and stole away with never a word of farewell. You betrayed me to Cao Cao and caused the death of my two friends on the other side and so caused all my plans to miscarry. Now what have you come for?
Certainly, it is not out of kindness to me.
I would cut you in two, but I still care for our old friendship.
I would send you back again, but within a day or two I shall attack that rebel; and if I let you stay in my camp, my plans will leak out.
So I am going to tell my attendants to conduct you to a certain retired hut in the Western Hills, and keep you there till I shall have won the victory.
Then I will send you back again.” Jiang Gan tried to say something, but Zhou Yu would not listen.
He turned his back and went into the recesses of his tent. The attendants led the visitor off, set him on a horse, and took him away over the hills to the small hut, leaving two soldiers to look after him.
When Jiang Gan found himself in the lonely hut, he was very depressed and had no desire to eat or sleep.
But one night, when the stars were very brilliant, he strolled out to enjoy them. Presently he came to the rear of his lonely habitation and heard, near by, some one crooning over a book.
Approaching with stealthy steps, he saw a tiny cabin half hidden in a cliff whence a slender beam or two of light stole out between the rafters.
He went nearer and peeping in, saw a man reading by the light of a lamp near which hung a sword. And the book was Sun Zi's classic “The Art of War.” “This is no common person,” thought Jiang Gan, and so he knocked at the door.
The door was opened by the reader, who bade him welcome with cultivated and refined ceremony.
Jiang Gan inquired his name.
The host replied, “I am Pang Tong.” “Then you are surely the Master known as Blooming-Phoenix, are you not?” “Yes; I am he.” “How often have I heard you talked about!
You are famous.
But why are you hidden away in this spot?” “That fellow Zhou Yu is too conceited to allow that any one else has any talent, and so I live here quietly.
But who are you, Sir?” “I am Jiang Gan.” Then Pang Tong made him welcome and led him in and the two sat down to talk.
“With your gifts, you would succeed anywhere,” said Jiang Gan.
“If you would enter Cao Cao's service, I would recommend you to him.” “I have long desired to get away from here; and if you, Sir, will present me, there is no time like the present.
If Zhou Yu heard of my wish, he would kill me, I am sure.” So without more ado, they made their way down the hill to the water's edge to seek the boat in which Jiang Gan had come. They embarked and, rowing swiftly; they soon reached the northern shore.
At the central camp, Jiang Gan landed and went to seek Cao Cao to whom he related the story of the discovery of his new acquaintance.
When Cao Cao heard that the newcomer was Master Blooming-Phoenix, Cao Cao went to meet him personally, made him very welcome, and soon they sat down to talk on friendly terms.
Cao Cao said, “And so Zhou Yu in his youth is conceited and annoys his officers and rejects all their advice; I know that.
But your fame has been long known to me, and now that you have been gracious enough to turn my way, I pray you not to be thrifty of your advice.” “I, too, know well that you are a model of military strategy,” said Pang Tong, “but I should like to have one look at your disposition.” So horses were brought, and the two rode out to the lines, host and visitor on equal terms, side by side.
They ascended a hill whence they had a wide view of the land base. After looking all round Pang Tong remarked, “Wu Qi the Great General, came to life again, could not do better, nor Sun Zi the Famed Strategist if he reappeared! All accords with the precepts. The camp is beside the hills and is flanked by a forest. The front and rear are within sight of each other.
Gates of egress and ingress are provided, and the roads of advance and retirement are bent and broken.” “Master, I entreat you not to overpraise me, but to advise me where I can make further improvements,” said Cao Cao.
Then the two men rode down to the naval camp, where twenty four gates were arranged facing south. The cruisers and the battleships were all lined up so as to protect the lighter crafts which lay inside. There were channels to pass to and fro and fixed anchorages and stations. Pang Tong surveying all this smiled, saying, “Sir Prime Minister, if this is your method of warfare, you enjoy no empty reputation.” Then pointing to the southern shore, he went on, “Zhou Yu! Zhou Yu!
You are finished; you will have to die.” Cao Cao was mightily pleased.
They rode back to the chief tent and wine was brought. They discussed military matters, and Pang Tong held forth at length.
Remarks and comments flowed freely between the two, and Cao Cao formed an exalted opinion of his new adherent's abilities and treated him with the greatest honor.
By and bye the guest seemed to have succumbed to the influence of many cups and said, “Have you any capable medical people in your army?” “What are they for, Master?” said Cao Cao.
“There is a lot of illness among the marines, and you ought to find some remedy.” The fact was that at this time Cao Cao's men were suffering from the climate; many were vomiting and not a few had died. It was a source of great anxiety to him, and when the newcomer suddenly mentioned it, of course he had to ask advice.
Pang Tong said, “Your marine force is excellent, but there is just one defect; it is not quite perfect.” Cao Cao pressed him to say where the imperfection lay.
“I have a plan to overcome the ailment of the soldiers so that no one shall be sick and all fit for service.” “What is this excellent scheme?” said Cao Cao.
“The river is wide, and the tides ebb and flow. The winds and waves are never at rest.
Your troops from the north are unused to ships, and the motion makes them ill.
If your ships, large and small, were classed and divided into thirties, or fifties, and joined up stem to stem by iron chains and boards spread across them, to say nothing of soldiers being able to pass from one to the next, even horses could move about on them.
If this were done, then there would be no fear of the wind and the waves and the rising and falling tides.” Coming down from his seat, Cao Cao thanked his guest, saying, “I could never defeat the land of the south without this scheme of yours.” “That is my idea;” said Pang Tong, “it is for you to decide about it.” Orders were then issued to call up all the blacksmiths and set them to work, night and day, forging iron chains and great bolts to lock together the ships.
And the soldiers rejoiced when they heard of the plan.
In the Red Cliffs' fight they used the flame, The weapon here will be the same. By Pang Tong's advice the ships were chained, Else Zhou Yu had not that battle gained.
Pang Tong further told Cao Cao, saying, “I know many bold humans on the other side who hate Zhou Yu.
If I may use my little tongue in your service, I can induce them to come over to you; and if Zhou Yu be left alone, you can certainly take him captive.
And Liu Bei is of no account.” “Certainly if you could render me so great a service, I would memorialize the Throne and obtain for you one of the highest offices,” said Cao Cao.
“I am not doing this for the sake of wealth or honors, but from a desire to succor humankind.
If you cross the river, I pray you be merciful.” “I am Heaven's means of doing right and could not bear to slay the people.” Pang Tong thanked him and begged for a document that would protect his own family.
Cao Cao asked, “Where do they live?” “All are near the river bank.” And Cao Cao ordered a protection declaration to be prepared.
Having sealed it, he gave it to Pang Tong, who said, “You should attack as soon as I have gone, but do not let Zhou Yu doubt anything.” Cao Cao promised secrecy, and the wily traitor took his leave.
Just as he was about to embark, he met a man in a Taoist robe, with a bamboo comb in his hair, who stopped him, saying, “You are very bold.
Huang Gai is planning to use the 'personal injury ruse', and Kan Ze has presented the letter of pretended desertion. You have proffered the fatal scheme of chaining the ships together lest the flames may not completely destroy them.
This sort of mischievous work may have been enough to blind Cao Cao, but I saw it all.” Pang Tong become helpless with fear, his viscera flown away, his spirit scattered. By guileful means one may succeed, The victims too find friends in need.
The next chapter will tell who the stranger was. CHAPTER 48.
Banquet On The Great River, Cao Cao Sings A Song; Battle On Open Water, The Northern Soldiers Fight With The Chained Ships. In the last chapter Pang Tong was brought up with a sudden shock when some one seized him and said of his scheme.
Upon turning to look at the man, Pang Tong saw it was Xu Shu, an old friend, and his heart revived.
Looking around and seeing no one near, Pang Tong said, “It would be a pity if you upset my plan; the fate of the people of all the eighty-one southern counties is in your hands.” Xu Shu smiled, saying, “And what of the fate of these eight hundred thirty thousand soldiers and horse of the north?” “Do you intend to wreck my scheme, Xu Shu?” “I have never forgotten the kindness of Uncle Liu Bei, nor my oath to avenge the death of my mother at Cao Cao's hands.
I have said I would never think out a plan for him. So am I likely to wreck yours now, Brother?
But I have followed Cao Cao's army thus far; and after they shall have been defeated, good and bad will suffer alike and how can I escape?
Tell me how I can secure safety, and I sew up my lips and go away.” Pang Tong smiled, “If you are as high-minded as that, there is no great difficulty.” “Still I wish you would instruct me.” So Pang Tong whispered something in his ear, which seemed to please Xu Shu greatly, for he thanked him most cordially and took his leave.
Then Pang Tong betook himself to his boat and left for the southern shore.
His friend gone, Xu Shu mischievously spread certain rumors in the camp, and next day were to be seen everywhere soldiers in small groups, some talking, others listening, heads together and ears stretched out, till the camps seemed to buzz.
Some of the officers went to Cao Cao and told him, saying, “A rumor is running around the camps that Han Sui and Ma Teng are marching from Xiliang to attack the capital.” This troubled Cao Cao, who called together his advisers to council. Said he, “The only anxiety I have felt in this expedition was about the possible doings of Han Sui and Ma Teng.
Now there is a rumor running among the soldiers, and though I know not whether it be true or false, it is necessary to be on one's guard.” At this point Xu Shu said, “You have been kind enough to give me an office, Sir, and I have really done nothing in return.
If I may have three thousand troops, I will march at once to San Pass and guard this entrance.
If there be any pressing matter, I will report at once.” “If you would do this, I should be quite at my ease.
There are already troops beyond the Pass, who will be under your command, and now I will give you three thousand of horse and foot, and Zang Ba shall lead the van and march quickly.” Xu Shu took leave of the Prime Minister and left in company with Zang Ba.
This was Pang Tong's scheme to secure the safety of Xu Shu. A poem says:
Cao Cao marched south, but at his back There rode the fear of rear attack.
Pang Tong's good counsel Xu Shu took, And thus the fish escaped the hook. Cao Cao's anxiety diminished after he had thus sent away Xu Shu. Then he rode round all the camps, first the land forces and then the naval.
He boarded one of the large ships and thereon set up his standard. The naval camps were arranged along two lines, and every ship carried a thousand bows and crossbows.
While Cao Cao remained with the fleet, it occurred the full moon of the eleventh month of the thirteenth year of Rebuilt Tranquillity . The sky was clear; there was no wind and the river lay unruffled.
He prepared a great banquet, with music, and thereto invited all his leaders.
As evening drew on, the moon rose over the eastern hills in its immaculate beauty, and beneath it lay the broad belt of the river like a band of pure silk.
It was a great assembly, and all the guests were clad in gorgeous silks and embroidered robes, and the arms of the fighting soldiers glittered in the moonlight.
The officers, civil and military, were seated in their proper order of precedence. The setting, too, was exquisite.
The Nanping Mountains were outlined as in a picture; the boundaries of Chaisang lay in the east; the river showed west as far as Xiakou; on the south lay the Fan Mountains, on the north was the Black Forest. The view stretched wide on every side. Cao Cao's heart was jubilant, and he harangued the assembly, saying, “My one aim since I enlisted my first small band of volunteers has been the removal of evil from the state, and I have sworn to cleanse the country and restore tranquillity. Now there is only left this land of the south to withstand me.
I am at the head of a hundred legions. I depend upon you, gentlemen, and have no doubt of my final success.
After I have subdued the South Land, there will be no trouble in all the country.
Then we shall enjoy wealth and honor and revel in peace.” They rose in a body and expressed their appreciation, saying, “We trust that you may soon report complete victory, and we shall all repose in the shade of your good fortune.” In his elation, Cao Cao bade the servants bring more wine and they drank till late at night.
Warmed and mellowed, the host pointed to the south bank, saying, “Zhou Yu and Lu Su know not the appointed time.
Heaven is aiding me bringing upon them the misfortune of the desertion of their most trusted friends.” “O Prime Minister, say nothing of these things lest they become known to the enemy,” said Xun You. But the Prime Minister only laughed.
“You are all my trusty friends,” said he, “both officers and humble attendants.
Why should I refrain?” Pointing to Xiakou, he continued, “You do not reckon for much with your puny force, Liu Bei and Zhuge Liang.
How foolish of you to attempt to shake the Taishan Mountains!” Then turning to his officers, he said, “I am now fifty-four and if I get the South Land, I shall have the wherewithal to rejoice.
In the days of long ago, the Patriarch Duke Qiao in the south and I were great friends, and we came to an agreement on certain matters, for I knew his two daughters—Elder Qiao and Younger Qiao—were lovely beyond words.
Then by some means, they became wives to Sun Ce and Zhou Yu.
But now my palace of rest is built on the River Zhang, and victory over the South Land will mean that I marry these two fair women. I will put them in the Bronze Bird Tower, and they shall rejoice my declining years.
My desires will then be completely attained.” He smiled at the anticipation.
Du Mu, a famous poet of the Tang Dynasty, in one poem says: A broken halberd buried in the sand, With deep rust eaten, Loud tells of ancient battles on the strand, When Cao Cao was beaten.
Had eastern winds Zhou Yu's plan refused to aid And fan the blaze, the two fair Qiaos, in the Bronze Bird's shade, Would have been locked at spring age.
But suddenly amid the merriment was heard the hoarse cry of a raven flying toward the south.
“Why does the raven thus cry in the night?” said Cao Cao to those about him.
“The moon is so bright that it thinks it is day,” said they, “and so it leaves its tree.” Cao Cao laughed; by this time he was quite intoxicated.
He set up his spear in the prow of the ship and poured a libation into the river and then drank three brimming goblets. As he lowered the spear, he said, “This is the spear that broke up the Yellow Scarves, captured Lu Bu, destroyed Yuan Shao, and subdued Yuan Shu, whose armies are now mine. In the north it reached to Liaodong, and it stretched out over the whole south. It has never failed in its task.
The present scene moves me to the depths, and I will sing a song in which you shall accompany me.” And so he sang:
“When goblets are brimming then sang is near birth, But life is full short and has few days of mirth, Life goes as the dew drops fly swiftly away, Beneath the glance of the glowing hot ruler of day.
Human's life may be spent in the noblest enterprise, But sorrowful thoughts in his heart oft arise. Let us wash clean away the sad thoughts that intrude, With bumpers of wine such as Du Kang once brewed.
Gone is my day of youthful fire And still ungained is my desire.
The deer feed on the level plain And joyful call, then feed again.
My noble guests are gathered round. The air is trilled with joyful sound. Bright my future lies before me. As the moonlight on this plain; But I strive in vain to reach it.
When shall I my wish attain?
None can answer; and so sadness Grips my inmost heart again. Far north and south, Wide east and west, We safety seek; Vain is the quest.
Human's heart oft yearns For converse sweet.
And my heart burns When old friends greet.
The stars are paled by the full moon's light, The raven wings his southward flight.
And thrice he circles round a tree, No place thereon to rest finds he.
They weary not the mountains of great height, The waters deep of depth do not complain, Duke Zhou 2 no leisure found by day or night Stern toil is his who would the empire gain.” The song made they sang it with him and were all exceedingly merry; save one guest who suddenly said, “When the great army is on the point of battle and lives are about to be risked, why do you, O Prime Minister, speak such ill words?” Cao Cao turned quickly toward the speaker, who was Liu Fu, Imperial Protector of Yangzhou. This Liu Fu sprang from Hefei. When first appointed to his post, he had gathered in the terrified and frightened people and restored order. He had founded schools and encouraged the people to till the land. He had long served under Cao Cao and rendered valuable service.
When Liu Fu spoke, Cao Cao dropped his spear to the level and said, “What ill-omened words did I use?” “You spoke of the moon paling the stars and the raven flying southward without finding a resting place.
These are ill-omened words.” “How dare you try to belittle my endeavor?” cried Cao Cao, very wrathful; and with that he smote Liu Fu with his spear and slew him.
The assembly broke up, and the guests dispersed in fear and confusion.
Next day, when Cao Cao had recovered from his drunken bout, he was very grieved at what he had done.
When the murdered man's son, Liu Xi, came to crave the body of his father for burial, Cao Cao wept and expressed his sorrow.
“I am guilty of your father's death; I was drunk yesterday. I regret the deed exceedingly.
Your father shall be interred with the honors of a minister of the highest rank.” Cao Cao sent an escort of soldiers to take the body to the homeland for burial.
A few days after the two leaders of the naval force, Mao Jie and Yu Jin, came to say the ships were all connected together by chains as had been ordered, and all was now ready.
They asked for the command to start. Thereupon the leaders of both land and naval forces were assembled on board a large ship in the center of the squadron to receive orders.
The various armies and squadrons were distinguished by different flags: Mao Jie and Yu Jin led the central naval squadron with yellow flag; Zhang He, the leading squadron, red flag; Lu Qian, the rear squadron, black flag; Wen Ping, the left squadron, blue flag; and Li Tong, the right squadron, white flag.
On shore Xu Huang commanded the horsemen with red flag; Li Dian, the vanguard, black flag; Yue Jin, the left wing, blue flag; and Xiahou Yuan, the right wing, white flag.
Xiahou Dun and Cao Hong were in reserve, and the general staff was under the leadership of Xu Chu and Zhang Liao.
The other leaders were ordered to remain in camps, but ready for action.
All being ready, the squadron drums beat the roll thrice, and the ships sailed out under a strong northwest wind on a trial cruise. When they got among the waves, they were found to be as steady and immovable as the dry land itself.
The northern soldiers showed their delight at the absence of motion by capering and flourishing their weapons.
The ships moved on, the squadrons keeping quite distinct. Fifty light cruisers sailed to and fro keeping order and urging progress.
Cao Cao watched his navy from the General's Terrace and was delighted with their evolutions and maneuvers. Surely this meant complete victory.
He ordered the recall and the squadrons returned in perfect order to their base.
Then Cao Cao went to his tent and summoned his advisers. He said, “If Heaven had not been on my side, should I have got this excellent plan from the Blooming-Phoenix?
Now that the ships are attached firmly to each other, one may traverse the river as easily as walking on firm earth.” “The ships are firmly attached to each other,” said Cheng Yu, “but you should be prepared for an attack by fire so that they can scatter to avoid it.” The General laughed.
“You look a long way ahead,” said he, “but you see what cannot happen.” “Cheng Yu speaks much to the point;” said Xun You, “why do you laugh at him?” Cao Cao said, “Any one using fire depends upon the wind.
This is now winter and only west winds blow. You will get neither east nor south winds.
I am on the northwest, and the enemy is on the southeast bank. If they use fire, they will destroy themselves. I have nothing to fear.
If it was the tenth moon, or early spring, I would provide against fire.” “The Prime Minister is indeed wise,” said the others in chorus.
“None can equal him.” “With northern troops unused to shipboard, I could never have crossed the river but for this chaining plan,” said Cao Cao.
Then he saw two of the secondary leaders stand up and they said, “We are from the north, but we are also sailors.
Pray give us a small squadron, and we will seize some of the enemy's flags and drums for you that we may prove ourselves adepts on the water.” The speakers were two men who had served under Yuan Shao, named Jiao Chu and Zhang Nan.
“I do not think naval work would suit you two, born and brought up in the north,” said Cao Cao.
“The southern soldiers are thoroughly accustomed to ships.
You should not regard your lives as a child's plaything.” They cried, “If we fail, treat us according to army laws!” “The fighting ships are all chained together, there are only small, twenty-men boats free.
They are unsuitable for fighting.” “If we took large ships, where would be the wonderful in what we will do?
No; give us a score of the small ships, and we will take half each and go straight to the enemy's naval port.
We will just seize a flag, slay a leader, and come home.” “I will let you have the twenty ships and five hundred of good, vigorous troops with long spears and stiff crossbows.
Early tomorrow the main fleet shall make a demonstration on the river, and I will also tell Wen Ping to support you with thirty ships.” The two men retired greatly elated.
Next morning, very early, food was prepared, and at the fifth watch all was ready for a start.
Then from the naval camp rolled out the drums and the gongs clanged, as the ships moved out and took up their positions, the various flags fluttering in the morning breeze. And the two intrepid leaders with their squadron of small scouting boats went down the lines and out into the stream.
Now a few days before the sound of Cao Cao's drums had been heard on the southern bank, Zhou Yu had watched the maneuvers of the northern fleet on the open river from the top of a hill till the fleet had gone in again.
So when the sound of drums was again heard, all the southern army went up the hills to watch the northern fleet. All they saw was a squadron of small ships bounding over the waves.
As the northern fleet came nearer, the news was taken to Zhou Yu who called for volunteers to go out against them.
Han Dang and Zhou Tai offered themselves.
They were accepted and orders were issued to the camps to remain ready for action but not to move till told.
Han Dang and Zhou Tai sailed out each with a small squadron of five ships in line. The two braggarts from the north, Jiao Chu and Zhang Nan, really only trusted to their boldness and luck.
Their ships came down under the powerful strokes of the oars; and as they neared, the two leaders put on their heartprotectors, gripped their spears, and each took his station in the prow of the leading ship of his division.
Jiao Chu's ship led and as soon as he came near enough, his troops began to shoot at Han Dang, who fended off the arrows with his buckler; Jiao Chu twirled his long spear as he engaged his opponent.
But, at the first thrust, he was killed.
His comrade Zhang Nan with the other ships was coming up with great shouts when Zhou Tai sailed up at an angle and these two squadrons began shooting arrows at each other in clouds.
Zhou Tai fended off the arrows with his shield and stood gripping his sword firmly till his ships came within a few spans of the enemy's ships, when he leaped across and cut down Zhang Nan. Zhang Nan's dead body fell into the water.
Then the battle became confused, and the attacking ships rowed hard to get away.
The southerners pursued but soon came in sight of Wen Ping's supporting fleet.
Once more the ships engaged and the forces fought with each other.
Zhou Yu with his officers stood on the summit of a mountain and watched his own and the enemy ships out on the river. The flags and the ensigns were all in perfect order.
Then he saw Wen Ping and his own fleets engaged in battle, and soon it was evident that the former was not a match for his own sailors. Wen Ping turned about to retire, Han Dang and Zhou Tai pursued.
Zhou Yu fearing lest his sailors should go too far, then hoisted the white flag of recall.
To his officers Zhou Yu said, “The masts of the northern ships stand thick as reeds; Cao Cao himself is full of wiles; how can we destroy him?” No one replied, for just then the great yellow flag that flapped in the breeze in the middle of Cao Cao's fleet suddenly fell over into the river.
Zhou Yu laughed.
“That is a bad omen,” said he. Then an extra violent blast of wind came by, and the waves rose high and beat upon the bank.
A corner of his own flag flicked Zhou Yu on the cheek, and suddenly a thought flashed through his mind.
Zhou Yu uttered a loud cry, staggered, and fell backward. They picked him up; there was blood upon his lips, and he was unconscious. Presently, however, he revived.
And once he laughed, then gave a cry, This is hard to ensure a victory.
Zhou Yu's fate will appear as the story unfolds. CHAPTER 49.
On The Seven Stars Altar, Zhuge Liang Sacrifices To The Winds; At Three Gorges, Zhou Yu Liberates The Fire. In the last chapter Zhou Yu was seized with sudden illness as he watched the fleets of his enemy.
He was borne to his tent, and his officers came in multitudes to inquire after him.
They looked at each other, saying, “What a pity our general should be taken ill when Cao Cao's legions threaten so terribly!
What would happen if Cao Cao attacked?” Messengers with the evil tidings were sent to Sun Quan, while the physicians did their best for the invalid.
Lu Su was particularly sad at the illness of his patron and went to see Zhuge Liang to talk it over.
“What do you make of it?” said Zhuge Liang.
“Good luck for Cao Cao; bad for us,” said Lu Su.
“I could cure him,” said Zhuge Liang laughing. “If you could, Wu would be very fortunate,” said Lu Su.
Lu Su prayed Zhuge Liang to go to see the sick man.
They went, and Lu Su entered first.
Zhou Yu lay in bed, his head covered by a quilt.
“How are you, General?” said Lu Su.
“My heart pains me; every now and again I feel faint and dizzy.” “Have you taken any remedies?” “My gorge rises at the thought; I could not.” “I saw Zhuge Liang just now, and he says he could heal you.
He is just outside, and I will call him if you like.” “Ask him to come in.” Zhou Yu bade his servants help him to a sitting position, and Zhuge Liang entered.
“I have not seen you for days,” said Zhuge Liang.
“How could I guess that you were unwell?” “How can any one feel secure? We are constantly the playthings of luck, good or bad.” “Yes; Heaven's winds and clouds are not to be measured.
No one can reckon their comings and goings, can they?” Zhou Yu turned pale and a low groan escaped him, while his visitor went on, “You feel depressed, do you not?
As though troubles were piling up in your heart?” “That is exactly how I feel.” “You need cooling medicine to dissipate this sense of oppression.” “I have taken a cooling draught, but it has done no good.” “You must get the humors into good order before the drugs will have any effect.” Zhou Yu began to think Zhuge Liang knew what was really the matter and resolved to test him.
“What should be taken to produce a favorable temper?” said Zhou Yu. “I know one means of producing a favorable temper,” replied Zhuge Liang. “I wish you would tell me.” Zhuge Liang got out writing materials, sent away the servants, and then wrote a few words:
“To burn out the fleet Of Cao Cao; All are in your wish, Except winds from the east.” This he gave to the sick general, saying, “That is the origin of your illness.” Zhou Yu read the words with great surprise, and it confirmed his secret opinion that Zhuge Liang really was rather more than human.
He decided that the only course was to be open and tell him all.
So he said, “Since you know the cause of the disease, what do you recommend as treatment?
The need of a remedy is very urgent.” “I have no great talent,” said Zhuge Liang, “but I have had to do with humans of no ordinary gifts from whom I have received certain magical books called Concealing Method. I can call the winds and summon the rains.
Since you need a southeast breeze, General, you must build an altar on the Nanping Mountains, the Altar of the Seven Stars. It must be nine spans high, with three steps, surrounded by a guard of one hundred and twenty humans bearing flags.
On this altar I will work a spell to procure a strong southeast gale for three days and three nights.
Do you approve?” “Never mind three whole days;” said Zhou Yu, “one day of strong wind will serve my purpose.
But it must be done at once and without delay.” “I will sacrifice for a wind for three days from the twentieth day of the moon; will that suit you?” Zhou Yu was delighted and hastily rose from his couch to give the necessary orders.
He commanded that five hundred men should be sent to the mountains to build the altar, and he told off the guard of one hundred and twenty to bear the flags and be at the orders of Zhuge Liang.
Zhuge Liang took his leave, went forth, and rode off with Lu Su to the mountains where they measured out the ground. He bade the soldiers build the altar of red earth from the southeast quarter.
It was two hundred and forty spans in circuit, square in shape, and of three tiers, each of three spans, in all nine spans high.
On the lowest tier he placed the flags of the twentyeight “houses” of the heavens and four constellations; on the east seven, with blue flags; on the north seven, with black flags; on the west seven, with white flags; and on the south seven, with red flags.
Around the second tier he placed sixty-four yellow flags, corresponding to the number of the diagrams of the Book of Divination, in eight groups of eight.
Four men were stationed on the highest platform, each wearing a Taoist headdress and a black silk robe embroidered with the phoenix and confined with wide sashes. They wore scarlet boots and square-cut skirts.
On the left front stood a man supporting a tall pole bearing at its top a plume of light feathers to show by their least movement the wind's first breathing.
On the right front was a man holding a tall pole whereon was a flag with the symbol of the seven stars to show the direction and force of the wind.
On the left rear stood a man with a sword, and on the right rear a man with a censer.
Below the altar were forty-four men holding flags, umbrellas, spears, lances, yellow banners, white axes, red banderoles, and black ensigns. And these were spaced about the altar. On the appointed day Zhuge Liang, having chosen a propitious moment, bathed his body and purified himself. Then he robed himself as a Taoist, loosened his locks, and approached the altar.
He bade Lu Su retire, saying, “Return to the camp and assist the General in setting out his forces.
Should my prayers avail not, do not wonder.” So Lu Su left him.
Then Zhuge Liang commanded the guards on no account to absent themselves, to maintain strict silence, and to be reverent; death would be the penalty of disobedience.
Next, with solemn steps he ascended the altar, faced the proper quarter, lighted the incense, and sprinkled the water in the basins. This done he gazed into the heavens and prayed silently.
The prayer ended he descended and returned to his tent. After a brief rest he allowed the soldiers by turns to go away to eat.
Thrice that day he ascended the altar and thrice descended; but there was no sign of the wind.
During that time, Zhou Yu, with Cheng Pu and Lu Su and other military officials on duty, sat waiting in the tent till the wished-for wind should blow and the attack could be launched.
Messengers were also sent to Sun Quan to prepare to support the forward movement.
Huang Gai had his fire ships ready, twenty of them.
The fore parts of the ships were thickly studded with large nails, and they were loaded with dry reeds, wood soaked in fish oil, and covered with sulfur, saltpeter, and other inflammables. The ships were covered in with black oiled cloth.
In the prow of each was a black dragon flag with indentations. A fighting ship was attached to the stern of each to propel it forward. All were ready and awaited orders to move.
Meanwhile Cao Cao's two spies, Cai He and Cai Zhong, were being guarded carefully in an outer camp far from the river bank and daily entertained with feasting. They were not allowed to know of the preparations.
The watch was so close that not a trickle of information reached the prisoners.
Presently, while Zhou Yu was anxiously awaiting in his tent for the desired wind, a messenger came to say that Sun Quan had anchored at a place thirty miles from the camp, where he awaited news from the Commander-in-Chief.
Lu Su was sent to warn all the various commanders to be ready, the ships and their weapons, sails and oars, all for instant use, and to impress upon them the penalties of being caught unprepared.
The soldiers were indeed ready for the fight and yearning for the fray.
But the sky remained obstinately clear, and as night drew nigh no breath of air stirred.
“We have been cajoled,” said Zhou Yu.
“Indeed what possibility is there of a southeast wind in midwinter?” “Zhuge Liang would not use vain and deceitful words,” replied Lu Su.
Towards the third watch, the sound of a movement arose in the air. Soon the flags fluttered out.
And when the Commander-in-Chief went out to make sure, he saw they were flowing toward the northwest.
In a very short time the southeast wind was in full force. Zhou Yu was, however, frightened at the power of the man whose help he had invoked. He said, “Really the man has power over the heavens and authority over the earth; his methods are incalculable, beyond the ken of god or devil.
He cannot be allowed to live to be a danger to our land of the south.
We must slay him soon to fend off later evils.” So Zhou Yu resolved to commit a crime to remove his dangerous rival.
He called two of the generals of his guard, Ding Feng and Xu Sheng, and said to them, “Each of you take a party of one hundred troops, one along the river, the other along the road, to the altar on the mountains. As soon as you get there, without asking questions or giving reasons, you are to seize and behead Zhuge Liang.
Rich reward will be given when you bring his head back.” Xu Sheng and Ding Feng went off on their errand, the former leading dagger and ax-men going as fast as oars could propel them along the river, the latter at the head of archers and bowmen on horseback.
The southeast wind buffeted them as they went on their way.
High was raised the Seven Stars Altar, On it prayed the Sleeping-Dragon For an eastern wind, and straightway Blew the wind.
Had not the wizard Exercised his mighty magic Nought had Zhou Yu's skill availed.
Ding Feng first arrived. He saw the guards with their flags, dropped off his steed, and marched to the altar, sword in hand. But he found no Zhuge Liang.
He asked the guards; they told him, saying, “He has just gone down.” Ding Feng ran down the hill to search.
There he met his fellow Xu Sheng, and they joined forces.
Presently a simple soldier told them, saying, “The evening before a small, fast boat anchored there near a sand spit, and Zhuge Liang was seen to go on board.
Then the boat went up river.” So Xu Sheng and Ding Feng divided their party into two, one to go by water, the other by land.
Xu Sheng bade his boatmen put on all sail and take every advantage of the wind.
Before very long he saw the fugitive's boat ahead, and when near enough, stood in the prow of his own and shouted, “Do not flee, O Instructor of the Army!
The General requests your presence.” Zhuge Liang, who was seated in the stern of his boat, just laughed aloud, saying, “Return and tell the General to make good use of his soldiers.
Tell him I am going up river for a spell and will see him again another day.” “Pray wait a little while,” cried Xu Sheng.
“I have something most important to tell you.” “I knew all about it, that Zhou Yu would not let me go and that he wanted to kill me. That is why Zhao Yun was waiting for me.
You would better not approach nearer.” Seeing the other ship had no sail, Xu Sheng thought he would assuredly come up with it and so maintained the pursuit.
Then when he got too close, Zhao Yun fitted an arrow to the bowstring and, standing up in the stern of his boat, cried, “You know who I am, and I came expressly to escort the Directing Instructor.
Why are you pursuing him?
One arrow would kill you, only that would cause a breach of the peace between two houses.
I will shoot and just give you a specimen of my skill.” With that he shot, and the arrow whizzed overhead cutting the rope that held up the sail.
Down came the sail trailing in the water and the boat swung round.
Then Zhao Yun's boat hoisted its sail, and the fair wind speedily carried it out of sight.
On the bank stood Ding Feng. He bade his comrade come to the shore and said, “Zhuge Liang is too clever for any one; and Zhao Yun is bravest of the brave.
You remember what he did at Dangyang, at the Long Slope Bridge.
All we can do is to return and report.” So they returned to camp and told their master about the preparations that Zhuge Liang had made to ensure safety.
Zhou Yu was indeed puzzled at the depth of his rival's insight. “I shall have no peace day or night while he lives,” said Zhou Yu.
“At least wait till Cao Cao is done with,” said Lu Su. And Zhou Yu knew Lu Su spoke wisely.
Having summoned the leaders to receive orders, first Zhou Yu gave orders to Gan Ning:
“Take with you the false deserter Cai Zhong and his soldiers, and go along the south bank, showing the flags of Cao Cao, till you reach the Black Forest just opposite the enemy's main store of grain and forage. Then you are to penetrate as deeply as possible into the enemy's lines and light a torch as a signal. Cai He is to be kept in camp for another purpose.” The next order was:
“Taishi Ci is to lead two thousand troops as quickly as possible to Huangzhou and cut the enemy's communications with Hefei.
When near the enemy, he is to give a signal; and if he sees a red flag, he will know that our lord, Sun Quan, is at hand with reinforcements.” Gan Ning and Taishi Ci had the farthest to go and started first.
Then Lu Meng was sent into the Black Forest with three thousand troops as a support to Gan Ning who was ordered to set fire to Cao Cao's depot. A fourth party of three thousand troops was led by Ling Tong to the borders of Yiling and attack as soon as the signal from the forest was seen.
A fifth party of three thousand under Dong Xi went to Hanyang to fall upon the enemy along the River Han.
Their signal was a white flag; and a sixth division of three thousand commanded by Pan Zhang would support them.
When these six parties had gone off.
Huang Gai got ready his fire ships and sent a soldier with a note to tell Cao Cao that he was coming over that evening.
Four naval squadrons were told off to support Huang Gai.
The four squadrons, each of three hundred ships, were placed under four commanders: Han Dang, Zhou Tai, Jiang Qin, and Chen Wu. Twenty fire ships preceded each fleet. Zhou Yu and Cheng Pu went on board one of the large ships to direct the battle.
Their guards were Ding Feng and Xu Sheng. Lu Su, Kan Ze, and the advisers were left to guard the camp.
Cheng Pu was greatly impressed with Zhou Yu's ordering of the grand attack.
Then came a messenger bearing a mandate from Sun Quan making Lu Xun Leader of the Van. He was ordered to go to Qichun. Sun Quan himself would support Lu Xun.
Zhou Yu also sent a unit to the Western Hills to make signals and to hoist flags on the Nanping Mountains.
So all being prepared they waited for dusk. Liu Bei was at Xiakou anxiously awaiting the return of his adviser.
Then appeared a fleet, led by Liu Qi, who had come to find out how matters were progressing.
Liu Bei sent to call him to the battle tower and said, “The southeast wind had begun to blow, and that Zhao Yun had gone to meet Zhuge Liang.” Not long after a single sail was seen coming up before the wind, and Liu Bei knew it was Zhuge Liang, the Directing Instructor of the Army.
So Liu Bei and Liu Qi went down to meet the boat.
Soon the vessel reached the shore, and Zhuge Liang and Zhao Yun disembarked.
Liu Bei was very glad, and after they had inquired after each other's wellbeing, Zhuge Liang said, “There is no time to tell of any other things now.
Are the soldiers and ships ready?” “They have long been ready,” replied Liu Bei. “They only await you to direct how they are to be used.” The three then went to the tent and took their seats. Zhuge Liang at once began to issue orders:
“Zhao Yun, with three thousand troops is to cross the river and go to the Black Forest by the minor road. He will choose a dense jungle and prepare an ambush.
Tonight, after the fourth watch, Cao Cao will hurry along that way.
When half his troops have passed, the jungle is to be fired.
Cao Cao will not be wholly destroyed but many will perish.” “There are two roads,” said Zhao Yun. “One leads to the southern regions and the other to Jingzhou.
I do not know by which he will come.” “The south road is too dangerous; Cao Cao will certainly pass along the Jingzhou road, so that he may get away to Xuchang.” Then Zhao Yun went away.
Next Zhuge Liang said to Zhang Fei, “You will take three thousand troops over the river to cut the road to Yiling. You will ambush in the Hulu Valley.
Cao Cao, not daring to go to South Yiling, will go to North Yiling.
Tomorrow, after the rain, he will halt to refresh his troops.
As soon as the smoke is seen to rise from their cooking fires, you will fire the hill side.
You will not capture Cao Cao, but you will render excellent service.” So Zhang Fei left.
Next was called Mi Zhu, Mi Fang, and Liu Feng. They were to take command of three squadrons and go along the river to collect beaten soldiers and their weapons.
The three left.
Then Zhuge Liang said to Liu Qi, “The country around Wuchang is very important, and I wish you to take command of your own troops and station them at strategic points.
Cao Cao, being defeated, will flee thither, and you will capture him. But you are not to leave the city without the best of reasons.” And Liu Qi took leave.
Then Zhuge Liang said to Liu Bei, “I wish you to remain quietly and calmly in Fankou, in a high tower, to watch Zhou Yu work out his great scheme this night.” All this time Guan Yu has been silently waiting his turn, but Zhuge Liang said no word to him.
When Guan Yu could bear this no longer, he cried, “Since I first followed my brother to battle many years ago, I have never been left behind.
Now that great things are afoot, is there no work for me? What is meant by it?” “You should not be surprised.
I wanted you for service at a most important point, only that there was a something standing in the way that prevented me from sending you,” said Zhuge Liang. “What could stand in the way?
I wish you would tell me.” “You see Cao Cao was once very kind to you, and you cannot help feeling grateful.
Now when his soldiers have been beaten, he will have to flee along the Huarong Road; and if I sent you to guard it, you would have to let him pass. So I will not send you.” “You are most considerate, Instructor.
But though it is true that he treated me well, yet I slew two of his most redoubtable opponents, Yan Liang and Wen Chou, by way of repayment, beside raising a siege.
If I happened upon him on this occasion, I should hardly let him go.” “But what if you did?” “You could deal with me by military rules.” “Then put that in writing.” So Guan Yu wrote a formal undertaking and gave the document to Zhuge Liang.
“What happens if Cao Cao does not pass that way?” said Guan Yu.
“I will give you a written engagement that he will pass.” Then Zhuge Liang continued, “On the hills by the Huarong Valley, you are to raise a heap of wood and grass to make a great column of smoke and mislead Cao Cao into coming.” “If Cao Cao sees a smoke, he will suspect an ambush and will not come.” said Guan Yu. “You are very simple,” said Zhuge Liang.
“Do you not know more of war's ruses than that? Cao Cao is an able leader, but you can deceive him this time.
When he sees the smoke, he will take it as a subterfuge and risk going that way.
But do not let your kindness of heart rule your conduct.” Thus was his duty assigned Guan Yu, and he left, taking his adopted son Guan Ping, his general Zhou Cang, and five hundred swordsmen.
Said Liu Bei, “His sense of rectitude is very profound; I fear if Cao Cao should come that way, my brother will let him pass.” “I have consulted the stars lately, and the rebel Cao Cao is not fated to come to his end yet.
I have purposely designed this manifestation of kindly feeling for Guan Yu to accomplish and so act handsomely.” “Indeed there are few such far-seeing humans as you are,” said Liu Bei.
The two then went to Fankou whence they might watch Zhou Yu's evolutions. Sun Qian and Jian Yong were left on guard of Xiakou.
Cao Cao was in his great camp in conference with his advisers and awaiting the arrival of Huang Gai.
The southeast wind was very strong that day, and Cheng Yu was insisting on the necessity for precaution.
But Cao Cao laughed, saying, “The Winter Solstice depends upon the sun and nothing else; there is sure to be a southeast wind at some one or other of its recurrences.
I see nothing to wonder at.” Just then they announced the arrival of a small boat from the other shore with a letter from Huang Gai.
The bearer of the letter was brought in and presented it. Cao Cao read it:
“Zhou Yu has kept such strict watch that there has been no chance of escape.
But now some grain is coming down river, and I, Huang Gai, have been named as escort commander which will give me the opportunity I desire.
I will slay one of the known generals and bring his head as an offering when I come.
This evening at the third watch, if boats are seen with dragon toothed flags, they will be the grain boats.” This letter delighted Cao Cao who, with his officers, went to the naval camp and boarded a great ship to watch for the arrival of Huang Gai.
In the South Land, when evening fell, Zhou Yu sent for Cai He and bade the soldiers bind him.
The unhappy man protested, saying, “I have committed no crime.” But Zhou Yu said, “What sort of a fellow are you, think you, to come and pretend to desert to my side?
I need a small sacrifice for my flag, and your head will serve my purpose.
So I am going to use it.” Cai He being at the end of his tether unable to deny the charge suddenly cried, “Two of your own side, Kan Ze and Gan Ning, are also in the plot!” “Under my directions,” said Zhou Yu.
Cai He was exceedingly repentant and sad, but Zhou Yu bade them take Cai He to the river bank where the black standard had been set up and there, after the pouring of a libation and the burning of paper, Cai He was beheaded, his blood being a sacrifice to the flag.
This ceremony over, the ships started, and Huang Gai took his place on the third ship. He merely wore breast armor and carried a keen blade. On his flag were written four large characters “Van Leader Huang Gai”.
With a fair wind his fleet sailed toward the Red Cliffs.
The wind was strong and the waves ran high.
Cao Cao in the midst of the central squadron eagerly scanned the river which rolled down under the bright moon like a silver serpent writhing in innumerable folds.
Letting the wind blow full in his face, Cao Cao laughed aloud for he was now to obtain his desire.
Then a soldier pointing to the river said, “The whole south is one mass of sails, and they are coming up on the wind.” Cao Cao went to a higher point and gazed at the sails intently, and his officers told him that the flags were black and dragon shaped, and indented, and among them there flew one very large banner on which was a name Huang Gai.
“That is my friend, the deserter,” said he joyfully.
“Heaven is on my side today.” As the ships drew closer, Cheng Yu said, “Those ships are treacherous.
Do not let them approach the camp.” “How know you that?” asked Cao Cao.
And Cheng Yu replied, “If they were laden with grain, they would lie deep in the water.
But these are light and float easily.
The southeast wind is very strong, and if they intend treachery, how can we defend ourselves?” Cao Cao began to understand.
Then he asked who would go out to stop the approaching fleet, and Wen Ping volunteered, saying, “I am well used to the waters.” Thereupon Wen Ping sprang into a small light craft and sailed out, followed by ten cruisers which came at his signal.
Standing in the prow of his ship, Wen Ping called out to those advancing toward them, “You southern ships are not to approach; such are the orders of the Prime Minister.
Stop there in mid stream!” The soldiers all yelled to them to lower their sails.
The shout had not died away when a bowstring twanged, and Wen Ping rolled down into the ship with an arrow in the left arm.
Confusion reigned on his ship, and all the others hurried back to their camp.
When the ships were about a mile of distant, Huang Gai waved his sword and the leading ships broke forth into fire, which, under the force of the strong wind, soon gained strength and the ships became as fiery arrows.
Soon the whole twenty dashed into the naval camp.
All Cao Cao's ships were gathered there, and as they were firmly chained together not one could escape from the others and flee.
There was a roar of bombs and fireships came on from all sides at once. The face of the three rivers was speedily covered with fire which flew before the wind from one ship to another. It seemed as if the universe was filled with flame.
Cao Cao hastened toward the shore.
Huang Gai, with a few troops at his back, leaped into a small boat, dashed through the fire, and sought Cao Cao.
Cao Cao, seeing the imminence of the danger, was making for the land; Zhang Liao got hold of a small boat into which he helped his master; none too soon, for the ship was burning. They got Cao Cao out of the thick of the fire and dashed for the bank.
Huang Gai, seeing a handsomely robed person get into a small boat, guessed it must be Cao Cao and pursued. He drew very near and he held his keen blade ready to strike, crying out, “You rebel! Do not flee. I am Huang Gai.” Cao Cao howled in the bitterness of his distress.
Zhang Liao fitted an arrow to his bow and aimed at the pursuer, shooting at short range.
The roaring of the gale and the flames kept Huang Gai from hearing the twang of the string, and he was wounded in the shoulder.
He fell and rolled over into the water.
He fell in peril of water When flames were high; Ere cudgel bruises had faded, An arrow struck.
Huang Gai's fate will be told in the next chapter. CHAPTER 50.
Zhuge Liang Foresees The Huarong Valley Episode; Guan Yu Lifts His Saber To Release Cao Cao. The last chapter closed with Huang Gai in the water wounded, Cao Cao rescued from immediate danger, and confusion rampant among the soldiers.
Pressing forward to attack the naval camp, Han Dang was told by his soldiers that some one was clinging to the rudder of his boat and shouting to him by his familiar name.
Han Dang listened carefully and in the voice at once he recognized that Huang Gai was calling to him for help.
“That is my friend Huang Gai!” cried he, and they quickly pulled the wounded leader out of the water.
Then they saw Huang Gai was wounded for the arrow still stuck. Han Dang bit out the shaft of the arrow but the point was deeply buried in the flesh.
They hastily pulled off his wet garments and cut out the metal arrowhead with a dagger, tore up one of the flags, and bound up the wound. Then Han Dang gave Huang Gai his own fighting robe to put on and sent him off in a small boat back to camp.
Huang Gai's escape from drowning must be taken as proof of his natural affinity for, or sympathy with, water. Although it was the period of great cold and he was heavy with armor when he fell into the river, yet he escaped with life.
In this great battle at the junction of the three rivers, the Three Gorges, when fire seemed to spread wide over all the wide surface of the water, when the earth quaked with the roar of battle, when land forces closed in on both wings and four battle squadrons advanced on the front, when the ferocity of fire answered the clash of weapons and weapons were aided by fire, under the thrusts of spears and the flights of arrows, burnt by fire and drowned by water, Cao Cao lost an incalculable number of troops.
And a poet wrote: When Wei and Wu together strove For the mastery, In the Red Cliffs fight the towering ships Vanished from the sea, For there the fierce flames, leaping high. Burned them utterly. So Zhou Yu for his liege lord Got the victory.
And another poem runs: The hills are high, the moon shines faint.
The waters stretch afar; I sigh to think how oft this land Has suffered stress of war; And I recall how southerners Shrank from the northern army's might, And how a favoring eastern gale Helped them to win the fight.
While fire was consuming the naval base of Cao Cao, Gan Ning made Cai Zhong guide him into the innermost recesses of Cao Cao's camp. Then Gan Ning slew Cai Zhong with one slash of his sword.
After this Gan Ning set fire to the jungle; and at this signal, Lu Meng put fire to the grass in ten places near to each other.
Then other fires were started, and the noise of battle was on all sides.
Cao Cao and Zhang Liao, with a small party of horsemen, fled through the burning forest. They could see no road in front; all seemed on fire.
Presently Mao Jie and Wen Ping, with a few more horsemen, joined them.
Cao Cao bade the soldiers seek a way through.
Zhang Liao pointed out, saying, “The only suitable road is through the Black Forest.” And they took it.
They had gone but a short distance when they were overtaken by a small party of the enemy, and a voice cried, “Cao Cao, stop!” It was Lu Meng, whose ensign soon appeared against the fiery background.
Cao Cao urged his small party of fugitives forward, bidding Zhang Liao defend him from Lu Meng.
Soon after Cao Cao saw the light of torches in front, and from a gorge there rushed out another force.
And the leader cried, “Ling Tong is here!” Cao Cao was scared; his liver and gall both seemed torn from within.
But just then on his half right, he saw another company approach and heard a cry, “Fear not, O Prime Minister, I am here to rescue you!” The speaker was Xu Huang, and he attacked the pursuers and held them off.
A move to the north seemed to promise escape, but soon they saw a camp on a hill top.
Xu Huang went ahead to reconnoiter and found the officers in command were Cao Cao's Generals Ma Yan and Zhang Yi, who had once been in the service of Yuan Shao. They had three thousand of northern soldiers in camp.
They had seen the sky redden with the flames, but knew not what was afoot so dared make no move. This turned out lucky for Cao Cao who now found himself with a fresh force.
He sent Ma Yan and Zhang Yi, with a thousand troops, to clear the road ahead while the others remained as guard. And he felt much more secure.
The two went forward, but before they had gone very far, they heard a shouting and a party of soldiers came out, the leader of them shouting, “I am Gan Ning of Wu!” Nothing daunted the two leaders, but the redoubtable Gan Ning cut down Ma Yan; and when his brother warrior Zhang Yi set his spear and dashed forward, he too fell beneath a stroke from the fearsome sword of Gan Ning.
Both leaders dead, the soldiers fled to give Cao Cao the bad news.
At this time Cao Cao expected aid from Hefei, for he knew not that Sun Quan was barring the road.
But when Sun Quan saw the fires and so knew that his soldiers had won the day, he ordered Lu Xun to give the answering signal. Taishi Ci seeing this came down and his force joined up with that of Lu Xun, and they went against Cao Cao.
As for Cao Cao, he could only get away toward Yiling.
On the road Cao Cao fell in with Zhang He and ordered him to protect the retreat. Cao Cao pressed on as quickly as possible. At the fifth watch he was a long way from the glare and he felt safer.
He asked, “What is this place?” They told him, “It is west of the Black Forest and north of Yidu.” Seeing the thickly crowded trees all about him, and the steep hills and narrow passes, Cao Cao threw up his head and laughed.
Those about him asked, “Why are you, Sir, so merry?” And he said, “I am only laughing at the stupidity of Zhou Yu and the ignorance of Zhuge Liang.
If they have only set an ambush there, as I would have done, why, there is no escape.” Cao Cao had scarcely finished his explanation when from both sides came a deafening roll of drums and flames sprang up to heaven. Cao Cao nearly fell off his horse—he was so startled.
And from the side dashed in a troop, with Zhao Yun leading, who cried, “I am Zhao Yun, and long have I been waiting here!” Cao Cao ordered Xu Huang and Zhang He to engage this new opponent, and he himself rode off into the smoke and fire.
Zhao Yun did not pursue; he only captured the banners, and Cao Cao escaped.
The faint light of dawn showed a great black cloud all around, for the southeast wind had not ceased.
Suddenly began a heavy downpour of rain, wetting every one to the skin, but still Cao Cao maintained his headlong flight till the starved faces of the soldiers made a halt imperative.
He told the men to forage in the villages about for grain and the means of making a fire.
But when these had been found and they began to cook a meal, another pursuing party came along, and Cao Cao again was terrified.
However, these proved to be Li Dian and Xu Chu escorting some of his advisers whom he saw with joy.
When giving the order to advance again, Cao Cao asked, “What places lay ahead?” They told him, “There are two roads; one was the highway to South Yiling, and the other a mountain road to North Yiling.” “Which is the shorter way to Jiangling?” asked Cao Cao.
“The best way is to take the south road through Hulu Valley,” was the reply. So Cao Cao gave orders to march that way.
By the time Hulu Valley was reached, the soldiers were almost starving and could march no more; horses too were worn out. Many had fallen by the roadside.
A halt was then made, food was taken by force from the villagers, and as there were still some boilers left, they found a dry spot beside the hills where they could rest and cook. And there they began to prepare a meal, boiling grain, and roasting strips of horse flesh.
Then they took off their wet clothes and spread them to dry.
The beasts, too, were unsaddled and turned out to graze.
Seated comfortably in a somewhat open spot, Cao Cao suddenly looked up and began to laugh loud and long.
His companions, remembering the sequel of his last laugh, said, “Not long since, Sir, you laughed at Zhou Yu and Zhuge Liang; that resulted in the arrival of Zhao Yun and great loss of troops to us.
Why do you now laugh?” “I am laughing again at the ignorance of the same two men.
If I were in their place, and conducting their campaign, I should have had an ambush here, just to meet us when we were tired out.
Then, even if we escaped with our lives, we should suffer very severely.
They did not see this, and therefore I am laughing at them.” Even at that moment behind them rose a great yell. Thoroughly startled, Cao Cao threw aside his breastplate and leaped upon his horse.
Most of the soldiers failed to catch theirs, and then fires sprang up on every side and filled the mouth of the valley. A force was arrayed before them and at the head was the man of ancient Yan, Zhang Fei, seated on his steed with his great spear leveled. “Whither would you flee, O rebel?” shouted he.
The soldiers grew cold within at the sight of the terrible warrior.
Xu Chu, mounted on a bare-backed horse, rode up to engage him, and Zhang Liao and Xu Huang galloped up to his aid.
The three gathered about Zhang Fei and a melee began, while Cao Cao made off at top speed. The other leaders set off after him, and Zhang Fei pursued.
However, Cao Cao by dint of hard riding got away, and gradually the pursuers were out-distanced. But many had received wounds.
As they were going. the soldiers said, “There are two roads before us; which shall we take?” “Which is the shorter?” asked Cao Cao.
“The high road is the more level, but it is fifteen miles longer than the bye road which goes to Huarong Valley.
Only the latter road is narrow and dangerous, full of pits and difficult.” Cao Cao sent men up to the hill tops to look around.
They returned, saying: “There are several columns of smoke rising from the hills along the bye road.
The high road seems quiet.” Then Cao Cao bade them lead the way along the bye road.
“Where smoke arises there are surely soldiers,” remarked the officers.
“Why go this way?” “Because the 'Book of War' says that the hollow is to be regarded as solid, and the solid as hollow.
That fellow Zhuge Liang is very subtle and has sent people to make those fires so that we should not go that way. He has laid an ambush on the high road.
I have made up my mind, and I will not fall a victim to his wiles.” “O Prime Minister, your conclusions are most admirable.
None other can equal you,” said the officers.
And the soldiers were sent along the bye road.
They were very hungry and many almost too weak to travel. The horses too were spent.
Some had been scorched by the flames, and they rode forward resting their heads on their whips; the wounded struggled on to the last of their strength.
All were soaking wet and all were feeble.
Their arms and accouterments were in a deplorable state, and more than half had been left upon the road they had traversed. Few of the horses had saddles or bridles, for in the confusion of pursuit they had been left behind.
It was the time of greatest winter cold, and the suffering was indescribable.
Noticing that the leading party had stopped, Cao Cao sent to ask the reason.
The messenger returned, saying, “The rain water collected in the pits makes the ground a mire, and the horses cannot not move.” Cao Cao raged.
He said, “When soldiers come to hills, they cut a road, when they happen upon streams, they bridge them; such a thing as mud cannot stay an army.” So he ordered the weak and wounded to go to the rear and come on as they could, while the robust and able were to cut down trees, and gather herbage and reeds to fill up the holes.
And it was to be done without delay, or death would be the punishment of the disobedient or remiss.
So the soldiers dismounted and felled trees and cut bamboos, and they leveled the road.
And because of the imminence and fear of pursuit, a party of one hundred under Zhang Liao, Xu Chu, and Xu Huang was told off to hasten the workers and slay any that idled.
The soldiers made their way along the shallower parts, but many fell, and cries of misery were heard the whole length of the way.
“What are you howling for?” cried Cao Cao. “The number of your days is fixed by fate.
Any one who howls shall be put to death.” The remnant of the army, now divided into three, one to march slowly, a second to fill up the waterways and hollows, and a third to escort Cao Cao, gradually made its way over the precipitous road.
When the going improved a little and the path was moderately level, Cao Cao turned to look at his following and saw he had barely three hundred soldiers. And these lacked clothing and armor and were tattered and disordered.
But he pressed on, and when the officers told him the horses were quite spent and must rest, he replied, “Press on to Jingzhou and there we shall find repose.” So they pressed on.
But they had gone only one or two miles when Cao Cao flourished his whip and broke once again into loud laughter.
“What is there to laugh at?” asked the officers.
“People say those two, Zhou Yu and Zhuge Liang, are able and crafty; I do not see it. They are a couple of incapables.
If an ambush had been placed here, we should all be prisoners.” Cao Cao had not finished this speech when the explosion of a bomb broke the silence, and a company of five hundred troops with swords in their hands appeared and barred the way. The leader was Guan Yu, holding his greendragon saber, bestriding the Red-Hare.
At this sight, the spirits of Cao Cao's soldiers left them, and they gazed into each others' faces in panic.
“Now we have but one course;” said Cao Cao, “we must fight to the death.” “How can we?” said the officers.
“Though the leaders are not scared, the horses are spent.” Cheng Yu said, “I have always heard that Guan Yu is haughty to the proud but kindly to the humble; he despises the strong, but is gentle with the weak.
He discriminates between love and hate and is always righteous and true.
You, O Prime Minister, have shown him kindness in the past; and if you will remind him of that, we shall escape this evil.” Cao Cao agreed to try.
He rode out to the front, bowed low and said, “General, I trust you have enjoyed good health.” “I had orders to await you, O Prime Minister,” replied Guan Yu, bowing in return, “and I have been expecting you these many days.” “You see before you Cao Cao, defeated and weak.
I have reached a sad pass, and I trust you, O General, will not forget the kindness of former days.” “Though indeed you were kind to me in those days, yet I slew your enemies for you and relieved the siege of Baima.
As to the business of today, I cannot allow private feelings to outweigh public duty.” “Do you remember my six generals, slain at the five passes?
The noble person values righteousness.
You are well versed in the histories and must recall the action of Yu Gong, the archer, when he released his master Zi Zhuo, for he determined not to use Zi's teaching to kill Zi.” Guan Yu was indeed a very mountain of goodness and could not forget the great kindness he had received at Cao Cao's hands, and the magnanimity Cao Cao had shown over the deeds at the five passes.
He saw the desperate straits to which his benefactor was reduced, and tears were very near to the eyes of both. He could not press Cao Cao hard.
He pulled at the bridle of his steed and turned away saying to his followers, “Break up the formation!” From this it was evident that his design was to release Cao Cao, who then went on with his officers; and when Guan Yu turned to look back, they had all passed.
He uttered a great shout and Cao Cao's soldiers jumped off their horses and knelt on the ground crying for mercy. But he also had pity for them.
Then Zhang Liao, whom he knew well, came along and was allowed to go free also.
Cao Cao, his army lost, fled to the Huarong Valley; There in the throat of the gorge met he Guan Yu.
Grateful was Guan Yu, and mindful of former kindness, Wherefore slipped he the bolt and freed the imprisoned dragon.
Having escaped this danger, Cao Cao hastened to get out of the valley.
As the throat opened out, he glanced behind him and saw only forty-seven horsemen.
As evening fell, they reached Jiangling, and they came upon an army that they took to be more enemies.
Cao Cao thought the end had surely come, but to his delight they were his own soldiers and he regained all his confidence.
Cao Ren, who was the leader, said, “I heard of your misfortunes, my lord, but I was afraid to venture far from my charge, else I would have met you before.” “I thought I would never see you again,” said Cao Cao.
The fugitives found repose in the city, where Zhang Liao soon joined them.
He also praised the magnanimity of Guan Yu.
When Cao Cao mustered the miserable remnant of his officers, he found nearly all were wounded and he bade them rest.
Cao Ren poured the wine of consolation whereby his master might forget his sorrows.
And as Cao Cao drank among his familiars, he became exceedingly sad.
Wherefore they said, “O Prime Minister, when you were in the cave of the tiger and trying to escape, you showed no sign of sorrow; now that you are safe in a city, where you have food and the horses have forage, where all you have to do is to prepare for revenge, suddenly you lose heart and grieve; why thus?” Replied Cao Cao, “I am thinking of my friend Guo Jia; had he been alive, he would not have let me suffer this loss.” He beat his breast and wept, saying “Alas for Guo Jia!
I grieve for Guo Jia! I sorrow for Guo Jia!” The reproach shamed the advisers.
Next day Cao Cao called Cao Ren and said, “I am going to the capital to prepare another army for revenge.
You are to guard this region and, in case of necessity, I leave with you a sealed plan. You are only to open the cover when hard-pressed, and then you are to act as directed.
The South Land will not dare to look this way.” “Who is to guard Hefei and Xiangyang?” “Jingzhou is particularly your care, and Xiahou Dun is to hold Xiangyang.
As Hefei is most important, I am sending Zhang Liao thither with good aids of Li Dian and Yue Jin.
If you get into difficulties, send at once to tell me.” Having made these dispositions, Cao Cao set off at once with a few followers.
He took with him the officers who had come over to his side when Jingzhou fell into his hands.
Cao Ren placed Cao Hong in charge of Yiling.
After having allowed the escape of Cao Cao, Guan Yu found his way back to headquarters.
By this time the other detachments had returned bringing spoil of horses and weapons and supplies of all kinds.
Only Guan Yu came back empty-handed. When he arrived, Zhuge Liang was with his brother congratulating him on his success.
When Guan Yu was announced, Zhuge Liang got up and went to welcome him, bearing a cup of wine.
O General,” said Zhuge Liang. “You have done a deed that overtops the world.
You have removed the empire's worst foe and ought to have been met at a distance and felicitated.” Guan Yu muttered inaudibly, and Zhuge Liang continued, “I hope it is not because we have omitted to welcome you on the road that you seem sad.” Turning to those about him, Zhuge Liang said, “Why did you not tell us Guan Yu was coming?” “I am here to ask for death,” said Guan Yu. “Surely Cao Cao came through the valley?” “Yes; he came that way, and I could not help it; I let him go.” “Then whom have you captured?” “No one.” “Then you remembered the old kindness of Cao Cao and so allowed him to escape.
But your acceptance of the task with its conditions is here.
You will have to suffer the penalty.” Zhuge Liang called in the lictors and told them to take away Guan Yu and put him to death.
Guan Yu risked life when he spared Cao Cao in direst need, And age-long admiration gained For kindly deed.
What actually befell will he seen in the next chapter. CHAPTER 51. Cao Ren Fights The South Land's Troops; Zhuge Liang Angers Zhou Yu.
Guan Yu would have died there but for his elder brother, who said to Zhuge Liang, “We three pledged ourselves to live and die together.
Although my brother Guan Yu has offended, I cannot bear to break our oath.
I hope you will only record this against him and let him atone later for the fault by some specially meritorious service.” So the sentence was remitted.
In the meantime, Zhou Yu mustered his officers and called over his soldiers, noted the special services of each, and sent full reports to his master.
The soldiers who had surrendered were all transported across the river. All this done they spread the feast of victory. The next step was to attack and capture Nanjun. The van of the army camped on the river bank.
There were five camps and the Commander-inChief's tent was in the center. He summoned his officers to a council.
At this moment Sun Qian arrived with congratulations from Liu Bei.
Zhou Yu received him and, having saluted in proper form, Sun Qian said, “My lord sent me on this special mission to felicitate the General on his great virtue and offer some unworthy gifts.” “Where is Liu Bei?” asked Zhou Yu.
“He is now encamped at Youkou, the mouth of River You.” “Is Zhuge Liang there?” asked Zhou Yu, taken aback.
“Both are there,” said Sun Qian.
“Then return quickly, and I will come in person to thank them.” The presents handed over, Sun Qian was sent back forthwith to his own camp. Then Lu Su asked Zhou Yu why he had started when he heard where Liu Bei was camped.
“Because,” replied Zhou Yu, “camping at the mouth of River You means that he has the intention of taking Nanjun.
Having spent much military energy and spared no expenditure, we thought the territory should fall to us easily. Those others are opposed to us, and they wish to get the advantage of what we have already accomplished.
However, they must remember that I am not dead yet.” “How can you prevent them?” asked Lu Su.
“I will go myself and speak with them.
If all goes well, then, let it be so; in case it does not, then I shall immediately settle up with Liu Bei without waiting for Nanjun to be taken.” “I should like to accompany you,” said Lu Su.
The General and his friend started, taking with them a guard of three thousand light horse.
Having arrived at Youkou, they sought out Sun Qian, who, in turn, went in to see Liu Bei and told him Zhou Yu had come to render thanks.
“Why has he come?” asked Liu Bei of his Directing Instructor. “He is not likely to come out of simple politeness.
Surely he has come in connection with Nanjun.” “But if he brings an army, can we stand against it?” asked Liu Bei.
“When he comes, you may reply thus and thus.” Then they drew up the warships in the river and ranged the soldiers upon the bank; and when the arrival of Zhou Yu was formally announced, Zhao Yun, with some horsemen, went to welcome him.
When Zhou Yu saw what bold soldiers they looked, he began to feel uncomfortable, but he went on his way.
Being met at the camp gates by Liu Bei and Zhuge Liang, he was taken in to the chief tent, where the ceremonies were performed and preparations for a banquet had been made.
Presently Liu Bei raised his cup in felicitation on the recent victory gained by his guest.
The banquet proceeded, and after a few more courses Zhou Yu said, “Of course you are camped here with no other idea than to take Nanjun?” Liu Bei said, “We heard you were going to take the place and came to assist.
Should you not take it, then we will occupy it.” Zhou Yu laughed, saying, “We of the South Land have long wished for this territory. Now that it is within our grasp, we naturally shall take it.” Liu Bei said, “There is always some uncertainty.
Cao Cao left Cao Ren to guard the region, and you may be certain that there is good strategy behind Cao Ren, to say nothing of his boldness as a warrior.
I fear you may not get it.” “Well, if we do not take it then, Sir, you may have it,” said Zhou Yu.
“Here are witnesses to your words,” said Liu Bei, naming Lu Su, Zhuge Liang, and those at table.
“I hope you will never repent what you have just said.” Lu Su stammered and seemed unwilling to be cited as one of the witnesses, but Zhou Yu said, “When the word of a noble person has gone forth, it is ended; he never regrets.” “This speech of yours, Sir, is very generous,” interjected Zhuge Liang.
“The South Land shall try first; but if the place does not fall, there is no reason why my lord should not capture it.” The two visitors then took their leave and rode away.
As soon as they had left, Liu Bei turned to Zhuge Liang and said, “O Master, you bade me thus reply to Zhou Yu; but though I did so, I have turned it over and over in my mind without finding any reason in what I said.
I am alone and weak, without a single foot of land to call my own.
I desired to get possession of Nanjun that I might have, at least, a temporary shelter, yet I have said that Zhou Yu may attack it first, and if it falls to the South Land, how can I get possession?” Zhuge Liang laughed and replied, “First I advised you to attack Jingzhou, but you would not listen; do you remember?” “But it belonged to Liu Biao, and I could not bear to attack it then.
Now it belongs to Cao Cao I might do so.” “Do not be anxious,” replied the adviser.
“Let Zhou Yu go and attack it; some day, my lord, I shall make you sit in the high place thereof.” “But what design have you?” “So and so,” said Zhuge Liang, whispering.
Liu Bei was satisfied with the reply, and only strengthened his position at Youkou.
In the meantime Zhou Yu and Lu Su returned to their own camp, and the latter said, “Why did you tell Liu Bei that he might attack Nanjun?” “I can take it with a flick of my finger,” replied Zhou Yu, “but I just manifested a little pretended kindliness.” Then he inquired among his officers for a volunteer to attack the city.
Jiang Qin offered himself, and was put in command of the vanguard, with Xu Sheng and Ding Feng as helpers. He was given five thousand of veterans, and they moved across the river.
Zhou Yu promised to follow with supports.
On the other side Cao Ren ordered Cao Hong to guard Yiling, and so hold one corner of an ox-horn defense.
When the news came that the South Land's force had crossed the River Han, Cao Ren said, “We will defend and not offer battle.” But General Niu Jin said impetuously, “To let the enemy approach the walls and not offer battle is timidity.
Our troops, lately worsted, need heartening and must show their mettle.
Let me have five hundred of veterans, and I will fight to a finish.” Cao Ren could not withstand this offer, and so the five hundred went out of the city. At once Ding Feng came to challenge the leader, and they fought a few bouts.
Then Ding Feng pretended to be defeated, gave up the fight, and retreated into his own lines.
Niu Jin followed him hard.
When he had got within the South Land's formation, at a signal from Ding Feng, the army closed round and Niu Jin was surrounded.
He pushed right and left, but could find no way out.
Seeing Niu Jin in the toils, Cao Ren, who had watched the fight from the wall, donned his armor and came out of the city at the head of his own bold company of horsemen and burst in among the forces of the South Land to try to rescue his colleague.
Beating back Xu Sheng, Cao Ren fought his way in and presently rescued Niu Jin.
However, having got out, Cao Ren saw several score of horsemen still in the middle unable to make their way out, whereupon he turned again to the battle and dashed in to their rescue.
This time he met Jiang Qin on whom Cao Ren and Niu Jin made a violent attack.
Then the brother Cao Chun came up with supports, and the great battle ended in a defeat for the troops of the South Land.
So Cao Ren went back victor, while the unhappy Jiang Qin returned to report his failure.
Zhou Yu was very angry and would have put to death his hapless subordinate but for the intervention of the other officers.
Then Zhou Yu prepared for another attack where he himself would lead.
But Gan Ning said, “General, do not be in too great hurry; let me go first and attack Yiling, the supporting angle of the ox-horn formation.
After that the conquest of Nanjun will be easy.” Zhou Yu accepted the plan and Gan Ning, with three thousand troops, went to attack Yiling.
When news of the approaching army reached him, Cao Ren called to his side Chen Jiao, who said, “If Yiling be lost, then Nanjun is lost too.
So help must be sent quickly.” Thereupon Cao Chun and Niu Jin were sent by secret ways to the aid of Cao Hong.
Cao Chun sent a messenger to the city to ask that they should cause a diversion by a sortie at the time the reinforcements should arrive.
So when Gan Ning drew near, Cao Hong went out to meet and engage him.
They fought a score of rounds, but Cao Hong was overcome at last, and Gan Ning took the city.
However, as evening fell the reinforcements under Cao Chun and Niu Jin came up, and the captor was surrounded in the city he had taken. The scouts went off immediately to tell Zhou Yu of this sudden change of affairs which greatly alarmed him.
“Let us hasten to his rescue,” said Cheng Pu.
“Our place is of the greatest importance,” said Zhou Yu, “and I am afraid to leave it undefended lest Cao Ren should attack.” “But Gan Ning is one of our first leaders and must be rescued,” said Lu Meng.
“I should like to go myself to his aid, but whom can I leave here in my place?” said Zhou Yu.
“Leave Ling Tong here;” said Lu Meng, “I will push on ahead, and you can protect my advance.
In less than ten days we shall be singing the paean of victory.” “Are you willing?” said Zhou Yu to the man who was to act for him.
Ling Tong said, “If the ten-day period is not exceeded, I may be able to carry on for that time; I am unequal to more than that.” Ling Tong's consent pleased Zhou Yu who started at once, leaving ten thousand troops for the defense of the camp.
Lu Meng said to his chief, “South of Yiling is a little-used road that may prove very useful in an attack on Nanjun.
Let us send a party to fell trees and barricade this road so that horses cannot pass.
In case of defeat, the defeated will take this road and will be compelled to abandon their horses, which we shall capture.” Zhou Yu approved and the men set out.
When the main army drew near Yiling, Zhou Yu asked who would try to break through the besiegers, and Zhou Tai offered himself.
He girded on his sword, mounted his steed, and burst straight into the Cao Hong's army. He got through to the city wall.
From the city wall Gan Ning saw the approach of his friend Zhou Tai and went out to welcome him.
Zhou Tai told him the Commander-in-Chief was on the way to his relief, and Gan Ning at once bade the defenders prepare from within to support the attack of the rescuers.
When the news of the approach of Zhou Yu had reached Yiling, Cao Hong, Cao Chun, and Niu Jin had sent to tell Cao Ren, who was at Nanjun, and at the same time they prepared to repel the assailants. When the army of the South Land came near, they at once attacked.
Simultaneously Gan Ning and Zhou Tai went out to attack on two sides, and the troops of Cao Hong were thrown into confusion. The soldiers of the South Land fell on lustily, and the three leaders all fled by a bye road, but, finding the way barred with felled trees and other obstacles, they had to abandon their horses and go afoot.
In this way the troops of the South Land gained some five hundred steeds.
Zhou Yu, pressing on as quickly as possible toward Nanjun, came upon Cao Ren and his army marching to save Yiling.
The two armies engaged and fought a battle which lasted till late in the evening.
Then both drew off, and Cao Ren withdrew into the city. During the night he called his officers to a council.
Then said Cao Hong, “The loss of Yiling has brought us to a dangerous pass; now it seems the time to open the guide-letter of the Prime Minister, and see what plans he arranged for our salvation in this peril.” “You but say what I think,” replied Cao Ren.
Whereupon he tore open the guide-letter and read it. His face lighted up with joy, and he at once issued orders to have the morning meal prepared at the fifth watch.
At daylight the whole army moved out of the city through three gates, but they left a semblance of occupation in the shape of banners on the walls.
Zhou Yu went up to the tower of observation and looked over the city.
He saw that the flags along the battlements had no guards behind them, and he noticed that all troops carried bundles at their waists behind so that they were ready for a long march.
Thought Zhou Yu to himself, “Cao Ren must be prepared for a long march.” So Zhou Yu went down from the tower of observation and sent out an order for two wings of the army to be ready.
One of these was to attack and, in case of its success, the other was to pursue at full speed till the clanging of the gongs should call them to return.
He took command of the leading force in person, and Cheng Pu commanded the other. Thus they advanced to attack the city. The armies being arrayed facing each other, the drums rolled out across the plain.
Cao Hong rode forth and challenged, and Zhou Yu, from his place by the standard, bade Han Dang respond.
The two champions fought near two score bouts, and then Cao Hong fled.
Thereupon Cao Ren came out to help him, and Zhou Tai rode out at full speed to meet him.
These two exchanged a half score passes and then Cao Ren tied.
Cao Ren's army fell into confusion.
Thereupon Zhou Yu gave the signal for the advance of both his wings, and the forces of Cao Ren were sore smitten and defeated.
Zhou Yu pursued to the city wall, but Cao Ren's troops did not enter the city. Instead, they went away northwest.
Han Dang and Zhou Tai pressed them hard.
Zhou Yu, seeing the city gates standing wide open and no guards upon the walls, ordered the raiding of the city.
A few score horsemen rode in first, Zhou Yu followed and whipping his steed.
As he galloped into the enclosure around the gate, Chen Jiao stood on the defense tower. When he saw Zhou Yu enter, in his heart he applauded the god-like perspicacity of the Prime Minister Cao Cao. Then was heard the clap-clap of a watchman's rattle.
At this signal the archers and crossbowmen let fly, and the arrows and bolts flew forth in a sudden fierce shower, while those who had won their way to the van of the inrush went headlong into a deep trench.
Zhou Yu managed to pull up in time, but turning to escape, he was wounded in the left side and fell to the ground.
Niu Jin rushed out from the city to capture the chief, but Xu Sheng and Ding Feng at the risk of their lives got him away safe.
Then the troops of Cao Ren dashed out of the city and wrought confusion among the troops of the South Land, who trampled each other down and many more fell into the trenches.
Cheng Pu tried to draw off, but Cao Ren and Cao Hong came toward him from different directions, and the battle went hardly against the soldiers of Zhou Yu, till help came from Ling Tong, who bore back their assailants.
Satisfied with their success, Cao Ren led his forces into the city, while the losers marched back to their own camp.
Zhou Yu, sorely wounded, was taken to his own tent and the army physician called in. With iron forceps, he extracted the sharp bolt and dressed the wound with a lotion designed to counteract the poison of the metal. But the pain was intense, and the patient rejected all nourishment.
The physician said, “The missile had been poisoned, and the wound will require a long time to heal. You, General, must be kept quiet and especially free from any irritation, which will cause the wound to reopen.” Thereupon Cheng Pu gave orders that each division was to remain in camp.
Three days later, Niu Jin came within sight and challenged the men of the South Land to battle, but they did not stir. The enemy hurled at them taunts and insults till the sun had fallen low in the sky, but it was of no avail and Niu Jin withdrew.
Next day Niu Jin returned and repeated his insulting abuse.
Cheng Pu dared not tell the wounded general.
The third day, waxing bolder, the enemy came to the very gates of the stockade, the leader shouting that he had come for the purpose of capturing Zhou Yu. Then Cheng Pu called together his officers and they discussed the feasibility of retirement into the South Land that they might seek the opinion of Sun Quan.
Ill as he was, Zhou Yu still retained control of the expedition.
He knew that the enemy came daily to the gates of his camp and reviled him, although none of his officers told him.
One day Cao Ren came in person, and there was much rolling of drums and shouting.
Cheng Pu, however, steadily refused to accept the challenge and would not let any one go out.
Then Zhou Yu summoned the officers to his bedside and said, “What mean the drums and the shouting?” “The soldiers are drilling,” was the reply.
“Why do you deceive me?” said Zhou Yu angrily.
“Do I not know that our enemies come day by day to our gates and insult us?
Yet Cheng Pu suffers this in silence and makes no use of his powers and authority.” He sent for Cheng Pu and, when he arrived, asked him why he acted thus.
“Because you are ill, and the physician said you were on no account to be provoked to anger.
Wherefore, although the enemy challenged us to battle, I kept it from you.” “And if you do not fight, what think you should be done?” said Zhou Yu.
And they all said they desired to return to the South Land till he had recovered from his wound, when they would make another expedition.
Zhou Yu lay and listened. Suddenly he sprang up, crying, “The noble person who has eaten of his lord's bounty should die in his lord's battles; to return to one's home dead and wrapped in a horse's hide is a happy fate.
Am I the sort of people to bring to nought the grand designs of my country?” So speaking he proceeded to gird on his armor and he mounted his horse.
The wonder of the officers only redoubled when their General placed himself at the head of some hundreds of horsemen and went out of the camp gates toward the enemy, then fully arrayed.
Cao Ren, their general, stood beneath the great standard. At sight of the opponents, Cao Ren flourished his whip and began to hurl abuse at them, “Zhou Yu, you babe! I think your fate has met you. You dare not face my army.” The stream of insult never ceased. Presently Zhou Yu could stand it no longer.
Riding out to the front he cried, “Here I am, base churl; look at me!” The whole Cao Ren's army were taken aback.
But Cao Ren turned to those about him and said, “Let us all revile him!” And the whole army yelled insults.
Zhou Yu grew angry and sent Pan Zhang out to fight.
But before he had delivered his first blow, Zhou Yu suddenly uttered a loud cry, and he fell to the ground with blood gushing from his mouth. At this Cao Ren's army rushed to the battle, and the army of the South Land pressed forward to meet them. A fierce struggle waged around the General's body, but he was borne off safely and taken to his tent.
“Do you feel better?” asked Cheng Pu anxiously.
“It was a ruse of mine,” whispered Zhou Yu in reply.
“But what avails it?” “I am not suffering, but I did that to make our enemies think I was very ill and so oppose them by deceit.
I will send a few trusty men to pretend desertion and tell them I am dead.
That will cause them to try a night raid on the camp, and we shall have an ambush ready for them. We shall get Cao Ren easily.” “The plan seems excellent,” said Cheng Pu.
Soon from the tent there arose the sound of wailing as for the dead.
The soldiers around took up the cry and said one to another, “The General is dead of his wound,” and they all put on the symbols of mourning. Meanwhile Cao Ren was consulting with his officers. Said he, “Zhou Yu lost his temper, and that has caused his wound to reopen and brought on that flow of blood.
You saw him fall to the ground, and he will assuredly die soon.” Just then there came in one who said that a few men had come over from the enemy asking to be allowed to join the army of Cao Ren; among them were two of Cao Cao's men who had been made prisoners.
Cao Ren sent for the deserters and questioned them.
They told him, saying, “Zhou Yu's wound reopened at his anger, and he died in the camp that day. The leaders are all clothing in white and in mourning.
We desert because we have been put to shame by the second in command.” Pleased at this news, Cao Ren at once began to arrange to make a night attack on the camp and, if possible, get the head of the dead general to send to the capital.
“Success depends upon promptitude, so act without delay,” said Chen Jiao.
Niu Jin was told off as Van Leader, Cao Ren himself led the center, while the rear was commanded by Cao Hong and Cao Chun. Chen Jiao and a small force were left to guard Nanjun.
At the first watch they left the city and took the way toward Zhou Yu's camp.
When they drew near, not a soldier was visible in the camp, but flags and banners and spears were all there, evidently to keep up an appearance of preparation.
Feeling at once that they had been tricked, they turned to retreat.
But a bomb exploded and this was the signal for an attack on all four sides. Han Dang and Jiang Qin pressed in from the east; Zhou Tai and Pan Zhang, from the west; Chen Wu and Lu Meng, from the north; and Xu Sheng and Ding Feng, from the south.
The result was a severe defeat for the raiders, and the army of Cao Ren was entirely broken and scattered abroad so that no one part of the beaten army could aid the other.
Cao Ren, with a few horsemen got out of the press and presently met Cao Hong. The two leaders ran away together, and by the fifth watch they had got near Nanjun. Then they heard a beating of drums, and Ling Tong appeared barring the way.
There was a small skirmish, and Cao Ren went off at an angle. But he fell in with Gan Ning, who attacked him vigorously.
Cao Ren dared not go back to Nanjun, but he made for Xiangyang along the main road. The forces of the South Land pursued him for a time and then desisted.
Zhou Yu and Cheng Pu then made their way to Nanjun where they were startled to see flags on the walls and every sign of occupation.
Before they had recovered from their surprise, there appeared one who cried, “Pardon, General; I had orders from the Directing Instructor to take this city.
I am Zhao Yun of Changshan.” Zhou Yu was fiercely angry and gave orders to assault the city, but the defenders sent down flights and flights of arrows, and his troops could not stay near the rampart. So he withdrew and took counsel.
In the meantime he decided to send Gan Ning with a force of several thousand to capture Jingzhou City, and Ling Tong with another army to take Xiangyang.
Nanjun could be taken later.
But even as these orders were being given, the scouts came in hurriedly to report, saying, “After Nanjun fell, Zhuge Liang, suddenly forging a military commission, induced the guards of Jingzhou to leave it and go to the rescue of Cao Ren.
Whereupon Zhang Fei occupied the town.” Soon after another messenger came, saying, “Xiahou Dun, at Xiangyang, received from Zhuge Liang dispatches, supported by a commission in due form, saying that Cao Ren was in danger and needed help, whereupon Xiahou Dun marched off, and Guan Yu seized that city.” Thus the two cities that Zhou Yu wanted had fallen, without the least effort, into the hands of his rival Liu Bei.
“How did Zhuge Liang get this military commission with which he has imposed on the generals?” asked Zhou Yu.
Cheng Pu replied, “He seized that of Chen Jiao and so has got all this region into his power.” Zhou Yu uttered a great cry, for at that moment his wound had suddenly burst open.
A city falls, but not to us the gain; The guerdon is another's; ours the pain.
The next chapter will say what befell Zhou Yu. CHAPTER 52.
Zhuge Liang Negotiates With Lu Su; Zhao Yun Captures Guiyang. Zhou Yu's anger at seeing that his rival, Zhuge Liang, had surprised Nanjun, and at hearing the same news of Jingzhou and Xiangyang, was but natural.
And this sudden fit of rage caused his wound to reopen. However, he soon recovered.
All his officers besought him to accept the situation, but he said, “What but the death of that bumpkin Zhuge Liang will assuage my anger?
If Cheng Pu can but aid me in an attack on Nanjun, I can certainly restore it to my country.” Soon Lu Su came in, to whom Zhou Yu said, “I simply must fight Liu Bei and Zhuge Liang till it is decided which shall have the upper hand. I must also recapture the city.
Perhaps you can assist me.” “It cannot be done,” replied Lu Su.
“We are now at grips with Cao Cao, and victory or defeat is undecided.
Our lord has not been successful in overcoming Hefei.
Do not fight near home, or it will be like people of the same household destroying each other; and should Cao Cao take advantage of this position to make a sudden descent, we should be in a parlous condition.
Further, you must remember that Liu Bei and Cao Cao are united by the bonds of old friendship; if the pressure becomes too great, Liu Bei may relinquish these cities, offer them to Cao Cao, and join forces with him to attack our country.
That would be a real misfortune.” “I cannot help being angry” said Zhou Yu, “to think that we should have used our resources for their benefit.
They get all the advantage.” “Well, let me go and see Liu Bei and talk reason to him.
If I can arrive at no understanding, then attack at once.” “Excellent proposal!” cried all present.
So Lu Su, with his escort, went away to Nanjun to carry out his proposal and try to arrange matters. He reached the city wall and summoned the gate, whereat Zhao Yun came out to speak with him.
“I have something to say to Liu Bei;” said he, “I wish to see him.” “My lord and Zhuge Liang are in Jingzhou,” was the reply.
Lu Su turned away and hasted to Jingzhou. He found the walls bedecked with flags and everything in excellent order.
In his heart he admired the sight, and thought what an able person was the commander of that army.
The guards reported his arrival, and Zhuge Liang ordered them to throw wide the gate.
Lu Su was led to the government house and, after the usual exchange of salutes, Zhuge Liang and his visitor took their respective seats.
Having finished the tea, Lu Su said, “My master, Marquis Sun Quan, and the commander of his army, Zhou Yu, have sent me to lay before the Imperial Uncle their views. When Cao Cao led his huge host southward, he gave out that it was for the conquest of the South Land; really his intention was to destroy Liu Bei.
Happily our army was able to repulse that mighty host and so saved him.
Wherefore Jingzhou with its nine territories of forty-one counties ought to belong to us.
But by a treacherous move, your master has occupied Jingzhou and Xiangyang, so that we have spent our treasure in vain and our armies have fought to no purpose. The Imperial Uncle has reaped the benefits to the full.
This is not as it should be.” Zhuge Liang replied, “Lu Su, you are a man of high intelligence; why do you hold such language?
You know the saying that all things turn to their owner.
These places have never belonged to the South Land, but were of the patrimony of Liu Biao, and though he is dead, his son remains.
Should not the uncle assist the nephew to recover his own?
Could my master have refrained ?” “If the nephew Liu Qi, the rightful heir, had occupied these cities there would have been something to say.
But he is at Jiangxia and not here.” “Would you like to see him?” said Zhuge Liang.
At the same time he ordered the servants to request Liu Qi to come.
Thereupon Liu Qi at once appeared, supported by two attendants.
Addressing Lu Su he said, “I am too weak to perform the correct ceremonies; I pray you pardon me, Lu Su.” Lu Su said not a word; he was too much taken aback.
However, he recovered himself presently and said, “But if the heir had not been here, what then?” “The heir is living but from day to day; should he go, then—there will be something to talk about.” “Should he die, then you ought to return these cities to us.” “You state the exact facts,” said Zhuge Liang.
Then a banquet was prepared and, that over, Lu Su took his leave. He hastened back to his own camp and gave Zhou Yu an account of his mission.
“But what is there for us in the chance of Liu Qi's death?” said Zhou Yu. “He is in his very first youth.
When will these places fall to us?” “Rest content, General; let me guarantee the return of these places.” “But how can you?” asked Zhou Yu.
“Liu Qi has indulged too freely in wine and women; he is a wreck and rotten to the core, miserably emaciated and panting for breath. I will not give him half a year's life.
Then I will go to Liu Bei, and he will be unable to deny the request.” But Zhou Yu was still unmollified.
Suddenly came a messenger from Sun Quan, who said, “Our lord is laying siege to Hefei but in several battles has had no victory.
He now orders you to withdraw from here and go to Hefei to help him.” Thereupon Zhou Yu marched back to Chaisang. Having reached home, he began to give attention to the recovery of his health.
He sent Cheng Pu with the marine and land forces to Hefei ready for Sun Quan's call. Liu Bei was exceedingly well satisfied with the possession of his new region, and his thoughts turned to more ambitious schemes.
Then a certain man came to him to suggest a plan.
This man was Yi Ji and, remembering the kindly feeling of other days, Liu Bei received him most graciously.
When Yi Ji was seated, and his host had asked what he proposed, he said, “You wish for a plan to accomplish yet greater deeds; why not seek wise people and ask them?” “Where are these wise people to be found?” asked Liu Bei.
Yi Ji replied, “In this region there is a certain family named Ma, five brothers, all of whom are known as men of ability. The youngest is called Ma Su.
The ablest is Ma Liang, who has white hairs in his eyebrows, and the villagers have a little rhyming couplet that means 'There are five sons in the family Ma, but white eyebrows is the best of them.' You should get this man to draw up a plan for you.” So Liu Bei told them to request his presence.
Ma Liang came and was received with great respect.
He was asked to suggest a plan for the security of the newly acquired region, and he said, “Attacked as it is on all sides, this region is not one in which one is permanently secure.
You should let Liu Qi remain here till he is recovered from his present illness; the actual protection of the place being left in the hands of trusty friends. Obtain an edict appointing him Imperial Protector of Jingzhou, and the people will be content.
Then conquer Wuling, Changsha, Guiyang, and Lingling; and with the resources you will thus acquire, you will have the means for further plans.
That should be your policy.” “Which of the four territories should be first taken?” asked Liu Bei.
“The nearest, Lingling, which lies in the west of River Xiang.
The next is Wuling, and after these the other two.” Ma Liang was given an appointment as Imperial Protector Assistant, with Yi Ji as his second.
Then Liu Bei consulted Zhuge Liang about sending Liu Qi to Xiangyang, so that Guan Yu could be free to return. Next they made preparations to attack Lingling, and Zhang Fei was to lead the van.
Zhao Yun was to guard the rear, while Liu Bei and Zhuge Liang were to command the main body.
A fifteen thousand troops were left to hold Jingzhou.
Mi Zhu and Liu Feng were left to guard Jiangling.
The Governor of Lingling was Liu Du. When danger thus threatened, he called in his son Liu Xian, and they discussed the case.
The son was very self-confident and said to his father, “Have no anxiety.
They may have the known and famous warriors, Zhang Fei and Zhao Yun, but we have our leader, Xing Darong, who is match for any number of men.
He can withstand them.” So Liu Xian, with the famous leader, was entrusted with the defense. At the head of a full ten thousand troops, they made a camp about ten miles from the city, with the shelter of hills and a river.
Their scouts brought news that Zhuge Liang was close at hand with one army.
Xing Darong decided to check his advance and went forth to oppose him. When both sides were arrayed, Xing Darong rode to the front. In his hand he held a battle-ax called Cleaver of Mountains.
In a mighty voice he cried, “Rebels, how comes it that you have dared to enter our territory?” From the center of the opposing army, where appeared a cluster of yellow flags, there came out a small four-wheeled carriage in which sat, very erect, a certain man dressed in white, with a turban on his head. In one hand he held a feather fan, with which he signed to the warrior to approach.
At the same time he said, “I am Zhuge Liang of Nanyang, whose plans broke up the countless legions of Cao Cao so that nothing of them returned whence they started.
How then can you hope to oppose me?
I now offer you peace, and it will be well for you to surrender.” Xing Darong laughed derisively, saying, “Their defeat was owing to the plan of Zhou Yu; you had nothing to do with it.
How dare you try to deceive me?” So saying he swung up his battle-ax and came running toward Zhuge Liang.
But Zhuge Liang turned his carriage and retired within the lines which closed up behind him. Xing Darong came rushing on.
As he reached the array, the troops fell away on both sides and let him enter. Well within he looked round for his chief opponent.
Seeing a yellow flag moving along quietly, he concluded that Zhuge Liang was with it and so followed it.
When the flag had gone over the shoulder of a hill it stopped. Then suddenly as if the earth had opened and swallowed it up, the four-wheeled carriage disappeared, while in its place came a ferocious warrior, with a long octaneserpent halberd in his hand and mounted on a curvetting steed. It was Zhang Fei, who dashed at Xing Darong with a tremendous roar.
Nothing daunted, Xing Darong whirled up his battle-ax and went to meet Zhang Fei.
But after four or five bouts, Xing Darong saw that there was no chance of victory for him, so he turned his horse and ran. Zhang Fei pursued, the air shaking with the thunder of his voice. Then the ambushing troops appeared.
Xing Darong, nothing daunted, rushed into their midst. But in front appeared another warrior barring the way, who called out, “Do you know me? I am Zhao Yun of Changshan.” Xing Darong knew that all was over; he could neither fight nor fly. So he dismounted and gave in. He was fettered and taken to camp, where were Liu Bei and Zhuge Liang.
Liu Bei ordered him out to execution, but Zhuge Liang hastily checked him.
“We will accept your submission if you capture Liu Xian for us,” said Zhuge Liang.
The captive accepted the offer without the least hesitation, and when Zhuge Liang asked how he intended to do it, he replied, “If you will set me free, I shall be cunning of speech.
If you raid the camp this evening, you will find me your helper on the inside.
I will make Liu Xian a prisoner and will hand him over to you. He being captured, his father will surrender at once.” Liu Bei doubted the good faith of the man, but Zhuge Liang said, “Xing Darong is not deceiving.” Wherefore Xing Darong was set free and went back to camp, where he related all that had occurred. “What can we do?” asked Liu Xian.
“We can meet trick with trick.
Put soldiers in ambush tonight outside our camp while within everything will appear as usual. When Zhuge Liang comes we shall capture him.” The ambush was prepared.
At the second watch an army came out of the darkness and appeared in the gate. Each carried a torch and they began to set fire to all about them.
Out dashed Liu Xian and Xing Darong, and the incendiaries forthwith fled.
The two warriors pursued them, but the fugitives ran and then suddenly disappeared at about three miles from the camp. Much surprised the two turned to wend their way back to their own camp. It was still burning for no one had extinguished the flames. Soon from behind them came out Zhang Fei.
Liu Xian called out to his companion, saying, “Do not enter the burning camp, but to go to attack Zhuge Liang's stockade.” Thereupon they turned again, but at a distance of three miles Zhao Yun and an army suddenly debouched upon their road.
Zhao Yun attacked and slew Xing Darong by a spear thrust.
Liu Xian turned to flee, but Zhang Fei was close upon him and made him prisoner. He was thrown across a horse, bound, and taken to camp.
When he saw Zhuge Liang, Liu Xian said, “The ruse was Xing Darong's evil counsel; I was forced to follow.” Zhuge Liang ordered them to loose his bonds, had him properly dressed, and gave him wine to cheer him and help him forget his troubles. When he was recovered, he was told to go to his father and persuade him to yield.
“And if he does not, the city shall be destroyed and every one put to death,” said Zhuge Liang as Liu Xian left. The son returned to the city and told his father these things.
Liu Du at once decided to yield and forthwith hoisted the flag of surrender, opened the gates, and went out taking his seal of office with him.
He was reappointed to his governorship, but his son was sent to Jingzhou for service with the army.
The people of Lingling all rejoiced greatly at the change of rulers.
Liu Bei entered the city, calmed and reassured the people and rewarded his army. But he at once began to think of the next move and asked for an officer to volunteer to take Guiyang.
Zhao Yun offered, but Zhang Fei vehemently proposed himself for the command of the expedition.
So they wrangled and contended.
Then said Zhuge Liang, “Undoubtedly Zhao Yun was first to volunteer, wherefore he is to go.” Still Zhang Fei opposed and insisted on going.
They were told to decide the dispute by drawing lots, and Zhao Yun drew the winning lot. Zhang Fei was still very angry and grumbled, “I would not have wanted any helpers:
just three thousand soldiers and I would have done it.” “I also only want three thousand soldiers,” said Zhao Yun.
“And if I fail, I am willing to suffer the penalties.” Zhuge Liang was pleased that Zhao Yun recognized his responsibility so fully, and with the commission gave Zhao Yun three thousand of veterans.
Though the matter was thus settled, Zhang Fei was discontented and pressed his claim till Liu Bei bade him desist and retire.
With his three thousand troops, Zhao Yun took the road to Guiyang.
The Governor, Zhao Fan, soon heard of his approach and hastily called his officers to take counsel.
Two of them, Chen Ying and Bao Long, offered to meet the invaders and turn them back.
These two warriors belonged to Guiyang and had made themselves famous as hunters. Chen Ying used a “Flying Fork,” and Bao Long could draw a bow with such force that he had been known to send an arrow through two tigers. So strong were they, as well as bold.
They stood before Zhao Fan and said, “We will lead the way against Liu Bei.” The Governor replied, “I know that Liu Bei is of the imperial family, and Zhuge Liang is exceedingly resourceful. Guan Yu and Zhang Fei are very bold.
But the commander of this force is Zhao Yun who, on one occasion, faced a hundred legions of Cao Cao and never blenched.
Our small force here cannot stand against such people.
We shall have to yield.” “Let me go out to fight,” said Chen Ying.
“If I cannot capture Zhao Yun, then you can yield.” The Governor could not resist him and gave his consent.
Then Chen Ying, with three thousand troops, went forth; and soon the two armies came within sight of each other.
When Chen Ying's army was drawn up, he girded on his flying fork and rode to the front. Zhao Yun gripped his spear and rode to meet him.
Zhao Yun began to rail at Chen Ying, saying, “My master is the brother of Liu Biao to whom belonged this land. Now he is supporting his nephew, the heir and son of Liu Biao. Having taken Jingzhou, I am come to soothe and comfort the people here.
Why then do you oppose me?” “We are supporters of the Prime Minister Cao Cao and are no followers of your master,” was the reply.
Zhao Yun, waxing angry, firmly grasped his spear and rode forward. His opponent twirled the flying fork and advanced.
The horses met, but after four or five encounters Chen Ying, realizing that there was no hope of victory, turned and fled.
Zhao Yun followed.
Suddenly turning, Chen Ying got close to Zhao Yun and flung the fork. Zhao Yun deftly caught it and threw it back.
Chen Ying dodged away, but Zhao Yun soon caught him up, seized, dragged him out of the saddle, and threw him to the ground. Then Zhao Yun called up his soldiers and they bound the prisoner.
Chen Ying was taken to the camp, while his troops scattered and fled.
“I thought you would not dare a combat with me,” said Zhao Yun to the prisoner when they had returned to camp.
“However, I am not going to put you to death. You are free.
But persuade your master to yield.” Chen Ying asked pardon, put his hands over his head, and fled like a frightened rat. When he reached his city, he told the Governor all these things.
“My original desire was to yield, but you insisted on fighting, and this is what it has brought you to.” So spoke the Governor. He bade Chen Ying begone and then prepared his letter of submission and put up his seal.
With a small party, Zhao Fan went out of the city and wended his way to Zhao Yun's camp. Zhao Yun received him graciously, offered him wine, and then accepted the seal of office. After the wine had gone round several times, Zhao Fan became talkative, saying, “General, your surname is the same as mine, and five centuries ago we were one family. You are from Changshan, and so am I. Moreover we are from the same village.
If you do not mind, we might swear brotherhood.
I should be very happy.” Zhao Yun was pleased and they compared ages.
They were of the same year.
However, Zhao Yun was the elder by four months, and so Zhao Fan made his bow as younger brother.
The two men, having so many things in common, were very pleased with each other and seemed fitted to be close friends.
At eventide the feast broke up, and the late Governor returned to his dwelling.
Next day Zhao Fan requested Zhao Yun to enter the city, where, after Zhao Yun had assured the people of their safety, he went to a banquet at the state residence.
When they had become mellow with wine, the Governor invited Zhao Yun into the inner quarters, where wine was again served.
When Zhao Yun was a little intoxicated, his host bade a woman come forth and offer a cup of wine to the guest.
The woman was dressed entirely in white silk, and her beauty was such as to overthrow cities and ruin states. “Who is she?” asked Zhao Yun.
“My sister-in-law; she is of the Fan family.” Zhao Yun at once changed his look and treated her with deference.
When she had offered the cup, the host told her to be seated and join the party, but Zhao Yun declined this addition to the evening and the lady withdrew.
“Why did you trouble your sister-in-law to present wine to me, Brother?” asked Zhao Yun.
“There is a reason,” said the host smiling. “I pray you let me tell you. My brother died three years ago and left her a widow. But this cannot be regarded as the end of the story.
I have often advised her to marry again, but she said she would only do so if three conditions were satisfied in one man's person.
The suitor must be famous for literary grace and warlike exploits, secondly, handsome and highly esteemed and, thirdly, of the same name as our own.
Now where in all the world was such a combination likely to be found?
Yet here are you, Brother, dignified, handsome, and prepossessing, a man whose name is known all over the wide world and of the desired name. You exactly fulfill my sister's ambitions.
If you do not find her too plain, I should like her to marry you and I will provide a dowry.
What think you of such an alliance, such a bond of relationship?” But Zhao Yun rose in anger, shouting, “As I have just sworn brotherhood with you, is not your sister-in-law my sister-in-law?
How could you think of bringing such confusion into the relationship?” Shame suffused Zhao Fan's face, and he said, “I only thought of being kind to you; why are you so very rude to me?” Zhao Fan looked right and left to his attendants with murder in his eye.
Zhao Yun raised his fist and knocked him down. Then he strode out of the place, mounted, and rode out of the city. Zhao Fan at once called in his two generals.
Chen Ying said, “He has gone away in a rage, which means that we shall have to fight him.” “I greatly fear you will lose,” said Zhao Fan. “We will pretend to be deserters,” said Bao Long, “and so get among his soldiers.
When you challenge him, we will suddenly catch him.” “We shall have to take some others with us,” said Chen Ying.
“Five hundred troops will be ample,” said Bao Long.
So in the night the two men and their followers ran over to Zhao Yun's camp to desert.
Zhao Yun understood the trick they would play, but he called them in, and they said, “When Zhao Fan tempted you with that fair lady, he wanted to make you drunk and get you into the private apartments so that he might murder you and send your head to Cao Cao. Yes; he was as wicked as that even.
We saw you go away in anger, and we thought that would mean grave trouble for us, and so we have deserted.” Zhao Yun listened with simulated joy, and he had wine served to the two men, and pressed them to drink so that they were quite overcome.
When this was done, he had both bound with cords, called up their followers, and asked them whether this was real or pretended desertion, and they told him the truth.
Then he gave the soldiers wine and said, “Those who wanted to harm me are your leaders and not you.
If you do as I tell you, you shall be well rewarded.” The soldiers threw themselves to the ground and promised obedience.
Thereupon the two leaders—Chen Ying and Bao Long—were beheaded.
Their five hundred troops were made to lead the way and act as screen for a whole thousand of horsemen, and the party set out at full speed for Guiyang.
When they got there, they summoned the gate and said that they had slain Zhao Yun and had got back. And they wished to speak with the Governor.
Those on the wall lighted flares and inspected those at the gate. Surely enough they wore the uniforms of their own people, and Zhao Fan went out to them. He was immediately seized and made prisoner.
Then Zhao Yun entered the city, restored order, and sent off swift messengers to Liu Bei who at once, with his adviser, came to Guiyang.
When they had taken their seats, the late Governor was brought in and placed at the foot of the steps.
In response to Zhuge Liang's questions, Zhao Fan related the history of the proposed marriage.
Said Zhuge Liang to Zhao Yun, “But this seems a fine project; why did you receive the proposal so roughly?” Zhao Yun said, “Zhao Fan and I had just sworn brotherhood, and so marriage with his sister-in-law would have called down on my head universal blame. That is one reason.
Another is that I should have made his sister fail to keep her dutiful chastity.
And thirdly, I did not know whether I might trust such a proposal from one who had just yielded to force.
My lord, your position as a recent victor was one of danger, and could I risk the failure of your plans for the sake of a woman?” Liu Bei said, “But now that the plan has been carried out, and we are victors, would you care to marry her?” “There are other women in the world. All my fear is for the building of a reputation. What is a family to me?” “You are indeed right honorable,” said Liu Bei.
Zhao Fan was released and restored to the governorship. Zhao Yun was conspicuously rewarded. But Zhang Fei was angry and disappointed.
“So Zhao Yun gets all the praise, and I am worth nothing,” cried he.
“Just give me three thousand soldiers, and I will take Wuling and bring you the Governor.” This pleased Zhuge Liang, who said, “There is no reason why you should not go, but I will only require one condition of you.” Wondrous, the plans of the general, so doth he conquer in battle; Soldiers keenly competing gain renown in the fighting.
The condition that Zhuge Liang made will appear in the next chapter. CHAPTER 53.
Guan Yu Releases Huang Zhong; Sun Quan Fights With Zhang Liao. What Zhuge Liang required from Zhang Fei was a formal recognition of responsibility for success.
Said Zhuge Liang, “When Zhao Yun went on his expedition, he gave written guarantee of being responsible for success, and you ought to do the same now that you are starting for Wuling.
In that case you may have men and start.” So Zhang Fei gave the required document and received joyfully the three thousand of soldiers he had demanded. He set out at once and traveled without rest till he reached Wuling.
When the Governor of Wuling, Jin Xuan by name, heard that an expedition against him was afoot, he mustered his officers and recruited brave soldiers and put his weapons in order ready for the struggle. And his army moved out of the city.
A certain secretary, Gong Zhi, remonstrated with his chief for opposing a scion of the imperial house, saying, “Liu Bei is of the Hans, and recognized as an uncle of the Emperor. All the world knows he is kindly and righteous.
Added to that his brother Zhang Fei is extraordinarily bold.
We cannot face them in battle with hope of success.
Our best course is to give in.” But his master angrily replied, “Do you want to play the traitor and take the side of the rebels and help them?” Jin Xuan called in the lictors and told them to put Gong Zhi to death.
The other officers interceded for Gong Zhi, saying, “It augers ill to start an expedition by slaying your own officer.” So the Governor merely sent Gong Zhi sway. He himself led the army out of the city. After marching seven miles, he met with Zhang Fei's army. Zhang Fei at once rode to the front, spear ready to thrust, and opened with a shout.
Jin Xuan turned to his officers and asked who would go out to fight him, but no one replied; they were too afraid.
So the Governor himself galloped out, flourishing his sword. Seeing him advance, Zhang Fei shouted in a voice of thunder. Poor Jin Xuan was seized with panic, turned pale and could not go on. He turned his steed and fled. Then Zhang Fei and his army went in pursuit and smote the fugitives, chasing them to the city wall.
Here the fugitives were greeted by a flight of arrows from their own wall. Greatly frightened, Jin Xuan looked up to see what this meant, and there was Gong Zhi, who had opposed him, standing on the wall. “You brought defeat upon yourself because you opposed the will of God,” cried the traitor. “I and the people with me are determined to yield to Liu Bei.” Just as Gong Zhi finished speaking, an arrow wounded Jin Xuan in the face and he fell to the ground.
Thereupon his own troops cut off his head, which they forthwith presented to Zhang Fei.
Gong Zhi then went out and made formal submission, and Zhang Fei bade him take his letter and the seal to Guiyang to Liu Bei, who was pleased to hear of Zhang Fei's success and gave the governorship to Gong Zhi. Soon after Liu Bei came to Wuling in person and soothed the people.
This done he wrote to Guan Yu telling him Zhao Yun and Zhang Fei had gained a territory each.
Guan Yu at once wrote back and said, “Changsha is yet to be taken; and if I am not thought too feeble, I would like to be sent to attack it.” Liu Bei agreed and sent Zhang Fei to relieved his brother, whom Liu Bei ordered to return and prepare for an expedition to Changsha.
Guan Yu came and went in to see his elder brother and Zhuge Liang.
At this interview Zhuge Liang said, “Zhao Yun has taken Guiyang, and Zhang Fei Wuling. Both successful warriors have done their work with three thousand troops.
The Governor of Changsha, Han Xuan, was not worth mentioning, but there was a certain general with him, named Huang Zhong, who had to be reckoned with. “Huang Zhong is a native of Nanyang.
He used to be in the service of Liu Biao and was a colleague Liu Biao's nephew, Liu Pan, when he was in command of Changsha. After Liu Biao's death, he joined Han Xuan when he took command of the city.
Now, although he is nearly sixty, he is a man to be feared and a warrior of a thousand.
You ought to take a larger number of troops.” Guan Yu replied, “Instructor, what makes you damp another man's ardor to fight and do away with your own dignity? I do not think the old leader need be discussed, and I do not think I require three companies of soldiers.
Give me my own five hundred of swordsmen, and I will have the heads of both Han Xuan and Huang Zhong to sacrifice to our standard.” Liu Bei resisted this decision of Guan Yu, but Guan Yu would not give way.
He just took his five hundred and set out. “If he is not careful how he attacks Huang Zhong, there will be a mishap,” said Zhuge Liang.
“You must go to support him.” Liu Bei accordingly, at the head of another and larger party, set out toward Changsha.
Governor Han Xuan of Changsha was of hasty temperament with small compunction in matters of life and death and was universally hated.
When he heard of the army coming against him, he called his veteran leader, Huang Zhong, to ask advice.
The latter said, “Do not be distressed; this sword of mine and my bow are equal to the slaughter of all who may come.” Huang Zhong had been very strong and could bend the three-hundredpound bow and was a most perfect archer.
When Huang Zhong referred to his prowess, a certain man spoke up and said, “Let not the veteran General go out to battle.
Trust to my right arm, and you shall have this Guan Yu a prisoner in your hands.” The speaker was General Yang Ling.
The Governor accepted his offer and told off a thousand troops to go with him, and they quickly rode out of the city.
About fifteen miles from the city, they observed a great cloud of dust approaching and soon distinguished the invaders.
Yang Ling set his spear and rode to the front to abuse and fight.
Guan Yu made no reply to the abuse, but rode forward flourishing his sword.
The warriors soon met, and in the third encounter Yang Ling was cut down.
Guan Yu's army dashed forward and pursued the defeated force to the city wall.
When the Governor heard of this reverse, he ordered the veteran Huang Zhong to go out while he went up on the city wall to watch the fight.
Huang Zhong took his sword and crossed the drawbridge of Changsha at the head of his force.
Guan Yu, seeing an old leader riding out, knew it must be Huang Zhong. Guan Yu halted his troops and placed them in line with their swords at the point. Then sitting there on horseback, he said, “He who comes is surely Huang Zhong, eh?” “Since you know me, how dare you come within my boundaries?” replied the veteran.
“I have come expressly to get your head!” Then the combat began.
They fought a hundred and more bouts, and neither seemed nearer victory.
At this point the Governor, fearing some mishap to his veteran general, beat the gong to retreat and the battle ceased, one side going into the city of Changsha and the other camping three miles away to the rear. Guan Yu thought in his heart that the fame of the veteran opposed to him was well merited. He had fought a hundred bouts and discovered never a weak spot.
He determined that in the next encounter he would use a “swinging-horse stab” and so overcome Huang Zhong.
Next day, the early meal eaten, Guan Yu came to the city wall and offered his challenge.
The Governor seated himself on the city wall and bade his veteran warrior go out to accept it.
At the head of a few horsemen, Huang Zhong dashed across the drawbridge.
The two champions engaged, and at the end of half a hundred bouts neither had the advantage. On both sides the soldiers cheered lustily.
When the drums were beating most furiously, suddenly Guan Yu wheeled round his horse and fled.
Of course Huang Zhong followed.
Just as the moment for the feint arrived, Guan Yu heard behind him a tremendous crash and turned to see his pursuer lying prone upon the ground.
Huang Zhong's steed had stumbled and thrown him.
Guan Yu turned, raised his sword in both hands, and cried in a fierce tone, “I spare your life, but quick!
Get another horse and come again to battle.” Huang Zhong pulled his horse to its feet hastily, leapt upon its back, and went into the city at full speed.
The Governor was astonished and asked for an account of the accident. “The horse is too old,” replied Huang Zhong.
“Why did you not shoot since your aim is so perfect?” asked the Governor. “I will try again tomorrow,” said Huang Zhong.
“Then I will run away as if overcome, and so tempt him to the drawbridge and then shoot him.” Han Xuan gave the veteran a gray horse that he usually rode himself; Huang Zhong thanked him and retired.
But Huang Zhong could not forget Guan Yu's generous conduct, nor could he understand it. He could not make up his mind to shoot the man who had spared his life.
Yet if he did not shoot, he betrayed his duty as a soldier.
It was very perplexing, and the whole night spent in thinking it over found him still undecided.
At daybreak a man came in saying that Guan Yu was near the wall and challenging them again.
So Huang Zhong gave order to go out.
Now Guan Yu, having fought for two days and not having overcome Huang Zhong, was very ill at ease.
So he called up all his dignity when he went forth to fight that day. When they had got to the thirtieth bout, Huang Zhong fled as if he was overcome. Guan Yu pursued.
As he rode away, Huang Zhong thought in his heart, “He spared me only yesterday, and I cannot bear to shoot him today.” Putting up his sword, Huang Zhong took his bow and twanged the string only; no arrow flew. Guan Yu dodged, but seeing no arrow in the air, he retook the pursuit.
Again Huang Zhong twanged an arrowless bowstring, and again Guan Yu dodged, but no arrow came.
Then Guan Yu said to himself, “He cannot shoot,” and pressed on in pursuit.
As they neared the city wall, the veteran stopped on the drawbridge, fitted an arrow, pulled the bow, and sent an arrow flying that just hit the base of the plume on Guan Yu's helmet.
The soldiers shouted at the display of marksmanship. Guan Yu was taken aback and set off for camp with the arrow still sticking.
Then he heard that Huang Zhong's skill was said to be equal to piercing a willow leaf at a hundred paces, and Guan Yu understood that he owed this warning in the shape of an arrow in his plume to gratitude for sparing the veteran the preceding day. Both withdrew.
But when the veteran leader went up on the wall to see the Governor, he was at once seized.
“What have I done?” cried Huang Zhong.
“I have seen these last three days that you were fooling me; you were slack the day before yesterday, which proved you had some sinister intention.
Yesterday, when your horse stumbled and he spared you, it showed that you were in league with him.
And today you twice twanged a vain bowstring, while at the third shot you only hit your opponent's helmet. Dare you say there is no secret understanding in all this?
If I do not put you to death, it will assuredly redound to my own hurt.” Han Xuan ordered Huang Zhong to be executed outside the city gate.
Han Xuan also met the intercession of the officers by saying, “Any one who pleads for the condemned shall be regarded as in the plot.” The executioners had hustled the old man out of the city and the sword was in the air and on the point of descending, when a man suddenly dashed in, cut down the lictor, and rescued Huang Zhong. “Huang Zhong is our bulwark;” shouted he, “to destroy him is to destroy the Changsha people.
This Governor is too fierce and cruel, too lightly values good people, and is too arrogant toward his officers.
We ought rather to kill him, and those who will, let them follow me.” All eyes turned toward this bold speaker, who was bronzed and had eyes like the Cowherd's star. Some of them knew him as Wei Yan, a native of Yiyang.
He would have followed Liu Bei from Xiangyang but, unable to come up with him, had gone into the service of Han Xuan.
Han Xuan took exception to his arrogant carriage and lack of polish and neglected him. And so Wei Yan had remained in the city without office.
After the rescue of Huang Zhong, Wei Yan called upon the people to make an end of the Governor. He waved his arm and shouted to the people. Soon he had a following of several hundreds.
Huang Zhong could not stop them. In a very short time, Wei Yan had dashed up on the wall, and Han Xuan lay dead.
Taking his head, Wei Yan rode off out of the city to lay the bloodstained trophy at the feet of Guan Yu, who forthwith went into the city to restore confidence.
When the people were all quiet, Guan Yu sent to request Huang Zhong to come to see him, but the old general pleaded illness.
Next Guan Yu sent the good news to his brother and to Zhuge Liang and asked them to come.
Soon after Guan Yu had left to capture Changsha, Liu Bei and Zhuge Liang had followed him up with supports in case of need.
While on the march, a black flag was furled backwards and a crow flew over from north to south croaking thrice as it passed.
“What good or evil things do these omens presage?” asked Liu Bei.
With hands hidden within his long sleeves, Zhuge Liang performed a rapid calculation on his fingers of the auspices and replied, “Changsha is taken and a great leader mastered. We shall know soon after noon.” Sure enough a simple soldier presently came galloping along with the welcome tidings of the capture of the city, and saying that the two city warriors who had aided them were near waiting the arrival of Liu Bei.
Soon after they arrived, Liu Bei entered the city, where he was escorted to the magistracy and heard the recital of Huang Zhong's deeds.
Liu Bei went in person to Huang Zhong's house and inquired for him, whereupon Huang Zhong came forth and yielded formally.
Huang Zhong requested to be permitted to bury the remains of the late Governor on the east of the city.
Lofty as is heaven above earth was the spirit of the general, Who, even in his old age, suffered sorrows in the south; Cheerfully had he approached death, with no thought of resentment, But, bowing before the conqueror, he hung his head and was ashamed.
Praise the sword, gleaming snow-white, and the glory of super-human bravery, Consider the mail-clad steed snuffing the wind and rejoicing in the battle, That warrior's name shall stand high and its brightness be undiminished, While the cold moon sheds her light on the waters of River Xiang.
Liu Bei was generous toward the veteran leader who had come under his banner.
But when Wei Yan was introduced, Zhuge Liang suddenly ordered him to be thrust forth and put to death. “He has merit; he has committed no fault,” exclaimed Liu Bei.
“Why slay him?” But Zhuge Liang replied, “Ingratitude; to eat a man's bread and slay him is most disloyal; to live on his land and offer his territory to another is most wrong.
He will certainly turn against his new master.
Wherefore it is well to put him to death and prevent him from doing harm.” “If we slay this man, others who may wish to surrender will be deterred by the danger.
I pray you forgive him.” Zhuge Liang pointed his finger at Wei Yan and said, “You are pardoned.
You would do well to be perfectly faithful to your lord as well as grateful. Do not let a single thought stray elsewhere, or I will have your head by fair means or foul.” Wei Yan made a low obeisance.
Having given in with good grace, Huang Zhong introduced a nephew of Liu Biao, named Liu Pan, then living in Yuxian near by. Liu Bei gave Liu Pan the governorship of Changsha.
All being tranquil at the four territories, Liu Bei and his army returned to Jingzhou City. The name of Youkou was changed to Gongan, and soon all was prosperous.
Able people from all sides came to assist in the administration. Guards were placed at strategic points.
When Zhou Yu went to Chaisang to recover from his wound, he left Gan Ning in command at Baling and Ling Tong at Hanyang. The fleet was shared between these two places to be ready to move when required.
The remainder of the force was under Cheng Pu, and he went to Hefei, where Sun Quan had been since the fight at the Red Cliffs. Sun Quan was still fighting the northern army, and in half a score encounters, small and great, neither had gained a decided advantage.
Sun Quan could not approach the city but entrenched himself about fifteen miles away.
When Sun Quan heard of the coming of reinforcements of Cheng Pu, he was very pleased and went in person to meet and welcome the leaders.
Lu Su was in advance of the main body, and Sun Quan dismounted and stood by the roadside to greet him.
As soon as he saw this, Lu Su slid out of the saddle and made his obeisance.
But the officers were amazed at the attitude of Sun Quan, and still more so when Sun Quan asked Lu Su to remount and ride by his side.
Presently Sun Quan said secretly to Lu Su, “I, the Lone One, dismounted to greet you as you saw; was that manifestation enough for you?” “No,” replied Lu Su.
“Then what further can I do?” “I want to see your authority and virtue spread over the four seas and enfold the nine regions, and you yourself playing your part as emperor.
Then will my name be inscribed in the annals, and I shall indeed be known.” Sun Quan clapped his hands and laughed gleefully.
When they reached the camp, a banquet was prepared and the services of the new arrivals were praised and glorified.
The destruction of Hefei was one day under discussion when one came in to say that Zhang Liao had sent a written challenge to battle. Sun Quan tore open the cover, and what he read therein made him very wrath.
“This Zhang Liao has insulted me grossly,” said he.
“He hears that Cheng Pu has arrived and sends a challenge.
Tomorrow, O newly-come warriors, you shall see me fight with him.
You shall have no share in the battle.” Orders were given that next morning the army would move out of camp and advance on Hefei.
Early in the morning, when they had advanced about halfway, they met the army of Cao Cao and prepared for battle.
Sun Quan, with helmet of gold and breastplate of silver, rode to the front with Song Qian and Jia Hua, each armed with a halberd to support him and guard him one on each side.
When the third roll of the drum ceased, the center of Cao Cao's army opened to allow the exit of three warriors, all fully armed. They were Zhang Liao, supported by Li Dian and Yue Jin.
Zhang Liao, the central figure, especially designated Sun Quan as the object of his challenge.
Sun Quan took his spear and was about to accept the challenge, from when the ranks behind him came out Taishi Ci, who galloped forth with his spear ready to thrust.
Zhang Liao whirled up his sword to strike the newcomer, and the two fought near a hundred bouts without a decisive blow.
Then said Li Dian to Yue Jin, “He there opposite us with the golden helm is Sun Quan; could we but capture him, the loss of our eight hundred thirty thousand soldiers at the Red Cliffs would be amply avenged.” So speaking Yue Jin rode out, alone, just one man and one sword, and went sidelong toward the two combatants. Then suddenly, swift as a flash of lightning, he ran forward and slashed at Sun Quan. But Sun Quan's two guards were too quick for him.
Up went the two halberds of Song Qian and Jia Hua guarding their lord's head.
The blow fell, but on the crossed halberds which were shorn through near the head, and in another moment they were hammering away on the head of Yue Jin's steed with the shafts of their broken weapons and forcing it back.
Song Qian snatched a spear from a soldier near and went in pursuit of Yue Jin, but Li Dian, on the other side, fitted an arrow to his bow and aimed at Song Qian's heart from behind.
And Song Qian fell as the bowstring twanged.
Then Taishi Ci, seeing his colleague fell, left off the fight with Zhang Liao and returned to his own line.
At this Zhang Liao fell on in a swift attack, and the army of Sun Quan, thrown into confusion, scattered and fled.
Zhang Liao, having distinguished Sun Quan in the distance, galloped in pursuit and had nearly come up with him, when Cheng Pu happily rushed in from one side of the line of fight, stayed the pursuit, and saved his master.
Zhang Liao withdrew to Hefei.
Sun Quan was escorted back to his main camp, where his beaten soldiers gradually rejoined him and their ranks were reformed.
When Sun Quan knew of the death of Song Qian, he was greatly pained and wept aloud.
But Zhang Hong, the adviser, reproached him, saying, “My lord, you relied too much upon your martial prowess and lightly engaged in battle with a formidable enemy. Every person in the army was chilled with fear, and you lost a general and some of your banners.
It is not for you to exhibit prowess on the actual battlefield and encroach upon the duties of a general.
Rather curb and repress such physical feats as those ancient Xia Yu and Meng Ben, and contemplate schemes of exercising princely virtues with the hegemony of all the feudal states.
It is because of your ill-regulated action in engaging in battle that Song Qian perished at the hands of your enemies.
Hereafter you should regard as most important your personal safety.” “Yes; it is indeed a fault,” said Sun Quan.
“I will reform.” Soon after, Taishi Ci entered the tent and said, “In my command there is a certain Ge Ding, brother of a groom in the army of Zhang Liao. This servant is deeply resentful on account of a punishment inflicted upon him and is anxious to be revenged. He has sent over to say that he will show a signal tonight when he has assassinated Zhang Liao in revenge for the death of your late leader Song Qian.
I wish to take some troops over to await this signal to attack.” “Where is Ge Ding?” asked Sun Quan.
“Ge Ding has mingled with the enemy and gone into the city.
Let me have five thousand soldiers.” Zhuge Jin said, “Zhang Liao is full of guile; I think you will find him prepared for your coming.
Be careful.” As Taishi Ci urged his chief to let him go, and Sun Quan was deeply hurt by the death of his leader, the permission was given and the force started.
Now here it must be said that Taishi Ci and this Ge Ding were natives of the same place.
Ge Ding had made his way into the city without detection, found his brother, and the two had arranged their plot.
Ge Ding also told him, saying, “Taishi Ci will come over tonight to help us; what need to be done now?” His brother, the groom, said, “As the troops of Sun Quan are far away, I fear they cannot be here tonight, so we will make a huge bonfire of straw and then you can rush out and cry treachery. That will throw all into confusion and will give a chance to kill Zhang Liao.” “This is an excellent plan,” said Ge Ding.
Now after the victory, Zhang Liao returned to the city and rewarded his soldiers, but he issued orders that no one was to doff his armor or sleep.
His attendants said, “You have gained a great victory today, and the enemy are far away.
You might doff your armor and get some repose.” But Zhang Liao replied, “That is not the way of a leader.
A victory is no reason for rejoicing, nor should a defeat cause sadness.
If those of the South Land suspect that I am unprepared, they will attack; and we must be ready to repel them.
Be ready tonight and be doubly careful.” Scarcely had he said this than a fire started and cries of “Treachery!” arose.
Many rushed to tell the leader, who went out and called together his guard of about half a score. They took up a commanding position in the way.
Those about him said, “The shouts are insistent; you ought to go and see what it means.” “A whole city cannot be traitors,” said Zhang Liao.
“Some discontented person has frightened the soldiers.
If I see any one doing so, I will slay him.” Soon after this Li Dian dragged up Ge Ding and his fellow traitor.
After a few brief questions, they were beheaded.
Then arose a great noise, shouting and the rolling of drums was heard outside the gate. “That means the troops of South Land are there to help,” said Zhang Liao.
“But we will destroy them by a simple ruse.” He bade them light torches and yell “Treachery! Rebellion!” and throw open the city gates and let down the drawbridge.
When Taishi Ci saw the gates swing open, he thought his scheme was going well and in full confidence rode in at the gate.
But just at the entrance a signal bomb suddenly exploded, and the enemy arrows came down on him like pelting rain. Then he knew he had fallen into a snare and turned to ride out. But he was wounded in many places. And in the pursuit that followed, more than half the troops under Taishi Ci were cut off.
As he drew near his own lines, a rescue force led by Lu Xun and Dong Xi came to his aid, and the Cao Cao's soldiers ceased from pursuit.
Sun Quan was exceedingly sad when he learned that his faithful general had been grievously wounded; and when Zhang Zhao prayed him to cease from war, Sun Quan was content.
They gathered in their soldiers to their ships and sailed to Nanxu and Runzhou where they camped. Meanwhile Taishi Ci was dying.
When his lord went to ask how he fared, he cried, “When a worthy person is born into a turbulent world, he has to be a soldier and gird on a three-span sword to step on the mountains to mend the sky. I have not rendered great service.
Why must I die before I have attained my desire?” These were his last words; he was forty-one years of age.
Single minded and perfectly loyal, Such was Taishi Ci, in Donglai, Far distant frontiers rang with his exploits, Riding or archery, all humans he excelled, One in Bohai who admired his valor, Cared for his mother while he was fighting, How he roared in the battle at Shenting!
Dying, he spoke as a hero; All through the ages people sigh for his fate.
Sun Quan was exceedingly grieved when this second of his leaders died. He gave orders to bury his remains most honorably outside the north wall of Nanxu on Beigu Hill and took his son, Taishi Heng, into his own palace to be brought up.
In Jingzhou, when Liu Bei heard of the series of misfortunes that had befallen Sun Quan and of his retirement to Nanxu, he and Zhuge Liang discussed their plans.
Said Zhuge Liang, “I was studying the sky and saw a falling star in the northwest.
The imperial family is to suffer a loss.” Zhuge Liang had scarcely said this when they brought news of the death of Liu Qi, son of Liu Biao. Liu Bei at once began to wail bitterly.
But his adviser said to him, “Life and death are beyond our control, wherefore weep not, my lord, for grief harms the body. Rather consider what is necessary to be done.
Send some one to assume control and make arrangements for the interment.” “Who can go?” asked Liu Bei.
“No other than Guan Yu.” So they sent Guan Yu to guard the city of Xiangyang. Liu Bei at once began to feel troubled about his promise to surrender Jingzhou on the death of Liu Qi. Zhuge Liang did not consider this a matter of moment.
Zhuge Liang said, “I will have somewhat to say to any one who comes to ask fulfillment of the promise.” In half a month it was announced that Lu Su would come to mourn at the funeral.
To claim the promise one will come, But they will send him empty home.
What reply Zhuge Liang made may be read in the next chapter. CHAPTER 54. The Dowager Marchioness Sees Her Son-InLaw At A Temple; The Imperial Uncle Takes A Worthy Consort.
Liu Bei and Zhuge Liang went out of the city to welcome the envoy of the South Land and led him to the guest-house.
After the usual greetings, Lu Su said, “Hearing of the death of your nephew, my lord Sun Quan has prepared some gifts and sent me to take his place at the funeral sacrifices.
General Zhou Yu also sends regards to the Imperial Uncle and to you, Master Zhuge Liang.” Both rose at once and thanked him for the courtesy.
Then the gifts were handed over and a banquet prepared, and while it was in progress, the guest brought up the real object of his visit.
“You said, Sir, that Jingzhou should be returned to us after the death of Liu Qi.
Now that that event has happened, rendition becomes due, and I should be glad to know when the transfer can take place.” “We will discuss that later; in the meantime let us go on with our wine,” said Liu Bei. So the feasting continued. Some time later Lu Su returned to the subject, but this time his host remained silent.
However, Zhuge Liang, changing color, said, “Lu Su, you are unreasonable. You could not wait till some other has to explain this matter to you.
From the very foundation of the empire by our illustrious ancestor, the great heritage has descended in due course till today when, unhappily, evil doers have risen among the powerful and they have seized upon such portions as they could.
But with God's favor and help, unity is nearly restored.
My lord is a scion of the Imperial House, a great great grandson of Emperor Myers. Now, as the Emperor's Uncle, should he not have a share of the empire?
Moreover, Liu Biao was my lord's elder brother, and there is certainly nothing extraordinary in one brother's succession to another's estate. “What is your master?
The son of a petty official on the banks of the River Qiantang, absolutely without merit so far as the state is concerned.
Just because he is powerful, he holds actual possession of six territories and eightyone counties, which has whetted his insatiable appetite till he now desires to swallow the whole empire.
The land is the estate of the Liu family and my lord, who is of that name, has no share thereof, while your master, whose name is Sun, would dispute with, and even fight him.
Beside, at the battle at the Red Cliffs my lord did good service and acquired great merit while his commanders risked their lives. Was it solely the strength of your southern soldiers that won that fight?
Had I not brought that southeast wind that meant so much for Zhou Yu, could he have done anything?
Had the South Land been conquered, it is needless to say that the two paramount beauties would now be gracing the Bronze Bird Palace, and as for yourself and other officers, insignificant though your families be, could you have been sure to survive?
Just now my lord did not reply because he was willing to believe rather that a scholar of your abilities would understand without a detailed explanation, and I trust now that you will.” This speech absolutely shut the guest's mouth for a time, and he said no word in reply.
But after an interval he said, “What you say, Zhuge Liang, I think is devoid of reason, and means much unpleasantness for me.” “What unpleasantness?” asked Zhuge Liang.
The guest replied, “When Liu Bei was in serious straits at Dangyang, I conducted you across the river and introduced you to my lord.
I opposed Zhou Yu when he was going to capture Jingzhou, and then it came to agreement that the place was to be ours when the young man died. And I pledged myself to that.
Now how can I go back and say you break your promise?
Both my lord and Zhou Yu will hold me guilty.
I would not mind death so much, but I fear that my master will be very wrathful and make war on the Imperial Uncle, who will have no place of refuge and he will look ridiculous in the eyes of the world for no reason.” Replied Zhuge Liang, “I care not for Cao Cao with his million troops and the Emperor in name at his back, and do you think I fear such a youngster as Zhou Yu?
However, as it may cause you some loss of consideration, I will try to persuade my master to put the matter in writing and give you a paper to the effect that he is temporarily occupying Jingzhou as a base; and when he can obtain possession of some other city, this shall be returned to you. What think you the South Land would say to this?” “Wait till what other place was obtained?” said Lu Su.
“My master can scarcely think of attacking the Middle Land yet, but Liu Zhang in Yiazhou is ignorant and weak, and my master will attack him.
If he gets the western region, then this place will be given up to you.” Lu Su had no alternative and accepted the offer.
Liu Bei with his own hand wrote the pledge and sealed it.
Zhuge Liang being named as guarantor also signed the document.
“Since I belong to this side of the compact and one can hardly have a guarantor of the same party, I would trouble you, Lu Su, also to sign. It will look better when you reach the South Land again,” said Zhuge Liang.
Lu Su said, “I know that your master is perfectly honorable and will adhere to the bargain.” And so Lu Su signed.
Then he received the document in formal style and took his departure.
He was sent off with every mark of great respect, both Liu Bei and Zhuge Liang attending him to his boat.
There the Directing Instructor delivered him a last exhortation, “When you see your master, speak discreetly and explain fully so as not to create a bad impression.
If he rejects our document, we may get angry and we will take his whole country.
The one thing now is for our two houses to live in harmony and not give our common enemy, Cao Cao, an opportunity against us.” Lu Su went down into his ship.
He reached Chaisang and there saw Zhou Yu, who said, “Well, how did you speed with your demand for Jingzhou?” “Here is the document,” said Lu Su, giving it to Zhou Yu to read.
“You have been victimized by Zhuge Liang,” said Zhou Yu, stamping his foot with irritation.
“In name it may be temporary occupation, but in fact it is humbug.
They say the place is to be returned when they get the west. Who knows when that will be?
Suppose ten years; then it will be ten years before they give us Jingzhou.
What is the use of such a document as this? And you are a guarantor of its due performance!
If they do not give us the city, you get into trouble. Suppose our lord finds you in the wrong, what then?” Lu Su was dumbfounded.
When he had somewhat recovered his selfpossession, he said, “I think Liu Bei will be true to me.” “You, my friend, are simple and sincere; Liu Bei is a scoundrel adventurer; and Zhuge Liang is a slippery customer. They and you are utterly different.” “What then is to be done?” cried Lu Su distressfully.
“You are my dear friend, and your kindness in freely offering your store of grain to relieve my army is still fresh in my memory. Of course I will save you.
Do not be anxious, but wait a few days till we get news of what is doing on the north of the river, and then we can decide upon a plan.” Lu Su passed some very uneasy days.
Then the scouts came back saying that in Jingzhou everything seemed in excellent order and the white flags were flying everywhere, while outside the city they were building a magnificent mausoleum for Lady Gan, wife of Liu Bei. All the soldiers were in mourning. When Zhou Yu knew who was dead, he said to Lu Su, “My scheme is made.
You will see Liu Bei just stand still to be bound, and we shall get Jingzhou like turning a hand.” “What is the main spring of your plan?” said Lu Su.
“Liu Bei will want to remarry, and our lord has a sister, Princess Sun Ren.
She is a veritable amazon, whose women guards number many hundreds, all armed with weapons of war. Her apartments also are full of such things.
I will write to our lord to send an intermediary to arrange that the lady shall wed Liu Bei at her family home, and thus we shall entice Liu Bei to Nanxu.
But instead of marrying a wife, Liu Bei will find himself a prisoner, and then we will demand Jingzhou as ransom.
When they have handed over the region, I shall find something else to say and nothing will fall on your head.” Lu Su was very grateful.
Then Zhou Yu wrote letters to his master, and a swift boat was chosen to take Lu Su to see the Marquis of Wu. After the lending of Jingzhou had been discussed, Lu Su presented the document given him by Liu Bei. “What is the use of such nonsense as this?” said Sun Quan, when he had read it.
“There is another letter from General Zhou Yu; and he says that if you will employ his scheme, you can recover Jingzhou,” replied Lu Su.
Having read that letter, Sun Quan was more pleased and began to consider who was the best person to send.
Suddenly he cried, “I have it; Lu Fan is the man to send.” Sun Quan called Lu Fan and said to him, “I have just heard that Liu Bei has lost his wife.
I have a sister whom I should like to marry to him and so make a bond of union between our two houses. Thus we should be united against Cao Cao and in support of the House of Han.
You are the one man to be intermediary, and I hope you will go to Jingzhou and see to this.” Under these orders, Lu Fan at once began to prepare his ships for the voyage and soon started.
Liu Bei was greatly distressed at the death of Lady Gan, fretting for her day and night.
One day when he was talking with his adviser, they announced the arrival of Lu Fan who had come on a mission from the South Land.
“One of Zhou Yu's devices,” said Zhuge Liang smiling, “and it is all on account of this region.
I will just retire behind the screen and listen.
But you, my lord, agree to whatever the messenger proposes.
Then let the messenger be taken to the guest-house while we arrange what is to be done.” So the envoy was introduced.
Bows having been exchanged, host and guest being seated in due order and the tea drunk; Liu Bei opened the interview.
“You must have some commands for me, Sir, since you come thus.” “News has just been received that you, O Imperial Uncle, have just been bereaved of your consort. I venture to hope you would not object to an advantageous match, and I have come to propose one.
Are you disposed to listen?” “To lose one's wife in middle age is truly a great misfortune,” said Liu Bei.
“While her body is still warm, I cannot listen to proposals for another marriage.” Lu Fan said, “A man without a wife is like a house without a ridge pole. At your age, one should not live an incomplete life.
I am come on the part of Marquis Sun Quan, who has a sister, beautiful as she is, accomplished and well fitted to be a mate for you.
Should the two families become allied as formerly were Qin and Jin, then that ruffian Cao Cao would never dare so much as look this way.
Such an alliance would be to the benefit of both our houses and of the state. I hope, O Imperial Uncle, that you will fairly consider the proposal.
However, since the young girl's mother is dotingly fond of her, the mother does not wish her to go far away, and so I must ask you to come into our country for the wedding.” “Does the Marquis know of your coming?” “How dare I come without his knowledge?” “I am no longer young,” said Liu Bei. “I am fifty and grizzled.
This fair damsel, the sister of the Marquis, is now in the flower of her youth and no mate for me.” “Although the damsel is a woman, yet in mind she surpasses many a man, and she has said she will never wed any one who is unknown to fame.
Now, Sir, you are renowned throughout the four seas. Marriage with you would be the chaste maiden mating with the born gentleman.
Of what consequence is the difference in age?” “Sir, stay here awhile and I will give you a reply tomorrow,” said Liu Bei.
So that day the envoy was entertained at a banquet and then conducted to the guest-house to repose, while, late as it was, Liu Bei and Zhuge Liang discussed their plans.
“I knew what he had come about,” said the adviser.
“While he was talking, I consulted the oracle and obtained an excellent sign. Wherefore you may accept the proposal and send Sun Qian back with this envoy to arrange the details. When the promise has been ratified, we will choose a day and you shall go to complete the ceremony.” “How can I thus go into enemy territory?
Zhou Yu has wanted to slay me for a long time.” “Let Zhou Yu employ all his ruses; think you he can get beyond me?
Let me act for you, and his calculations will always fail halfway.
Once Sun Quan's sister is in your power, there will be no fear for Jingzhou.” Still Liu Bei doubted in his mind.
However, Sun Qian was sent to the South Land, with definite instructions, and traveled thither with Lu Fan.
At the interview Sun Quan said, “I wish my sister could induce Liu Bei to live here with us.
He would come to no harm.” Sun Qian took his leave; and returning to Jingzhou, he told the bridegroom elect, saying, “Sun Quan's sole desire is for our lord to go over and complete the marriage.” However, Liu Bei feared and would not go.
Zhuge Liang said, “I have prepared three plans, but I need Zhao Yun to carry them out.
He will be sent as your guard.” So Zhuge Liang called in Zhao Yun, gave him three silken bags, and whispered in his ear, saying, “Here are three schemes enclosed in three bags.
When you escort our lord to the South Land, you will take these with you and act as they direct.” Zhao Yun hid the three silken bags in his breast so that they should be at hand when required. Zhuge Liang next sent the wedding gifts, and when these had been received, the preliminaries were settled.
It was then the early winter of the fourteenth year of Rebuilt Tranquillity ; and the bridegroom elect, his escort, and the intermediary, left the city of Jingzhou with a fleet of ten fast ships to sail down the river to Nanxu. Zhuge Liang remained to guard and rule the region. But Liu Bei was far from feeling comfortable. They arrived and the ships were made fast.
This done, the time had come for the first of the silken bags to be opened.
And so it was; and thereupon Zhao Yun gave each of his five hundred guards his instructions, and they went their several ways. Next Zhao Yun told Liu Bei what he was to do: to pay his visit first to the State Patriarch Qiao, who was the father-in-law of Sun Ce and of Zhou Yu. The State Patriarch Qiao resided in Nanxu and to his house, leading sheep and bearing wine jars, went the bridegroom elect.
Having made his obeisance, Liu Bei explained that as Lu Fan had arranged, he had come to marry a wife.
In the meantime the five hundred guards, all in gala dress, had scattered over the city place buying all sorts of things, as they said, for the wedding of Liu Bei with the daughter of the Sun House. They spread the news far and wide and the whole town talked about it.
When Sun Quan heard of Liu Bei's arrival, he bade Lu Fan wait upon him and take him to the guest-house.
Meanwhile the State Patriarch Qiao went to the Dowager Marchioness, mother of Sun Quan, to congratulate her on the happy event.
“What happy event?” ejaculated the old lady. “The betrothal of your beloved daughter to Liu Bei.
And he has arrived too, as surely you know.” “My poor old self does not know;” said the Dowager, “I have heard nothing of all this.” She at once summoned her son and also sent her servants out into the town to see what was going about. They quickly returned to say: “The whole city know of the coming wedding, and the bridegroom is now at the guesthouse.
Moreover, he has come with a large escort, and they are spending freely, buying pork and mutton and fruits, all in readiness for the wedding feasting.
Lu Fan and Sun Qian are the intermediaries on each side, and they are in the guest-house too.” The Dowager Marchioness was terribly taken aback and upset so that, when Sun Quan arrived, he found his mother beating her breast and weeping bitterly.
“What has disturbed you, Mother?” asked he. “What you have just done,” said she.
“You have treated me as a nonentity.
When my elder sister lay dying, what did she tell you?” Sun Quan began to be frightened, but he said boldly, “Please speak out plainly, Mother; what is this great sorrow?” “When a son is grown he takes a wife, and when a girl is old enough she goes to her husband. And that is right and proper.
But I am the mother, and you ought to have told me that your sister was to become the wife of Liu Bei. Why did you keep me in the dark?
It was my place to promise her in marriage.” “Whence comes this story?” said the Marquis, really much frightened.
“Do you pretend ignorance?
There is not a soul in the city who does not know!
But you have succeeded in keeping me in the dark.” “I heard it several days ago,” said the State Patriarch Qiao. “And I came just now to offer my felicitations.” “There is no such thing,” said Sun Quan.
“It is just one of the ruses of Zhou Yu to get hold of Jingzhou. He has used this means to inveigle Liu Bei here and hold him captive till Jingzhou is restored to us.
And if they will not give it back, then Liu Bei will be put to death.
That is the plot.
There is no real marriage.” But the Dowager was in a rage and vented her wrath in abusing Zhou Yu. She said, “Zhou Yu is a pretty sort of governor over the six territories and eighty-one counties if he cannot find any means of recovering one region except making use of my child as a decoy.
Truly this is a fine deed, to spoil the whole of my child's life and condemn her to perpetual widowhood, because he wants to use the fair damsel ruse to slay a man!
Who will ever come to talk of marriage with her after this?” Said the State Patriarch Qiao, “By this means you may indeed recover Jingzhou, but you will be a shameful laughing stock to all the world.
What can be done?” Sun Quan had nothing to say; he could only hang his head, while the Dowager abused his general.
The State Patriarch Qiao tried to soothe her, saying, “After all Liu Bei, the Imperial Uncle, is a scion of the reigning family. You can do nothing better now than to welcome him as a son-in-law and not let this ugly story get abroad.” “I am afraid their ages do not match,” interposed Sun Quan.
“Liu Bei is a very famous man,” said the State Patriarch Qiao.
“There can be no shame in having such a son-in-law.” “I have never seen him,” said the Dowager.
“Arrange that I may get a look at him tomorrow at the Sweet Dew Temple. If he displeases me, you may work your will on him.
But if I am satisfied with him, then I shall simply let the girl marry him.” Now Sun Quan was above all things filial and at once agreed to what his mother said.
He went out, called in Lu Fan, and told him to arrange a banquet for the morrow at the temple so that the Dowager Marchioness might see the bridegroom.
“Why not order Jia Hua to station some men in the wings of the temple?
Then if the Dowager be not pleased, we can call them out and fall upon him,” said Lu Fan. Accordingly the ambush was prepared and five hundred ruffians posted to act as the Dowager's attitude might determine.
When the State Patriarch Qiao took his leave and had reached his house, he sent to tell Liu Bei, saying, “Tomorrow the Marquis and the Dowager Marchioness wished to see you. So be careful!” Liu Bei and his faithful henchman discussed their plans.
Zhao Yun said, “The morrow bodes rather ill than well.
However, your escort shall be there.” Next day the Dowager Marchioness and the State Patriarch Qiao went to the Temple of Sweet Dew as had been arranged.
Sun Quan came with a number of his strategists; and when all were assembled, Lu Fan was sent to the guest-house to request Liu Bei to come.
He obeyed the summons, but as a precaution he put on a light coat of mail under his brocaded robe. His followers too took their swords upon their backs and followed close.
He mounted his steed, and the cavalcade set out for the temple.
At the door of the temple he met Sun Quan on whom the visitor's brave demeanor was not lost.
After they had exchanged salutations, Sun Quan led Liu Bei into the presence of his mother. “Just the son-in-law for me!” said the Dowager delighted with the appearance of Liu Bei.
“He has the air of an emperor and a look like the sun,” remarked the State Patriarch Qiao.
“When one remembers also that his fair fame has spread over the whole earth, you may well be congratulated on getting such a noble son-in-law.” Liu Bei bowed, in acknowledgment of his reception.
Soon after they were all seated at the banquet in the temple, Zhao Yun entered and took his place beside Liu Bei.
“Who is this?” asked the Dowager.
“This is Zhao Yun of Changshan.” “Then he must be the hero of Dangyang, who saved the little Liu Shan.” “Yes; this is he,” replied Liu Bei.
“A fine general!” said the Dowager, and she gave him wine.
Presently Zhao Yun said to his master, “I have seen a lot of armed ruffians hidden away in the purlieus of the temple.
They can be there for no good, and you should ask the Dowager to get them sent away.” Thereupon Liu Bei knelt at the feet of the Dowager and, weeping, said, “If you would slay me, let it be here.” “Why do you say this?” asked she.
“Because there are assassins in hiding in the wings of the temple; what are they there for if not to kill me?” The Dowager wrathfully turned on Sun Quan, “What are armed men doing there today when Liu Bei is to become my son-in-law and the pair are my son and daughter?” Sun Quan said he did not know and sent Lu Fan to inquire.
Lu Fan put the blame on Jia Hua.
The Dowager summoned him and upbraided him severely. He had nothing to say, and she told them to put him to death.
But Liu Bei interceded, saying, “The general's death will do me harm and make it hard for me to stay at your side.” The State Patriarch Qiao also interceded, and she only ordered the general out of her presence.
His subordinates also scattered and ran like frightened rats.
By and bye, strolling out of the banquet room into the temple grounds, Liu Bei came to a boulder.
Drawing his sword he looked up to heaven and prayed, saying, “If I am to return to Jingzhou and achieve my intent to become a chief ruler, then may I cleave this boulder asunder with my sword; but if I am to meet my doom in this place, then may the sword fail to cut this stone.” Raising his sword he smote the boulder.
Sparks flew in all directions, and the boulder lay split in twain.
It happened that Sun Quan had seen the blow, and he said, “Why do you thus hate that stone?” Liu Bei replied, “I am near my fifth decade and have so far failed to rid the state of evil; I greatly regret my failure.
Now I have been accepted by the Dowager as her son-in-law, and this is a critical moment in my life.
So I implored of Heaven a portent that I might destroy Cao Cao as I would that boulder and restore the dynasty. You saw what happened.” “That is only to blind me,” thought Sun Quan.
Drawing his own sword, he said, “And I also ask of Heaven an omen, that if I am to destroy Cao Cao, I may also cut this rock.” So he spoke.
But in his secret heart he prayed, “If I am to recover Jingzhou and extend my borders, may the stone be cut in twain.” He smote the stone and it split in twain.
And to this day there are cross cuts in the stone, which is still preserved. One who saw this relic wrote a poem:
The shining blades fell and the rock was shorn through, The metal rang clear and the sparks widely flew.
Thus fate then declared for the dynasties two And the tripartite rule there began.
Both put up their swords and returned hand in hand to the banquet hall.
After some more courses, Sun Qian gave his master a warning look, and Liu Bei said, “I pray you excuse me as my drinking powers are very small.” Wherefore Sun Quan escorted him to the gate.
As they walked down looking at high land and rolling river spreading in glorious panorama before their eyes, Liu Bei exclaimed, “Really this is the finest scene in the whole world! 1” These words are recorded on a tablet in the Temple of the Sweet Dew, and one who read them wrote a poem:
From the river-side hills the rain clears off, And the black clouds roll away, And this is the place of joy and mirth And never can sorrow stay.
And here two heroes of ages past Decided their parts to play, And the lofty heights flung back wind and wave Then, as they do today.
Yes, they stood both entranced by the beautiful scene. And gradually along the vast river the wind whipped the waves into snowy foam and raised them high toward heaven.
And in the midst of the waves appeared a tiny leaf of a boat riding over the waves as if all was perfect calm.
“The northern people are riders and the southern people sailors; it is said quite true,” sighed Liu Bei.
Sun Quan hearing this remark took it as a reproach to his horsemanship.
Bidding his servants lead up his steed, Sun Quan leaped into the saddle and set off, full gallop, down the hill. Then wheeling he came up again at the same speed. “So the southerners cannot ride, eh?” said Sun Quan laughing.
Not to be outdone, Liu Bei lifted the skirts of his robe, jumped upon his horse and repeated the feat.
The two steeds stood side by side on the declivity, the riders flourishing their whips and laughing.
Thence forward that hillside was known as the “Slope Where the Horses Stood,” and a poem was written about it:
Their galloping steeds were of noble breed, And both of spirit high, And the riders twain from the hill-crest gazed At the river rolling by. One of them mastered the western mountains.
One ruled by the eastern sea; And the hill to this very day Still is the Slope Where the Horses Stood.
When they rode side by side into Nanxu, the people met them with acclamations.
Liu Bei made his way to the guest-house and there sought advice from Sun Qian as to the date of the wedding.
Sun Qian advised, “It should be fixed as early as possible so that no further complications could arise.” So next day Liu Bei went to the State Patriarch Qiao and told him in plain words, “Many the people of the place mean harm to me, and I cannot stay here long.
I must return soon.” “Do not be anxious,” said the State Patriarch Qiao.
“I will tell the Dowager Marchioness, and she will protect you.” Liu Bei bowed to express his thanks.
The State Patriarch Qiao saw the Dowager, and she was very angry when she heard the reason for Liu Bei's desire to leave.
“Who would dare harm my son-in-law?” cried she.
But she made Liu Bei move into the library of the Palace as a precaution, and she chose a day for the celebration of the wedding. But his soldiers could not keep guard at the library and were removed from his commands.
Liu Bei explained to his hostess, and when she understood this, she gave her son-inlaw and his people rooms in her own Palace so that he might be quite safe. Liu Bei was very happy, and there were fine banquets, and the bride and bridegroom duly plighted their troth.
And when it grew late and the guests had gone, the newly wedded pair walked through the two lines of red torches to the nuptial apartment.
To his extreme surprise, Liu Bei found the chambers furnished with spears and swords and banners and flags, while every waiting-maid had girded on a sword.
Walls hung with spears the bridegroom saw, And armed waiting-maids; His heart fell back on all its fears Of well-laid ambuscades.
What happened will be related in the next chapter. CHAPTER 55.
Liu Bei Rouses The Spirit Of Lady Sun; Zhuge Liang A Second Time Angers Zhou Yu.
The bridegroom turned pale: bridal apartments lined with weapons of war and waiting maids armed! But the housekeeper of the princess said, “Do not be frightened, O Honorable One. My lady has always had a taste for warlike things, and her maids have all been taught fencing as a pastime.
That is all it is.” “Not the sort of thing a wife should ever look at,” said Liu Bei.
“It makes me feel cold and you may have them removed for a time.” The housekeeper went to her mistress and said, “The weapons in your chamber displease the handsome one; may we remove them?” Lady Sun laughed, saying, “Afraid of a few weapons after half a life time spent in slaughter!” But she ordered their removal and bade the maids take off their swords while they were at work.
That night Liu Bei and his wife conversed under the moonlight, and the night passed happily enough. Next day Liu Bei distributed gifts among the maids to secure their good will.
He also sent Sun Qian to Jingzhou with news of the wedding, while he gave himself up to feasting and enjoyment.
The Dowager loved him more every day. The results of the plot to destroy Liu Bei were thus very different from the originators' intention. Sun Quan sent to his general:
“My mother had insisted upon marrying her daughter to Liu Bei; and so by juggling with the fictitious, we had made it real.
What is to be done?” The news troubled Zhou Yu day and night, but eventually he thought but another scheme which he embodied in a letter sent to his master.
Here is the outline of the missive:
“Contrary to expectation, the plot that I, Zhou Yu, contrived has turned the wrong way.
However, since by juggling with deceit, we have ended in a solid truth; our future plans must start from the actual present facts.
To the boldness of the adventurer Liu Bei is added the aid of such great leaders as Guan Yu, Zhang Fei, and Zhao Yun, not to mention that he has a strategist like Zhuge Liang. He is not the man to remain long in a lowly position. Wherefore I can think of no better plan than to enervate him by surrounding him with softness and keeping him in the South Land, a prisoner of luxury.
Therefore build for him a fine palace to blunt the edge of his determination and surround him with sensuous luxury. In this way the affection of his brothers will be alienated, and Zhuge Liang will be driven away.
When this result has been attained, we can smite him and so end a great matter.
If we be at all careless, I fear the recumbent dragon may fly to the skies; it is no beast to be kept in a pond.
My lord, I pray you consider this thoroughly.” The letter was shown to Zhang Zhao who said, “My idea is identical with his.
Liu Bei began life in a humble position and for years has been a wanderer. He has never tasted the delights of wealth.
Give him the means of luxury, a beautiful dwelling, fair women, gold and silken attire; and as he enjoys them, the thoughts of Zhuge Liang and his brothers will fade away and they, on their side, will be filled with rancor.
Thus can we lay our plans for recovering Jingzhou.
I recommend action as Zhou Yu says and quickly.” Sun Quan then set about redecorating the Eastern Palace and laying out the grounds. He filled the rooms with beautiful furniture for his sister and her husband.
He also sent fair damsels and musicians by the score, and many and beautiful vessels in gold and silver, and silken stuffs.
And his mother was delighted at his kindness to her son-in-law.
Indeed Liu Bei was soon so immersed in sensuous pleasure that he gave no thought to return.
Zhao Yun and the company under him led an idle life in the front portion of the Eastern Palace, save that at times they went outside the city for archery and horse-racing.
And thus passed the year.
Suddenly Zhao Yun remembered the orders he had received and the three bags with the plans in them.
It was time to open the second one for the end of the year was nigh.
His orders were only to open the third when danger was very near and there appeared no way out.
As already remarked, the year was drawing to a close, and Zhao Yun saw his lord daily becoming more and more the slave of pleasure. Liu Bei never appeared among his guards now.
So the bag was opened and in pursuance of the wonderful scheme thereby discovered, Zhao Yun went to the hall of the Palace and asked to see his master.
The maid in attendance went within and said, “Zhao Yun has some important matter on which to see the master.” Liu Bei called him in and asked what the business was.
Zhao Yun assumed an attitude of great concern and said, “My lord, you are living happily secluded in these beautiful apartments; do you never think of Jingzhou?” “But what is the matter that you seem so disturbed?” asked Liu Bei.
“Today early Zhuge Liang sent a messenger to say that Cao Cao was trying to avenge his last defeat and was leading five hundred thousand troops to attack Jingzhou, which was in great danger. And he wished you to return.” “I must speak to my wife,” said Liu Bei.
“If you consult her, she will be unwilling for you to return.
It would be better to say nothing but to start this evening. Delay may do great damage.” “Retire for a time; I must act discreetly,” said Liu Bei.
Zhao Yun urged the need to return several times more, but finally went away. Liu Bei went into his wife's rooms and began to weep silently.
Seeing his tears, Lady Sun said, “Why are you so sad, my husband?” Liu Bei replied, “I have been driven hither and thither all my life.
I was never able to do my duty to my parents nor have I been able to sacrifice to my ancestors. I have been very unfilial.
The new year is at hand, and its approach disquiets me greatly.” “Do not try to deceive me,” said Lady Sun. “I heard and I know all.
Just now Zhao Yun came to tell you Jingzhou was threatened and you wish to return home.
That is why you put forward this excuse.” Then Liu Bei fell on his knees and said, “Why should I dissemble, O Wife, since you know?
I do not wish to go, but if Jingzhou be lost, I shall be an object of ridicule to everyone. I do desire to go, but I cannot leave you.
Now you know why I am grieved.” She replied, “I am your handmaid, and whithersoever you go, it is my duty to follow.” “Yes; your heart is right, but the difficulty is your mother and the Marquis; they will be unwilling.
If you would have pity on me and let me go for a time——” And again the tears gushed forth.
“Do not be so sad, my husband,” said Lady Sun.
“I will implore my mother to let us go, and she will surely allow it.” “Even supposing the Dowager permits, I am sure the Marquis will hinder.” Lady Sun said nothing for a long time while she weighed the matter thoroughly.
Presently she spoke, “On New Year's Day you and I will go to court and present our congratulations. Then we will give the excuse of a sacrifice on the river bank and go away without formal leave. Will that suit you?” Liu Bei knelt at her feet and expressed his gratitude.
“I should be never so grateful,” said he. “Dead or alive I would remember your love.
But this must be a perfect secret.” This having been decided and the arrangements made; Liu Bei gave Zhao Yun secret orders, saying, “Lead your company out of the city and be on the road on New Year's morn.
We are going away.” Sun Quan held a grand court on the New Year's Day of the fifteenth year of Rebuilt Tranquillity .
Liu Bei and his bride went into the Dowager Marchioness' presence, and Lady Sun said, “My husband has been thinking of his ancestors, who lie in the county of Zhuo, and grieves that he cannot do his duty by them.
Today we wish to go to the river side and offer sacrifice toward the north.
It is our duty to inform you.” “A very filial proceeding,” said the Dowager. “I should not think of stopping you.
Although you have never known your husband's parents, yet you may go with him to sacrifice as it is proper for a wife to do.” Both thanked the Dowager Marchioness and went out, rejoicing at having so far hoodwinked Sun Quan.
Lady Sun got into her carriage taking only a little clothing with her, while Liu Bei followed with a small escort.
They went out of the city of Nanxu and met Zhao Yun at the place arranged.
Then with a guard in front and rear, they left the precincts of the city, traveling as quickly as they could.
That day, at the new year banquet, Sun Quan drank freely so that he had to be helped to his chamber, and the guests left.
Before very long the escape of the fugitives became known, but it was then dark, and when they tried to tell Sun Quan, they could not rouse him.
He slept heavily until the fifth watch.
The next morning, when Sun Quan heard the story, he asked advice of his counselors.
Zhang Zhao said, “They have got away today, but trouble will surely come of it; therefore, pursue after them without loss of time.” So Chen Wu and Pan Zhang, with five hundred of veterans, were sent out with orders to use all speed both by day and by night and bring back the fugitives.
They left.
Sun Quan's anger burned hot against Liu Bei. In his wrath he seized his jade inkstone and dashed it to the ground where it shivered to pieces.
Said Cheng Pu, “My lord, your wrath is in vain, for I do not think your generals will catch the runaways.” “Will they dare to disobey my order?” said Sun Quan. “Our young lady had always delighted to look upon war and is very fierce and determined. All the officers fear her.
Now she has gone with her husband of her own free will; and those sent in pursuit, if once they look upon her countenance, will not dare to lay hands on her.” Sun Quan's wrath burned the more fiercely at these words.
He drew the sword girded at his side and called up Jiang Qin and Zhou Tai, saying, “You two take this sword and bring back the heads of my sister and Liu Bei.
And if you do not, I will put you to death.” With this order they set out in pursuit, leading a whole thousand troops. Meanwhile Liu Bei and his wife were pressing forward with all speed.
When night fell, they rested for a time by the roadside, but not for long.
Just as they reached the confines of Chaisang, they turned and saw a great cloud of dust and the soldiers said that a force was coming in pursuit.
“What shall we do if they come up with us?” said Liu Bei excitedly to Zhao Yun.
“My lord, you go on in front and I will prevent pursuit.” As they turned the foot of a hill, they saw a troop of soldiers blocking their road in front.
Two generals were there and they bellowed, “Liu Bei, dismount and yield yourself captive.
We are here by order of Commander Zhou Yu, and you have kept us waiting long.” Now the thought had come to Zhou Yu that Liu Bei would try to flee, and so he had sent Xu Sheng and Ding Feng, with three thousand troops, to intercept him at this critical spot. They had made a camp there and kept a lookout from the hilltops, for Zhou Yu had calculated that Liu Bei would certainly pass that way. So when Liu Bei and his cavalcade appeared, they all buckled on their arms and barred the way.
Greatly fearing, Liu Bei rode back to consult Zhao Yun, to whom he said, “In front a force barring the road; in rear pursuers. There is no escape.
What can we do?” “Do not be alarmed, my lord.
The Directing Instructor gave me three plans enclosed in three silken bags.
Two have been used and have answered admirably.
There is yet the third, and my orders were to open the bag in such a strait as this.
This is a day of great danger such as calls me to open the bag.” Thereupon Zhao Yun opened the bag and handed it to Liu Bei.
As soon as Liu Bei had seen the contents, he hastened to Lady Sun's carriage and began to weep, saying, “I have something private to say, and I must tell you.” “What have you to tell me, my husband?
Tell me the whole truth,” replied she.
“Your brother and Zhou Yu formerly made a plot for you to marry me, not for your sake, but to get me into their power and hold me so that they might recover Jingzhou.
They were set on my murder, and you were the bait with which to hook me.
Careless of consequences I came, for I knew that the spirit of a heroine dwelt in your bosom and you would pity me.
Lately I heard that harm was intended me, and so I made danger to Jingzhou the excuse to escape.
Happily for me you have remained true and come with me.
But now the Marquis is pursuing us, and Zhou Yu's soldiers are in front.
Only you, my wife, can extricate us from this danger; and if you refuse, then slay me where I stand that I may thus show my gratitude for your kindness.” Lady Sun grew angry and said, “Then does my brother forget that I am his sister? How will he ever look me in the face? I can extricate us from this danger.” Thereupon she bade her people push the carriage to the front.
She rolled up the curtains and herself called out, “Xu Sheng, Ding Feng, are you turned traitors then?” The two generals slid out of their saddles, dropped their arms, and stood meekly in front of the carriage. “We are no traitors,” said they.
“We have the Commander-in-Chief's orders to camp here and await Liu Bei.” “Zhou Yu is an interfering scoundrel,” cried she.
“We of the land of the south have never harmed you, and Liu Bei, the Uncle of the Great Family, is my husband.
I have already told my mother and my brother of our journey, and now I find you with an army at the foot of these hills preventing our passage.
Is it that you would plunder us of our valuables?” The two generals mumbled dissent; they would not dare such a thing.
“We pray you, O Lady, stay your anger.
This is no plan of ours; we do but obey our General's orders.” “So you fear Zhou Yu and not me!” cried she scornfully.
“Think you that if he slays you, I will not slay him?” She broke into a torrent of abuse of Zhou Yu.
Then she bade them push her carriage forward.
The two leaders thought within themselves, “We are but men of lowly rank, we dare not dispute with Lady Sun.” Beside they saw Zhao Yun was bursting with wrath. So they ordered their troops to stand aside and leave the road clear. The cavalcade had only gone a few miles when up came the pursuers.
The two generals told the new-comers what had happened. “You were wrong to let them pass,” said Chen Wu and Pan Zhang.
“We have orders from the Marquis himself to arrest them.” Thereupon all four went in pursuit.
When the noise of the approaching force reached the ears of Liu Bei, he said to his wife, “They are again pursuing us; what now?” “Husband, go on in front.
Zhao Yun and I will keep them off.” So Liu Bei and a small company went on toward the river bank, while Zhao Yun reined up beside the lady's carriage and set out his troops ready for battle.
And when the four generals came up, they dismounted and stood with folded arms.
“What are you doing here, Generals?” asked Lady Sun.
“We have orders from our lord to request you and Liu Bei to return.” Calmly but bitterly she said, “So this is the sort of fools you are! You would make dissension between brother and sister.
But I am a wife on my way to my husband's home.
Nor am I leaving clandestinely, for I had my mother's gracious permission. Now we, husband and wife, are going to Jingzhou; and if even my brother were here himself, he would let us pass in all politeness.
But you, because you have weapons in your hands, would slay us!” She abused the four men to their faces so that they looked from one to another in shame. And each in his heart thought, “Say what one will, after all they two are brother and sister and the Dowager Marchioness is the controlling power.
Sun Quan is most obedient and would never dare oppose his mother's decision. When the reaction comes, then indeed we shall certainly be found in the wrong. We would better be kind.” Another thing was that one of the two they sought, Liu Bei, was not there and Zhao Yun looked angry and dangerous. Finally, muttering to themselves, they gave way and with one accord retired and left the road open.
Lady Sun passed through.
“We four will go to see the Commander-in-Chief and report,” said Xu Sheng. But that did not please them all and they stood irresolute.
Presently they saw a column of troops sweeping down on them like a hurricane. These were Jiang Qin and Zhou Tai with their company.
“Have you fellows seen Liu Bei ?” they cried as they rushed up.
“He has just passed along.” “Why did you not arrest him?” “Because of what Lady Sun said.” “That is just as the Marquis feared, and so he gave us this sword and told us first to slay his sister and then Liu Bei. And if we disobey, he will put us to death.” “What can be done?
They are far away by now.” Jiang Qin said, “After all they are but a few and on foot; they cannot travel very fast.
Let Xu Sheng and Ding Feng go to Zhou Yu to tell him, and he can send fast boats to pursue them on the river while we follow up on the bank.
We must get them either on water or land, and we must not listen to what they say.” Whereupon two went back to report and four to the river bank.
Meanwhile Liu Bei had got a long way from Chaisang and reached Butterfly Shore. He now felt calmer.
He went along the bank of the river seeking a boat, but there was no craft on the broad bosom of the stream.
He bowed his head in deep sorrow.
Zhao Yun bade him be of good courage, saying, “My lord, you have just escaped from the tiger's jaws and had not far to go. Moreover, I suspect Zhuge Liang has something prepared for us.” But his master was despondent.
His thoughts were back to the pleasures he had enjoyed but a few hours since in the house of his wife, and the tears rolled down his cheeks. A poem has been written on this episode: By the bank of the deep flowing Great River Once was a wedding, And the ruling houses of two states yet to be Were allied by marriage.
See the beautiful maiden stepping slowly To the golden bridal chamber! Yet was the marriage but a ruse. Its author vainly imagined that a hero, Sinking in amorous toils, Would forget his high intent.
Liu Bei bade Zhao Yun go along the bank to seek some boats. Then the soldiers told him there was a huge cloud of dust on the road.
Ascending one of the hills, he looked back whence they had come and saw the whole earth as it were covered with an advancing host. He sighed and said, “We have fled before them now for days, worn out our soldiers and jaded our horses, and all to die in a strange place.” He watched the enemy coming nearer and nearer.
Then as things began to look most desperate, he saw a line of some twenty boats all in the act of setting their sails.
“By good luck here are some ships,” said Zhao Yun.
“Let us get on board, row to the further bank, and see what can be done.” Liu Bei and his bride hastened down the bank and went into a ship. The soldiers were embarked.
Then they saw in the hold of the ship some one in Taoist dress, who came up with a smile, saying, “My lord, again you see Zhuge Liang.
He has waited a long time.” All the soldiers on board were from Jingzhou, and Liu Bei rejoiced at the sudden happy turn of affairs.
Before long the four pursuer leaders reached the bank.
Zhuge Liang pointed to them and laughed, saying, “I foresaw this a long time ago.
You may return and tell Zhou Yu not to use the 'Fair Damsel Trick' again.” Those on the bank sent a flight of arrows at the ships, but they were already too far away.
The four generals on the bank looked very foolish. As the boats were sailing along, a great noise was heard on the river behind them, and there appeared a huge fleet of war ships, sailing under the flag of Zhou Yu.
He also was there in command of the fleet, and he was supported by Huang Gai and Han Dang. They seemed like a drove of horses and came along swift as a falling star. They gained on the fugitives rapidly.
Zhuge Liang ordered the boats to row over to the north bank, and the party landed.
They had started off away from the shore before Zhou Yu could land.
Zhou Yu's marines, except the leaders, were all afoot, but they kept up the pursuit, following as quickly as they could.
Zhou Yu led the pursuit, closely followed by Huang Gai, Han Dang, Xu Sheng, and Ding Feng.
When Zhou Yu's force reached the borders of Huangzhou, Liu Bei and his party were not far away, and so they pressed the pursuit.
But there were only horses for a few leaders in front, and suddenly the rolling of drums struck Zhou Yu's ears, and from out a gully dashed a troop of swordsmen led by Guan Yu.
Zhou Yu was too surprised and unprepared to do anything but flee.
Zhou Yu fled for his life and Guan Yu pursued.
At different points Liu Bei's generals, Huang Zhong and Wei Yan, came out and attacked, so that the troops of the South Land suffered a great defeat and Zhou Yu barely escaped.
As he came to the river and was going down into his ship, the soldiers of Liu Bei on the bank jeered at him on account of the miscarriage of his scheme, shouting, “General Zhou Yu has given Uncle Liu Bei a wife and has lost his soldiers.” Zhou Yu was so annoyed that he would have gone up the bank to fight again, but his generals restrained him.
He uttered, “My schemes are a failure and a defeat, and how can I face my master again?” All at once he cried aloud and fell back in a swoon. His wound had reopened. The generals came to his help, but it was long before he recovered consciousness.
Twice had he played his trick And twice had he lost the game; His heart was full of resentment, He was overwhelmed with shame.
The fate of Zhou Yu will appear in the next chapter. CHAPTER 56.
Cao Cao Feasts In The Bronze Bird Tower; Zhuge Liang Provokes Zhou Yu A Third Time. The ambuscade into which Zhou Yu had fallen had been prepared by the orders of Zhuge Liang and was triple.
However, Huang Gai and Han Dang contrived to get clear and found refuge in the ships, though with the loss of many troops.
When Zhou Yu was in safety and looked about him, he saw Liu Bei and Lady Sun safely resting on a hilltop. How could such a sight fail to put him in a rage?
And with the access of rage, his wound, not yet healed, burst open once again. He swooned and fell.
They raised him and his ship set sail.
Zhuge Liang ordered no pursuit, the southern fleet departed undisturbed, and Liu Bei proceeded to Jingzhou City, where were great rejoicings in honor of his recent marriage.
Meanwhile Zhou Yu had gone to Chaisang while Jiang Qin and those with him bore to Nanxu the sad tidings to Sun Quan.
He was angry beyond words and his first thought was to send an army under Cheng Pu to take Jingzhou.
Zhou Yu also wrote from his sick bed urging his lord to take vengeance.
But Zhang Zhao knew better and said it could not be done.
Said he, “Cao Cao has never forgotten his defeat at the Red Cliffs, but he dares not attempt to avenge himself while the Sun family are friendly with Liu Bei.
If in any moment of anger you two fall upon each other, Cao Cao will certainly seize the opportunity and your position will be dangerous.” Gu Yong supported Zhang Zhao, saying, “Beyond all doubt Cao Cao has his spies here.
As soon as he hears of any rift in the friendship between the Sun and Liu families, he will desire to come to an understanding with the latter, and Liu Bei, who fears your power, will accept his offer and take his side.
Such an alliance will be a continual menace to the land south of the river.
No; the plan for the occasion is to secure the friendship of Liu Bei by memorializing that he be made Imperial Protector of Jingzhou.
This will make Cao Cao afraid to send any army against the South Land.
At the same time it will raise kindly feelings in the heart of Liu Bei and win his support.
You will be able to find some one who will provoke a quarrel between Cao Cao and Liu Bei and set them at each other, and that will be your opportunity.
In this way you will succeed.” “These are good words,” said Sun Quan, “but have I a messenger who can accomplish such a mission?” “There is such a man, one whom Cao Cao respects and loves.” “Who is he?” “What prevents you from employing Hua Xin?
He is ready to hand.” Wherefore Hua Xin was given letters and bidden go to the capital, Xuchang, whither he proceeded at once and sought to see Cao Cao.
They told him that Cao Cao and all his friends were at Yejun, celebrating the completion of the Bronze Bird Tower. So thither he went.
Cao Cao had indeed never forgotten his great defeat at the Red Cliffs and nourished schemes to avenge it, but he feared the combination of his two chief enemies, and that fear restrained him.
In the spring of the fifteenth year  the great Tower was completed, and Cao Cao invited a vast assembly to celebrate its inauguration with banquets and rejoicings.
The feast was on the bank of River Zhang. The Bronze Bird Terrace stood in the center, flanked by two others named the Terrace of the Jade Dragon and the Terrace of the Golden Phoenix. Each tower was a hundred spans high and two bridges connected them. Gold and jade vied with each other in the many apartments.
At the opening ceremony, Cao Cao wore a golden headdress inlaid with jewels and a robe of green brocaded silk, girded with a belt of jade. On his feet were pearl-encrusted shoes.
So clad he took his seat as host, while his officers, civil and military, were drawn up below the terrace.
For the military officers was arranged an archery competition, and one of his attendants brought forth a robe of red crimson Xichuan silk as a prize. This was suspended from one of the drooping branches of a willow tree, beneath which was the target. The distance was a hundred paces.
The competitors were divided into two bands, those of Cao Cao's own family being dressed in red and the others in green.
They all had carved bows and long arrows and were mounted. They stood holding in their steeds till the signal should be given for the games to begin.
Each was to shoot one arrow and the robe was the guerdon for hitting the target in the red; misses were to pay a forfeit of drinking a cup of cold water.
As soon as the signal was given, a red-robed youth rode quickly forth. He was Cao Xiu.
Swiftly he galloped to and fro thrice. Then he adjusted the notch of his arrow to the string, pulled the bow to its full, and the arrow flew straight to the bull's eye.
The clang of the gongs and the roll of the drums announced the feat, which astonished them all.
And Cao Cao, as he sat on the terrace, was delighted. “A very promising colt of my own,” said he to those about him, and he sent a messenger for the red robe that the winner might receive it from his own hands.
But suddenly from the green side rode out one who cried, “It were more fitting to let outsiders compete for the Prime Minister's silken robe; it is not right that members of the family monopolize the contest.” Cao Cao looked at the speaker, who was Wen Ping.
And some of the officers cried, “Let us see what his shooting is like!” So Wen Ping fitted an arrow to the string and fired also from horseback while galloping.
To the surprise of the onlookers, he also made a bull's eye, which was honored by another salute from gongs and drums.
“Quickly bring me the robe,” cried Wen Ping.
But at once from the ranks of the red-robed another competitor dashed forward, shouting fiercely, “How can you win what has been already won?
But let me show you how I can shoot an arrow that shall overcome both your shots.” He drew his bow to the full, and the arrow flew straight to the heart of the red.
The surprised onlookers saw that this new competitor was Cao Hong, who now became also a claimant for the robe.
However, yet another archer came forth from the green-robed ranks, playing with his bow and crying, “What is there amazing in your shooting, you three?
See how I can shoot.” This man was Zhang He.
He put his horse to the gallop, then turned his back and, shooting backwards, also hit the center of the red.
Thus four arrows were now sticking in the bull's eye, and all agreed that it was marvelous archery.
“I think the robe should be mine,” said Zhang He.
Before he could finish speaking, a fifth competitor came out from the red robes and shouted, “You shot backwards; but that is commonplace enough.
Look while I shoot better than you all.” The speaker was Xiahou Yuan. He galloped off to the very limit, and then bending his body over backwards he sent his arrow right in among the other four.
As the gongs and drums broke out, Xiahou Yuan put aside his bow and rode up, saying, “Is not that a better shot than any of its predecessors?” Then came out another from the greens who cried, “Leave the robe there for me, Xu Huang, to win.” “What can you do that is better than my shot?” said Xiahou Yuan. “That you hit the bull's eye is no great feat.
You will see me win the silken robe after all.” So speaking, Xu Huang fitted an arrow to his bow.
Then looking around, he aimed at the willow twig from which the robe hung down and shot thereat so true that his arrow cut it through, and the robe fluttered to the ground.
At once Xu Huang dashed along, picked up the robe and slipped it on. Then riding swiftly to the terrace, he thanked the Prime Minister.
No one present could withhold unstinted praise, and Xu Huang was turning to ride away when another green clad general leaped out, saying, “Where would you go with that robe?
Quickly leave it for me!” All eyes turned to this man who was Xu Chu.
Xu Huang cried, “The robe has already been adjudged to me; would you dare take it by forces” Xu Chu made no reply but galloped up to snatch the robe.
As Xu Chu's horse drew near, Xu Huang struck at his rival a blow with his bow.
But Xu Chu seized the bow with one hand while with the other he simply lifted his opponent out of his seat. Wherefore Xu Huang let go the bow and the next moment lay sprawling on the ground.
Xu Chu slipped out of the saddle too, and they began to pommel each other with their fists.
Cao Cao sent one to separate them; but in the struggle, the robe had been torn and soiled.
Cao Cao called the angry rivals before him; and they came, one darting fierce looks of hate, the other grinding his teeth with rage.
“Never mind the robe; I see only your magnificent courage,” said Cao Cao smiling.
“What does a robe more or less matter?” Whereupon Cao Cao called the generals to him one by one, and to each he presented a robe of Xichuan silk.
They thanked him for the generous gifts, and he then commanded them to take their seats in due order.
Then to the strains of a band of music, wherein each performer vied with all the others, the naval and military officers took their places.
Civil officers of repute and generals of renown drank one to another, and hearty felicitations were exchanged.
Cao Cao looked around to those about him, saying, “Since the military officers have competed in mounted archery for our enjoyment and displayed their boldness and their skill, you, Gentlemen Scholars, stuffed full of learning as you are, can surely mount the terrace and present some complimentary odes to make the occasion a perfect success.” “We are most willing to obey your commands,” they replied, all bowing low.
At that time there was a band of four scholars named Wang Lang, Zhong Yao, Wang Can, and Chen Lin, and each of them presented a poem.
Every poem sang the praises of Cao Cao's valuable services and great merits and said he was worthy to receive the highest trust of all.
When Cao Cao had read them, he laughed, saying, “You gentlemen are really too flattering.
As a fact I am but an ignoramus who began life with a simple bachelor's degree and recommendations for filial devotion.
And when the troubles began, I built for myself a little cottage in the country near Qiao, where I could study in spring and summer and spend the rest of the year in hunting till the empire was once more tranquil and I could emerge and take office.
“To my surprise, I was chosen for a small military office which changed my intentions, and I determined to repress the rebellion and so make a name for myself. I thought that I might win an inscription on my tomb to the effect that it covered the remains of the “Lord Cao Cao Who Restores Order in the West.” That would have been ample for a life's work.
I recall now how I destroyed Dong Zhuo and smote the Yellow Scarves; then I made away with Yuan Shu and broke the power of Lu Bu; next I exterminated Yuan Shao; and at the death of Liu Biao, I had subdued the whole empire.
“As a minister of state I have attained the topmost pinnacle of honor, and I have no more to hope for.
Were it not for poor me, I know not how many there would be styling themselves emperors and dubbing themselves princes.
Certain there be who, seeing my great authority, think I have some ulterior aim.
But they are quite wrong. I ever bear in mind what Confucius said of King Wen of Zhou, that he was perfectly virtuous, and this saying is ever engraved on my mind1. If I could, I would do away with my armies and retire to my fief with my simple title of Lord of Wuping. I cannot.
I am afraid to lay down my military powers lest I should come to harm.
Should I be defeated, the state would totter; and so I may not risk real misfortune for the sake of an empty reputation for kindness.
There be some of you who do not know my heart.” As he closed, they all rose and bowed their heads, saying, “None are your equals, O Prime Minister, not even Duke Zhou or the great Minister Yi Yin2.” A poem has been written referring to this:
Had Duke Zhou, the virtuous, died, while foul-mouthed slander was spreading vile rumors; Or Wang Mang, the treacherous, while he was noted for the deference paid to learned men; None would have known their real characters.
After this oration Cao Cao drank many cups of wine in quick succession till he became very intoxicated. He bade his servants bring him brush and inkstone that he might compose a poem.
But as he was beginning to write, they announced, “The Marquis of Wu has sent Hua Xin as an envoy and presented a memorial to appoint Liu Bei Imperial Protector of Jingzhou. Sun Quan's sister is now Liu Bei's wife, while on the River Han, the greater part of the nine territories is under Liu Bei's rule.” Cao Cao was seized with quaking fear at the news and threw the pen on the floor.
Cheng Yu said to him, “O Prime Minister, you have been among fighting soldiers by myriads and in danger from stones and arrows many a time and never quailed.
Now the news that Liu Bei has got possession of a small tract of country throws you into a panic.
Why is it thus?” Cao Cao replied, “Liu Bei is a dragon among humans.
All his life hitherto he has never found his element, but now that he has obtained Jingzhou; it is as if the dragon, once captive, had escaped to the mighty deep.
There is good reason for me to quake with fear.” “Do you know the reason of the coming of Hua Xin?” said Cheng Yu.
“No; I know not,” said the Prime Minister.
“Liu Bei is Sun Quan's one terror, and Sun Quan would attack Liu Bei were it not for you, O Prime Minister. Sun Quan feels you would fall upon him while he was smiting his enemy.
Wherefore he has taken this means of calming Liu Bei's suspicions and fears and at the same time directing your enmity toward Liu Bei and from himself.” Cao Cao nodded; “Yes,” he said.
Cheng Yu continued, “Now this is my plan to set Sun Quan and Liu Bei at one another and give you the opportunity to destroy both; it can be done easily.” “What is your plan?” asked Cao Cao.
“The one prop of the South Land is Zhou Yu; remove it by memorializing that Zhou Yu be appointed Governor of Nanjun. Then get Cheng Pu made Governor of Jiangxia, and cause the Emperor to retain this Hua Xin in the capital to await some important post.
Zhou Yu will assuredly attack Liu Bei, and that will be our chance.
Is not the scheme good?” “Friend Cheng Yu, you are a man after my own heart.” Wherefore Cao Cao summoned the emissary from the South Land and overwhelmed him with gifts.
That day was the last of the feastings and merrymakings; and Cao Cao, with all the company, returned to the capital where he forthwith presented a memorial assigning Zhou Yu and Cheng Pu to the governorships of Nanjun and Jiangxia, and Hua Xin was retained at the capital with a post of ministry.
The messenger bearing the commissions for their new offices went down to the South Land, and both Zhou Yu and Cheng Pu accepted the appointments. Having taken over his command, the former thought all the more of the revenge he contemplated and, to bring matters to a head, he wrote to Sun Quan asking him to send Lu Su and renew the demand for the rendition of Jingzhou. Wherefore Lu Su was summoned, and his master said to him, “You are the guarantor in the loan of Jingzhou to Liu Bei.
He still delays to return it, and how long am I to wait?” “The writing said plainly that the rendition would follow the occupation of Yiazhou.” Sun Quan shouted back, “Yes it said so.
But so far they have not moved a soldier to the attack.
I will not wait till old age has come to us all.” “I will go and inquire?” said Lu Su.
So he went down into a ship and sailed to Jingzhou.
Meanwhile Liu Bei and Zhuge Liang were at Jingzhou gathering in supplies from all sides, drilling their troops, and training their armies. From all quarters people of learning flocked to their side.
In the midst of this they heard of Lu Su's coming, and Liu Bei asked Zhuge Liang what he thought.
Zhuge Liang replied, “Just lately Sun Quan concerned himself with getting you appointed Imperial Protector of Jingzhou; that was calculated to inspire Cao Cao with fear.
Cao Cao obtained for Zhou Yu the governorship of Nanjun; that was designed to stir up strife between our two houses and set us fighting so that he might accomplish his own ends.
This visit of Lu Su means that Zhou Yu, having taken over his new governorship, wishes to force us out of this place.” “Then how shall we reply?” “If Lu Su introduces the subject, you will at once set up loud lamentations.
When the sound of lamentation is at its height, I will appear and talk over your visitor.” Thus they planned, and Lu Su was duly received with all honor.
When the salutations were over and host and guest were about to be seated, Lu Su said, “Sir, now that you are the husband of a daughter of Wu, you have become my lord, and I dare not sit in your presence.” Liu Bei laughed. “You are an old friend,” said he.
“Why this excessive humility?” So Lu Su took his seat.
And when tea had been served, the guest said, “I have come at the order of my master to discuss the subject of Jingzhou.
You, O Imperial Uncle, have had the use of the place for a long time.
Now that your two houses are allied by marriage, there should be the most friendly relations between you two, and you should hand it back to my master.” At this Liu Bei covered his face and began to cry. “What is the matter?” asked the guest.
Liu Bei only wept the more bitterly.
Then Zhuge Liang came in from behind a screen, saying, “I have been listening.
Do you know why my lord weeps so bitterly?” “Really I know not.” “But it is easy to see.
When my lord got the temporary occupation of Jingzhou, he gave the promise to return it when he had got the Western Land of Rivers. But reflect.
Liu Zhang of Yiazhou is my lord's younger brother, and both of them are blood relations of the ruling family. If my lord were to move an army to capture another region, he fears the blame of the ignorant.
And if he yields this place before he has another, where could he rest?
Yet, while he retains this place it seems to shame you.
The thing is hard on both sides, and that is why he weeps so bitterly.” The close of Zhuge Liang's speech seemed to move Liu Bei to greater grief, for he beat his breast and stamped his feet and wept yet more bitterly.
Lu Su attempted to console him, saying, “Be not so distressed, O Uncle; let us hear what Zhuge Liang can propose.” Zhuge Liang said, “I would beg you to return to your master and tell him all.
Tell him of this great trouble and entreat him to let us stay here a little longer.” “But suppose he refuses; what then?” said Lu Su.
“How can he refuse since he is related by marriage to my master ?” said Zhuge Liang.
“I shall expect to hear glad tidings through you.” Lu Su was really the first of generous people; and seeing Liu Bei in such distress, he could do no other than consent and say he would do so.
Liu Bei and Zhuge Liang both thanked him most cordially, and after a banquet the emissary went down into his ship to return.
On the way Lu Su called in to see Zhou Yu at Chaisang and told him.
But Zhou Yu stamped his foot with rage and said, “My friend, you have been fooled again.
Long ago when Liu Bei was dependent on Liu Biao, he always cherished the intention to supplant him; think you that he really pities Liu Zhang?
This sort of evasive policy will certainly cause you much trouble.
However, I have a scheme which I think Zhuge Liang will not be able to get the better of.
Only you will have to make another journey.” “I should be pleased to hear your fine scheme,” said Lu Su. “Do not go to see our master.
Return to Jingzhou and say to Liu Bei that since his family and the Suns are related by marriage, they really form but one house, and since he has qualms about attacking the west, we will do it for him.
Thus, the South Land will march an army under this pretext, but really go to Jingzhou, and we shall take him unprepared.
The road to the west runs through his city, and we will call upon him for supplies.
He will come out to thank the army, and we will assassinate him whereby we shall revenge ourselves and at the same time remove a source of future evil.” This seemed an excellent plan to Lu Su, and he returned at once to Jingzhou. Before receiving him, Liu Bei talked over the matter with his adviser.
Said Zhuge Liang, “Lu Su has not seen the Marquis of Wu, he has called in at Chaisang, and he and Zhou Yu have decided upon some scheme, which he is to talk you into accepting.
However, let him talk; you, my lord, only watch me; and when I nod my head, then you agree to whatever he may propose.” Lu Su was then admitted and said, “The Marquis of Wu praises the noble virtue of the Imperial Uncle; and after consultation with his officers, he has determined to take the western country on the Imperial Uncle's behalf and, that done, Jingzhou can be exchanged for it without further delay. However, when the army marches through, it will be expected of you to contribute some necessary supplies.” Zhuge Liang here nodded his head rapidly, at the same time saying, “We could hardly have hoped for such kindness.” And Liu Bei saluted with joined hands and said, “This is due to your friendly efforts on our behalf.” “When the brave army arrives, we shall certainly come out to meet it and entertain the soldiers,” said Zhuge Liang.
Lu Su felt great satisfaction and was quite happy at his success; he took his leave and went homeward. But Liu Bei as yet did not understand.
“What is their intention?” said he.
His adviser smiled, saying, “Zhou Yu's end is very near.
The ruse he is now trying would not take in a child.” “Why?” “This is the ruse known as 'Borrow a Road to Exterminate the Host.' Under the pretense of taking the west, they intend to capture this place; and when you go out to compliment the army, you will be seized and they will dash into the city which they hope to find unprepared.” “And what are we to do?” “Have no anxiety; all we have to do is to prepare a hidden bow to get the fierce tiger; to spread the enticing bait to hook the great leviathan.
Wait till Zhou Yu comes; if he is not killed, he will be nine-tenths a corpse.
We will call in Zhao Yun for orders and give him secret instructions, and I will dispose the others.” And Liu Bei was glad.
Let Zhou Yu lay what plans he will, Zhuge Liang anticipates his skill; That land of rivers fair bait did look, But he forgot the hidden hook.
Lu Su hastened back to Zhou Yu to tell him that all was going as he desired and Liu Bei would come out to welcome the army.
Zhou Yu laughed with glee, saying, “At last!
Now they will fall into my trap.” Zhou Yu bade Lu Su prepare a petition for the information of the Marquis, and he ordered Cheng Pu to bring up reinforcements.
He himself had nearly recovered from the arrow wound and felt well. He made his dispositions for the advance, appointing Gan Ning Van Leader, Xu Sheng and Ding Feng the Commanders of the body, and Ling Tong and Lu Meng Rear Guards. The army numbered fifty thousand troops, and Zhou Yu marched with the second division.
While voyaging in his ship, he was always smiling to think how he was to have Zhuge Liang at last.
At Xiakou he inquired, “Is there any one to welcome the brave army?” They told him, “The Imperial Uncle has sent Mi Zhu to greet us.” And Mi Zhu was called.
“What of the preparations for the army?” asked Zhou Yu as soon as Mi Zhu came.
“My master has seen to that; all is prepared,” said Mi Zhu.
“Where is the Imperial Uncle?” asked Zhou Yu.
“He is at the city of Jingzhou, waiting outside the walls to offer you the cup of greeting.” “This expedition is on your account,” said Zhou Yu.
“When one undertakes so long a march and such a task, the rewards for the army must be very substantial.” Having got this idea of what Zhou Yu expected, Mi Zhu returned to his own city, while the southern battle ships in close order sailed up the river and took their places along the bank. As they went on, the most perfect tranquillity seemed to reign on all sides. Not a ship was visible anywhere, and no one hindered.
Zhou Yu pressed forward till he came quite near Jingzhou, and still the wide river lay calm.
But the spies who came back reported two white flags flying on the city walls. Still not a person was seen, and Zhou Yu began to feel suspicious.
He had his ship navigated in shore, and he himself landed on the bank, where he mounted a horse and, with a small army of three thousand veterans under Gan Ning, Xu Sheng, and Ding Feng, traveled along the land road.
By and bye he came to the city wall. There was no sign of life.
Reining in his steed, he bade them challenge the gate.
Then some one from the wall asked, “Who is there?” The soldiers of the South Land replied, “The Commander-in-Chief of the South Land, Zhou Yu, in person.” Immediately was heard the thud of a club, and the wall became alive with troops all armed.
And from the tower came out Zhao Yun who said, “Why are you here, General?” “I am going to take the west for you;” replied Zhou Yu, “do you not know?” “The Directing Instructor knows that you want to try the ruse of 'Borrowing a Road to Destroy the Host.' And so he stationed me here.
And my master bade me say that he and the ruler of the Western Land of Rivers are both members of the reigning family so that he could not think of such baseness as attacking Yiazhou.
If you people of the South Land do so, he will be forced to go away into the mountains and become a recluse. He could not bear to lose the confidence of humankind.” At this Zhou Yu turned his horse as if to return.
Just then his scouts came up to report: “Armed bands are moving toward us from all four sides, led by Guan Yu, Zhang Fei, Huang Zhong, and Wei Yan.
Their number is unknown, but the sound of their tramping shakes the heavens.
They say they want to capture the Commander-in-Chief.” At these tidings Zhou Yu's excitement became so intense that he fell to the ground with a great cry, and the old wound reopened.
The game was now too deep; in vain he sought A countermove; his efforts came to nought.
Later chapters will show what was Zhou Yu's fate. CHAPTER 57. Sleeping-Dragon Mourns At Chaisang; Blooming-Phoenix Intervenes At Leiyang. In the last chapter it was said that a sudden rage filled the bosom of Zhou Yu, and he fell to the ground. Then he was carried to his boat.
It only added to his rage and mortification to be told that Liu Bei and Zhuge Liang could be seen on the top of one of the hills apparently feasting and enjoying some music.
He lay grinding his teeth with vexation. “They say I shall never be able to get Yiazhou!
But I will; I swear I will.” Soon after Sun Quan's brother Sun Shao arrived, and Zhou Yu told him his vexations. “My brother sent me to assist you,” said Sun Shao.
Zhou Yu ordered Sun Shao to press the army forward for Yiazhou, and they got to Baqiu.
There they stopped, for the scouts reported large forces under Liu Bei's generals—Liu Feng and Guan Ping—barring the water route in the Great River. This failure did not make the Commander-in-Chief any calmer.
About this time a letter from Zhuge Liang arrived, which ran like this: “Since our parting at Chaisang I have thought of you often.
Now comes to me a report that you desire to take the Western Land of Rivers, which I regret to say I consider impossible.
The people there are strong, and the country is precipitous and defensible. Imperial Protector Liu Zhang may be weak within, but he is strong enough to defend himself. “Now indeed, General, you would go far and you would render great services, yet can any one foretell the final result?
No; not even Wu Qi the Great General could say for certain, nor could Sun Zi the Famed Strategist be sure of a successful issue.
Cao Cao suffered severe defeat at the Red Cliffs; think you he will ever cease to hope for revenge?
Now if you undertake a long expedition, will he not seize the occasion to fall upon the South Land and grind it to powder?
Such a deed would be more than I could bear, and I venture to warn you of the possible danger if haply you may condescend to regard it.” The letter made Zhou Yu feel very sorrowful, and he sighed deeply.
He called for paper and ink and wrote to the Marquis of Wu and, having done this, he said to his assembled officers, “I have honestly tried to do my best for my country, but my end is at hand. The number of my days is accomplished.
You must continue to aid our master till his end shall be achieved——” He stopped; for he had swooned.
Slowly he regained consciousness; and as he looked up to heaven, he sighed heavily, “O God, since thou made Zhou Yu, why did thou also create Zhuge Liang?” Soon after he passed away; he was only thirty-six.
The battle at the Red Cliffs made him famous; Though young in years he gained a veteran's reputation.
Deep feeling, his music declared its intensity; Subtle, with excess hospitality he foiled a plot; Persuasive, he obtained a large gift of grain from Lu Su; Capable, he led an army of millions.
Baqiu was his deathbed, there his fate met him. Sadly indeed they mourned him.
After his death his generals sent his dying memorial to the Marquis of Wu, who was most deeply affected and wept aloud at the sad tidings of his death.
When Sun Quan opened the letters, he saw that Lu Su was named as the dead general's successor, This is the letter:
“Possessing but ordinary abilities, there was no reason why I should have been the recipient of your confidence and high office, but I have not spared myself in the leadership of the great army under my command that thereby I might prove my gratitude.
Yet none can measure life and the number of our days is ordained by fate.
Before I could achieve even my poor intentions, my feeble body has failed me. I regret it without measure.
I die with Cao Cao threatening and our northern borders disturbed, and with Liu Bei in your family as though you were feeding a fierce tiger.
None can foretell the fate of the empire in these nervous days of stress and of peculiar anxiety for you.
“Lu Su is most loyal, careful in all matters and a fitting man to succeed to my office.
When a person is near death, his words are wise; and if I may haply retain your regard, I may die but I shall not decay.” “Zhou Yu should have been a king's counselor,” cried Sun Quan, amid his tears.
“He has left me alas! too soon, and whom have I to lean upon?
But he recommends Lu Su, and I can do nothing better than take that advice.” Whereupon Sun Quan appointed Lu Su to the vacant command, Commandership-in-Chief.
Sun Quan also saw that the coffin of his beloved general was sent to Chaisang ready for the funeral sacrifices.
The night of Zhou Yu's death, Zhuge Liang was gazing up at the heavens when he saw a star of a general fall to the earth. “Zhou Yu is dead,” said he with a smile.
At dawn he sent to tell Liu Bei, who sent people to find out, and they came back to say it was true Zhou Yu had died. “Now that this has come to pass, what should we do?” said Liu Bei.
“Lu Su will succeed,” said Zhuge Liang.
“And I see in the heavens signs of an assembly of generals in the southeast, so I shall go there.
The mourning for Zhou Yu will serve as a pretext.
I may find some able leaders there to be of help to you.” “I am afraid lest the generals of the South Land harm you,” said Liu Bei. “While Zhou Yu lived, I did not fear; is there anything to dread now that he is gone?” However, Zhuge Liang took Zhao Yun as commander of his escort when he embarked for Baqiu, and on the road he heard of Lu Su's succession to the late general's post.
As the coffin of Zhou Yu had been sent to Chaisang, Zhuge Liang continued his journey thither and, on landing, was kindly received by Lu Su. The officers of the South Land did not conceal their enmity, but the sight of the redoubtable Zhao Yun, always close at hand, kept them from trying to hurt Zhuge Liang.
The officers brought by Zhuge Liang were arranged in order before the bier, and he himself poured the libation. Then he knelt and read this threnody: “Alas, Zhou Yu! Hapless are you in your early death.
Length of days is in the hands of God, yet do humans suffer and my heart is deeply grieved for you.
I pour this libation that your spirit may enjoy its fragrance. “I lament you.
I lament your younger days passed in the companionship of Sun Ce, when, preferring eternal principles to material wealth, you abode in a humble cottage.
“I lament your ripe strength when you guarded distant Baqiu, putting fear into the heart of Liu Biao, destroying rebels and ensuring safety.
“I lament the grace of your manhood.
Married to a fair maid of the Qiao family, son-in-law of a great minister, you were such as would add luster to the Han Court. “I lament your resolute purpose when you opposed the pledge-giving to Cao Cao.
As in the beginning your wings drooped not, so in the end your pinions spread wide.
“I lament your abandon, when your false friend, Jiang Gan, came to you at Poyang Lake.
There you manifested your lofty ideals.
“I lament your magnificent talents, proved in civil administration as in military science.
With fire attacking the fierce enemy at the Red Cliffs, you brought his strength to weakness.
“I recall you as you were but yesterday, bold and successful, and I weep your untimely death.
Prostrate I weep tears of sorrow.
Loyal and upright in heart, noble and spiritual by nature, your life has been but three decades, but your fame will endure for ages. “I mourn for your affection. My bowels writhe with sorrow, and my deepseated sadness will never cease.
The very heavens are darkened.
The army is sad; your lord sheds tears; your friends weep floods.
“Scanty of ability am I, yet even of me you begged plans and sought schemes to aid the South Land to repulse Cao Cao, to restore the Hans and comfort the Lius.
But with you as the firm corner stone and your perfect dispositions, could the final result cause any anxiety?
“Alas, my friend! The quick and the dead are ever separate; they mingle never.
If in the deep shades spirits have understanding, you now read my inmost heart, yet hereafter there will be none on earth to comprehend.
“Alas, the pain!
“Deign to accept this my sacrifice.” The sacrifice finished, Zhuge Liang bowed to the ground and keened while his tears gushed forth in floods. He was deeply moved.
Those who stood on guard by the bier said one to another, “People lied when they said these two were enemies; look at the sincerity shown in sacrifice.” And Lu Su was particularly affected by the display of feeling and thought, “Plainly Zhuge Liang loved Zhou Yu much, but Zhou Yu was not broadminded enough and would have done Zhuge Liang to death.” Before Sleeping-Dragon emerged from his Nanyang retreat, A brilliant man had descended upon this earth; Since, O Azure Heaven, ye made Zhou Yu, Why needed Yellow Earth produce an Zhuge Liang?
Lu Su gave a banquet for Zhuge Liang after which the guest left.
Just as Zhuge Liang was embarking, his arm was clutched by a person in Taoist dress who said with a smile, “You exasperated literally to death the man whose body lies up there; to come here as a mourner is an open insult to the South Land.
It is as good as to say they have no other left.” At first Zhuge Liang did not recognize the speaker, but very soon he saw it was no other than Pang Tong, or the Blooming-Phoenix.
Then Zhuge Liang laughed in his turn, and they two hand in hand went down into the ship, where they talked heart to heart for a long time.
Before leaving, Zhuge Liang gave his friend a letter and said, “I do not think that Sun Quan will use you as you merit.
If you find life here distasteful, then you may come to Jingzhou and help to support my master.
He is liberal and virtuous and will not disdain what you have spent your life in learning.” Then they parted, and Zhuge Liang went alone to Jingzhou.
Lu Su had the coffin of Zhou Yu taken to Wuhu, where Sun Quan received it with sacrifices and lamentations. The dead leader was buried in his native place.
Zhou Yu's family consisted of two sons and a daughter, the children being named Zhou Xun, Zhou Yin, and Zhou Ying. Sun Quan treated them with generosity and tenderness.
Lu Su was not satisfied that he was the fittest successor to his late chief and said, “Zhou Yu was not right in recommending me, for I have not the requisite ability and am unfitted for this post.
But I can commend to you a certain able man, conversant with all knowledge, and a most capable strategist, not inferior to the old Guan Zhong or Yue Yi, one whose plans are as good as those of Sun Zi and Wu Qi, the most famous masters of the Art of War.
Zhou Yu often took his advice, and Zhuge Liang believes in him.
And he is at hand.” This was good news for Sun Quan, who asked the man's name, and when he heard it was Pang Tong or Blooming-Phoenix, he replied, “Yes; I know him by reputation; let him come.” Whereupon Pang Tong was invited to the Palace and introduced.
The formal salutations over, Sun Quan was disappointed with the man's appearance, which was indeed extraordinary. Pang Tong had bushy eyebrows, a turned-up nose, a dark face, and a stubby beard. So Sun Quan was prejudiced against Pang Tong.
“What have you studied,” asked Sun Quan, “and what are you master of?” Pang Tong replied, “One must not be narrow and obstinate; one must change with circumstances.” “How does your learning compare with that of Zhou Yu?” asked Sun Quan.
“My learning is not to be compared with his in the least; mine is far greater.” Now Sun Quan had always loved his late general, and he could not bear to hear him disparaged. This speech of Pang Tong only increased his dislike.
So he said, “You may retire, Sir; I will send for you when I can employ you.” Pang Tong uttered one long sigh and went away.
When he had gone, Lu Su said, “My lord, why not employ him?” “What good would result; he is just one of those mad fellows.” “He did good service at the Red Cliffs fight, however, for it was he who got Cao Cao to chain his ships together.” “It was simply that Cao Cao wished to chain his ships together. No credit was due to this fellow.
In any case I give you my word that I will not employ him.
That much is certain.” Lu Su went out and explained to Pang Tong that the failure was not due to lack of recommendation, but simply a whim of Sun Quan, and he must put up with it.
The disappointed suitor hung his head and sighed many times without speaking. “I fear you are doomed to constant disappointment here,” said Lu Su. “There is nothing you can hope for, eh?” But still Pang Tong was silent.
“With your wonderful gifts, of course you will be successful whithersoever you may go.
You may take my word for that. But to whom will you go?” “I think I will join Cao Cao,” said Pang Tong suddenly. “That would be hinging a gleaming pearl into darkness. Rather go to Liu Bei, who would appreciate you and employ you fittingly.” “The truth is that I have been thinking of this for a long time,” said Pang Tong. “I was only joking just now.” “I will give you a letter to Liu Bei; and if you go to him, you must try to maintain peace between him and my lord and get them to act together against Cao Cao.” “That has been the one desire of my life.” Pang Tong took the letter offered by Lu Su and soon made his way to Jingzhou City.
He arrived at a moment that Zhuge Liang was absent on an inspection journey, but the doorkeeper announced him and said he had come to throw in his lot with Liu Bei.
He was received, for he was no stranger in name.
When Pang Tong was admitted, he made the ordinary salutation but did not make an obeisance and this, coupled with his ugly face, did not please his host. “You have come a long and arduous journey,” said Liu Bei.
At this point the suitor should have produced his letters from Zhuge Liang and Lu Su, but did not. Instead he replied, “I hear, O Imperial Uncle, that you are welcoming the wise and receiving scholars, wherefore I have come to join your service.” “The country is decently peaceful now, and unfortunately there is no office vacant.
But away to the northeast there is a small magistracy, Leiyang, which needs a chief.
I can offer you that post until there should be something more fitting.” Pang Tong thought this rather poor welcome for a person of his talent. But his friend was absent, so he could do nothing but control his annoyance and accept. He took his leave and started.
But when he arrived at his post, he paid no attention to business at all; he gave himself up entirely to dissipation. The taxes were not collected nor were lawsuits decided.
News of this reaching Liu Bei, who was angry and said, “Here is this stiffnecked pedant throwing my administration into disorder.” So Liu Bei sent Zhang Fei to the county with orders to make a general inspection of the whole county and look into any irregularities and disorders.
But as Liu Bei thought there might be some tact needed, Sun Qian was also sent as coadjutor.
In due course the inquisitors arrived at Leiyang, where they were received by the officials and welcomed by the people at the boundary. But the Magistrate did not appear.
“Where is the Magistrate?” asked Zhang Fei.
“Ever since his arrival, a hundred days ago and more, he has attended to no business, but spends his days from morn to night in wine-bobbing and is always intoxicated.
Just now he is sleeping off a debauch and is not yet risen.” This raised Zhang Fei's choler, and he would have dismissed the offender forthwith had not his colleague said, “Pang Tong is a man of great ability, and it would be wrong to deal with him thus summarily.
Let us inquire into it.
If he is really so guilty, we will punish his offense.” So they went to the magistracy, took their seats in the hail of justice, and summoned the Magistrate before them.
He came with dress all disordered and still under the influence of wine. “My brother took you for a decent person,” said Zhang Fei, angrily, “and sent you here as magistrate.
How dare you throw the affairs of the county into disorder?” “Do you think I have done as you say, General?” said Pang Tong.
“What affairs have I disordered?” “You have been here over a hundred days and spent the whole time in dissipation. Is not that disorderly?” “Where would be the difficulty in dealing with the business of a trifling county like this?
I pray you, General, sit down for a while till I have settled the cases.” Thereupon Pang Tong bade the clerks bring in all the arrears and he would settle them at once.
So they brought in the piles of papers and ordered the suitors to appear. They came and knelt in the hall while the magistrate, brush in hand, noted this and minuted that, all the while listening to the pleadings. Soon all the difficulties and disputes were adjusted, and never a mistake was made, as the satisfied bows of the people proved.
By midday the whole of the cases were disposed of, and the arrears of the hundred days settled and decided. This done, the Magistrate threw aside his pen and turned to the inquisitors, saying, “Where is the disorder?
When I can take on Cao Cao and Sun Quan as easily as I can read this paper, what attention from me is needed for the business of this paltry place?” Zhang Fei was astonished at the man's ability, rose from his seat, and crossed over, saying, “You are indeed a marvel, Master.
I have not treated you respectfully enough, but now I shall commend you to my brother with all my might.” Then Pang Tong drew forth Lu Su's letter and showed it to Zhang Fei.
“Why did you not show this to my brother when you first saw him?” asked Zhang Fei. “If I had had a chance, I would have done so.
But is it likely that one would just take advantage of a letter of commendation to make a visit?” Zhang Fei turned to his colleague and said, “You just saved a wise man for us.” Sun Qian and Zhang Fei left the magistracy and returned to Liu Bei to whom they related what had happened.
Liu Bei then seemed to be conscious of his error and said, “I have been wrong; I have behaved unjustly to a sage.” Zhang Fei then gave his brother the letter in which Lu Su had recommended Pang Tong. Opening it he read:
“Pang Tong is not the sort of person to be met with in any day's march.
Employ him in some capacity where extra ordinary talent is required, and his powers will declare themselves.
Beware of judging him by his looks, or you may lose the advantage of his abilities, and some other will gain him.
This would be a misfortune.” While Liu Bei was feeling cast down at the mistake he had made, as shown by the letter, they announced the return of Zhuge Liang. Soon Zhuge Liang entered the hall, and the first question he put after the formal salutations was:
“Is Directing-Instructor Pang Tong quite well?” “He is in charge of Leiyang,” replied Liu Bei, “where he is given to wine and neglects his business.” Zhuge Liang laughed, saying, “My friend Pang Tong has extraordinary abilities and ten times my knowledge.
I gave him a letter for you, my lord. Did he present it?” “This very day I have received a letter, but from Lu Su.
I have had no letter written by you.” “When a person of transcendent abilities is sent to a paltry post, he always turns to wine out of simple ennui,” said Zhuge Liang.
“If it had not been for what my brother said, I should have lost a great person,” said Liu Bei.
Then he lost no time, but sent Zhang Fei off to the northeast to request Pang Tong to come to Jingzhou City.
When he arrived, Liu Bei went out to meet him and at the foot of the steps asked pardon for his mistake.
Then Pang Tong produced the letter that Zhuge Liang had given him. What Liu Bei read therein was this:
“As soon as the Blooming-Phoenix shall arrive, he should be given an important post.” Liu Bei rejoiced indeed as he read it, and he said, “Water-Mirror said of the two men, Sleeping-Dragon and Blooming-Phoenix, that any man who obtained the help of either of them could restore the empire when he would.
As I now have them both, surely the Hans will rise again.” Then he appointed Pang Tong as Vice Directing Instructor and General, and the two strategists began training the army for its work of subjugation. News of these doings came to the capital, Xuchang, and Cao Cao was told of Liu Bei's two strategists and of the army in training and the stores accumulating and the league between his two chief enemies. And he knew that he had to expect an attack sooner or later.
So he summoned his strategists to a council for a new campaign.
Said Xun Yu, “Sun Quan should be first attacked. because of the recent death of their ablest general Zhou Yu.
Liu Bei will follow.” Cao Cao replied, “If I go on such a distant expedition, Ma Teng will fall upon the capital.
While I was at the Red Cliffs, there were sinister rumors of this, and I must guard against it.” Xun Yu said, “The best thing that occurs to stupid me is to obtain for Ma Teng the title of General Who Subdues the South and send him against the South Land. Thus he can be enticed to the capital and got rid of.
Then you can have no fear of marching southward.” Cao Cao approved, and soon Ma Teng was summoned from Xiliang, a frontier territory in the west.
Ma Teng was a descendant of the famous leader Ma Yuan, General Who Quells the Waves. His father's name was Ma Su.
Ma Su had held a minor magistracy in Tianshui in the reign of Emperor Huan, but had lost it and drifted west into Longxi where he got amongst the Qiang Peoples, one of whose women he took to wife. She bore him a son, Ma Teng.
Ma Teng was rather over the common height, and bold-looking. He was of a mild disposition and very popular.
But in the reign of Emperor Ling, these Qiangs made trouble, and then Ma Teng raised a force and put it down.
For his services he received the tile of General Who Corrects the West. He and Han Sui, who was known as Commander Who Guards the West, were pledged brothers. On receipt of the summons to the capital, Ma Teng took his eldest son, Ma Chao, into his confidence and told him some of his former life. “When Dong Cheng got the Girdle Edict from the Emperor, we formed a society, of which Liu Bei was one, pledged to put down rebellion.
However, we accomplished nothing, for Dong Cheng was put to death and Liu Bei was unfortunate, while I escaped to the west.
However, I hear that Liu Bei now holds Jingzhou, and I am inclined to carry out the plan we made so long ago.
But here I am summoned by Cao Cao and what is to be done?” Ma Chao replied, “Cao Cao has the command of the Emperor to call you; and if you do not go, that will mean disobeying an imperial command and you will be punished.
Obey the summons in so far as to go to the capital, where you may be able to arrange to carry out your original intention.” But Ma Teng's nephew, Ma Dai, held other opinions and opposed this.
Said he, “Cao Cao's designs are unfathomable; and if you go, Uncle, I fear you will suffer.” “Let me lead the army against the capital,” said Ma Chao.
“Can we not purge the empire of evil?” But his father said, “You must take command of the Qiang troops for the defense of our territory here. I will take with me your two brothers and your cousin.
When Cao Cao knows that you have the Qiangs at your call and that Han Sui is prepared to assist, he will hardly dare to work any harm to me.” “Father, if you must go, be careful not to enter the city till you know exactly what plots and machinations are afoot.” “I will certainly take great care, so do not be too anxious,” said the father. The order of march was prepared.
The governor took five thousand troops, with his two sons—Ma Xiu and Ma Tie—as Leaders of the Van and his nephew Ma Dai bringing up the rear. These set out along the tortuous road to the capital.
At seven miles distance from Xuchang they camped.
When Cao Cao heard of Ma Teng's arrival, he called to him Minister Huang Kui and said to him, “Ma Teng is to be sent against the south, and I shall send you as Adviser. You are first to go to his camp and express my congratulations on his arrival and say that as Xiliang is so distant and transport very difficult, he is not to take too large an army of his own.
I will send a large force.
Also tell him to come in soon for audience of the Emperor.
I will send him supplies.” With these instructions Huang Kui went to Ma Teng, who brought out wine and entertained him well.
In his cups the messenger grew confidential and said, “My father perished at the hands of Li Jue and Guo Si, and I have always nourished resentment.
Now there is another rebel in power wronging our Prince.” “Who is that?” asked Ma Teng.
“The wrong doer is that rebel Cao Cao, of course.
Do you mean to say you do not know?” However, Ma Teng was careful.
He thought it very likely that these words were but a trap for him, so he pretended to be greatly shocked and begged his guest to be careful lest he be overheard.
But Huang Kui cared not, shouting, “Then you have quite forgotten the Girdle Edict, eh?” Ma Teng began to see Huang Kui was sincere and presently became confidential in turn and told his guest all his schemes.
“Cao Cao wants you to go in to audience; there is no good intention there.
Do not go,” said Huang Kui.
“You lead your army up close to the city and get Cao Cao to come and review them; and when he comes, assassinate him.” They two settled how this plan could be worked out and the messenger, still hot with anger and excitement, returned to his home.
Seeing Huang Kui so disturbed in mind, his wife, Lady Zhi, asked him what was wrong.
But he would tell her nothing. However, he had a concubine, Li Chunxiang. And it happened that she had an intrigue with the wife's younger brother, Miao Ze, who much desired to marry her. The concubine who also saw her lord's displeasure, spoke of it to her paramour, and he told her she could probably draw from him what was wrong by a leading question. “Ask him what is the truth about two men, Liu Bei and Cao Cao?
Who is the wicked one.” That evening Huang Kui went to the apartments of his concubine, and she presently put the question proposed by her lover.
Her lord, still rather intoxicated, said, “You are a woman; still you know right from wrong as well as I.
My enemy and the man I would slay if I could, is Cao Cao.” “But why?
And if you wish to slay him, why do you not do something?” said she. “I have done something.
I have settled with General Ma Teng to assassinate Cao Cao at the review.” Li Chunxiang of course told her paramour, who told Cao Cao, and Cao Cao made his arrangements to defeat the scheme.
He called up his trusty generals and gave them orders for the morrow and, this done, he arrested Huang Kui and all his household.
Next day, as arranged, Ma Teng and his western troops came close up to the wall, and among the flags and banners he discerned that of the Prime Minister himself, whereby he knew that Cao Cao would hold the review in person.
So Ma Teng rode forward.
Suddenly a bomb exploded, and at this signal there appeared bodies of armed troops in four directions:
right and left, front and rear, led by Xu Chu, Xiahou Yuan, Cao Hong, and Xu Huang. The western forces were quite hemmed in.
Ma Teng then saw the mistake he had made, and he and his two sons fought valiantly to free themselves from the trap.
The youngest son—Ma Tie—soon fell in the volleys of arrows. Father and son rode this way and that, seeking a way out, but failed on every side.
Both were sorely wounded; and when their steeds fell from their many arrow wounds, both were captured.
Ma Teng, Ma Xiu, and the miserable Huang Kui who could not keep his counsel, were brought before Cao Cao.
Huang Kui loudly protested his innocence.
Cao Cao then called in the witness Miao Ze.
“That worthless scoundrel has spoiled all my plans!” cried Ma Teng.
“Now I cannot slay the rebel and purge my country. But it is the will of God.” Father and son were dragged forth, the father uttering volleys of abuse all the time. And so three men were executed in this adventure.
The sons and father share one niche of fame, For purest loyalty their praise the same. To their own hurt the rebels they withstood, Content to die to make their pledges good.
In blood the solemn oath they did indite To slay the wicked and preserve the right.
A worthy father's worthy sons by western bride, Old Waves Queller's name his grandson glorified.
“I desire no other reward than Li Chunxiang as wife,” said the betrayer, Miao Ze.
Cao Cao smiled and said, “For the sake of a woman then you have brought a whole household to death. What advantage would there be in preserving such a miscreant?” So Cao Cao bade the executioners put both the traitor and the woman to death, with Huang Kui's household.
Those who saw the fearful vengeance sighed at its cruelty.
Through passion base a loyal man was slain, And she who shared his passion shared his fate; The man they served was pitiless in hate, And thus a mean man's treachery was vain.
Cao Cao did not desire to rouse the rancor of the army of Xiliang, wherefore he proclaimed to them, “The intended treachery of your leaders was theirs alone.” However, he sent to secure the passes so that Ma Dai should not escape.
As has been said, Ma Dai led the rearguard.
Before long the fugitives from the main army came and told him what had occurred at the capital.
This frightened him so much that he abandoned his army and escaped disguised as a trader.
Having slain Ma Teng, Cao Cao decided to set out on his expedition to the south.
But then came the disquieting news of the military preparations of Liu Bei, whose objective was said to be the west.
This caused him alarm, for, as he said, “The bird's wings will be fully grown if he obtains possession of the Western Land of Rivers.” Cao Cao recognized the difficulty, but from among his counselors there arose one who said, “I know how to prevent Liu Bei and Sun Quan from helping each other, and both the south and the west will be yours.” Chill death struck down the heroes of the west, Calamity approached the bold leaders of the south.
The next chapter will unfold the scheme. CHAPTER 58.
Ma Chao Launches An Expedition For Revenge; Cao Cao Flees The Field In Disguise.
“What is this good plan of yours, friend Chen Qun?” asked Cao Cao of the speaker, who was a civilian in his service.
Chen Qun replied, “Your two principal enemies—Liu Bei and Sun Quan —are now firm allies, close as lips and teeth. But Liu Bei wants the Western Land of Rivers and if you, O Prime Minister, send a mighty host against Sun Quan, Sun Quan must ask help from his friend Liu Bei, who, having his heart set on the west, will refuse it.
Sun Quan without this aid cannot stand and will become so weak that the South Land will be yours for the taking, and Jingzhou will follow in a tap of the drum.
The west will follow and the whole empire is yours.” “Those are my thoughts put into words,” replied Cao Cao.
The expeditionary force of three hundred thousand troops set out for the south. Zhang Liao of Hefei was in command of the supply department.
Sun Quan speedily heard of the move and called in his advisers.
At the council Zhang Zhao said, “Let us send to Lu Su to tell him to write at once to Liu Bei that he may help us.
They are good friends, and Liu Bei will certainly respond favorably.
Beside, since Liu Bei and our lord are now connected by marriage, there is no risk of refusal.
With the support of Liu Bei, there is no danger to our country.” Sun Quan listened to this advice and sent to Lu Su bidding him to ask help from Liu Bei.
Accordingly, on receipt of this command, a letter was written to Liu Bei, who after reading it, retained the messenger at the guest-house till Zhuge Liang could arrive from Nanjun.
As soon as he arrived, Liu Bei showed him the letter.
The adviser said, “It is not necessary for the South Land's troops to move, nor need we send ours. I can prevent Cao Cao from even daring to look in the southeast direction.” So Zhuge Liang wrote a reply telling Lu Su: “You can lay aside all anxiety and rest content, for if the northern army approach, they will be forced backward at once.” The letter was given to the messenger, and then Liu Bei asked his adviser, “How could the Instructor hope to roll back the huge army of three hundred thousand troops that Cao Cao is preparing to bring south?” Zhuge Liang replied, “Cao Cao's chief fear is Xiliang.
Now just lately he has slain Ma Teng and his sons as well, and the people of Xiliang are grinding their teeth with rage.
Now you must write and ask Ma Chao to march through the pass, and Cao Cao will have no leisure to think of any expedition to the south.” The letter was written, sent by a trusty hand, and duly delivered.
Now Ma Chao was in Xiliang. One night he had a vision. In his dream he saw himself lying out on a snowy plain and many tigers were coming up and biting him.
He awoke in a fright and began to wonder what the dream portended. Failing to explain it, he told the dream to his officers.
One of them ventured to say the portent was evil. This was General Pang De.
“What is your interpretation?” asked Ma Chao.
“Meeting with tigers on a snowy plain is a very inauspicious subject to dream about.
Assuredly our old General is in trouble at the capital.” And at that moment one entered in hot haste and cast himself on the earth, weeping and crying, “The Uncle and his sons are dead!” It was Ma Dai, the nephew of Ma Teng. And he told the story of the evil: “Uncle Ma Teng and Huang Kui had planned to assassinate Cao Cao, but the plot had miscarried and become known. Ma Tie fell in the battlefield, Uncle Ma Teng and Ma Xiu were put to death in the market place, and I escaped in disguise.” Ma Chao fell to the ground and wept bitterly, grinding his teeth with rage at his enemy Cao Cao.
They lifted him to his feet and led him away to repose.
Soon after arrived a messenger with a letter from Liu Bei, which read like this:
“In these latter days of the hapless Hans, when the rebellious and tyrannical Cao Cao monopolizes all power, to the injury of the Emperor and the wretchedness of the people, I, Liu Bei, recall that I and your father were recipients of an edict and we swore to exterminate the recreant. Now your father has suffered death at the hands of the tyrant, and you must avenge him.
As the holy books say, you cannot let the same sky cover you nor the same sunshine upon you and your father's murderer.
If you can lead your army to attack Cao Cao on one side, I will march my armies to prevent his retreat, and he will be taken, and all his evil crew can be exterminated. Then and thus will your father be avenged and the Hans can be restored.
I might add more, but I will await your reply.” Wiping his tears, Ma Chao wrote a reply which was returned by the bearer. The Xiliang army was then mustered; horse and foot were assembled.
Just before the day that had been fixed for the start, the Imperial Protector of Xizhou, Han Sui, sent for Ma Chao, to whom he showed a letter from Cao Cao promising the Lordship of Xiliang as a reward for sending Ma Chao a prisoner to the capital.
“Bind us both, Uncle, and send us thither; you need not move a single spear,” said the younger man prostrating himself.
But Han Sui raised him, saying, “Your father and I were sworn brothers; think you I would harm you?
Rather will I help if you are going to fight.” Ma Chao expressed his gratitude. The unhappy bearer of Cao Cao's letter was dragged forth and beheaded. This done, the two took count of their armies.
Han Sui had eight divisions under eight commanders—Yang Qiu, Cheng Yin, Hou Xuan, Liang Xing, Cheng Yi, Li Kan, Ma Wan, and Zhang Heng—all to be relied upon to follow Han Sui.
Ma Chao had two leaders, Pang De and Ma Dai. The total force was two hundred thousand troops with which the commanders march to Changan.
The Governor of that city was Zhong Yao. As soon as he heard what was afoot, he sent a fleet messenger to Cao Cao and prepared for defense.
He led his force out into the open plain and arrayed it for battle.
Ma Dai, with fifteen thousand, came on first, pouring over the countryside like a flood.
Zhong Yao would parley with him, but Ma Dai came forward, sword in hand, to attack.
However, the defender did not take the challenge but turned and fled.
Ma Dai followed in pursuit.
Soon the main body of the invaders arrived, and they surrounded the city, which Zhong Yao set about defending.
Changan had been the capital of the Western Hans and so was well fortified with a solid wall and a deep moat, safe against the most terrific attacks.
The new armies besieged the city for ten days without success.
Then Pang De proposed a plan. Said he, “Since the land about the city is barren and the water bitter, the people must have communication with the country around in order to live. Further they have no fuel.
Ten days of siege must have exhausted the supplies in the city, wherefore if we relax for a time—well, you will see.
We shall capture the city without moving a finger.” “Your plan seems excellent,” said Ma Chao, when he heard what it was.
Thereupon they sent orders to each division to retire, and Ma Chao covered the retreat.
Next day Zhong Yao went up on the walls to look around and saw that the besiegers had gone.
However, suspecting a ruse, he sent out spies, who returned to say the soldiers had really moved away to a distance.
Wherefore he felt much relieved and allowed both soldiers and people to go out into the country to cut the much needed firewood and bring in water. The city gates, thrown wide open, were thronged with those passing in and out.
This continued for five days, and then they heard that Ma Chao's army was returning. A panic ensued. The people rushed into the city, and the gates were once more barred. The General of the west gate was Zhong Jin, brother of Zhong Yao.
About the third watch of the night, a torch was seen moving just inside the gate; and when the General went to see what was wrong, and was passing the gateway, a man suddenly galloped up and slashed at him with a sword. At the same time the attacker shouted, “Here is Pang De!” Zhong Jin was taken aback, could not defend himself and was cut down. The gate guard was soon disposed of, the gates were shattered, and the soldiers of Ma Chao and Han Sui came pouring in.
Zhong Yao escaped by the opposite gate and left the city in the hands of his enemies.
He reached Tong Pass, where he fortified himself and sent news of the misfortune to Cao Cao.
Cao Cao threw aside all plans for his expedition to the south when Changan was lost. He at once gave orders, “Cao Hong and Xu Huang are to march your ten thousand troops to Tong Pass to support Zhong Yao.
You are to hold the Pass at all costs for ten days, or you will pay for its loss with your heads.
After ten days the Pass will be no concern of yours, for I will be there with the main army.” Cao Ren said, “Cao Hong short of temper is unfitted to hold the Pass.
Everything could happen.” Cao Cao replied, “You will go to reinforce him.” Cao Hong and Xu Huang made all haste to Tong Pass and took over the command from Zhong Yao.
They confined themselves to defense; and though Ma Chao appeared every day and reviled and shouted shameful things of the three generations of Cao Cao's family, the guardians of the Pass remained quiet.
But Cao Hong fretted at the daily insults and would have led the defenders out to fight had not his colleague restrained him. “Ma Chao only wishes to provoke you to come out, but remember our orders and go not.
The Prime Minister has some master plan.” So spoke Xu Huang.
But the advice was hard to follow, for Ma Chao's soldiers took turns in reviling the defenders of the Pass, resting neither day nor night.
And Xu Huang found it hard to curb his colleague's impatience.
Thus it continued till the ninth day. Then the defenders saw that their enemies had turned all their horses loose and were lolling about on the grass and sleeping as if quite fatigued.
Thereupon Cao Hong bade them saddle his horse, told off three thousand troops, and soon this small force was dashing down to catch the besiegers unprepared.
The soldiers of Ma Chao at once fled, leaving their steeds and throwing aside their weapons.
Cao Hong could not resist pursuit and chased them.
At this time Xu Huang was higher up the road taking in cartloads of grain and forage; but when he heard what his impulsive colleague had done, he hastily got a force together and went to his rescue. He shouted to Cao Hong to return.
Suddenly a great shouting arose near Xu Huang, and out dashed Ma Dai to attack.
Both Cao Hong and Xu Huang turned to flee, but the drums rolled and two bodies of troops led by Ma Chao and Pang De came out from behind the hills. Then a battle began which went against Cao Cao's troops from the first. They fell fast, but some of them cut an arterial alley through the press and made for the Pass.
Their enemies flooded into the Pass in close pursuit, and they had to abandon their post and flee whither they could find a way.
Pang De pursued after Cao Hong, but Cao Ren came to his rescue and they both fled.
Ma Chao and Pang De took the Pass.
Cao Hong made all haste to his master to give him the evil tidings.
“When I gave you the limit of ten days, why did you leave the Pass on the ninth?” “Those soldiers from Xiliang hurled every sort of insult at us,” replied Cao Hong. “And when I thought I had them unprepared, I took the opportunity. But I fell victim to their cunning.” “You are young and impetuous.
But, Xu Huang, you ought to have known.” Xu Huang said, “He would not listen, though I told him many times.
And that day I was taking in stores in another part of the Pass.
As soon as they told me, I felt sure there would be some misfortune, and so I hastened after him, but it was too late.” Cao Cao was annoyed and ordered Cao Hong to be put to death.
But his brother officers begged that he might be pardoned, and as he had confessed his fault, he was allowed to go free and unpunished.
Cao Cao advanced to Tong Pass.
Cao Ren said, “We should establish a strong stockade before attacking.” So trees were felled and a strong stockade built.
They made three camps: Cao Ren was in the left; Xiahou Yuan, the right; and Cao Cao himself was in the center one.
Soon after, Cao Cao and all his officers in a body rushed to attack the Pass.
They ran against the Xiliang troops posted on two sides, halted and formed their array. This done, Cao Cao rode to the center standard whence he looked at his opponents.
He saw before him a body of fine troops, every one with the bearing of a hero.
And the leader, Ma Chao, was worthy of them, with his vivid face as if powdered and red lips as if colored, his supple hips and broad shoulders, his deep voice and fierce strength. He was wearing silver helmet and armor and gripping a long spear as he sat there on his charger.
Pang De and Ma Dai supported him, and Cao Cao admired Ma Chao in his secret heart.
However, Cao Cao urged forward his steed and shouted to Ma Chao, “Why are you arrayed against the Hans, whom your father and grandfather served faithfully?” Ma Chao ground his teeth and cursed Cao Cao, “Rebel! Betrayer of both prince and people!
Murderer of my father and brothers! My hate for you is to the death:
the same sky shall not continue to cover us, for I will take you captive and satiate my appetite on your living flesh.” With this he set his spear and rode over toward Cao Cao as if to slay him. But Yu Jin came out from behind and engaged Ma Chao in battle.
These two fought some half score bouts, and then Yu Jin had to flee.
Zhang He, however, took his place and the two warriors exchanged twenty passes. Then Zhang He, too, ran away. Next to come forth was Li Tong.
Ma Chao's martial prowess was now at its height, and he made short work of Li Tong, who went out of the saddle at the first blow.
Then Ma Chao flourished his spear at the troops behind him as a signal for them to come on, which they did like a flood.
They overwhelmed Cao Cao's forces, and Ma Chao, Pang De, and Ma Dai rode forward to try to capture Cao Cao. They came close.
Cao Cao heard one of his pursuers shout to another, “Cao Cao is he in the red dress!” So he hastily tore off his red robe and threw it away.
He also heard one say “Cao Cao is he with the long beard!” At once Cao Cao took the sword that he wore at his side and sawed off some of the beard.
Yet again a soldier recognized him and told Ma Chao that Cao Cao had now cut his beard, whereupon the order went forth to capture short beards.
And then Cao Cao wrapped the corner of a flag about neck and jowl and fled.
Panic seized upon the soldiers at Tong Pass; Frightened, Cao Cao flung off his brocade robe And, terror-stricken, sawed his beard off with a sword. The fame of Ma Chao rose even to the sky.
Cao Cao had got clear of the battle and was getting calmer. Then again the sound of hoofs fell upon his ears; and on looking round, he perceived Ma Chao quite close.
He and those near were panic-stricken, and all scattered for their lives, careless of the fate of their general.
“Cao Cao, do not flee!” cried Ma Chao coming nearer.
The whip dropped from Cao Cao's nerveless hand as he saw his enemy coming closer and closer.
But just as Ma Chao had leveled his spear for a thrust, Cao Cao slipped behind a tree, changed the direction of his flight and so escaped, while Ma Chao struck the tree.
He quickly pulled out his spear, but the delay gave the fugitive an advantage, although it did not quite free him from pursuit, for Ma Chao was soon again galloping on his track.
As they drew near the slope of some hills, a bold general suddenly appeared, who cried, “Do not hurt my lord!” This was Cao Hong, and he went toward Ma Chao, whirling his sword.
Ma Chao was stopped, and this saved Cao Cao's life.
Cao Hong and Ma Chao fought half a hundred bouts till Cao Hong began to grow weary and become uncertain of his strokes.
And when, shortly after, Xiahou Yuan appeared with some thirty horsemen, Ma Chao found it prudent to retire.
Then Cao Cao was escorted to his camp defended by Cao Ren. He found the camps were still unharmed and the losses had not been great.
As he sat in his tent, Cao Cao said, “Had I not spared Cao Hong, I should have fallen at the hands of Ma Chao today.” So he called in his rescuer and rewarded him well.
And they got together the scattered troops and strengthened the camp, deepening the moat and raising the rampart.
Ma Chao came daily and challenged any one to combat and abused them all shamefully, but, by the order of the Prime Minister, these insults were treated with silent contempt.
“Our enemies use long spears,” said the officers.
“We will meet them with bows and crossbows.” “They may have long spears,” replied Cao Cao, “but whether I give battle or not depends on my decision. How can they thrust at us if we do not go out?
All you have to do is to take no notice of them, and they will speedily retire.” The officers wondered.
They said one to another, “The Prime Minister came out on this expedition of his own will and was foremost in the fight; why does he accept defeat so easily?” After some days the spies reported:
“Ma Chao has been reinforced by twenty thousand Qiangs, the tribespeople beyond the frontier.” Cao Cao took the news gleefully.
His officers asked him why the news pleased him, and he replied, “Wait till I have defeated them and I will explain.” Three days later there was a report of further reinforcements, and Cao Cao not only smiled but gave a banquet.
His officers ridiculed him in secret.
Then said Cao Cao, “You gentlemen laugh because I cannot destroy Ma Chao.
Well then, can any one of you propose a plan?” Then rose Xu Huang and said, “O Prime Minister, you have a large force here, and the enemy are strongly posted beyond the Pass. This means that on the west side of River Wei they are unprepared.
If you can get an army secretly across the river and block the ferry, you will cut off their retreat; and if you can smite them on the north side of the river, they can get no reinforcements and must fail.” “What you propose is just what I think,” said Cao Cao.
So Xu Huang was placed over four thousand troops, and with Zhu Ling, marched to the west of River Wei and hid in the gullies. They were to wait till Cao Cao crossed the river to the north so that both could strike together.
Then Cao Cao ordered Cao Hong to prepare boats and rafts at the Reed Ferry. Cao Ren was left in command of the camps.
Cao Cao himself crossed River Wei, and when Ma Chao heard of the new military movements, he said, “I understand.
The Pass is left, rafts are being prepared; that means that he is going to cross to the north side and cut off my retreat.
I must coast along the river and keep him off. If I can do that, his food will run short within twenty days, and that will cause a mutiny. I will travel along the south bank and attack.” Han Sui did not approve this plan.
He quoted the military maxim to strike when troops were half over the river. “Attack from the south bank when his army is in the act of crossing, and his army will be drowned in the river,” said he.
“Uncle, your words are good,” replied Ma Chao.
And the spies went forth to find out the time of crossing the river.
When Cao Cao's preparations were complete and all was ready, he sent three parties of soldiers over the river first.
They reached the ferry at the first sign of dawn, and the veterans were sent over first and lay out a camp.
Cao Cao and his guard took up station on the south bank to watch the crossing.
Very soon the sentinels reported, “A general dressed all in white is approaching.” Everyone knew it must be Ma Chao. This terrified them and they made a rush to get into the boats.
The river bank became a scene of shouting men struggling who could first embark.
Cao Cao sat watching and never stirred. He only issued orders to stop the confusion. Meanwhile, the yelling of the troops and the neighing of the horses of the approaching army came nearer and nearer.
Suddenly a general jumped out of one of the boats and shouted to Cao Cao: “The rebels are close!
Get into a boat, O Prime Minister.” “The rebels are near; why not?” replied Cao Cao simply to the speaker, who was Xu Chu.
And he turned round to look at them. As a fact Ma Chao was very close, not a hundred paces away, and Xu Chu laid hold of Cao Cao and dragged him down the bank. The boat had already pushed off and was ten spans from the bank, but Xu Chu took Cao Cao on his back and leaped on board.
The boat was small and in danger of being overturned, wherefore Xu Chu drew his sword and chopped away at the hands clinging to the side so that the soldiers fell back into the water.
The boat went down stream, Xu Chu standing in the prow poling as hard as he could.
His master crouched out of sight at his feet.
When Ma Chao saw tile boat in midstream drifting down with the current, he took his bow and arrows and began to shoot. He also ordered his brave generals to go along the river and shoot so that a shower of arrows fell about the boat.
Xu Chu fearing Cao Cao would be wounded, protected him with a saddle which he held over him with his left hand, for Ma Chao's shooting was not in vain.
Many of the soldiers working the boat were wounded. Some had fallen overboard, while more lay in the bottom of the boat.
The boat itself got out of control and was whirled hither and thither by the current.
Xu Chu straddled over the tiller and tried thus to guide the boat while he poled with one hand and with the other held the protecting saddle over Cao Cao's head.
Then the Magistrate of Weinan, Ding Fei, who from a hill top saw that Cao Cao was very closely pressed, even in danger of his life, drove out from his camp all the cattle and horses there, so that they scattered over the hillside. This was too much for the born Qiang herdsmen of the plains. At sight of the beasts, they left the river and ran off to secure the cattle. Nor had they any inclination to pursue their enemy.
And so Cao Cao escaped.
As soon as they reached the northern shore, the boat was scuttled.
The rumor had spread that Cao Cao was on the river and in danger, so all his officers came to his aid. But he was now safe on shore.
Xu Chu's double armor was stuck full of arrows.
The officers escorted Cao Cao to the camp where they made their obeisance and expressed the hope that he had not suffered seriously.
“The rebels very nearly caught me today,” said he smiling.
“They would have got across the river had they not been enticed away by the freeing of the cattle and horses.” said Xu Chu.
“Who was it that drew them off?” said Cao Cao.
Some one who knew told him.
Before long Magistrate Ding Fei came in to pay his respects, and Cao Cao thanked him.
“I should have been a prisoner but for your happy thought,” said he.
And the Magistrate received a rank of Commander in the army. “Though they have gone, yet they will assuredly return tomorrow,” said Ding Fei.
“You must prepare to repel them.” “My preparations are all made,” was the reply.
Cao Cao ordered his generals to spread themselves along the river bank and throw up mounds as shelters for camps. If they saw the enemy approaching, the soldiers were to be withdrawn from behind the mounds, leaving the ensigns all flying, so as to give the impression that each camp contained a garrison.
Along the river they were to dig ditches and put up sheds, thus to entice the enemy there and their army would stumble into the pits and fall easy victims.
Ma Chao returned to Han Sui and told him, saying, “I would have captured Cao Cao, but a certain bold general had taken him on his back and leaped with him into a boat.” Han Sui replied, “I have heard that Cao Cao had a body guard of the bravest and strongest soldiers under the command of Dian Wei and Xu Chu. They are called the Tiger Guards.
Now as Dian Wei is dead, the man you saw must have been Xu Chu.
He is both brave and powerful and goes by the name of Tiger-Lust.
You will do well to avoid him.” “I know his name, too,” said Ma Chao. “Cao Cao now means to attack our rear;” continued Han Sui, “let us attack first, before he can establish camps and stockades.
If once he can do that, it will be difficult to dislodge him.” “My idea is that we should hold the north bank and prevent him from crossing.” “Worthy nephew, keep guard here while I go along the bank of the river and fight Cao Cao.” “If you will take Pang De as your van leader, I am content,” said Ma Chao.
So Han Sui and Pang De, with fifty thousand troops, went away down to the River Wei, while Cao Cao again warned his generals to entice the enemy.
Pang De was in advance with a goodly squadron of iron-clad horsemen, and they burst along at full speed.
Then there arose a confused shouting as they all went plunging into the ditches prepared for them.
Pang De soon leaped out, gained the level ground, and laid about him with all his might. He slew many Cao Cao's soldiers and presently got out of the thick of the fight.
But Han Sui had also been involved, and Pang De went afoot to try to aid him.
On the way he met Cao Yong, a general of Cao Ren. Pang De cut Cao Yong down. Then mounting the dead man's steed, he rode forward fiercely, slaying as he passed. He reached his leader whom he led away southeast.
The troops of Cao Cao pursued him, but Ma Chao came with reinforcements and drove them off.
He rescued a great number, and they continued fighting till evening when they withdrew and mustered their troops.
Two commanders, Cheng Yin and Zhang Heng, were missing, and a couple of hundred soldiers had been killed when they fell into the pits. Ma Chao and Han Sui discussed what should next be done. “If we give the enemy time, he will make himself strong on the north bank.
I think we can do no better than to raid his camp tonight,” said Ma Chao. “We must have a force and supports for it,” said Han Sui.
So it was decided that Ma Chao should lead the striking force with Pang De and Ma Dai as supports. They would start at nightfall.
Now Cao Cao's troops were on the north bank of the River Wei, and he gave his generals orders, saying, “The rebels will try to surprise us as they are deceived by my not having set up stockades.
You will place your soldiers in ambush.
At the bomb signal, you will rush out from four directions to capture them.” At nightfall Ma Chao sent out a small scouting party headed by Cheng Yi. Seeing nothing, Cheng Yi penetrated deep into the enemy's lines. Presently, a bomb was exploded.
Out leapt the hidden troops, and in a few moments the whole scouting party were killed.
Cheng Yi was cut down by the blade of Xiahou Yuan.
But close at hand came the main army led by Ma Chao, Ma Dai, and Pang De that rushed into the ambush forces. Wait for the foe all undismayed. Place your men in ambuscade.
Generals striving to outvie Are not beaten easily. Who got the advantage will presently be told.
CHAPTER 59.
Xu Chu Strips For A Fight With Ma Chao; Cao Cao Writes A Letter To Sow Dissension.
The fight narrated in the last chapter lasted till morn when each side drew off, Ma Chao camping on the River Wei, whence he kept up harassing attacks both day and night.
Cao Cao, also camped in the bed of the same river, began to construct three floating bridges out of his rafts and boats so as to facilitate communication with the south bank.
Cao Ren established a camp on the river, which he barricaded with his carts and wagons.
Ma Chao determined to destroy this camp, so his troops collected straw and each man marched with a bundle and took fire with him. Han Sui's forces were to fight. While one party attacked, the other party piled up the straw, which they lit, and soon there was a fierce fire all around.
The defenders could do nothing against it, so they abandoned the camp and ran away.
All the transport and bridges were destroyed.
It was a great victory for the Xiliang army and gave them the command of the River Wei.
Cao Cao was sad at the failure to make good his strong camp and fearful of his defenselessness. Then Xun You proposed a mud wall.
So three thousand soldiers were set to build a mud rampart. The enemy seeing this harassed the workmen with perpetual attacks at different points so that the work went slowly.
Beside, the soil was very sandy, and the wall would not stand but collapsed as fast as it was built. Cao Cao felt helpless.
It was the ninth month of the sixteenth year of Rebuilt Tranquillity , and the fierce cold of winter was just coming on. Ominous clouds covered the sky day after day with never a break.
One day as Cao Cao sat in his tent, very disheartened, a stranger was announced and was led in.
He was an old man who said he had a suggestion to offer.
He was tall, as delicate as a crane and as refined as a pine tree.
He gave his name as Lou Zibo and said he came from Jingzhao. He was a recluse and a Taoist, his religious name being Plum-Blossom Dreamer.
Cao Cao received him with great courtesy, and presently the venerable one began, saying, “O Prime Minister, you have long been striving to make a camp on the river.
Now is your opportunity; why not begin?” “The soil is too sandy to stand,” said Cao Cao.
“But if you have some other plan to propose, pray tell me what it is, O Hermit.” “You are more than human, O Prime Minister, in the art of war, and you surely know the times and seasons.
It has been overcast for many days, and these clouds foretell a north wind and intense cold.
When the wind begins to blow, you should hurry your army to carry up the earth and sprinkle it with water. By dawn your wall will be complete.” Cao Cao seized upon the suggestion.
He offered his aged visitor a reward, but the venerable one would receive nothing.
That night the wind came down in full force.
Every man possible was set to earth-carrying and wetting.
As they had no other means of carrying water, they made stuff bags which they filled with water and let out the water over the earth.
And so as they piled the earth, they froze it solid with water, and by dawn the wall was finished and stood firm.
When his scouts told Ma Chao that the enemy had built a wall, he rode out and saw it.
Ma Chao was greatly perplexed and began to suspect help from the gods.
However, very soon after, he got his whole army together and sounded an attack.
Cao Cao himself rode out of the camp, with only the redoubtable Xu Chu in attendance, and advanced toward the enemy.
Flourishing his whip he called out, “I, Cao Cao, am here alone, and I beg Ma Chao to come out to parley with me.” Thereupon Ma Chao rode out, his spear set ready to thrust.
“You despised me because I had no wall to my camp, but lo! in one single night, God has made me a wall.
Do you not think it time to give in?” Ma Chao was so enraged that he almost rushed at Cao Cao, but he was not too angry to notice the henchman behind him, glaring in angry fashion, who held a gleaming sword in his grip. Ma Chao thought this man could be no other than Xu Chu, so he determined to find out.
With a flourish of his whip, he said, “Where is the noble 'Marquis Tiger' that I hear you have in your camp?” At this Xu Chu lifted his sword and roared, “I am Xu Chu of Qiao!” From Xu Chu's eyes shot gleams of supernatural light and his attitude was so terror-striking that Ma Chao dared not move.
He turned his steed and retired.
Cao Cao and his doughty follower returned to their camp; and as they two passed between the armies, not a man there but felt a quiver of fear.
“They know our friend Xu Chu over there as Marquis Tiger,” said Cao Cao when he returned.
And thereafter the soldiers all called Xu Chu by that name. “I will capture that fellow Ma Chao tomorrow,” said Xu Chu.
“Ma Chao is very bold,” said his master.
“Be careful!” “I swear to fight him to the death,” said Xu Chu.
Then Xu Chu sent a written challenge to his enemy saying that the Marquis Tiger challenged Ma Chao to a decisive duel on the morrow. Ma Chao was very angry when he received the letter.
“Dare he insult me so?” cried he.
Then he wrote his pledge to slay TigerLust on the morrow.
Next day both armies moved out and arrayed in order of battle.
Ma Chao gave Pang De and Ma Dai command of the two wings, while Han Sui took the center.
Ma Chao took up his station in front of the center and shouted, “Where is the Tiger-Lust?” Cao Cao, who was on horseback by the standard, turned and said, “Ma Chao is no less bold than Lu Bu!” As he spoke, Xu Chu rode forth whirling his sword and the duel began.
They fought over a hundred bouts, and neither had the advantage.
But then, their steeds being spent with galloping to and fro, each retired within his own lines and obtained a fresh mount.
The contest was renewed, and a hundred more encounters took place, still without victory to either.
Suddenly Xu Chu galloped back to his own side, stripped off his armor, showing his magnificent muscles and, naked as he was, leaped again into the saddle and rode out to continue the battle. Again the champions engaged, while both armies stood aghast.
Thirty bouts more, and Xu Chu, summoning up all his force, plunged toward Ma Chao with his sword held high to strike.
But Ma Chao avoided the stroke and rode in with his spear pointing directly at his opponent's heart.
Throwing down his sword, Xu Chu dashed aside the spear, which passed underneath his arm.
Then ensued a struggle for the spear, and Xu Chu by a mighty effort snapped the shaft so that each held one half. Then the duel was continued, each be laboring the other with the pieces of the broken spear.
At this point Cao Cao began to fear for his champion and so ordered two of his generals, Xiahou Yuan and Cao Hong, to go out and take a hand.
At this Pang De and Ma Dai gave the signal to their armored horsemen to attack.
They rode in, and a melee began in which Cao Cao's troops were worsted, and the great champion Xu Chu received two arrow wounds in the shoulder.
So the troops of Cao Cao retreated to their stockade, Ma Chao following them to the river.
Cao Cao's army lost more than half their number.
Cao Cao barred his gates and allowed none to go out.
Ma Chao went down to the river. When he saw Han Sui, he said, “I have seen some wicked fighters, but none to match that Xu Chu.
He is aptly nicknamed Tiger-Lust” Thinking that by strategy he might get the better of Ma Chao, Cao Cao secretly sent two bodies of troops across the river to take up position so that he might attack in front and rear.
One day from his ramparts, Cao Cao saw Ma Chao and a few horsemen ride close up to the walls and then gallop to and fro like the wind.
After gazing at them for a long time, Cao Cao tore off his helmet and dashed it on the ground, saying, “If that Ma Chao is not killed, may I never know my place of burial!” Xiahou Yuan heard his master, and his heart burned within him.
He cried, “May I die here at once if I do not destroy that rebel!” Without more ado, Xiahou Yuan flung open the gates and rode out with his company.
Cao Cao tried to stop this mad rush, but it was no good; so, fearing Xiahou Yuan might come to grief, Cao Cao rode out after him.
At sight of the soldiers of Cao Cao, Ma Chao faced his troops about, extended them in line and, as the enemy approached, dashed forward to the attack.
Then noticing Cao Cao himself among them, Ma Chao left Xiahou Yuan and rode straight for Cao Cao.
Panic seized Cao Cao and he rode for his life, while his troops were thrown into confusion. It was during the pursuit of this portion of the Cao Cao's army that Ma Chao was told of a force of the enemy on the west of River Wei. Realizing the danger, he abandoned the pursuit, called in his forces, and went to his own camp, there to consult with Han Sui. “What now? Cao Cao has went to the west of the river, and we can be attacked in the rear,” said Ma Chao.
Commander Li Kan said, “Then you would better come to an agreement, sacrifice some territory, and make peace. Then both can repose through the winter and await the changes and chances that may come with the spring warmth.” “He is wise,” said Han Sui, “and I advise the same.” But Ma Chao hesitated. Others exhorted him to make peace, and at length he agreed.
So Yang Qiu and Hou Xuan were sent as messengers of peace to the camp of Cao Cao.
“You may return; I will send my reply,” said Cao Cao when they had declared the purport of their mission.
And they left.
Then Jia Xu said to Cao Cao, “What is your opinion, O Prime Minister?” “What is yours?” asked Cao Cao.
“War allows deceit, therefore pretend to agree.
Then we can try some means of sowing suspicions between Han Sui and Ma Chao so that we may thereby destroy both.” Cao Cao clapped his hands for very joy, saying, “That is the best idea of all! Most suitable!
You and I agree in our ideas; I was just thinking of that.” So an answer was returned:
“Let me gradually withdraw my soldiers, and I will give back the land belonging to you on the west of the river.” And at the same time Cao Cao ordered the construction of a floating bridge to help in the withdrawal.
When the reply arrived, Ma Chao said to Han Sui, “Although he agrees to peace, yet he is evil and crafty.
We must remain prepared against his machinations.
Uncle, you and I will take turns in watching Cao Cao and Xu Huang on alternate days.
So shall we be safe against his treachery.” They agreed and began the regular alternate watch.
Soon Cao Cao got to know what they were doing, and he turned to Jia Xu, saying, “I am succeeding.” “Who keeps the look-out on this side tomorrow?” asked Cao Cao.
“Han Sui,” replied some one.
Next day Cao Cao at the head of a large party of his generals rode out of the camp, and the officers presently spread out right and left, he himself remaining a solitary rider visible in the center.
Han Sui did not know that Cao Cao had come out.
Presently Cao Cao called out, “Do any of you soldiers want to see Cao Cao? Here I am quite alone.
I have not four eyes nor a couple of mouths, but I am very knowing.” The soldiers turned pale with fright.
Then Cao Cao called up a man and told him to go and see Han Sui and say, “Sir, the Prime Minister humbly asks you to come and confer with him.” Thereupon Han Sui went out, and seeing Cao Cao wore no armor, Han Sui also threw off his and rode out clad in a light robe.
Each rode up to the other till their horse's heads nearly touched and there they stood talking.
Said Cao Cao, “Your father and I were granted filial degrees at the same time, and I used to treat him as an uncle.
You and I set out on our careers at the same time, too, and yet we have not met for years.
How old may you be now?” “I am forty,” replied Han Sui.
“In those old days in the capital, we were both very young and never thought about middle age.
If we could only restore tranquillity to the state, that would be a matter of rejoicing.” After that they chatted long about old times, but neither said a word on military matters.
They gossiped for a couple of hours before they took leave of each other.
It was not long before some one told Ma Chao of this meeting, and he went over to his ally to ask about it.
“What was it Cao Cao came out to discuss today ?” said Ma Chao. “He just recalled the old days when we were together in the capital.” “Did he say nothing about military matters?” “Not a word; and I could not talk about them alone.” Ma Chao went out without a word, but he felt suspicious.
When Cao Cao returned to his camp, he said to Jia Xu, “Do you know why I talked with him thus publicly?” “It may be an excellent idea,” said Jia Xu, “but it is not sufficient simply to estrange two people.
I can improve on it, and we will make them quarrel and even kill each other.” “What is your scheme?” “Ma Chao is brave but not very astute.
You write a letter with your own hand to Han Sui himself and put in it some rambling statements about some harm that is going to happen. Then blot it out and write something else. Afterwards you will send it to Han Sui, taking care that Ma Chao shall know all about it. Ma Chao will demand to read the letter, and when he sees that the important part of the letter has been changed, he will think that Han Sui has made the changes lest his secrets should leak out.
This will fit into the private talk you had with Han Sui the other day, and the suspicion will grow until it has brought about trouble.
I can also secretly corrupt some of Han Sui's subordinates, and get them to widen the breach and we can settle Ma Chao.” “The scheme looks excellent,” said Cao Cao.
And he wrote the letter as suggested, and then erased and changed it, after which he sealed it securely and sent it across to Han Sui.
Surely enough some one told Ma Chao about the letter, which increased his doubts, and he came to Han Sui's quarters to ask to see it.
Han Sui gave it to him, and the erasures and alterations struck Ma Chao at once. “Why are all these alterations here?” asked he.
“It came like that; I do not know.” “Does any one send a rough draft like this?
It seems to me, Uncle, that you are afraid I shall know something or other too well, and so you have changed the wording.” “It must be that Cao Cao has sealed up the rough draft by mistake.” “I do not think so.
He is a careful man and would not make such a mistake.
You and I, Uncle, have been allies in trying to slay the rebel; why are you turning against me now ?” “If you doubt my word, I will tell you what you can do.
Tomorrow, in full view of the army, I will get Cao Cao to come out and talk.
You can hide in behind the ranks ready to kill me if I am false.” “That being so, I shall know that you are true, Uncle.” This arrangement made, next day Han Sui with five generals in his train— Li Kan, Ma Wan, Yang Qiu, Hou Xuan, and Liang Xing—rode to the front, while Ma Chao concealed himself behind the great standard.
Han Sui sent over to say that he wished to speak to the Prime Minister.
Thereupon at his command, Cao Hong, with a train of ten horsemen rode out, advanced straight to Han Sui, leaned over to him and said, loudly enough to be heard plainly, “Last night the Prime Minister quite understood.
Let there be no mistake.” Then without another word on either side Cao Hong rode away. Ma Chao had heard.
He gripped his spear and started galloping out to slay his companion in arms.
But the five generals checked him and begged him to go back to camp.
When Han Sui saw him, he said, “Nephew, trust me, really I have no evil intentions.” But Ma Chao, burning with rage, went away.
Then Han Sui talked over the matter with his five generals. “How can this be cleared up?” “Ma Chao trusts too much to his strength,” said Yang Qiu.
“He is always inclined to despise you, Sir. If we overcome Cao Cao, do you think he will give way to you?
I think you should rather take care of your own interests, go over to the Prime Minister's side, and you will surely get rank one day.” “I was his father's pledged brother and could not bear to desert him,” said Han Sui. “It seems to me that as things have come to this pass: you simply have to now.” “Who would act as go-between?” asked Han Sui.
“I will,” said Yang Qiu.
Then Han Sui wrote a private letter which he confided to Yang Qiu, who soon found his way over to the other camp.
Cao Cao was only too pleased, and he promised that Han Sui should be made Lord of Xiliang and Yang Qiu its Governor.
The other confederates should be rewarded in other ways. Then a plot was planned:
when the preparations for the act of treachery were complete, a bonfire was to be lighted in Han Sui's camp, and all would try to do away with Ma Chao.
Yang Qiu went back and related all this to his chief, and Han Sui felt elated at the success of his overtures. A lot of wood was collected in camp at the back of his tent ready for the signal blaze, and the five generals got ready for the foul deed. It was decided that Ma Chao should be persuaded into coming to a banquet, and there they would slay him then. All this was done, but not without some hesitation and delay, and some news of the plot reached Ma Chao. He found out the careful preparations that had been made and resolved to act first.
Leaving Ma Dai and Pang De in reserve, he chose a few trusted leaders and with stealthy steps made his way into Han Sui's tent.
There he found Han Sui and his five confederates deep in conversation. He just caught a word or two that Yang Qiu said, “We must not delay, now is the time.” In burst Ma Chao raging and yelling, “You herd of rebels!
Would you dare to plot against me?” They were taken aback. Ma Chao sprang at Han Sui and slashed at his face.
Han Sui put up his hand to ward off the blow, and it was cut off.
The five drew their swords and set on Ma Chao and his men who rushed outside.
Soon Ma Chao was hemmed in by the five, but he kept them at bay by wonderful swordsmanship.
And as the swords flashed, the red blood flowed. Soon Ma Wan was down and Liang Xing disabled; then the other three fled.
Ma Chao ran back into the tent to finish Han Sui, but the servants had removed him.
Then a torch was lit, and soon there was commotion all through the camp.
Ma Chao mounted his horse, for Pang De and Ma Dai had now arrived, and the real fight began.
Cao Cao's troops poured in from all sides, and the Xiliang soldiers fought with each other.
Losing sight of his companions, Ma Chao and a few of his followers got to the head of the floating bridge over the River Wei just about dawn.
There he fell across Li Kan coming over the bridge. Ma Chao set his spear and rode at him full tilt.
Li Kan let go his spear and fled.
Lucky for him, it seemed at first that Yu Jin came up in pursuit.
But unable to get near enough to seize Ma Chao, Yu Jin sent an arrow flying after him.
Ma Chao's ear caught the twang of the bowstring, and he dodged the arrow, which flew on and killed Li Kan.
Ma Chao turned to attack his pursuer, who galloped away, and then he returned and took possession of the bridge.
Quickly Cao Cao's troops gathered about him, and the fiercest among them, the Tiger Guards, shot arrows at Ma Chao, which he warded off with his spear shaft so that they fell harmless to the earth. Ma Chao and his troops rode to and fro striking a blow wherever there was a chance, but the enemy were very thick about him, and he could not force his way out. In desperation he cut an arterial alley northwards and got through, but quite alone. Of his followers everyone fell.
Still he kept on dashing this way and that, till he was brought down by a crossbow bolt.
He lay upon the ground and his enemies were pressing in.
But at the critical moment, an army came in from the northwest and rescued him.
Pang De and Ma Dai had come up in the very nick of time. Thus Ma Chao was rescued, and they set him on one of the soldiers' horses, and he again took up the battle. Leaving a trail of blood in his rear, he got away northwest.
Hearing that his enemy had got away, Cao Cao gave order to his generals, “Pursue him day and night, and rich rewards are for him dead or alive.
For his head the rewards are a thousand ounces of gold and the lordship of a fief of ten thousand families.
If any one captures Ma Chao, the reward is the rank of general.” Consequently the pursuit was hot as every one was anxious to win renown and reward.
Meanwhile careless of all but flight, Ma Chao galloped on, and one by one his followers dropped by the way.
The footmen who were unable to keep up were captured till very few remained, and only some scores of riders were left. They traveled toward Lintao, a city in Longxi.
Cao Cao in person joined the pursuit and got to Anding, but there Ma Chao was still far in advance, so he gave up and returned. Gradually the generals did the same, all coming back to Changan.
Poor Han Sui, with the loss of his left hand, was an invalid, but he was rewarded with the Lordship of Xiliang.
Yang Qiu and Hou Xuan were given noble ranks and offices in Weikou.
Then orders were given to lead the whole army back to the capital.
Yang Fu, a military adviser from Liangzhou, came to Changan to point out the danger of withdrawal.
“Ma Chao has the boldness of Lu Bu and the heart of a barbarian.
Unless you destroy him this time, he will come again and he will be both bolder and stronger, and the whole west will be lost.
Wherefore you should not with draw your army.” Cao Cao said, “I would be quite willing to finish the subjugation, but there is much to do in the capital and the south is still to conquer. So I cannot remain.
But you, Sir, might secure this country for me. Do you consents” Yang Fu did consent.
And he brought to Cao Cao's notice Wei Kang, who was made Imperial Protector of Liangzhou, with joint military powers.
Just before Yang Fu left, he said to Cao Cao, “A strong force ought to be left in Changan, as a reserve in case they be required.” “That has been already dealt with,” replied Cao Cao.
Contentedly enough Yang Fu took leave and went away. Cao Cao's generals asked him to explain his recent policy, saying, “Since the first outbreak at Tong Pass, O Prime Minister, the north bank of River Wei was undefended. Why did you not cross to the north bank from the east of the river?
But instead you engaged in the attack of the Pass for many days before crossing to the north bank.” And he replied, “The rebels first held the Pass. Had I forthwith taken the east of the river, the rebels would have defended the camps one by one and mustered at all the ferries, and I should never have got across the river to the north bank.
So I massed troops against Tong Pass and made the rebels guard the south bank so that the west of the river was left open. Thus Xu Huang and Zhu Ling could move there, and I was able later to cross over to the north.
Then I made the raised road and the mud rampart to deceive the enemy and cause them to think I was weak and thus embolden them up to the point of attacking without proper preparation.
Then I used the clever device of causing dissension in their ranks and was able in one day to destroy the stored up energy of all their forces.
'It was a thunder clap before you could cover your ears.' Yes indeed; the mutations of the art of war can be called infinite.” “But one thing more puzzled us,” said the officers, “and we ask you to explain it.
When you heard the enemy was reinforced, you seemed to grow happier.
Why was that?” “Because Tong Pass is distant from Xuchang; and if the rebels had taken advantage of all defensible points and held them, they could not have been quelled in less than a couple of years.
When they came on altogether, they made a multitude but they were not unanimous. They easily quarreled and, disunited, were easily overcome.
So I had reason to rejoice that they came on altogether.” “Indeed no one can equal you in strategy,” said his officers, bowing low before him.
“Still, remember that I rely on you,” said Cao Cao.
Then he issued substantial rewards to the army and appointed Xiahou Yuan to the command at Changan. The soldiers who had surrendered were distributed among the various troops.
Xiahou Yuan recommended Zhang Ji of Gaoling, as his aids.
So the army returned to Capital Xuchang where it was welcomed by the Emperor in state chariot.
As a reward for his service, Cao Cao was given the court privileges of omitting his distinctive name when he was received in audience and of proceeding toward the court without assuming the appearance of frantic haste. Further he might go to court armed and booted, as did the Han Founding Minister Xiao He of old.
Whence his prestige and importance waxed mightily.
The fame of these doings penetrated west into Hanzhong, and one of the first to be moved to indignation was Zhang Lu, Governor of Hanning.
This Zhang Lu was a native of Pei .
He was a grandson of Zhang Ling who retired to Mount Humming, in the Eastern Land of Rivers, where he had composed a work on Taoism for the purpose of deluding the multitude.
Yet all the people respected Zhang Ling, and when he died his son, Zhang Heng, carried on his work, and taught the same doctrines.
Disciples had to pay a fee in rice, five carts.
The people of his day called him the Rice Thief.
Zhang Lu, his son, styled himself Master Superior, and his disciples were called Commonly Devil Soldiers.
A headman was called Libationer, and those who made many converts were called Chief Libationers.
Perfect sincerity was the ruling tenet of the cult, and no deceit was permitted.
When any one fell ill, an altar was set up and the invalid was taken into the Room of Silence where he could reflect upon his sins and confess openly. Then he was prayed for.
The director of prayers was called Superintending Libationer.
When praying for a person, they wrote his name on a slip and his confession and made three copies thereof, called “The writing of the Three Gods.” One copy was burned on the mountain top as a means of informing Heaven; another was burned to inform Earth; and the third was sunk in water to tell the Controller of the Waters.
If the sick person recovered, he paid as fee five carts of rice.
They had Public Houses of Charity wherein the poor found rice and flesh and means of cooking. Any wayfarer was allowed to take of these according to the measure of his appetite.
Those who took in excess would invite punishment from on high.
Offenses were pardoned thrice; afterwards offenders were punished.
They had no officials but all were subject to the control of the Libationers.
This sort of cult had been spreading in Hanzhong for some thirty years and had escaped repression so far because of the remoteness of the region.
All the Government did was to give Zhang Lu the title of General Who Guards the South and the post of Governor of Hanning and take means to secure from him a full quota of local tribute.
When the reports of Cao Cao's success against the west, and his prestige and influence, reached the Hanzhong people, Zhang Lu met with his counselors, saying, “Ma Teng has died, and Ma Chao defeated, thus the northwest has fallen. Cao Cao's next ambition will be the southwest, and Hanzhong will be his first attack.
I should act first by assuming the title of Prince of Hanzhong and superintending the defense.1” In reply one Yan Pu said, “The army of this region counts one hundred thousand, and there are ample supplies of everything. The Eastern Land of Rivers is a natural stronghold with its mountains and rivers.
Now Ma Chao's soldiers are newly defeated, and the fugitives from the Ziwu Valley are very numerous. We can add them to our army by several ten-thousands more.
My advice is that as Liu Zhang of Yiazhou is weak, we should take possession of the forty-one counties of the Western Land of Rivers, and then you may set up your sovereign as soon as you like.” This speech greatly pleased Zhang Lu, who then began to concert measures with his brother, Zhang Wei, to raise an army.
Stories of the movement reached Yiazhou, whose Imperial Protector was Liu Zhang. A son of Liu Yan, a descendant from Prince Gong of the Imperial House.
Prince Gong had been moved out to Jingling several generations ago, and the family had settled there.
Later, Liu Yan became an official, and when he died in due course, his son was recommended for the vacant Protectorship of Yiazhou.
There was enmity between Liu Zhang and Zhang Lu, for Liu Zhang had put to death Zhang Lu's mother and brother.
When he knew of the danger, Liu Zhang dispatched Pang Xi as Governor of Baxi to ward off Zhang Lu.
But Liu Zhang had always been feeble, and when he received news from his commander of Zhang Lu's movements, his heart sank within him for fear, and he hastily called in his advisers.
At the council one haughtily said, “My Master, be not alarmed; I am no genius, but I have a bit of a healthy tongue, and with that I will make Zhang Lu afraid even to look this way.” When plots did grow about the west, It suited Jingzhou's plans the best. The speaker's name and lineage will be told in the next chapter. CHAPTER 60.
Zhang Song Turns The Tables On Yang Xiu; Pang Tong Proposes The Occupation Of Shu.
The man who proposed the plan spoken of in the last chapter was Zhang Song, who belonged to Yiazhou and held the small office of Supernumerary Charioteer.
His appearance was grotesque. He had a broad forehead, protuberant at the temples like a countryman's hoe, and a pointed head. His nose was flat and his teeth protruded. He was a dwarf in stature but had a deep voice like a great bell.
“What proposal have you to offer that may avert this danger?” asked the Imperial Protector.
“My proposal is that we gain the support of Cao Cao. As we know, he has made a clean sweep of the empire. Lu Bu went first, and both the Yuans followed, all exterminated. Lately he has destroyed Ma Chao. In short he is the one man against whom no one can stand.
Therefore, my lord, prepare me worthy gifts to take to the capital, and I will get Cao Cao to march an army against Hanzhong, which will keep this Zhang Lu occupied so that we shall be left alone.” This met Liu Zhang's views, and so he prepared gold and pearls and rich stuffs, worthy presents for the man of power. And when these were ready, he appointed Zhang Song his emissary.
Zhang Song in the meantime occupied his leisure in secretly copying maps and plans of the west country. When all was ready, he started with a small escort.
They heard this in Jingzhou, and Zhuge Liang sent a trusty person to the capital to keep him informed as to all the doings.
Zhang Song arrived in Xuchang, and, after he had established himself in his lodging, he made daily visits to the Prime Minister's palace to try to obtain an interview.
But the last success had filled Cao Cao with insufferable pride, and he did nothing but give banquets. He never appeared except for the most important affairs, and even carried on the business of the state in his own residence. So Zhang Song waited many days.
But when he got to know the persons who were nearest the Prime Minister, he bribed them and obtained an audience.
Cao Cao was seated in the high place, and after his visitor had finished his salutations, he said, “Your master Liu Zhang has sent no tribute for several years; why?” “Because the roads are dangerous and thieves and robbers infest them.
Intercourse is restricted.” Cao Cao interrupted in a loud harsh voice, saying, “What thieves and robbers are there when I have cleansed the empire?” “How can you say the land is tranquil when one sees Sun Quan in the south, Zhang Lu and Liu Bei in the west, and every one of these with armies reckoned in legions?
The weakest of them has one hundred thousand troops.” The mean appearance of the emissary had prejudiced Cao Cao from the outset; and when Cao Cao heard these blunt words, he suddenly shook out his sleeves, rose and left the hall.
Those in attendance were annoyed with Zhang Song and said, “How can you behave so rudely when you come on a mission? Your whole attitude was blunt and discourteous.
Happily for you, our lord remembered you had come from afar and did not take open notice of your fault.
The best thing for you is to go home again as quickly as you can.” But Zhang Song smiled. “We have no plausible flatterers and glib talkers in our western country,” said he.
At this, one from below the steps called out, “So you call us plausible and glib then; and you have none such in your country, eh?” Zhang Song looked around and saw the speaker was a man with thin delicate eyebrows crossing narrow eyes set in a pale spiritual face.
He asked his name. It was Yang Xiu, son of the former Regent Marshal Yang Biao. The young man was then employed as Chief of the Secretariat of the Prime Minister.
He was deeply read and had the reputation of being a clever controversialist, as Zhang Song knew.
So on one side was a desire to confound and on the other overweening pride in his own ability, with contempt for other scholars.
Perceiving the ridicule in Zhang Song's speech, Yang Xiu invited him to go to the library where they could talk more freely. There, after they had got settled in their respective places, Yang Xiu began to talk about the west. “Your roads are precipitous and wearisome,” said Yang Xiu.
“But at our lord's command we travel, even through fire and water; we never decline,” replied Zhang Song.
“What sort of a country is this Yiazhou?” “Yiazhou is a name for the group of western counties and territories known of old as the state of Shu.
The roads are intersected by streams, and the land bristles with steep mountains.
The circuit is over two hundred stations and marches and the area over one hundred thousand square miles.
The population is dense, villages being so close that the crowings of cocks in one waken the people in the next, and the dogs barking in this excite the curs in that.
The soil is rich and well cultivated, and droughts or famines are equally unknown.
Prosperity is general and the music of pipes and strings can always be heard.
The produce of the fields is piled mountain high.
There is no place its equal.” “But what of the people?” “Our administrators are talented as Sima Xiangru; our soldiers able as Ma Yuan; our physicians are expert as Zhang Ji; our diviners are profound as Yan Zun.
Our schools of philosophy and our culture stand forth as models, and we have more remarkable people than I can enumerate. How should I ever finish the tale of them?” “And how many such as you, Sir, do you think there are at the orders of your Imperial Protector?” “Our officers are all geniuses: wise, bold, loyal, righteous, and magnanimous.
As for poor simpletons like me, they are counted by hundreds; there are cartloads of them, bushels of them.
No one could count them.” “What office may you hold then?” Zhang Song replied, “Mine can hardly be called an office. I am a Supernumerary Charioteer.
But, Sir, what state affairs may you control?” “I am the First Secretary in the Palace of the Prime Minister,” replied Yang Xiu.
“They say that members of your family held office for many generations, and I do not understand why you are not in court service actually assisting the Emperor, instead of filling the post of a mere clerk in the private palace of the Prime Minister.” Yang Xiu's face suffused with shame at this rebuke, but he mastered himself and replied, “Though I am among the minor officials, yet my duties are of great importance, and I am gaining experience under the Prime Minister's guidance.
I hold the office for the sake of the training.” Zhang Song smiled, saying, “If what I have heard is true, Cao Cao's learning throws no gleaming light on the way of Confucius or Mencius, nor does his military skill illumine the art of Sun Zi or Wu Qi. He seems to understand the doctrine of brute force and holding on to what advantages he can seize, but I see not how he can give you any valuable training or enlighten your understanding.” “Ah, Sir; that comes of dwelling in out-of-the-way parts.
How could you know of the magnificent talents of the great Prime Minister?
But I will show you something.” Yang Xiu called up an attendant and bade him bring a book from a certain case.
He showed this to his guest, who read the title “The New Book of Cao Cao”.
Then Zhang Song opened it and read it through from the beginning, the whole thirteen chapters. They all dealt with the art of war.
“What do you take this to be?” asked Zhang Song, when he had finished.
“This is the great Prime Minister's discussion of the art of ancient and modern war composed on the model of Sun Zi's Treatise on the Art of War.
You may be disdainful of the Prime Minister's talents, but will this not go down to posterity?” “This book! Every child in Yiazhou knows this by heart. What do you mean by calling it a new book?
It was written by some obscure person of the time of the Warring States, and Cao Cao has plagiarized it.
But he has deceived no one but you, Sir.” “But what is the use of your sarcastic insult in saying that your school children know the book by rote? It has never been given to the world, although copies have been made. It belongs to his private library.” “Do you disbelieve me? Why, I know it and could repeat it.” Then Zhang Song repeated the whole book, word for word, from beginning to end.
Yang Xiu said, “You remember it like this after only one reading!
Really you are marvelous.” He boasted not a handsome face, Nor was his body blessed with grace.
His words streamed like a waterfall, He read a book and knew it all.
Shu's glories could he well rehearse, His lore embraced the universe.
Or text or note of scholiast Once read, his memory held fast.
At leave-taking Yang Xiu said, “Remain a while in your lodgings till I can petition our Prime Minister to give you another interview.” Zhang Song thanked him and left.
By and bye Yang Xiu went to see Cao Cao on the matter of receiving the emissary from the west and said, “Sir, why did you formerly treat Zhang Song so off-hand?” “He spoke very rudely; that is why.” “But you bore with Mi Heng; why not with this man?” “Mi Heng's reputation for scholarship stood highest of all, and I could not bear to put him to death.
But what ability has this Zhang Song?” “To say nothing about his speech being like the River of Heaven, nothing daunts his talent for dialectic.
I happened to show him your new treatise; he read it over once and could repeat it. From this, it is evident he is cultured and has a prodigious memory. There are few like him in the world.
But he said the book was the work of an obscure person of a few hundred years back, and every school child in his country knew it.” “It only shows that the ancients and I are in secret sympathy,” replied Cao Cao.
However, Cao Cao ordered the book to be torn up and burned.
“Then may I bring him to see you, Sir, that he may see the glory of our court.” Cao Cao grudgingly consented, saying “I am reviewing troops tomorrow on the western parade ground. You may bring him there and let him see what my army looks like. He will be able to talk about it when he goes home.
When I have dealt with the south, I shall take the west in hand.” Hence the very next day Yang Xiu took Zhang Song over to the west parade ground, where a review of the Tiger Guard was to be held.
There were fifty thousand of them, and when drawn up in order, they made a very brave show with their gleaming helmets and bright new uniforms.
Their drums rolled to shake the heavens, and their weapons glittered in the sun.
Their discipline and order were perfect; their gay banners fluttered in the breeze. They looked ready to fly even, so alert and smart were they.
Zhang Song glanced at them contemptuously.
After a long time Cao Cao called up Zhang Song and, pointing to his army, said, “Have you ever seen such fine bold fellows in Yiazhou?” “We never see this military parade in Yiazhou; we govern the people by righteousness.” Cao Cao changed color and looked hard at the bold speaker, who gazed back at him without the least sign of fear.
Yang Xiu shot a quick glance at Zhang Song, but Cao Cao went on, saying, “I regard the rat-class of the world as of no more importance than so many weeds, and for my army to reach a place is to overcome it, to give battle is to conquer, to besiege is to take. Those who are with me, live; but those who oppose me, die.
Do you understand?” “O Prime Minister, I know well that when you march out your army, you always conquer.
I knew it when you attacked Lu Bu at Puyang; and when you fought Zhang Xiu at Wancheng; and when you met Zhou Yu at the Red Cliffs; and when in Huarong Valley encountered Guan Yu; and on that day when you cut off your beard and threw away your robe at Tong Pass; and when you hid in a boat to escape the arrows on the River Wei.
On all these occasions, no one could stand against you.” It made Cao Cao very angry to be thus twitted with his misfortunes and he said, “You stuck-up pedant!
How dare you thus bring up all my failures?” Cao Cao called to his attendants to eject the bold disputant and put him to death.
Yang Xiu ventured to argue with him, saying, “You may behead him, but he came from the west bearing tribute, and his death would have a very evil effect on all distant peoples.” But Cao Cao was too angry to be reasonable and persisted.
However, Xun Yu also remonstrated, and Zhang Song was not put to death.
But he was beaten and ejected.
He returned to his lodging and left the city that night, reflecting upon what he had intended and what he had accomplished. Thought he, “I did not expect such arrogance when I came with the intention of giving him a region.
When I get back, Liu Zhang will expect great things.
Now I am returning empty handed and a failure to endure the laughter of my fellow country people. I will not go back.
I have heard of the virtues of Liu Bei, and I will go to him and see what manner of man he is. Then I can decide what to do.” So with his little escort and following he made for Jingzhou.
He had reached the boundaries of Wuchang when he met a body of horsemen, at the head of whom rode a general in simple undress, who pulled up, saying, “Surely you are the Charioteer Zhang Song.” “I am he,” said Zhang Song.
The general quickly dismounted and humbly said, “I have expected you these many days.
I am Zhao Yun.” Zhang Song dismounted and returned the salutation, saying, “Then you are no other than the Fine Man of Changshan.” “No other,” was the reply.
“And my lord Liu Bei bade me await you here and offer you refreshment after your long and toilsome journey.” At this some soldiers brought forward wine and food which they offered kneeling.
Zhang Song said, “I am come because the world says Liu Bei is liberal and kindly disposed.” After a few cups of wine, the two retook the road toward Jingzhou City, which they neared next day at evening. They went to the guest-house. Here they found a large number of people who received the visitor with the beating of drums and every sign of respect.
And the officer in command, bowing low, said, “My brother sent me to meet you after your long and dusty journey and prepare the guest-house for your reception.
My name is Guan Yu.” So Zhang Song and Zhao Yun dismounted and entered the guest-house, where hosts and guest exchanged formal salutations and took their seats.
In a short time refreshments were served, and both men were most diligent in their attention to the traveler.
This roadside banquet was prolonged to the time of setting the watch, when they prepared for rest.
Next morning, after the early meal, they mounted and continued their journey.
Very soon they met Liu Bei himself, with an escort, and his two chief advisers, deferentially standing by the roadside.
As soon as he recognized them, Zhang Song dismounted and walked toward them. Liu Bei received him with extreme respect.
“Your exalted name has been long known to me;” said Liu Bei, “it has reverberated through my ears.
My one regret is that cloudy hills and long distances have hitherto prevented me from enjoying the advantage of your instruction.
Hearing that you were passing through, I have come to meet you; and if you would be willing to notice me and condescend to rest for a time in my city, thus allowing me to satisfy my long disappointed desire to see you, I should indeed hold myself fortunate.” Naturally the traveler's vanity was tickled, and he joyfully remounted.
They rode bridle to bridle into the city.
When they reached the residence, again they exchanged profound salutations and compliments before they took their various places as host and guest. And then a banquet was served.
But all throughout Liu Bei refrained from saying a word about the west; he only chatted on general and common things. The visitor noted this steady avoidance and resolved to probe his host's thoughts.
“How many counties are there in Jingzhou, where you are now, O Imperial Uncle?” Zhuge Liang replied, “Jingzhou is only ours temporarily; we have borrowed it from the South Land. They are always sending messengers to demand its return.
However, now that our lord has married their daughter, his position is more secure.
But it is still temporary.” “The South Land is large,” said Zhang Song, “yet their six territories and their eighty-one counties do not satisfy them.
The people are strong and the land is fruitful.” Said Pang Tong, “Our lord, being of the dynastic family, has never occupied a territory of the empire.
Those others, thievish as they are, may indeed seize upon as much territory as they are strong enough to hold, but such deeds are not according to the wise person's heart.” “Noble Sirs, pray say no more; what virtue have I that I should expect anything from the future?” said Liu Bei.
“Not so, indeed,” said Zhang Song.
“Illustrious Sir, you are of the lineage of Han; your noble character is widely known.
No one could say that your fate excludes all thoughts of occupying territory, where you might begin to set up authority and take an emperor's position.” Liu Bei deprecated such a suggestion, “Sir, you go too far; this really is too much.” The next three days were spent in banquets and wine parties, but all the time no mention was made of the Western Land of Rivers.
And when, at the end of that time, Zhang Song took leave, his host was at the three-mile “parting road” to bid him farewell and offer refreshment. When the moment came for the parting, Liu Bei raised his wine-cup and said, “I am sincerely grateful that you deigned to come here.
You have prolonged your visit to three days, but now the moment of parting has come.
Who knows when I may have the privilege of receiving your instructions again?” As Liu Bei said this, the tears flowed, but he hid them while Zhang Song, willing to believe that this emotion was on his account, thought how wonderfully kind and noble his host must be to be thus affected.
Quite overcome, Zhang Song decided to speak about the west.
So he said, “I have thought that I, too, would come to you one day, but so far I have found no way.
In Jingzhou I see Sun Quan on the east, always ready to pounce; I see Cao Cao on the north, greedy to swallow. So this is not a wholly desirable place for you to remain in.” “I know this but too well,” said Liu Bei, “but I have no secure place to go to.” “Yiazhou is well protected, has much fertile soil, is populous and well governed.
Its scholars are attracted by your virtue.
If you marched your armies westward, you could easily become a real power there and restore the glory of the Hans.” “But how dare I attempt this?
The ruler is also of the Imperial House.
The whole region is devoted to him for his good deeds, and no other person could attain such a hold.” “I am no traitor,” said Zhang Song, “but in your presence I feel constrained to be perfectly open and plain.
Liu Zhang, the Imperial Protector of Yiazhou, is naturally weak and can neither use the wise nor employ the capable. Then again Zhang Lu threatens the north.
People are distracted and would gladly welcome an appreciative ruler.
The journey I have just made was to propose to support Cao Cao and place the region under him, but I found him rebellious and set on evil, proud and arrogant. So I have turned aside to you.
If you will take Yiazhou, you will have a base from which to deal with Hanzhong when you will, and the whole country beside. You will continue the rightful line, and your name will live in history.
Would not that be real fame? If then you think of taking our country, I am willing to do what little I can as an ally within.
But do you contemplate such a step?” “I am deeply grateful that you think so well of me.
But the Imperial Protector being a member of the family, I should lay myself open to general execration, were I to attack him.” “When a hero finds himself in the world, his duty is to work out his destiny, to exert himself and perform his task as best as he can, to press forward among the foremost.
At the moment the position is that, if you fail to seize this opportunity, some other will take possession of Yiazhou, and you will regret when too late.” “And I have heard much of the difficult nature of the country, its many high mountains and numerous streams, and its narrow roads.
How could such a country be invaded?” Then Zhang Song drew the map from his sleeve, saying, “I am so deeply affected by your virtue that I offer you this map of the country, whereby its roads and rivers may be known.” Liu Bei unrolled the map; it was covered with notes, on the lie of the land, lengths and widths, and such matters. Strategic points on rivers and hills were shown, and store-houses and granaries and treasuries. Everything was plainly stated.
Zhang Song went on, “Sir, you can prepare your plans promptly.
I have two friends who will certainly help you. And when they come to see you, you may be perfectly frank with them.
Their names are Fa Zheng and Meng Da.” Liu Bei thanked him with joined hands. Said he, “As the blue mountains grow not old and the green waters always remain, so shall I never forget.
And when I shall have accomplished my task, you shall have no mean reward.” Replied Zhang Song, “I look for no reward.
Having met with an enlightened lord, I felt compelled to unbosom myself to him.” Zhang Song left soon after, and Guan Yu escorted him for several miles.
After arrival in Yiazhou, Zhang Song lost no time in sending for his friends, Fa Zheng and Meng Da.
The former was the first to come, and he was told of Cao Cao's arrogance and haughtiness toward humans of parts. “As for the man himself,” said Zhang Song, “he is a man to grieve with but not a person to rejoice with.
I have promised Yiazhou to Liu Bei, the Imperial Uncle, and I want your especial advice and assistance.” “I think Liu Zhang is incapable,” said Fa Zheng, “and I have felt drawn to Liu Bei for some time past.
So we are in sympathy here.” Shortly after Meng Da arrived.
Meng Da and Fa Zheng were fellow townsmen.
When Meng Da entered the room and saw the other two in earnest and secret conversation, he said, “I know what you two are about; you are scheming to hand over Yiazhou to somebody.” “It is really so; you have guessed right,” said Zhang Song.
“But to whom ought it to go?” said Fa Zheng. “There is but one:
Liu Bei,” said Meng Da.
All three clapped their hands and laughed.
Then said Fa Zheng to Zhang Song, “You will see our lord tomorrow; what about that?” “I shall recommend that you two be sent to Jingzhou on a mission.” They thought that a suitable scheme.
And when the lately arrived messenger saw his master and was asked how he had fared, Zhang Song said, “Cao Cao is a rebel who desires to get the whole empire into his hands. I need hardly tell you that.
But he also hankers after this region.” “Then what will become of us?” said Liu Zhang. “I have a plan to check both our enemies.
Liu Bei, the Imperial Uncle, now in Jingzhou, is a relative of yours, and he is generous and well disposed. This is a matter of common knowledge.
Cao Cao was simply overwhelmed at the result of the battle at the Red Cliffs, and Zhang Lu more so.
Now my plan is that you ally yourself with your distinguished relative against Cao Cao and Zhang Lu.” “I have been thinking thus for a long-time; can you recommend a suitable emissary?” “The only ones are Fa Zheng and Meng Da.” These two were summoned and, meanwhile, a letter was prepared.
Fa Zheng was to proceed as emissary to open up friendly relations, and Meng Da would follow in due course with an army to welcome Liu Bei into the Western Land of Rivers.
While still discussing the details of the policy, a person forced his way in, his face all running with sweat, and cried out, “My lord, your land of fortyone counties will be lost to you and pass to another if you listen to Zhang Song.” Zhang Song turned a startled look on the intruder, who was Huang Quan of Xiliang, First Secretary in the Imperial Protector's palace.
The Imperial Protector said, “Why do you use such language?
Liu Bei is of my family, and so I am seeking his support.” Said Huang Quan, “I know all about him; he is liberal minded to gain people to his side, and his softness can overcome the hardest. He is bolder than any other.
He gains humans' hearts from afar off, and those near him look up to him. He also has the wisest advisers and the boldest warriors.
But if you call him here as a soldier, think you that he will be content to remain in a lowly condition?
And if you treat him as an honored guest, can a state stand two rulers?
Hear me, my lord, and you stand secure as Taishan Mountains; be deaf to my words, and your position is as precarious as a pile of eggs.
This Zhang Song has lately come home through Jingzhou where he has certainly been plotting with Liu Bei.
Slay this man; and make an end of Liu Bei.
That will be for the happiness of this land.” “But how else am I to fend off my two enemies?” “Fortify your country, dig out your moats, and raise your ramparts.
Then you can wait on events.” “If these rebels invade this land, the position will be critical, as when fire singes one's eyebrows.
It is idle talk to tell me to wait on events.” No notice was taken of Huang Quan, and Fa Zheng was about to set out when another interfered, crying, “No, no!” This was a secretary, Wang Lei.
With bowed head Wang Lei stood and said, “My lord will bring misfortune upon himself if he listens to this Zhang Song.” “Not so; I make an alliance with Liu Bei in order to withstand Zhang Lu.” “Zhang Lu's invasion would be but a skin disease.
Liu Bei's entry into this country would be a mortal malady.
Liu Bei is an unscrupulous brave; he was once in Cao Cao's service and plotted against him.
Then he hung on to Sun Quan and seized Jingzhou.
This shows his character and his designs. Think you that you two can dwell together? If you invite him, then Shu is lost!” “No more wild talk!” cried Liu Zhang angrily. “Liu Bei is of my clan and family and will not ravish me of my possessions.” He bade the guards escort both men outside and ordered Fa Zheng to set out.
So he did, and before long came to Jingzhou.
When the salutations were over, Fa Zheng presented his letter, which Liu Bei opened and read: “I, Liu Zhang, a younger brother of our family, now write to General Liu Bei. From my humble place long have I gazed in your direction, but the roads of the Western Land of Rivers are precipitous, and I have failed to send my tribute.
This is to my shame. The victims of misfortune aid each other, and those in trouble support each other. If friends act thus, how much more should members of the same family?
Now Zhang Lu is mustering an army of invasion on my northern frontier, much to the injury of my tranquillity.
Wherefore I send this letter that you may know of my distress; and if you remember the kindly bonds of family and will play a brotherly part and lead your armies to destroy these ruffians, you will be my eternal protector and I shall be ever grateful.
This letter leaves much unsaid, but I await your coming.” This letter greatly pleased Liu Bei.
He made a banquet for the bearer thereof, and when they had mellowed themselves with wine, he dismissed the attendants and spoke to Fa Zheng in confidence. “Friend, I have long admired you, and Zhang Song extolled your virtues.
I shall always feel grateful for this opportunity of hearing you.” Fa Zheng bowed, saying, “That is too great praise for a humble emissary from Shu.
But they say that horses always neighed in recognition of Bo Le, the supreme judge of horses, and when a person has found his lord, he dies for him.
Have you thought further of Zhang Song's proposals, General?” “I have always been a wanderer, often in suffering and sorrow.
I have often thought of the wren for even that tiny bird has a twig to rest on; and of the cunning hare, that secures safety with three openings to its burrow. Does not a person need at least a shelter?
Your land of the west is fertile and a temptation, but its ruler is of my family, and I cannot plot against him.” “Yes; Yiazhou is a very paradise. But without a ruler it cannot exist.
Liu Zhang knows not how to use the wise people, and his heritage must speedily pass to another.
Today it is offered to your hands, and you must not miss the opportunity.
You know the saying, that the leader in the hunt gets the quarry. If you will only consent, I will serve you to the death.” Liu Bei signified his gratitude.
Said he, “Let me reflect for a time and take advice.” The banquet terminated and the guest left.
Zhuge Liang conducted Fa Zheng to his lodging while his master sat thinking.
Then Pang Tong said, “You must decide; not to decide is foolish.
You are of high intelligence, my lord, and why do you hesitate?” “What should my reply be?” asked Liu Bei. “You know these surroundings, and with them you cannot attain your ends.
Now before you lies a populous, fertile, and rich land, a base with the greatest possibilities.
You have the promise of assistance from two men within, and it seems like a gift of providence. Why hesitate?” “Now there are two men in the world as mutually antagonistic as fire and water.
My opposite is Cao Cao.
He is impetuous and I am long suffering; he is cruel and I am humane; he feigns while I am true.
In all particulars I act the direct contrary to him.
I refuse to risk the loss of the confidence and trust of the world for a trifling advantage.” Pang Tong smiled at these sentiments, saying, “My lord's words are quite in accord with abstract rectitude, but such ideas scarcely suit the days of rebellion.
There are other ways of fighting than with warlike weapons, but to adhere too obstinately to the idea of abstract rectitude is to do nothing.
One must be an opportunist, annex the weak and attack the willfully deluded, seize the recalcitrant and protect the docile. These were the teachings of the great Kings Tang and Wu.
If after the settlement you reward with righteousness and make of the land a great country, will you be guilty of a breach of trust?
Remember if you do not take it now, another will.” Liu Bei, a prey to confused emotions, replied, “These words are as jewels; they should be engraved on my very heart.” Thereupon he summoned Zhuge Liang to settle the details of an army to march west.
Zhuge Liang said, “This is an important place and must be very well defended.” Liu Bei replied, “I, Pang Tong, and my two generals Huang Zhong and Wei Yan will go into the west; you and our three best generals—Guan Yu, Zhang Fei, and Zhao Yun—can defend Jingzhou.” Guan Yu was told off for Xiangyang and the narrow pass at Qingni, Zhang Fei commanded four cities along the river, and Zhao Yun camped at Jiangling.
For the march westward, Huang Zhong led the van, Wei Yan had the rearguard, while Liu Bei moved in the center with Liu Feng and Guan Ping as his aids.
Pang Tong was Commander of the whole army. Just as the fifty thousand troops were starting, there came Liao Hua to offer his service; he and his troops were attached to Guan Yu.
It was in the winter that the expedition started.
Soon they met the force under Meng Da, five thousand soldiers, to act as escort into Yiazhou.
Liu Bei informed Liu Zhang that he had started, and the latter sent orders to the counties along the road to entertain them well on the march.
The Imperial Protector proposed to go out in person to welcome Liu Bei and ordered carriages to be prepared and tents and banners. All the escort were dressed in glittering armor.
At this Secretary Huang Quan, the sturdy opponent of the invitation to Liu Bei, again remonstrated. “My lord, if you go out, you will be exposed to danger. I have been in your service for many years, and I would prevent you from being the victim of another's wiles.
I pray you reflect.” Zhang Song said, “His words are those of one who would sow discord in a family and encourage the power of the robbers who threaten you.
Assuredly such action is to your detriment.” Liu Zhang then spoke angrily to Huang Quan, saying, “I have decided, and why do you oppose me?” The objector bowed his head and wept.
Then approaching nearer, he seized hold of the Imperial Protector's robe with his teeth to hinder him.
Liu Zhang angrily shook his robe and rose from his seat, but Huang Quan still held on till two of his teeth fell out.
Then the guards forced him away, and he retired, still crying.
As Liu Zhang was starting, another man cried, “My lord, do you neglect the loyal words of your faithful Huang Quan to go to your death?” And he threw himself prostrate at the steps in remonstrance.
He was Li Hui of Jianning.
“The prince may have ministers who remonstrate with him, and the father may have children who oppose,” said Li Hui.
“Huang Quan has spoken faithfully, and you ought to listen.
To let Liu Bei into this land is to welcome the tiger into your gates.” “Liu Bei is my brother and will not harm me,” said the Imperial Protector.
“And any other who shall oppose me shall suffer death.” So Li Hui was thrust out.
“The officers of Shu regard the safety of their families and no longer render you service.
The generals are arrogant, and each has some scheme of his own to further.
If you do not get Liu Bei to oppose the enemy without and your own people oppose you within, surely you are on the road to ruin.” So spoke Zhang Song, and the Imperial Protector replied, “I know the plan is for my advantage.” Whereupon he mounted his horse to ride out to Elm Tree Bridge. Then a messenger reported to him:
“Wang Lei has suspended himself, head downwards, at the city gate. In one hand he holds a written remonstrance and in the other a knife. And he says that if you heed him not, he will cut the rope and die at your feet.” Liu Zhang went to the gate, took the writing and read:
“Good medicine is bitter in the mouth but good for the disease; faithful words offend the ear but are good for the conduct.
Of old King Huai of Chu listened not to Qu Yuan, but attended the meeting at Wu Pass and was captured by the state of Qin.
Sir, you are thoughtlessly leaving your place to go to welcome Liu Bei, but I fear there is a way out and none in.
Could you but behead Zhang Song in the market place and have nothing to do with this league with Liu Bei, it would be for the happiness of old and young, and assure the safety of yourself.” Anger rose in Liu Zhang's breast as he read.
“Why do you insult me when I go to meet a kindly man I feel as if I were about to enjoy the delight of seeing brother?” At this Wang Lei gave a great cry, severed the rope, and fell to the ground battered and dead. Head downwards at the city gate one hung A last remonstrance in his outstretched hand. Resolved that, were his words rejected, he Would not survive defeat.
Sincere was he Who, desperate, held to Liu Zhang's silken robe Until his broken teeth released their grip. Sincere indeed, but how can he compare With stern Wang Lei who went to awful death?
Liu Zhang with thirty thousand troops went out to welcome his clansman, and there followed one thousand wagons laden with supplies and rich stuffs.
Liu Bei's advanced guard had arrived at River Moonstone.
During the march the people had brought presents, and Liu Bei had given an order to pay for everything, under penalty of death for disobedience.
Thus no one suffered, and the people came out in trusting crowds to watch the soldiers marching by and welcome them in every way.
Liu Bei soothed them with very gracious words.
Then Fa Zheng secretly showed Pang Tong a letter from Zhang Song advocating the assassination of Liu Zhang near the place of welcome.
Pang Tong said, “Say nothing about this; after the two Lius have met, there may be opportunities, but this is too early to talk.
Any plot would leak out.” So nothing was said.
Fucheng, where the meeting was to take place, was one hundred twenty miles from Capital Chengdu. Liu Zhang arrived first and sent messengers to welcome Liu Bei.
The two armies camped on the bank of River Fu.
Liu Bei went into the city to see the Imperial Protector, and they met cordially as brothers should.
Both shed a few tears, and by and bye they began a heart-to-heart talk.
Then followed a banquet, and after this each returned to his own camp.
The Imperial Protector said, “How ridiculous have been proved the fears of Huang Quan and Wang Lei! They do not understand the force of family affection.
I see he is really a kindly and noble man, and with him as a support I shall fear neither Cao Cao nor Zhang Lu.
And I owe all this to Zhang Song.” To show his gratitude, Liu Zhang took off the green silken robe he wore and sent it as a gift to Zhang Song, together with five hundred ounces of gold. However, some of his officers were not so content, and a group of them bade him beware.
“Do not rejoice too soon, O Master,” said they, “for Liu Bei is hard enough within in spite of his mild exterior.
You have not sounded him yet and should be on your guard.” “You are all too anxious;” said Liu Zhang, laughing, “my brother is no double-dealer, I am sure.” When Liu Bei had returned to his own tent, Pang Tong came in to ask what impression he had of his host of that day.
“He seems a very honest man,” said Liu Bei. “He is good enough, but some of his servants are discontented at this turn of affairs, and I would not guarantee there will be no murders. If you took my advice, you would have Liu Zhang assassinated at the return banquet.
A hundred ruffians behind the arras, a signal from you, and the deed would be accomplished. All that would be needed, then would be a rush on Capital Chengdu.
No sword need be drawn, no arrow fitted to the string.” “He is a brother of my house and has treated me with sincerity.
I am a new-comer and so far unknown in this land.
Such a deed would be abhorrent to all the world, and these people would resent it.
I will not establish myself by such means.” “The scheme is not mine; it originated in a private letter from Zhang Song, who says it will have to be done some time.” At this moment Fa Zheng came in and said, “This is not for ourselves; it is the will of heaven.” “Liu Zhang and I are of the same house, and I would shudder at harming him.” “Sir, you are wrong.
If you act not as we propose, then Zhang Lu will take Shu in revenge for the death of his mother. What is there for you at the end of your long march? Advance, and success is yours; retreat, and you have nothing.
And delays are most dangerous.
At any moment this scheme may leak out, and another will reap the profit. This is the day when Heaven smiles on you. Act before Liu Zhang suspects you; establish yourself.” So urged Fa Zheng, and Pang Tong backed it.
Their lord, by argument, they tried From rectitude to turn aside. What Liu Bei hid in his heart will be explained in the next chapter.
CHAPTER 61. In The River, Zhao Yun Recovers Liu Shan; With One Letter, Sun Quan Repulses Cao Cao.
In spite of the persuasion of Pang Tong and Fa Zheng, Liu Bei steadily refused to sanction the assassination of his host at the banquet, Imperial Protector Liu Zhang, even if thereby he was to gain possession of the Western Land of Rivers.
The next day there was another banquet, this time in the city of Fucheng, whereat host and guest unbosomed themselves freely to each other and became exceedingly friendly and affectionate.
All were mellow with wine, and Pang Tong, talking with Fa Zheng, said, “Since our master will have nothing to do with our scheme, we would better set Wei Yan's sword-play to work and take advantage of the confusion to kill Liu Zhang.” Wei Yan came in shortly afterward, with his sword drawn, and said, “There being no other entertainment at this banquet, may I show you a little fencing to amuse you?” Thereupon Pang Tong called up some of the armed guards and ranged them along the lower part of the hall till Wei Yan should fall on.
At these preparations the officers of Liu Zhang stared with questioning eyes toward the chief seats at the upper end, and one of them, Zhang Ren, drew his sword, saying, “An opponent is needed to make fencing a success, so he and I will display our skill at the same time.” So they began.
Presently, at a glance from Wei Yan, Liu Feng came up and took position at his side. At once three of the commanders of the west followed suit, saying, “And we three will come in too; it may add to your amusement and help to raise a laugh.” But to Liu Bei matters began to take on a serious look.
Drawing a sword of a servant, he stood out in the banquet hall and cried, “We brothers have perhaps honored our meeting with a little too much wine; there is nothing to say against that, but this is no Hongmen Banquet, where murder was done.
Put up your swords, or I will slay you!” “Why wear swords at all at a meeting of two brothers?” cried Liu Zhang, at the same time telling his servants to surround his officers and take away their weapons.
Disarmed, they sulkily withdrew, and then Liu Bei called all the generals of Liu Zhang to the upper end of the banquet hall, gave them wine, and said, “You need have no doubts; we two brothers, of the same bone and blood, have talked over the great design, and we are one in purpose.” The officers bowed and retired.
Liu Zhang took his guest by the hand, saying, “Brother, I shall never forget your kindness.” They sat drinking till late, both feeling very happy.
When at length Liu Bei reached his camp, he blamed his strategist for having caused the confusion. “Why did you endeavor to force me into committing a great wrong?” said Liu Bei.
“There must be no repetition of this.” Pang Tong retired, sighing.
When Liu Zhang reached his own camp, his leaders waited on him and said, “Sir, you saw the real meaning of that occurrence at the banquet, we suppose.
We think it prudent for you to retire at once into the city.” “My brother is different from ordinary humans,” replied Liu Zhang. “He may not incline toward murder himself, but those about him have but one desire—that is to exploit this land of ours to their own advantage.” “Do not try to sow dissension between us and make us quarrel,” said their chief. And Liu Zhang took no heed of their remonstrance.
One day, when he and Liu Bei were enjoying together relaxation from cares of state, the news came that Zhang Lu was about to invade the Western Land of Rivers at the Jiameng Pass. Thereupon the Imperial Protector begged Liu Bei to go and defend it.
Liu Bei consented and left immediately with his own especial band.
At once Liu Zhang's officers took advantage of the guest's departure to urge the Imperial Protector to place his own trusty generals in command at various strategic points, so as to guard against any attempts of the visitors to seize the land.
At first Liu Zhang was unwilling and refused, but as they prayed him most earnestly to do this he yielded and consented to take some steps to safeguard himself. He sent Yang Huai, Commander of Baishui, and Gao Pei to garrison River Fu Pass.
So Liu Zhang returned to Chengdu and his guest, Liu Bei, went away to the point where invasion threatened.
Arrived there, Liu Bei soon won the hearts of the people by the strict discipline he maintained over his army and by his gracious manner.
News of these doings in the west duly reached the south, and Sun Quan summoned his counselors as to his countermove.
Then Gu Yong spoke, saying, “I have an infallible plan to propose. Liu Bei and his army are now far away and separated from us by difficult country. Therefore he cannot return quickly, and my advice is to occupy the passes so that he cannot get through. Then send all your force against Jingzhou and Xiangyang, and they will surely fall to you.” “The plan seems excellent,” said Sun Quan.
But just then a voice was heard from behind the screen, crying, “You may just put to death the man who proposed that scheme for trying to compass the death of my daughter.” Every one started with surprise. It was the Dowager Marchioness' voice.
Further, Lady Wu looked very angry as she entered, saying, “What is to become of my only daughter, who is the wife of Liu Bei?” She turned her wrathful eyes to Sun Quan and said, “You were heir to your father and brother and obtained possession of all these lands without the least effort.
Yet you are dissatisfied and would forget the claims of your own flesh and blood and sacrifice your sister for the sake of adding a little to your lands.” “No, no!” murmured Sun Quan, ashamed.
“I would never think of going contrary to my mother's wishes and orders.” He abruptly dismissed the assembly, and when they had gone the old lady, still nursing her wrath, retired to her own apartments. Left alone beneath the portico, Sun Quan sighed sadly. “This chance missed! When will Jingzhou be mine?” thought he.
While still deep in reverie, Zhang Zhao came up, saying, “What grieves my lord?” “No great matter; only this last failure to gain my ends.” “The difficulty may be easily removed,” said Zhang Zhao.
“Choose some trusty man and charge him with a secret letter to Princess Sun Ren saying that her mother is dangerously ill.
Give him five hundred men as escort and tell him to make his way privily into Jingzhou City and deliver the letter. Hearing her mother wants her, she will rush home at once, and she might bring with her the only son of Liu Bei. Liu Bei will be glad enough to exchange Jingzhou for his son.
If he will not, you can still send the army.” “That sounds like a good plan,” said Sun Quan. “Further, I have the man to carry it out successfully.
He is that Zhou Shan, who was a bold one. He used to accompany my brother in his youth.
He is the man to go.” “Keep it a secret, then,” said Zhang Zhao, “and let Zhou Shan start quickly.” It was decided that Zhou Shan should take with him about five hundred soldiers disguised as ordinary traders. He had five vessels and distributed his men among them, while weapons were hidden in the holds.
Papers were was forged to look like veritable authority in case they were asked.
Zhou Shan set out along the river route for the city of Jingzhou and was not long on the way.
He anchored his ships under the bank, landed, and went into the city to the residence, where he bade the doorkeepers announce him.
He was admitted and led into the presence of Lady Sun and presently gave her the secret letter.
When she read that her mother was in danger of death, she began to weep bitterly and questioned the messenger closely.
Zhou Shan invented a story, saying, “The Dowager Marchioness is really fretting for a sight of yours; and if you do not go quickly, it will be too late.
The Dowager Marchioness also wants to see little Liu Shan once before she dies.” Lady Sun replied, “You know that the Imperial Uncle is far away on military service, and I ought to inform the chief of the army before returning home.” “But what will you do if the chief says he must inform your husband and await his consent?” said Zhou Shan.
“If I went without asking permission—but I fear that is impossible.” “My ships are all ready in the river, and you have only to drive through the city,” said Zhou Shan.
Naturally the news of her mother's illness greatly disturbed the young wife. In a short time her carriage was ready, and she mounted, taking Liu Shan with her.
She took an escort of thirty guards, all armed, and was soon at the river side and had embarked before the palace people could report what she was doing.
But just as the ships were starting, a voice was heard, shouting, “Do not start yet; let me bid my lady farewell.” The voice was Zhao Yun's; he had just returned from an inspection trip, and they had at once told him of Lady Sun's sudden departure.
As soon as he had recovered from his surprise, he dashed down to the river bank like a whirlwind, with only half a dozen followers. He arrived only just in time; the boat was starting, and Zhou Shan stood in the prow, a long spear in his hand.
“Who are you that you dare hinder the movements of your mistress?” cried Zhou Shan.
Zhou Shan bade his soldiers cast off and get under way, and also to prepare their weapons to fight.
The ship moved off with a fair wind and a strong current beneath her keel.
But Zhao Yun followed along the bank.
“My lady may go or not as she pleases,” cried he, “but I have one word to say to her.” Zhou Shan turned a deaf ear and only urged his soldiers to get greater speed on the ship.
Zhao Yun followed down the bank for some three or more miles. Then he saw a fishing boat made fast to the bank.
He at once dismounted, cast off the rope, took his spear, and leaped into the boat.
Then he made the two men row him toward the vessel in which sat Lady Sun.
As he approached, the soldiers of the South Land threatened him with their spears.
Thereupon he threw his spear into the bottom of the boat, drew the glittering steel blade he wore, dashed aside the opposing spears, and leaped upon the larger vessel. The guards of the South Land fell back in surprise and fear, and Zhao Yun went down into the body of the ship.
There sat Lady Sun with little Liu Shan in her arms. “Why this rude intrusion?” said she angrily.
The warrior sheathed his sword and said humbly, “Whither may my mistress be going, and why goes she privily?” “My mother is ill and on the point of death; I had no time to inform any person of my departure,” said Lady Sun.
“But why take the young master if you are going merely to see a sick person?” said Zhao Yun.
“Liu Shan is my son, and I would not leave him behind to be neglected.” “Mistress, you have acted wrongly.
My lord has but this one son of his body, and I rescued the child lord from among many thousand troops of Cao Cao in the great battle at Long Slope Bridge in Dangyang.
There is no reason for you to take him away.” Lady Sun took refuge in anger. “You leave my family affairs alone, you common soldier!” cried she.
“My lady, if you will go, then go, but leave the young master behind.” “You are a rebel, jumping on board the ship like that!” cried Lady Sun.
“If you will not leave the young lord behind, I refuse to let you go, come what may,” said Zhao Yun.
Lady Sun called in her maids to seize him, but he just pushed them off. Then he took the boy from her arms and ran out to the prow of the ship.
He tried to get the vessel in to the bank, but no one would aid him, and he thought it would be wrong to begin to slay indiscriminately. He knew not what to do in such a quandary.
And Lady Sun was screaming to her maids to take the boy away from him. But he kept too firm a grip on the child, and the good sword in his other hand kept every one at bay.
Zhou Shan was at the helm, giving all his attention to getting the ship out into the current and away down the river.
He steered for the middle of the stream, where the wind was strong.
Zhao Yun, one hand taken up with holding the boy, was quite unable to get the vessel in toward the shore.
Just as things looked most desperate, Zhao Yun saw a string of ships filing out from a creek lower down the stream, flags fluttering and drums beating.
He thought that certainly all was over and he was about to fall a victim to a stratagem of the South Land, when he noticed a mighty warrior standing in the prow of the leading craft. He was armed with a long spear, and it was Zhang Fei. Zhang Fei also shouted, “Sister-in-Law!
Leave the child lord.” Zhang Fei had been out scouting when he heard the news of his sister-inlaw's sudden departure, and he at once made for the River Yu with the intention of intercepting her flight. He had arrived just in the nick of time to cut off the ships of the South Land. Very soon, sword in hand, he had boarded the vessel.
As Zhang Fei came on board, Zhou Shan drew his sword and advanced toward him, but one sweep of Zhang Fei's blade laid him on the deck dead. And the grim warrior hung his head at the feet of Lady Sun.
“Why this very unseemly behavior?” cried Lady Sun, now quite frightened.
“Sister,” said Zhang Fei, “you thought very little of my brother when you set out on this mad journey.
That was behaving rudely.” “My mother is very ill; it is a matter of life and death,” cried she. “If I had waited for your brother's permission to go, I should have been too late.
If you do not let me go now, I will throw myself into the river.” Zhao Yun and Zhang Fei took counsel together.
They said to each other, “It is hardly the correct thing for servants to force their lord's wife into committing suicide.
Suppose we keep the child and let the vessel go.” Then they said, “O Lady, we cannot allow the wife of our exalted brother to die a death of shame, and so we will take our leave.
We trust you will not forget our brother and that you will return quickly.” Taking the child with them, they left the vessel, and the five ships of the South Land continued their voyage down stream. One poet has praised the conduct of Zhao Yun: Before, Zhao Yun saved Liu Shan, What time his mother died; Again like service he performs, Upon the Great River's tide.
The soldiers of Wu all in the ship, Were stricken down with fear Search all the world, you never find Of bold Zhao Yun the peer.
Another has eulogized Zhang Fei: At Long Slope Bridge, With rage Zhang Fei boiled, Like wild beast roared, And warriors recoiled.
From danger now His prince is saved. On history's page His name is graved.
Quite satisfied with their success, the two warriors sailed homeward.
Before they had gone far, they met Zhuge Liang with a squadron of ships. He was very pleased to find they had recovered the child, and they three joyfully returned to Jingzhou, whence an account of the whole adventure was written to Liu Bei.
When Lady Sun reached her home, she related the story of the death of Zhou Shan and the carrying off of the child. Naturally Sun Quan was very wrath at the miscarriage of his scheme, and he resolved to attack Jingzhou in revenge for his messenger's murder.
“Now that my sister has returned home, there is no longer any family tie to prevent the attack, and I will take full measure of revenge for the death of my general,” said Sun Quan. So he called the council to consider the expedition.
But before they could decide upon any plan, their deliberations were suddenly cut short by the news that Cao Cao was coming down upon the South Land with four hundred thousand troops, burning to avenge his defeat at the Red Cliffs. All thoughts now turned toward repelling his attack.
Adviser Zhang Hong, who had retired to his home ill, had just died, and his testament was sent to his lord to read. Therein he advised Sun Quan:
“My lord, the seat of government should be removed to the old land of Moling, where the scenery seems to bear the impress of kingly dignity, befitting a person who cherishes the ambition of founding an enduring dynasty.” Sun Quan read this document out to his councilors at this meeting, not without many tears in memory of the writer. He told them, saying, “Zhang Hong was sincere till his death.
I cannot withstand his last advice!” And Sun Quan at once gave orders to build a walled city named Shidou in Moling, and changed the name of the land to Jianye. Henceforth he intended to make his capital there.
As a protection against Cao Cao, Admiral Lu Meng proposed building a rampart at River Ruxu.
Some other officers opposed this, saying, “When the enemy appears, you will have to land in order to attack him, and after that you will return to your ships.
What is the use of a rampart?” Lu Meng replied, “One must prepare against possibilities. Soldiers vary in keenness and sometimes lose battles.
If an urgent occasion arises, the soldiers may be unable to reach the water's edge, and how then are they to embark?
They will then need shelter.” Sun Quan said, “Provision against eventualities, such as he proposes, is good.
Against a distant risk provide, and sorrow walks not by your side.” So they sent soldiers to build ramparts at River Ruxu, and as the work ceased not day or night the wall was soon completed.
In the capital Cao Cao's influence and glory waxed daily greater.
High Counselor Dong Zhao proposed that the title of duke should be conferred upon him. Dong Zhao said, “In all history, no one has rendered such services as you have, O Prime Minister, not even Duke Zhou or Lu Wang.
These thirty years you have exposed yourself to all risks, been combed by the wind and bathed by the rain, and you have swept evil from the empire, succored the distressed, and restored the Hans.
Who of all statesmen can rank with you?
It would be fitting for you to become the Duke of Wei  and receive the Nine Dignities, that your merit and virtue be known to all.” Now the Nine Dignities, or signs of honor, were:
Chariots:
Gilded chariots drawn by eight horses; .2. Court dresses:
Dragon-embroidered robes, headdresses, and shoes; .3. Music at banquets:
By royal bands; .4.
Red doors:
Symbols of wealth; .5.
Inner staircase: Protection for every step; .6.
Imperial Tiger Guard: Three hundred at the gates; .7. Imperial axes:
Commanding and ceremonial symbols; .8.
Bow and arrows:
Red-lacquered bow with a hundred arrows; .9.
Libation vessels:
Jade tablets and libation cups. However, all the courtiers were not of one mind.
Said High Adviser Xun Yu, “This should not be done, O Prime Minister.
You raised a force by an appeal to the innate sense of righteousness of the people, and with that force you restored the Han authority. Now you should remain loyal and humble.
The virtuous person loves people with a virtuous love and would not act in this way.” Cao Cao did not take this opposition kindly.
Dong Zhao said, “How can we disappoint the hopes of many because of the words of one?” So a memorial went to the Throne, and Cao Cao's ambitions and desires were gratified with the title of Duke of Wei. The Nine Dignities were added.
“I did not think to see this day!” said Xun Yu, sighing. This remark was repeated to the newly created Duke and angered him.
He took it to mean that Xun Yu would no longer aid him or favor his designs.
In the winter of the seventeenth year of Rebuilt Tranquillity , Cao Cao decided to send an army to conquer the South Land, and he ordered Xun Yu to go with it.
Xun Yu understood from this that Cao Cao wished his death, so he declined the appointment on the plea of illness.
While Xun Yu was at home, he received one day a box such as one sent with presents of dainties.
It was addressed in Cao Cao's own handwriting.
Opening it, Xun Yu found therein nothing.
He understood; he took poison and died.
He was fiftytwo years of age.
Xun Yu's talents were to all men known, That was sad that at the door of power he tripped.
Posterity is wrong to class him with the noble Zhang Liang, For, nearing death, he dared not face his lord of Han.
News of Xun Yu's death came to Cao Cao in the form of the ordinary letter of mourning by his son, Xun Yun.
Then Cao Cao was sorry and gave orders for an imposing funeral. He also obtained for the dead man the posthumous title of lordship.
The northern army reached River Ruxu, whence Cao Cao sent a reconnaissance of thirty thousand troops led by Cao Hong down to the river. Soon Cao Hong reported:
“The enemy's fleet blankets the river, but no sign of movements.” Feeling suspicious, Cao Cao led his army to the river to watch the enemy and deploy his troops.
On the river he saw displayed a fleet of ships all arranged in admirable order, the divisions being marked by distinctive flags.
The equipment glittered in the sunlight.
In the center was a large ship whereon was a huge umbrella, and beneath the shade sat Sun Quan in the midst of his staff.
“That is the sort of son to have;” said Cao Cao in admiration, “not such piglets and puppies as Liu Biao'.” Suddenly, at the explosion of a bomb, the ships got under way and came flying toward him, while a force moved out of River Ruxu.
Cao Cao's soldiers at once retired in great haste.
A company led by the green-eyed, red-bearded Sun Quan made straight for Cao Cao, who hastily retreated.
But Cao Cao was sore pressed by other Sun Quan's commanders, Han Dang and Zhou Tai, and it had gone hard with him but that Xu Chu came to his rescue and fought with the troops of the South Land till his master could escape.
Xu Chu fought some score bouts before he could draw off and return to his own aide.
When Cao Cao returned to camp, he conferred rich rewards upon his henchman who had saved him, and he reprimanded his other leaders for their too hasty retirement.
“You blunt the keen spirits of the army; and if you do such a thing again, I will put you to death,” said Cao Cao.
About midnight that night there arose great commotion at the gates of the camp; and when Cao Cao went outside, he found that the enemy had crept up secretly and started a conflagration. The soldiers of the South Land forced their way into the stockade and went hither and thither, slaying till morning broke.
Then Cao Cao and his army retired. Cao Cao was greatly distressed by this misfortune.
He was sitting in his tent poring over the Book of War when Cheng Yu came in to see him.
“O Prime Minister,” said Cheng Yu, “you who know so thoroughly the art of war, have you forgotten the maxim to strike quickly?
You had your army ready, but you postponed action and allowed your enemies to build the ramparts at River Ruxu.
Now you will find it hard to capture the place. It would be better now to retreat on the capital and await a more propitious moment.” Cao Cao listened, but said nothing; after a time Cheng Yu went away. Cao Cao remained seated in his tent, leaning on a small table by his side. And he fell asleep.
Suddenly he heard a sound as of a rushing stream or galloping squadrons of horse, and out of the river in front of him arose a huge red sun, so bright that his eyes were dazzled by it.
Looking up at the sky, he saw two other suns as if reflections of this one.
And as he wondered, the first sun suddenly flew up and then dropped among the hills in front of his camp with a roar like thunder. This woke him.
He was in his tent and had been dreaming, and the sentry at his tent door was just reporting noon.
Soon he had his horse saddled and rode out, with a small escort, toward the spot he had seen in his dream.
As he stood gazing around him, an army of horse came along with Sun Quan at their head. Sun Quan wore a glittering helmet and was clad in silver armor. Seeing his chief enemy, Sun Quan showed no sign of haste or dismay, but reined in his steed on a rise and, pointing with his whip at Cao Cao, said, “Behold the all-powerful minister who holds the capital in the hollow of his hand!
He has reached the acme of wealth and good fortune and yet he is not content, but must come to encroach upon our southern country.” Cao Cao replied, “You are disobedient, and the command of the Emperor is to exterminate you!” “What words!” cried Sun Quan with a laugh. “Are you not ashamed?
Everyone knows that you control every act of the Emperor and you tyrannize over the nobles.
I am no rebel against the dynasty, but I do desire to capture you and reform the government.” Cao Cao grew angry at this speech and bade his generals go over and take Sun Quan prisoner.
But before they could obey, Han Dang and Zhou Tai, Chen Wu and Pan Zhang led out two armies of soldiers from left and right at the sound of beating drums, and arrows and crossbow bolts began to fall like raindrops around Cao Cao.
He turned to retire, and the archers and bowmen followed him.
However, presently appeared Xu Chu, with the Tiger Guard, who rescued Cao Cao and took him back to his camp.
The army of the South Land had scored a victory, and they marched back to River Ruxu.
Alone in his camp, Cao Cao thought, “This Sun Quan certainly is no ordinary man, and by the presage of the sun in my dream he will become an emperor.” He began to think it would be well to retire from the expedition, only that he feared the troops of the South Land would exult over him.
So the two armies remained facing each other a whole month, fighting occasional skirmishes and battles in which victory fell sometimes to the one and sometimes to the other.
And so it went on till the new year, and the spring rains filled the watercourses to overflowing, and the soldiers were wading in deep mud.
Their sufferings were extreme, and Cao Cao became sad at heart.
At the council board his officers were divided, some being for retirement and others anxious to hold on till the warm weather. Their chief could not make up his mind.
Then there came a messenger from the South Land bearing a letter of Sun Quan, which read:
“You and I, O Prime Minister, are both servants of Han, but you are careless for the tranquillity of the people and think only of battle, thereby causing great suffering.
Is this conduct worthy of a kindly person?
“But spring with its heavy rains is at hand, and you would be wise to retire while you can.
If not, you may expect a repetition of the misfortune at the Red Cliffs.
It would be well to consider this.” And on the back of the letter was a note in two lines running thus:
“No tranquillity for me while you live!” Cao Cao read the letter and laughed. “Sun Quan speaks the truth!” said he. He rewarded the messenger and issued orders to retreat.
The Governor of Lujiang, Zhu Guang, was left to guard Huancheng; the army marched for the capital.
Sun Quan returned to Moling.
At a meeting of his advisers he said, “Cao Cao has marched north, Liu Bei is at Jiameng Pass; why should I not lead the army that has just repulsed the northern forces to take Jingzhou?” Thereupon Zhang Zhao offered another plan, saying, “Do not move a soldier; I know how to keep Liu Bei from returning to Jingzhou.” Cao Cao's army march away, Sun Quan's thoughts then southward stray. The scheme proposed by Zhang Zhao will be unfolded in the next chapter.
CHAPTER 62.
Taking Of River Virgo Pass, Yang Huai and Gao Pei Are Slain; Siege Of Luocheng, Huang Zhong and Wei Yan Rival. Zhang Zhao proceeded to unfold his device:
“If you undertake any expedition farther west, Cao Cao will undoubtedly return to the attack.
Rather write two letters, one to Liu Zhang saying that Liu Bei has leagued himself with you against the west, which will raise suspicions in the mind of Liu Zhang and cause him to attack his guest, and another letter persuading Zhang Lu to march upon Jingzhou, which will uproot Liu Bei.
Between these two conflicting matters, Liu Bei cannot give supports to all fronts, and we can march against Jingzhou.” Sun Quan approved, wrote the two letters and sent them by two messengers.
In the meantime, Liu Bei had been winning the hearts of the people about Jiameng Pass, where his army lay.
When he received the news of his wife's flight and of Cao Cao's threatened attack, he called in Pang Tong and laid the matter before him. “The victor, whoever it is, will assuredly possess himself of our region of Jingzhou,” said Liu Bei at the close.
“You need not trouble about that region,” said Pang Tong.
“I do not think the South Land or the Middle Land will try to take it so long as Zhuge Liang is there. But, my lord, write to Liu Zhang telling him you wish to return on account of this threatening danger. It will be a plausible excuse.
You may say that on account of Cao Cao's attack, Sun Quan has sent to you for help, and that as his country and yours are neighbors and dependent upon each other for safety you cannot refuse.
Further, you will assure him that there is no danger of any invasion by Zhang Lu.
However, we have too few troops for our purpose and insufficient grain, so you must also urge your relative to send you thirty or forty thousand of veterans and a plentiful supply of food.
He will not refuse, and with more soldiers and provisions we can do as we please.” Liu Bei agreed to this and sent a messenger to Chengdu.
When his messenger reached the River Fu Pass, Yang Huai and Gao Pei, who commanded the garrison, already knew of the design, and the former of the two generals went with him to the city.
After reading the letter, the Imperial Protector asked Yang Huai, “Why did you come with the messenger?” “Only because of that letter,” Yang Huai replied.
“This Liu Bei, from the day he first entered Yiazhou, has been trying to win over the hearts of your people by a display of kindness and virtue.
He certainly intends no good, and I think you should refuse both the troops and the supplies he asks.
To help him is like adding fuel to a fire.” “We are affectionate brothers, and I must help him,” said the Imperial Protector.
“Liu Bei is nothing but a vagabond swashbuckler,” some one cried, “and if you keep him here in the west, you are loosing a tiger in your household.
If you give him the troops and supplies he asks, you are adding wings to your tiger.” Turning whence the voice proceeded, they recognized the speaker as one Liu Ba, a native of Lingling. His words threw the Imperial Protector into a state of doubt and hesitation.
Huang Quan also dissuaded him most earnestly, and finally Liu Zhang actually decided to send only four thousand of worn-out soldiers and a paltry supply of grain. At the same time fresh orders enjoining a diligent watchfulness were sent to the guardians of the passes.
When Liu Bei read the letter that accompanied the Imperial Protector's miserable contribution to his strength, he was furious and cried, “I have been spending myself in your defense, and this is my reward!
You are mean and greedy enough to stint my supplies.
How can you expect generous service?” Liu Bei tore the letter to fragments and execrated the writer thereof.
The bearer of the letter fled back to the capital.
Then said Pang Tong, “You have hitherto laid too much stress on humanity and righteousness. However, that is all over now, and all affection between you two is at an end, now that you have torn up that letter.” “Yes.
And since that is so, what next?” asked Liu Bei.
“I have three schemes ready in my mind.
You may choose which pleases you.” “What are your three schemes?” “The first, and best, is to send an army forthwith and seize Chengdu. The second is to capture and put to death the two generals of the River Fu Pass.
They are the two most famous fighting men in this land. If you give out that you are returning to Jingzhou, they will assuredly come to say farewell.
Seize and put them to death, and the Pass and Fucheng are both yours. Chengdu will follow soon.
The third plan is to drop this role you have been playing, go back to Jingzhou and make a regular invasion.
But if you ponder these schemes too long, you will get into such straits that nothing can save you.” Liu Bei replied, “Of your three schemes, O Instructor, I find the first too summary and the last too slow. I choose the second scheme, which is neither.” So a letter was written to Liu Zhang saying that Cao Cao was sending an army against Qingni; the generals there were unequal to the defense, and Liu Bei had to go to help.
As the matter was pressing, there could be no personal leave-taking.
“I knew that the real desire of Liu Bei was to return to Jingzhou,” said Zhang Song, when he heard of the letter to Liu Zhang. Zhang Song then also composed a letter to Liu Bei. While he was looking about for a trusty person to take it, his brother Zhang Su, who was the Governor of Guanghan, came to see him. Zhang Song hid the letter in his sleeve while he talked with his brother.
Zhang Su noticed his anxious inquietude, which he could not explain.
Wine was brought in and, as the two brothers chatted over it, the letter dropped to the floor unnoticed by Zhang Song.
One of Zhang Su's servants saw it, picked it up, and gave it to his master, who opened and read it.
This is about how it ran:
“What I said to you lately was not mere meaningless talk. Why, then, postpone action?
The ancients valued the person who took by force and held by conciliation. If you act at once, the whole matter is in your hand.
Why abandon all and return to Jingzhou?
Surely I do not hear aright!
When you get this letter, attack without a moment's delay and remember that I am your ally on the inside.
Above all, no delay!” “This plot of my brother's will end in the destruction of the whole family,” said Zhang Su. “I must get in the first word.” So at once he went in and laid the whole matter before the Imperial Protector.
“I have always treated your brother so well!” said Liu Zhang, very angry.
Liu Zhang issued orders to arrest Zhang Song and behead him and all his household in the market place. Zhang Song, such as he have been but few, Little thought he that a letter would betray When he plotted for another. But success he never knew, For himself there opened out a gory way.
Having thus learned of a real conspiracy to deprive him of his heritage, Liu Zhang assembled his officers and asked their advice.
Huang Quan spoke out, saying, “Prompt action is needed.
Send to every strategic point telling them to increase the garrisons and keep careful guard and, above all, prevent the entrance of any person from Jingzhou.” Such orders were sent to all points of vantage where were garrisons.
In the meantime, carrying out Pang Tong's scheme, Liu Bei had marched down to Fucheng, where he halted and sent in a messenger to invite the two generals to come forth and say farewell. But they did not respond at once to this invitation.
“What is the real meaning of this retirement?” said one to the other.
“This Liu Bei ought to die,” said Gao Pei.
“Let us hide daggers under our dress and stab him at the place of farewell. That will end all our lord's troubles.” “A most excellent plan,” said Yang Huai.
So they two, taking only a small escort of two hundred, went down out of the Pass to say goodbye. Most of their forces were left in the camp.
On the way down to River Fu, Pang Tong had said to his master, “You have need to be on your guard against those two if they come to bid you farewell.
If they do not come, then the Pass must be attacked without delay.” Just as he said this, a violent gust of wind overthrew the leading flag of the army, and Liu Bei asked what this portended.
“That means a surprise; those two intend to assassinate you, so be on your guard.” Accordingly, Liu Bei put on double armor and girded on his sword in readiness.
When the two generals arrived, the army halted while the generals should pay the farewell visit.
Then Pang Tong said to his two generals, Wei Yan and Huang Zhong, “However many soldiers come down from the Pass, see to it that none return.” The two generals of the Western Land of Rivers, Yang Huai and Gao Pei, armed with hidden daggers, came up, their escort bearing gifts of sheep and wine.
They marked no precautions being taken against an attack and began to think their task of murder would be an easy one.
They were led in to where Liu Bei sat under a tent, his adviser with him.
They said, “We hear, O Imperial Uncle, that you contemplate a long march, and therefore we come to offer a few poor gifts to speed you on your way.” The cups of farewell were duly filled.
Then Liu Bei replied, “You have a heavy responsibility to defend the Pass, Generals. I pray you drink first.” They drank.
Then Liu Bei said, “I have a secret matter to talk over with you.” So all the two hundred soldiers of the escort were sent away and led to the midst of the camp.
As soon as they had gone, Liu Bei shouted, “My generals, lay hands upon these two rebels!” Thereupon Liu Feng and Guan Ping rushed out from behind the tent. The two generals of the Pass were taken aback, but began to struggle.
However, Liu Feng and Guan Ping each seized one man and held him.
“Your lord and I are of the same house;” said Liu Bei, “why then have you plotted against me and conspired to sow enmity between us?” Pang Tong bade them search the captives, and the hidden daggers were found.
So both were ordered to immediate execution. However, Liu Bei hesitated and was unwilling to confirm the sentence and put them to death.
But his adviser insisted that they were worthy of death for the assassination they had penned, and bade the executioners fall on. So the two men were beheaded. Of their following not one had been allowed to slip away. Liu Bei summoned the soldiers of the escort to his tent, gave them wine to comfort them, and said, “Your leaders conspired to sow dissension between brothers and were found with daggers hidden beneath their clothing.
They were assassins in intent and have met the fate they merited.
You have committed no crime and need feel no alarm.” The soldiers thanked him for his clemency with low obeisance.
Then said Pang Tong, “If you will now show the way so that our troops may capture the Pass, you shall even be rewarded.” They consented.
That same night the army set out, with the soldiers of the renegade escort leading the way.
When they reached the Pass they hailed the gate, saying, “Open the gate quickly; the generals have returned earlier than they expected because of important business.” Hearing the voices of their comrades, the gate guards had no suspicion of treachery and threw open the gates.
In rushed the enemy soldiers and so gained possession of River Fu Pass without shedding a drop of blood.
The defenders came over to the side of Liu Bei and were liberally rewarded. This done, the army was posted so as to guard the approaches and maintain what they had captured.
The next few days were spent in banquets and feasts in celebration of success.
At one of these feasts, Liu Bei turned to his adviser, saying, “This is what one might call a joyful occasion.” “To employ warlike weapons in making an attack upon the possession of another is not using them in the best way,” replied Pang Tong.
“Nor is such attack the most proper occasion for rejoicing.” Liu Bei replied, “The success of King Wu of Zhou was celebrated with music; I suppose weapons were not well used on that occasion either.
Why do you talk so wide of reason?
You would better retire.” Pang Tong laughed and withdrew from the table, while the attendants supported Liu Bei to his own chamber, where he had a long sleep.
About midnight he awoke from his wine, and then the servants told him that he had driven sway his adviser from the feast.
He was at once filled with remorse.
Next day, having dressed early in full costume of ceremony, he took his seat in the great hall, summoned his adviser and apologized handsomely for his rude behavior the night before. “I drank too much last night and spoke rudely; pray forget it.” Pang Tong, who had taken the whole episode in very good part from the first, laughed and talked as usual.
But Liu Bei went on, “Really I was the only one to blame yesterday.” “We both slipped up; it was not only you, my lord,” said Pang Tong.
Then Liu Bei laughed too, and the two were as good friends again as ever.
When Imperial Protector Liu Zhang heard of the doings of his relative and guest, he said, “I did not think that such things would come to pass.” The officers of Yiazhou met to consider how to oppose the further advance of Liu Bei, and Huang Quan said, “Let us send without delay a force to hold Luocheng, which is the very throat of the road he must take.
He may have veteran soldiers and fiery generals, but he will not be able to pass.” So the four ablest generals—Deng Xian, Ling Bao, Liu Gui, and Zhang Ren—were told off for this duty, and they led fifty thousand troops.
As they marched, Liu Gui said, “In the Silky Hills there is a wonderful Taoist who calls himself 'The Super Human of the Dark Void.' He has the gift of second sight, so let us visit him as we pass and inquire what our fortunes are to be.” “What should one seek of a hermit when one is out to repulse an enemy?” said his colleague, Zhang Ren, contemptuously. “Your view is wrong,” said Liu Gui.
“The Holy One  has said that it is characteristic of the most entire sincerity to be able to foreknow.
So let us inquire of this man of high intelligence that we may know what to do and what to avoid.” Whereupon they went up into the hills and sought the hermit's retreat. They were a small party, on horseback.
Meeting a wood-cutter, they inquired the whereabouts of the dwelling of the wise man, and he pointed to one of the highest hills, saying that the Sage lived on the very summit. They climbed up to the spot he had told them of and found a small hut. At their summons, a lad in Taoist garb came out to speak with them.
He asked their names and led them into the presence of the Super Human, who received them seated on a rush cushion.
They made a low obeisance, told him the reason of their coming, and asked of the future.
“How can a poor Taoist recluse know ought of fortunes, good or evil?” said he.
However, after a time, as Liu Gui repeated his request again and again and comported himself most humbly, the hermit bade the lad bring paper and ink and he wrote eight lines, which he handed to his questioner. “Supported by dragon and phoenix, So flies he westward.
But the phoenix shall fall to the earth.
And the dragon shall soar to the sky; There shall be successes and failures, For such is the eternal law.
See that ye act when occasion offers, Lest ye descend to the Nine Golden Springs.” Having read the oracle, they pressed the seer to reveal them their individual fortunes, but he replied, “Why ask these things?
None can escape his fate.” Liu Gui ventured to question the Sage further, but his eyelids dropped as if he slumbered.
Nor would he vouchsafe a word more, and the four generals took leave and descended the hill.
“One must have faith in such as he says,” said Liu Gui.
“What is to be gained by listening to the sayings of a daft old man?” replied Zhang Ren.
So they continued their road to Luocheng.
When they arrived, they said, “Luocheng is the throat of the road to Chengdu.
We must create a pincers defense for the city.
Two of us are to guard the ramparts while the other two are to station themselves in front of the city, where is a point of vantage sheltered by some hills.” Thus Deng Xian and Ling Bao wanted to build the ramparts outside the city.
Twenty thousand troops were told off; the two generals went to establish two camps in two stockades twenty miles away, hoping to be able to keep the foe away from the city.
The River Fu Pass being captured, Liu Bei took counsel with his adviser as to the next point to be attempted. This was Luocheng. The scouts reported:
“Liu Zhang has sent four generals to the defense of that city, and two camps has been established twenty miles away to form an ox horn.” Then Liu Bei assembled his officers and asked who would go to attack the camps.
The veteran Huang Zhong offered himself. “Veteran General, take your own troops and go,” said Liu Bei.
“A goodly reward shall be yours if you capture the two camps.” Huang Zhong thanked his lord and was just leading away his troops when suddenly up spoke a youthful leader, saying, “The General is too old to go on such an expedition; I am of poor ability, but I wish to take his place.” The speaker was Wei Yan.
Huang Zhong replied, “I already have my commission; why should you wish to supplant me?” “Because the task is beyond an old man's strength,” said Wei Yan.
“The two generals in those camps we know are the best and boldest in the country.
They are strong, and, veteran as you are, I fear you will be unable to overcome them. If you fail, our lord's great design will be hindered.
Therefore I ask that I may replace you, and my intent is kindly.” This reminder of his age angered the old man.
“Old, am I? Dare you compete with me in the use of warlike weapons?” said Huang Zhong. “Yes; I dare. And our lord shall be the judge.
The winner shall undertake this expedition.
Do you agree?” Huang Zhong ran down the steps and called to his soldiers to bring his small sword. But Liu Bei would stop this contest and said, “I have need of both of you in the task that lies before me.
When two tigers fight, one is sure to lose; and the loss of either of you is more than I could bear.
Be reconciled and quarrel no more.” “You two must not quarrel,” said Pang Tong.
“But as there are two camps to be taken and two generals to fight, take one each and let each lead his own troops.
The first to capture his camp shall be held to have rendered the greater service and to have acquired the greater merit.” This decision pacified them, and it was settled that Huang Zhong, the veteran, should go against Ling Bao, and Wei Yan, the younger leader, should attack Deng Xian.
But after they had marched away, Pang Tong recommended, “You, my lord, should follow them lest they should quarrel on the way.” So leaving the city of Fucheng in care of his adviser, Liu Bei also marched, taking with him Liu Feng, his adopted son, and Guan Ping, his nephew by adoption. They took five thousand troops.
After having received the command to take one of the camps, Huang Zhong went to his own camp and issued orders for the morning meal to be ready very early, and for every one to be in marching order by daybreak. When the time arrived, his army set out, taking the road through a gully to the left of the hills.
But early as Huang Zhong started, his rival had stolen a march on him. Wei Yan had sent over the night before to find out the hour fixed for Huang Zhong's start and had arranged his own departure a watch earlier, by which he would be able to reach his objective at dawn.
After Wei Yan's troops had taken their early meal, they removed the bells from the horses end put gags in their own mouths to prevent talking, and all-silently the army stole out of the camp just as the other party were eating their breakfast. The ensigns were furled and weapons covered lest the glint of steel should betray their movement.
Thus far successful in getting the start of his rival, Wei Yan thought as he rode along what a fine score he would make if he anticipated Huang Zhong also in his attack and captured the camp of Ling Bao before Huang Zhong could get there.
Wei Yan at once deviated from his own line and marched toward the camp defended by Ling Bao, of which the capture had been assigned to Huang Zhong.
Just before arrival, Wei Yan halted his troops and bade them prepare the drums and ensigns and their weapons.
Early as it was, yet the camp commander was on the alert, for the advancing force had been observed by his scouts. At the first sign of attack, the defenders poured out in full force.
Wei Yan galloped up and made straight for Ling Bao.
These two fought twenty or so of bouts, and then the troops of the Western Land of Rivers came up and joined in the battle.
The troops of Jingzhou under Wei Yan having marched a long distance, were fatigued and could not withstand this onslaught, so they fell back.
Wei Yan heard the confused sound of hoofs behind him and, giving up all thought of finishing his encounter with Ling Bao, turned his horse and fled.
The troops of the Western Land of Rivers kept up the pursuit, and the attackers were defeated and retired.
They had gone about two miles when another army of Yiazhou appeared from behind some hills. They advanced with heating drums.
Their leader, Deng Xian, shouted to Wei Yan to surrender, but Wei Yan heeded him not; whipping up his steed he fled the faster. However, the tired horse tripped and fell on its knees, throwing its rider to the ground.
Deng Xian's forces came galloping up, and he himself set his spear to thrust and slay Wei Yan. Before the spear could get where it was supposed to be, twang! went a bowstring, and Deng Xian lay prone upon the earth.
Ling Bao, Deng Xian's colleague, rode up quickly to his rescue, but just then a body of horse came dashing down the hill, and their leader shouted, “General Huang Zhong is here!” With uplifted sword Huang Zhong rode toward Ling Bao, who turned his steed and galloped off to the rear.
Huang Zhong pursued, and the army of Yiazhou were thrown into confusion. So Huang Zhong was able to rescue his colleague Wei Yan.
Huang Zhong had thus slain Deng Xian and forced his way up to the gate of the camp.
Once again Ling Bao came and engaged Huang Zhong.
The two had fought some ten bouts when appeared another body of soldiers. Thereupon Ling Bao fled again, and this time he made for the other camp, abandoning his own to the troops of Jingzhou.
But when he drew near his camp, he saw no longer the familiar flags of his own side. Instead, alien banners fluttered in the breeze.
He checked his steed and stared at the new force. The leader was a general wearing a silver breastplate and clad in a silken robe, no other than Liu Bei himself. On his left was his son and on his right rode his nephew. “Whither would you come?” cried Liu Bei. “The camp is ours; I have captured it.” Now Liu Bei had led his troops in the track of the other two armies ready to help either in case of need. He had come across the empty and undefended camp and taken possession.
Left with no place of refuge, Ling Bao set off along a byway to try to get back to Luocheng.
He had not gone far when he fell into an ambush and was taken prisoner. Bound with cords he was taken to the camp of Liu Bei.
The ambush had been prepared by Wei Yan, who, knowing he had committed a fault that could in no wise be explained away, had collected as many of his soldiers as he could find and made some of the captured soldiers of Yiazhou guide him to a spot suitable for laying an ambush.
Liu Bei had hoisted the flag of amnesty for his enemies, and whenever any soldier of the Western Land of Rivers laid down his weapons and stripped off his armor he was spared. Also all the wounded were granted life. Liu Bei told his enemies that they had liberty of choice.
He said, “You soldiers have parents and wives and little ones at home, and those who wish to return to them are free to go. If any wish to join my army, they also will be received.” At this proof of generosity the sound of rejoicing filled the land.
Having made his camp, Huang Zhong came to Liu Bei and said, “Wei Yan should be put to death for disobedience!” The culprit was summoned and came, bringing with him his prisoner.
Liu Bei decided that the merit of capturing an enemy should be set against his fault and bade him thank his rescuer, enjoining upon them both to quarrel no more.
Wei Yan bowed his head and confessed his fault, and Huang Zhong was handsomely rewarded. The prisoner was then taken before Liu Bei to decide upon his fate. Liu Bei loosened Ling Bao's bonds by his own hands and gave Ling Bao the cup of consolation. After he had drunk, Liu Bei asked if he was willing to surrender.
“Since you give me my life, I can do no other,” said he.
“Moreover, my two companions, Liu Gui and Zhang Ren, and I are sworn to live or die together.
If you will release me, I will return and bring them also to you and therewith you will get possession of Luocheng.” Liu Bei gladly accepted the offer.
He gave Ling Bao clothing and a horse and bade him go to the city to carry out his plan.
“Do not let him go,” said Wei Yan.
“If you do, you will never see him again.” Liu Bei replied, “If I treat humans with kindness and justice, they will not betray my trust.” So the prisoner was set free.
When Ling Bao reached the city and saw his two friends, he told them, saying, “I slew many of the enemy and escaped by mounting the steed of one of them.” Ling Bao said no word of having been captured.
Messengers were sent in haste to Chengdu for help. The loss of his general, Deng Xian, disturbed the Imperial Protector greatly. He called his advisers together to consult.
Then his eldest son, Liu Xun, said, “Father, let me go to defend Luocheng.” “You may go, my son, but who is there to go with you?” One Wu Yi at once offered himself.
He was brother-in-law to Liu Zhang, who said, “It is well that you go, Brother-in-Law, but who will second you?” Wu Yi at once recommended two men, Wu Lan and Lei Tong, who were appointed to assist in the command. Twenty thousand troops were given them, and they set out for Luocheng.
Liu Gui and Zhang Ren came out to welcome them and told them what had happened.
Wu Yi said, “If the enemy draw near to the walls, it will be hard to drive them off again.
What do you two think should be done?” Ling Bao replied, “The city lies along River Fu and the current is strong.
The enemy camp lies low at the foot of the hills; and with five thousand people I can cut the river banks, flood their camp, and drown Liu Bei and his army with him.” The plan was approved, and Ling Bao went away to carry it out.
Wu Lan and Lei Tong were told off to supervise the workers.
They began to prepare the tools for cutting the bank.
Leaving Huang Zhong and Wei Yan in command of the two camps, Liu Bei went away to Fucheng to consult with Pang Tong, the army's instructor.
Intelligence had been received that Sun Quan had sent a messenger to seek to make a league with Zhang Lu to make a joint attack upon the Jiameng Pass, and Liu Bei was alarmed lest it should come to pass.
“If they do that, I am taken in the rear and helpless in both advance and retreat,” said he.
“What do you counsel, O Instructor?” Pang Tong turned to Meng Da, saying, “You are a native of Shu and well skilled in its topography; what can be done to make the Pass secure?” “Let me take a certain man with me, and I will defend it myself and answer for its safety.” “Who is he?” asked Liu Bei. “He was formerly an officer under Liu Biao.
His name is Huo Jun, and he is a native of Nanjun in the south.” This offer was accepted, and the two generals departed.
After the council, when Pang Tong returned to his lodging, the doorkeeper told him that a visitor had arrived.
When Pang Tong went out to receive him, he saw a huge tall fellow eight cubits in stature and of noble countenance.
His hair had been cut short and hung upon his neck.
He was poorly dressed.
“Who may you be, Master?” asked Pang Tong.
The visitor made no reply, but went at once straight up the room and lay upon the couch.
Pang Tong felt very suspicious of the man and repeated his question.
Pressed again, the visitor said, “Do let me rest a little; then I will talk with you about everything in the world.” This answer only added to the mystery and increased the host's suspicion, but he had wine and food brought in, of which the guest partook ravenously.
Having eaten, he lay down and fell asleep.
Pang Tong wag greatly puzzled and thought the man must be a spy.
He sent for Fa Zheng, met him in the courtyard, and told him about the strange visitor.
“Surely it can be no other than Peng Yang,” said Fa Zheng.
Fa Zheng went inside and looked.
Immediately the visitor jumped up, saying, “I hope you have been well since we parted last!” Because two old friends meet again, A river's fatal flood is checked.
The next chapter will explain who the stranger was.
CHAPTER 63. Zhuge Liang Mourns For Pang Tong; Zhang Fei Releases Yan Yan. Fa Zheng and the new comer met with every sign of joy, clapping their hands and laughing with pleasure.
“This is Peng Yang of Guanghan, one of our heroes.
His blunt speech, however, offended Imperial Protector Liu Zhang, who put him to shame by shaving his head, loading him with fetters, and forcing him into a monastery.
That is why his hair is short.” The introduction made, Pang Tong treated the stranger with all the courtesy due to a guest and asked why he had come.
“To save a myriad of your soldiers' lives. I will explain fully when I see General Liu Bei.” A message was sent to Liu Bei, who came over to see the visitor.
“How many troops have you, General?” asked Peng Yang, when Liu Bei arrived. Liu Bei told him.
“As a leader you cannot be ignorant of the lie of the land.
Your camps over there are on River Fu; if the river be diverted and the enemy hold your army in front and rear, not a soul can escape.” Liu Bei realized that this was true.
Peng Yang continued, “In the heaven, the bowl of the Dipper lies toward the west, and Venus stands over against us. The aspect is ominous of evil, and some misfortune threatens.
It must be warded off.” Liu Bei offered Peng Yang an appointment as an adviser. Then he sent messages to the generals at the camps telling them to keep most vigilant lookout to guard against the cutting of the river bank.
When this message came, Huang Zhong and Wei Yan agreed together to take duty day and night about and maintain the strict watch necessary in the presence of an enemy near at hand. They arranged means of communication in case either met with a body of the enemy.
One very stormy night, Ling Bao ventured out with a strong reconnoitering party and went along the river bank to seek a suitable place for the breach.
But a sudden shouting in his rear told him that the army of Jingzhou were on the alert, and he at once retired.
Wei Yan came in pursuit and, as he pressed nearer, Ling Bao's troops hurried forward, trampling each other down in their haste.
Suddenly Ling Bao and Wei Yan ran against each other, and they engaged.
The fight was very short, for Wei Yan soon took his opponent prisoner.
Wu Lan and Lei Tong who came to Ling Bao's rescue were easily beaten off, and Ling Bao was carried away.
When Wei Yan reached the Pass, Liu Bei saw Ling Bao and greatly blamed him for his base ingratitude.
“I treated you generously and set you free; you repaid me with ingratitude. I cannot forgive again.” So the prisoner was beheaded, and his captor was rewarded.
A banquet was given in honor of Peng Yang.
Soon after this came a letter from Zhuge Liang, by the hand of Ma Liang, who reported all calm in Jingzhou and told Liu Bei that he need feel no anxiety. Opening the letter, Liu Bei read: “I have been making some astrological calculations.
This is the last year of the cycle, the bowl of the Dipper is in the western quarter, and the planet Venus approaches Luocheng.
The configuration is inimical to leaders, and the utmost caution is necessary.” Having read this and sent Ma Liang away, Liu Bei said, “I will return myself to Jingzhou and discuss the matter.” But Pang Tong, who thought in his heart that Zhuge Liang's warning was due to a jealous desire to prevent him from winning the glory of conducting a victorious campaign, opposed this, saying, “I also have made calculations, and I read the signs to mean that the time is favorable for you to get possession of this land, and no evil is foreshown.
Therefore be not of doubtful heart, my lord, but advance boldly.” Liu Bei was won over and decided to follow Pang Tong's advice.
He ordered Huang Zhong and Wei Yan to lead.
Pang Tong asked of Fa Zheng what roads there were to follow, and the latter drew a map, which was found to agree exactly with that left by Zhang Song.
Fa Zheng said, “North of the mountains is a high road leading to the east gate.
South of the mountains is another path leading to the west gate.
Both these roads are suitable for the advance of an army.” So Pang Tong said to Liu Bei, “With Wei Yan to lead the way, I will go along the southern road, while you, my lord, will advance along the high road, with Huang Zhong in the van.
We will attack Luocheng at the same time.” Liu Bei replied, “I was trained as a mounted archer and am accustomed to by-roads, wherefore, O Instructor, I think you should take the high road and let me take the other.” “There will be opposition on the high road, and you are the best to deal with it. Let me take the by-road.” “No; this does not suit me,” replied Liu Bei.
“A spirit bearing a massive iron club appeared to me in a dream and struck my right arm, so that I suffered great pain.
I feel sure this expedition will turn out badly.” Pang Tong replied, “When a soldier goes into battle, he may be killed, or he may be wounded; he accepts whichever is his fate.
But should one hesitate because of a dream?” “The real reason of my hesitation is the letter from Zhuge Liang. Wherefore I wish you to remain and guard River Fu Pass.
Do you agree to that?” Pang Tong smiled, saying, “Zhuge Liang has indeed filled your mind with doubts. The real thing is that he is unwilling to let me have the merit of accomplishing a great undertaking alone. That is why he has written this.
And your doubts and hesitations have produced the dream.
But I see nothing ill-omened, and I am prepared for any sacrifice and mean just what I say.
Pray, my lord, say no more, but prepare to set forth.” So the order went forth that the morning meal was to be taken early and the army was to march at dawn.
Huang Zhong and Wei Yan were to take the lead, one along each road. These two set out first, and in due time Liu Bei and Pang Tong mounted and followed.
Suddenly Pang Tong's horse shied and stumbled, throwing him off.
Liu Bei jumped down and seized the horse by the bridle, saying, “Why do you ride this wretched beast?” “I have ridden him a long time, and he has never done this before,” was the reply.
“A shying steed risks a person's life,” said Liu Bei.
“Ride my horse, which is thoroughly trained and will never fail you.
Give me yours.” They exchanged horses.
“I am deeply affected by your kindness,” said Pang Tong. “I could never repay you if I suffered death a thousand times.” Soon their ways diverged.
After his adviser had left, Liu Bei felt ill at ease and rode gloomily.
When the news of Ling Bao's capture and death reached Luocheng, Wu Yi and Liu Gui took counsel together.
Their colleague, Zhang Ren, said, “I know a by-road on the east which is of great importance, and I pray you let me guard it while you two hold the city.” So as soon as the news of the advancing armies came, Zhang Ren led three thousand troops to this road and placed them in ambush.
They remained hidden while Wei Yan passed and made no attack. The main body under Pang Tong soon followed.
The soldiers in ambush saw a rider on a fine white horse and pointed him out to one another, saying, “That surely is Liu Bei on the white horse.” Their leader Zhang Ren rejoiced too, and he gave certain orders. Pang Tong hastened forward.
By and by the mountain road narrowed to a defile with dense thickets on either hand, and as the season was when summer changes into autumn, the foliage was thick and impenetrable.
His heart alarmed him, and presently he reined in his steed and asked if any knew the name of that place.
One of the soldiers of Yiazhou who had joined his army said, “This is called 'The Fallen Phoenix Slope.'“ Pang Tong shuddered.
“An evil omen for me, since Blooming-Phoenix is my Taoist name.
There is no luck for me here.” He decided to retire.
But as he gave the order, the roar of a bomb rent the air and arrows began to fly toward him thick as swarming locusts. All the hidden men were shooting at the rider of the white horse.
And there, wounded by many arrows, poor Pang Tong died at the age of thirty-six. A poem says:
Deep in the blue recesses of Xian Hills Lay hid the modest cot of Pang Tong.
But now each village urchin knows his story, And any village rustic tells his exploits.
He knew the empire must be triply rent, And far he traveled lonely, to and fro.
None knew that Heaven would cast down his star, Forbidding his return in glory clad. A song was also written referring to Pang Tong:
They were two, the Phoenix and the Dragon, And they would travel far to the west; But on the road thither The Phoenix died on the mountain slope.
The wind drives off the rain, The rain sends off the wind. It was the day of the Han restoration, When the west was attained, But in the attainment The Dragon was alone.
Not only was the leader of the expedition slain, but more than half of his soldiers fell in the narrow road that fatal day.
Some of the troops in the van escaped and ran off to tell Wei Yan of the mishap to the army, and he halted and turned back to help.
However, it was difficult to march back, and he could not hack a way through, for the road was held by Zhang Ren, and archers and crossbowmen occupied all the heights.
Then one of the renegades proposed that they should try to return along the high road, and they started for Luocheng this way. But in front of them arose a great cloud of dust, betraying the approach of an enemy.
Wu Lan and Lei Tong, the defenders of the city, were moving toward them, and Wei Yan was between the two armies closed in like the kernel of a nut.
Wei Yan fought hard to get through. When his case seemed most desperate and hopeless, he observed signs of confusion in the army that lay between him and the city. Soon that army turned and faced the other way.
He pressed forward and presently saw troops of his own side, led by the veteran Huang Zhong. “I will rescue you, Wei Yan!” shouted Huang Zhong, as he came near. Now the defenders of Luocheng found themselves between two enemies, and they were smitten heavily. They could not check Wei Yan and Huang Zhong, who got close to the very walls of Luocheng.
Seeing them near, Liu Gui, who had been left to defend the city, poured out against them.
Thereupon Huang Zhong and Wei Yan, in spite of the nearness of the army of Liu Bei, refused battle and turned sway from the city. Liu Bei's army made a dash for two stockades, but when Zhang Ren came along the by-road, and the other three defenders of the city came on, the stockades could not be held, and Liu Bei's army had to retire.
Now fighting and now marching, the army of Liu Bei strove hard to reach River Fu Pass, but Zhang Ren pressed close.
However, Liu Feng and Guan Ping came up, and not only drove back the pursuers but chased them some seven miles. Finally, Liu Bei and his troops reached the Pass, weary and dispirited. His son and nephew returned from the pursuit with many horses they had captured from the flying enemy.
However, nothing had been gained and the victory lay rather with the army of the Western Land of River.
One of the fugitives from the army finally reached River Fu Pass and told Liu Bei of the sad news of Pang Tong, man and horse wounded to death.
Liu Bei turned his face to the west and mourned bitterly. Although the body of the slain leader lay far away, they instituted sacrifice to call the spirit, and all the generals keened for him.
Then said Huang Zhong, “Now that our leader is no more, certainly the enemy will return to attack the Pass. What is to be done?
I think we would better send to Jingzhou for Zhuge Liang and get him to lay plans for getting possession of the Western Land of Rivers.” And even then came in one to say that the enemy under Zhang Ren had come and were now offering a challenge at the rampart.
Huang Zhong and Wei Yan wished to go forth to fight, but Liu Bei disapproved, saying, “We have suffered a severe check, and the soldiers are low-spirited.
Let us rather remain on the defensive until the Directing Instructor can arrive.” Huang Zhong and Wei Yan made no objection, but set themselves to guard the Pass most vigilantly, while a letter was written to Zhuge Liang and sent by the hand of Guan Ping. He set forth at once, and Liu Bei gave himself up to holding the Pass.
In Jingzhou, it was the seventh day of the seventh moon, and in the evening Zhuge Liang invited his officers to a banquet. Conversation turned toward the enterprise in the Western Land of Rivers.
Suddenly a large and brilliant meteor appeared falling in the west, illuminating the whole sky.
It so disturbed the host that he dashed his wine cup to the ground, covered his face, and burst into tears.
Alas!” The guests eagerly asked him why he wept.
Zhuge Liang replied, “I knew by my calculations that the bowl of the Dipper would be in the west at this season and that the auspices would be unfavorable to leaders of armies, and lo!
the Heavens have gone against our army. When Venus was about to stand over Luocheng, I wrote to our lord warning him to be very cautious.
I never contemplated the falling of the star this evening.
Now Pang Tong is no more.” Again he fell to weeping. “My lord has lost an arm!” moaned he.
The guests were rather disturbed, but they only half believed that such a misfortune had happened. “We shall hear the sad news in a very few days,” said Zhuge Liang.
The banquet ended sadly enough, and the guests went their ways.
A few days later, while Zhuge Liang was sitting with Guan Yu and a few others, they reported the arrival of Guan Ping with letters from the west.
When the letters were opened, they knew that Pang Tong had fallen the same evening that the meteor had appeared.
Zhuge Liang wailed and the others wept with him.
Then Zhuge Liang said, “I must go to help our lord; he is hemmed in at the Pass and cannot move.” “If you go away, who will guard this region?” asked Guan Yu.
“It is of very great importance.” “Our lord has not written plainly, but I know what was in his mind.” Then he showed the letter to the others and said, “Provision for the defense of this region is laid upon me, and I am to find one equal to the task.
I read the letter to mean that he desires Guan Yu to undertake the defense, and I know that Guan Yu will do it for the sake of the pledge taken long ago in the Peach Garden.
The task is no light one.” Guan Yu accepted without hesitation or thought of excuse.
A special banquet was prepared at which the seal was to be handed over to him.
“All the future rests with you, General,” said Zhuge Liang as he raised the symbol of office to place it in the hands of the commander.
“When a person of honor accepts such a task, he is only released by death,” replied Guan Yu.
But that ill-omened word “death” displeased Zhuge Liang, and even then he would have retracted but that Guan Yu's word had gone forth. Zhuge Liang went on.
“Now if Cao Cao attack what is to be done?” said Zhuge Liang.
“Repel him with all my strength.” “But if Cao Cao and Sun Quan attack you together, what then?” “Fight both; half my force against each.” Zhuge Liang said, “In that case, Jingzhou would be in danger.
I will give you my advice in a few words, and if you remember them the region is safe.” “What are these few words?” asked Guan Yu. “North, fight Cao Cao; south, ally with Sun Quan.” “These words, O Commander, are engraved on my heart.” Thereupon the seal was placed in his hands.
Zhuge Liang also appointed tried and worthy people to assist the new commander. Guan Yu's civil staff included Ma Liang, Mi Zhu, Yi Ji, and Xiang Lang; and on military side, he was assisted by Mi Fang, Liao Hua, Guan Ping, and Zhou Cang. This done, Zhuge Liang began to prepare for his departure.
Zhang Fei, with ten thousand troops, was sent to fight his way into the country west of Bazhou and Luocheng, and he was to go with all speed. The earlier he got through, the greater merit would be his.
Zhao Yun was to lead a force up the Great River and make a junction at Luocheng.
Zhuge Liang, with his own body of fifteen thousand troops, would follow. Among those who followed Zhuge Liang was one Jiang Wan, a noted scholar from Lingling. Jiang Wan went as Secretary. Zhuge Liang and Zhang Fei set out the same day.
Just before leaving, the Directing Instructor said to Zhang Fei, “Do not think lightly of the soldiers of Yiazhou, for there are many mighty warriors among them.
On the march restrain your soldiers from plunder and license lest the ordinary people be against us.
Wherever you halt, be compassionate and kindly and do not give way to anger and flog your soldiers.
I shall expect you to reach Luocheng very soon.” Zhang Fei joyously mounted and left.
He marched rapidly, and on the way all places that surrendered suffered nothing whatever. When they drew near the county of Bazhou, the scouts of the Western Land of Rivers sent out by the Governor of that place informed their master, Yan Yan.
This Yan Yan was one of the famous generals of Yiazhou, and even then, although he was rather old, he had lost none of his boldness and could still pull the stiffest bow and wield the heaviest sword. Being so famous, Yan Yan was not the man to surrender at the first approach of an enemy. So when Zhang Fei came near, he cautiously encamped about three miles from the city. Thence he sent a messenger to summon the Governor to surrender.
Zhang Fei said, “Tell the old fool to give in, or I will trample down his walls and leave no soul alive.” Yan Yan had never favored inviting Liu Bei into Yiazhou.
When he had first heard of the Imperial Protector's intention, he said, “This is like calling a tiger to protect one when one is alone on a bare hill side.” When he heard of the seizure of River Fu Pass, he was very angry and offered again and again to lead an army and drive out the aggressors.
He had feared that his city would be attacked along this very road, so he had prepared his army, and when Zhang Fei's message came, he mustered them, five thousand or so, to oppose him.
Then a certain person said to Yan Yan, “You must be careful how you oppose a man who by the mere sound of his voice scared the many legions of Cao Cao at Long Slope Bridge.
Even Cao Cao himself was careful to keep out of his way.
Your safety is in defense, lying behind your ramparts and within your deep moats till hunger shall have vanquished your enemies.
This Zhang Fei has a very violent temper; and if he is provoked, he vents his anger in flogging his soldiers. If you avoid battle, he will be irritated; and his cruelty to his soldiers will cause them to mutiny.
Then you can attack and will succeed.” Yan Yan thought the advice good. He therefore resolved only to defend, and he set all his soldiers on the walls.
When one of Zhang Fei's soldiers came up to the gate and shouted for them to open, Yan Yan gave orders to open the gate and admit the man.
When the soldier had come within, he gave the message as has been related before.
But the Governor was exceedingly angry and said, “Fool that you are! How dare you speak thus to me?
Think you that I, General Yan Yan, will surrender to such as him.
By your mouth indeed will I send a message.” Then Yan Yan bade the executioner cut off the man's ears and nose. And thus mutilated he returned to Zhang Fei.
When Zhang Fei heard of it, his wrath boiled up and he cursed the defender of the city.
Grinding his teeth and glaring with rage, he put on his armor, mounted his steed, and went up close to the walls with a few mounted followers, and challenged those on the ramparts to fight him. But the defenders on the walls only replied with shameful abuse, and none accepted the challenge.
Zhang Fei galloped again and again to the drawbridge, only to be driven off each time with flights of arrows.
But not a man came outside the walls. As the day closed in, the warrior, still fuming with wrath, returned to his own camp.
Next day Zhang Fei again led his troops to the foot of the wall and challenged; again the challenge was refused.
But Yan Yan shot an arrow from the tower that struck Zhang Fei's helmet.
This angered him still more, and pointing the finger of disdain at his enemy, Zhang Fei cried, “I will capture you yet, you old fool, and then I will devour your flesh!” So again at eventide the troops of Jingzhou returned to camp bucking their desire.
On the third day Zhang Fei and his troops made the circuit of the city along the edge of the moat, hurling insults at their enemies.
It so happened that the city was set on a hill with rugged heights all round, so that going around it the assailants were sometimes on hill tops and sometimes on the level. While standing on one of the hills, Zhang Fei noticed that he could see clear down into the city.
There stood the defenders in their ranks, all ready for battle although none of them came out.
And the common people went to and fro carrying bricks and bringing stones to strengthen the defenses.
Then Zhang Fei ordered his horsemen to dismount and his footmen to sit down so that they could not be seen from the city. He hoped thus to cheat the defenders into thinking that there were none to attack and so induce them to come out.
But this also was vain, for still the defenders declined battle, and another day was lost.
The army once more returned to camp. That night Zhang Fei sat in his tent trying to think out some means to overcome an enemy that steadily refused to come out from behind the walls. Presently, however, the brain behind the knitted brows conceived a plan.
So next day, instead of sending all the troops to offer a challenge from the foot of the wall, Zhang Fei kept most of them in camp and sent only a few to howl insults and hurl abuse.
He hoped by this means to inveigle Yan Yan out to attack the small number of troops.
But this also failed, and he was left all day rubbing hid hands with impatience. Never a man appeared without the wall.
Foiled again, another ruse grew up behind his bushy eyebrows. He set his troops to cut firewood and seek out and explore the tracks that lay about the city. No longer did they challenge the wall. After some days of this, Yan Yan began to wonder what mischief was brewing, and he sent out spies, dressed as were the firewood cutters, to mingle with them and try to discover what was afoot.
That day, when the troops returned to camp, Zhang Fei sat in his tent stamping his foot with rage and execrating his enemy. “The old fool! Assuredly I shall die of disappointed wrath,” cried he.
Just then he noticed three or four soldiers lurking about his tent door as if they wished to speak with him. And one of them said, “General, do not let your heart be hot within you.
These last few days we have discovered a narrow road by which we can sneak past this city.” “Why did you not come and tell me before?” cried he.
“Because we have only lately discovered it,” said they. “I will lose no time then,” said he. “This very night let food be ready at the second watch, and we will break camp and steal away as silently as possible.
I will lead the way, and you shall go with me as guides.” The requisite orders were given.
Having made sure that the preparations for the march were really being made, the spies of the Governor returned into the city. “I guessed right, then,” said Yan Yan gleefully when the spies reported their success. “I cannot bear the fool.
He will now try to sneak past with his commissariat following, and I will cut off his rear.
How can he get through?
He is very stupid to fall thus into my trap.
All are to prepare for battle; the food is to be ready at the second watch, and the army is to move out at the third; we will hide in the woods and thickets till the greater part of the enemy's army has passed and Zhang Fei has arrived in the very throat of the road.
Then the blow will be struck.” They waited till night had fallen.
In due time the late meal was taken, the soldiers donned their armor, stole silently out of the city, and hid as they had been told. The Governor himself. with a few of his generals, went out also, dismounted and hid in a wood.
They waited till after the third watch. Then Zhang Fei came along, urging his troops to the top of their speed. His spear lay ready to thrust. He looked very handsome as he rode at the head of his army.
The carts were one or two miles in the rear. When the soldiers had got well past, Yan Yan gave the signal. The drums rolled out, up sprang the hidden troops and fell on the baggage train. The western troops began to plunder.
But suddenly a gong clanged and along came a company of soldiers Yan Yan had not seen.
At the same time a voice was heard shouting, “Old rebel, do not flee!
I have been waiting for this chance a long time.” Yan Yan turned his head. The leader of this band was a tall man with a leopard-like bullet head, round eyes, a sharp chin, and bristling tiger mustache. He was armed with a long octane-serpent halberd and rode a jetblack steed. In a word, it was Zhang Fei. All around the gongs were clanging, and many troops of Jingzhou were rushing toward Yan Yan, already too frightened to be able to defend himself. However, the two leaders engaged. Very soon Zhang Fei purposely gave his opponent an opening, and Yan Yan rushed in to cut down his enemy with his sword. But Zhang Fei evaded the blow, made a sudden rush, seized Yan Yan by the lace of his armor, and flung him on the ground.
Yan Yan was a prisoner, and in a moment was fast bound with cords.
The handsome leader who had passed first had not been Zhang Fei at all, but someone dressed and made up to resemble him.
To add to the confusion, Zhang Fei had exchanged the signals, making the gong the signal for his troops to fall on instead of the usual drum. As the gongs clanged, more and more of the troops of Jingzhou came into the fray.
The troops of Yiazhou could make no fight, and most of them dropped their weapons and surrendered. To reach the walls of the city was now easy.
After entering the gates, the leader ordered his soldiers not to hurt the people, and he put out proclamations to pacify the citizens.
By and by a party of executioners brought in the prisoner. Zhang Fei took his seat in the great hall, and the late commander of the city was brought before him by a party of executioners.
Yan Yan refused to kneel before his captor.
“Why did you not surrender at first?” cried Zhang Fei, angrily grinding his teeth.
“How dared you try to oppose me?” “Because you are a lot of unrighteous and lawless invaders!” replied Yan Yan without the least sign of fear.
“You may behead me as you will, but I will not surrender to you.” Zhang Fei angrily gave the order for his execution.
“Strike, if you want to, fool; why so angry?” said Yan Yan. This bold defiance was not lost upon Zhang Fei. Rising from his seat, he went down the steps, put aside the lictors, and began to loosen the prisoner's bonds. Then he dressed Yan Yan in new garments and led him to the high place.
When Yan Yan was seated, Zhang Fei made a low bow, saying, “I have always known you were a hero.
Now I pray you not remember against me the roughness of my speech.” Yan Yan was overcome with this kindness and forthwith surrendered.
A graybeard ruled in western Shu, Clear fame is his the whole world through, As radiant sun his loyalty.
Unmatched his soul's nobility.
When captive taken rather he Would suffer death than crook his knee.
Bazhou he ruled for many a year, The world cannot produce his peer. A poet has also written concerning Zhang Fei:
Yan Yan made prisoner, then the matchless one Exchanged the sword for reason, and so won The place he holds among the sacred ones Of the west, to whom they sacrifice today.
Then Zhang Fei asked Yan Yan to suggest the means of overcoming the Western Land of Rivers. Yan Yan replied, “I am but the defeated leader of a defeated force, indebted to the victor for my life.
I have nothing but my humble services to offer, but I can tell you how to get possession of Chengdu without drawing a bow or shooting an arrow.” Cities yield in quick succession Because of one old man's secession.
The proposal will be unfolded in the next chapter. CHAPTER 64. Zhuge Liang Plans For The Capture Of Zhang Ren; Yang Fu Borrows Soldiers To Destroy Ma Chao. As stated in the last chapter, Zhang Fei asked Yan Yan to tell him how he might conquer the whole of the Western Land of Rivers. This was the reply:
“All the fortified posts between this and Luocheng are under my control, and the commanders of all the garrisons owe to me their commissions. The only way for me to prove my gratitude is to make them all yield, as I myself have done.
Let me lead the advance, and I will summon them one by one to surrender.” Zhang Fei thanked him again and again, and the march on this plan began.
Whenever the army arrived at a post, Yan Yan summoned the commander, and there it ended.
Occasionally, one would hesitate, when Yan Yan would say, “You see I have submitted; how much more ought you to do so?” These bloodless victories followed each other day after day, supporters rallying to the invaders without question. They simply came. In the meantime, Zhuge Liang was preparing.
Having decided upon the date of departure, he wrote to inform Liu Bei and he made Luocheng the rendezvous for the various armies. On receipt of this letter, Liu Bei assembled his officers and explained to them its purport.
He bade them be ready to march on the twenty-second day of the seventh month. Both river and land forces were to set out the same day. But the fiery old man Huang Zhong was dissatisfied that there should be no local victory in the River Fu Pass. He said, “Day after day the enemy has come to challenge us, and day after day we have refused. They must have grown lax, and I propose a night raid on their camp. We shall catch them unprepared and shall score a victory.” Liu Bei agreed to try.
He arranged for a night raid, Huang Zhong on the right, Wei Yan on the left, and the center force under his own command.
They set out at the second watch and soon arrived. They found Zhang Ren's troops unprepared, rushed the camp, and set it on fire.
The flames were very fierce, and the troops of Yiazhou fled in confusion and sought shelter in Luocheng. They were admitted. After pursuing them for some distance, Liu Bei made a camp.
Next day Liu Bei marched right up to the city to besiege it.
Zhang Ren kept quiet within and made no attempt to beat off the besiegers.
On the fourth day Liu Bei led an attack on the west gate, sending Huang Zhong and Wei Yan to attack the east. The south gate was left to give the besieged a chance to escape if they would.
Now, outside the south gate of Luocheng the country was rough and hilly, while the swift River Fu ran past the north. For this reason the city could not be surrounded. From the city wall, Zhang Ren watched the progress of the attack and saw Liu Bei the whole day indefatigably going to and fro directing the assault.
He also saw that as the sun dropped toward the west, the attacking force showed signs of weariness.
Wherefore he sent his two generals, Wu Lan and Lei Tong, out of the city by the north gate with orders to make their way around and attack Huang Zhong and Wei Yan.
Zhang Ren said he himself would go out by the south gate and steal round to attack Liu Bei.
Lest the withdrawal of troops from the ramparts should discover his plans, he sent the populace up on the walls to make a show and bade them shout loudly to reinforce the rolling of the drums.
At sundown Liu Bei ordered the retirement of his army, and the rearmost company turned about to march back to camp.
At this moment arose still louder shouting from the ramparts, and out at the south gate burst Zhang Ren and his force.
Zhang Ren made straight for Liu Bei, who was in the middle of his army. Liu Bei's soldiers were thrown into confusion. As his two generals on the east side were also attacked, they could render no help, and Liu Bei fled to the hills.
Zhang Ren followed and soon got very near.
They were a whole company pursuing one solitary man, and as Liu Bei plied his whip he felt that the odds were much against him.
Just then he saw another company of soldiers ahead, emerging from a hill path. “An ambush in front; pursuers in rear!
Surely Heaven wishes to destroy me!” cried Liu Bei.
But all was not lost As they drew nearer, he recognized his own troops, and the leader who dashed to meet him was his brother Zhang Fei.
Zhang Fei and Yan Yan had happened to take that road, and Zhang Fei had hastened forward when he saw the dust of conflict.
Zhang Fei and Zhang Ren soon came up with each other, and they fought ten bouts. By this time Yan Yan with the main body had come up, and Zhang Ren turned and fled.
Zhang Fei followed and chased him as far as the city wall. The gate was opened to allow Zhang Ren to enter and at once shut. The drawbridge was raised. Then Zhang Fei returned to his elder brother to report his arrival and the incidents of the way.
Hearing that Zhuge Liang had not yet arrived, Zhang Fei rejoiced, saying, “So I have the credit of first arrival although he is traveling by river.” Liu Bei said, “But how is it you have come so quickly seeing the precipitous road you had to travel?
Did you meet no opposition?” Zhang Fei replied, “The fact is I have taken the forty-five garrisons on the way by making use of General Yan Yan, whom I captured. It was not my own merit at all.
I have come all the way without the least effort.” Zhang Fei told the story of Yan Yan's capture and services from beginning to end, and then presented the man himself.
Liu Bei said, “General, my brother's speedy arrival is certainly owing to your help.” Whereupon Liu Bei took off the golden chain mantle he was wearing and gave it to his new ally.
Orders were given for a banquet.
While it was being prepared, a messenger came to report, saying, “Huang Zhong and Wei Yan had been fighting with Wu Lan and Lei Tong and had held their own, till enemy reinforcements led by Wu Yi and Liu Gui arrived. Huang Zhong and Wei Yan then fled eastward.” Zhang Fei at once asked his brother to go with him to rescue them. Both went.
When Wu Yi and Liu Gui saw the army of Jingzhou coming, they retired into the city.
Wu Lan and Lei Tong continued the pursuit.
The coming of Liu Bei and Zhang Fei threatened their rear, and Huang Zhong and Wei Yan turned and recommenced the battle.
Wu Lan and Lei Tong were thus between two fires and helpless.
They offered to surrender and were received. Liu Bei returned to his own camp near the city.
The loss of his two generals grieved Zhang Ren sorely. He called his remaining two and asked advice.
They proposed to risk all in one desperate battle while they sent to Chengdu to tell their master of their sorry plight. Zhang Ren agreed.
Said he, “Tomorrow I will go and challenge them. If they accept and come out to fight, I will feign retreat and inveigle them round to the north side of the city.
As they follow me, a sortie must be made when they pass the gate so as to cut their army in two. We ought to overcome them in this way.” “Let me lead the sortie,” said Wu Yi.
“General Liu Gui can stay to help our lord's son Liu Xun guard the city.” This also was agreed to.
Next morning Zhang Ren went out to offer the challenge, his troops waving flags and shouting lustily. At once Zhang Fei took up the challenge and rode out.
He stayed not to parley, but galloped up to Zhang Ren and engaged him.
After about ten bouts Zhang Ren seemed to be getting worsted, so he turned and fled, taking the way around the north of the city.
Zhang Fei pursued him with all speed. Then as he passed the gate, Wu Yi made a sortie so that Zhang Fei was between two forces and unable to get clear. Zhang Ren turned back to attack. Zhang Fei seemed in a parlous state.
But at this very moment a body of soldiers came up from the river-side and a fierce warrior rode straight for Wu Yi, and in the first bout made him prisoner; his troops were then forced back, and Zhang Fei was free.
It was Zhao Yun who had so opportunely appeared.
“Where is the Directing Instructor?” asked Zhang Fei.
“He has arrived; I think he has already seen our lord,” replied Zhao Yun.
The prisoner was carried to the camp where Zhuge Liang was.
Zhang Fei dismounted and went in to greet him.
Zhuge Liang was surprised, and said, “How comes it that you arrived before me?” Liu Bei told the story of Zhang Fei's prudence and sagacity in dealing with Yan Yan.
Zhuge Liang congratulated Zhang Fei and said, “When Zhang Fei behaves with such skill, my lord's good fortune is indeed ample.” When the prisoner was taken in, Liu Bei asked him if he would surrender.
Wu Yi replied, “Why not, seeing I am a prisoner?” Thereupon Liu Bei himself loosed his bonds. Zhuge Liang began to question him upon the defense.
Wu Yi told him the names of the officers, saying, “The son of the Imperial Protector, Liu Xun, and his generals Liu Gui and Zhang Ren are the defenders.
Liu Gui does not count for much, but Zhang Ren is a man to be avoided.” “Then before we can get the city we must capture Zhang Ren,” said Zhuge Liang.
“There is a bridge on the east; what is it called?” “It is known as the 'Bridge of the Golden Goose.'“ Zhuge Liang rode over to the bridge and scrutinized the neighborhood.
After his return to camp, he summoned Huang Zhong and Wei Yan for orders. To them he said, “On the east of the city is a bridge called the Bridge of the Golden Goose, and about two miles south of this I saw a dense growth of reed and sedge which would afford excellent shelter.
Wei Yan is to lead a thousand spearmen to the left and attack, but only attack horsemen.
Huang Zhong will lead a thousand swordsmen who are to cut the horses.
When Zhang Ren has lost most of his troops and horses, he will flee by the hill road, where he will fall into an ambush of Zhang Fei.” Next Zhao Yun was called and sent to lie in ambush close to the bridge, which he was to destroy as soon as the enemy had crossed. That done, Zhao Yun was to take up a position beyond the bridge to prevent the enemy from getting away to the north. Forced to the south, their destruction would be inevitable.
These arrangements made, Zhuge Liang himself went to challenge the enemy and try to bring them to battle.
Imperial Protector Liu Zhang had sent two generals, Zhang Yi and Zhuo Ying, to reinforce Zhang Ren.
Zhang Ren sent Zhang Yi to the help of Liu Gui in the city, while Zhuo Ying was to march second with Zhang Ren himself to encounter the enemy.
Zhuge Liang led across the bridge a mob of disorderly looking soldiers, all in disarray, whom he drew up as if they were a fighting force. He himself, dressed in a simple robe and toying with a fan, took his seat in a small fourwheeled carriage. A few horsemen caracoling gaily to and fro formed his escort. Having crossed the bridge, Zhuge Liang halted and pointed to Zhang Ren, saying, “Dare you withstand me and not surrender when Cao Cao's million troops fled at my name?” But the enemy leader was rather occupied with inspecting the disorderly lot of soldiers he saw in front, all standing anyhow and not drawn up into formation at all.
With a cynical smile, Zhang Ren said, “People talk of Zhuge Liang's superhuman military genius; I say his reputation is false.” With that Zhang Ren whirled his spear about his head, and he dashed forward with all his troops.
As he came, Zhuge Liang left his carriage, mounted a horse, and retired to the far side of the bridge.
Zhang Ren impetuously pursued and rushed over the Bridge of the Golden Goose. It was only when he had reached the other side that he saw a body of soldiers on either hand. Then he knew that he had been led into a trap. As soon as he had got across the bridge, the two bodies of soldiers under Liu Bei and Yan Yan came to the attack.
Zhang Ren turned to get back to the bridge, but Zhao Yun had done his work and the bridge was in ruins.
Zhang Ren made to turn sway north, but Zhao Yun's troops stopped the way so he had to turn southward and followed the course of the river.
He presently reached the place where grew the reeds and sedges.
Out came Wei Yan and his company of spearmen, who stabbed at the horsemen fiercely while Huang Zhong, with his swordsmen, cut down the horses.
Soldiers and horses were soon lying on the ground. The few survivors were quickly made prisoners and bound with cords. No footman escaped.
But a few lucky horsemen followed Zhang Ren and got away to the hills.
There they met Zhang Fei, who fell upon them with a mighty roar, scattered the few followers, and captured the leader.
Seeing Zhang Ren a prisoner, his second in command Zhuo Ying turned toward Zhao Yun and surrendered.
Victorious, they returned to camp.
Liu Bei rewarded Zhuo Ying. When the leader Zhang Ren was led in by Zhang Fei, Zhuge Liang was seated beside his lord.
“Why have you held out so long after all the other generals of Yiazhou have yielded?” said Liu Bei.
“Can a loyal servant take a second master?” cried Zhang Ren fiercely, his eyes glaring with hate.
“You do not know the times; submission means life.” “I might submit today, but it would not endure. I should repent it.
You would better slay me.” Liu Bei was inclined to mercy, but the prisoner was irreconcilable and kept up a stream of furious abuse.
So at last the order was given for his execution, thus giving him a right to fame. A poem says:
No second lord the heroic servant knows, The way of death Zhang Ren contented goes.
Clear shines his fame as doth the heavenly moon That nightly lights the ramparts of Luocheng Town. Liu Bei grieved for Zhang Ren, although Zhang Ren had been an enemy, for he was a brave man.
Zhang Ren was given honorable burial, sepulture beside the Bridge of the Golden Goose, where all the passers-by would be reminded of his loyalty.
Next day the army moved on to Luocheng, Yan Yan and the other generals who had submitted leading the way.
At the gate they hailed the wardens and called upon them to surrender, whereby the city should be saved from utter destruction.
From the wall, Liu Gui abused the treacherous Yan Yan and took his bow to shoot.
But just as Liu Gui was fitting the arrow to the string, another man cut him down. Soon the gates were thrown open and the city had yielded.
As Liu Bei entered the city by one gate, Liu Xun, who had shared the command of the city, escaped by another gate and set off for Chengdu. Liu Bei put forth proclamations to allay the fears of the inhabitants of the city.
He inquired who had been on his side in cutting down Liu Gui and was told it was Zhang Yi of Wuyang.
Zhang Yi and all who had helped in the capture were amply rewarded. “Our next city is Chengdu,” said Zhuge Liang.
“However, in the meantime there may be some trouble in pacifying the outlying counties, and hence it will be well for you to send Zhang Fei and Zhao Yun with Wu Yi, Zhang Yi, Yan Yan, and Zhuo Ying leading the way, into the country along the river and Changyang, Deyang, and Baxi to reassure the people and to repress any rising that may take place.
There will be no need for any especial precautions in the neighborhood of Chengdu.” The warriors went their ways, and then Zhuge Liang began to make careful inquiries concerning the road to Chengdu.
Those who had given in their allegiance to the invaders said, “The only place where you can expect any serious defense is Mianzhu.
Once you have passed this, the capital lies at your mercy.” Then Fa Zheng was consulted. Said he, “With the fall of Luocheng, the Western Land of Rivers passed to you.
Let our lord only deal with the people kindly and justly, and there will be no need of weapons.
I can write such a letter to Imperial Protector Liu Zhang as shall make him surrender at call.” “That would be most excellent,” said Zhuge Liang.
The letter was written and sent by the hand of a messenger.
Liu Xun, son of the Imperial Protector, presently reached Chengdu and told his father of the loss of Luocheng.
The Imperial Protector at once called his counselors together, and Adviser Zheng Du said, “Although Liu Bei has been successful and captured cities and towns, yet his army is but small, his hosts are not near him, and he depends upon chance for his grain and has no proper supplies.
Therefore our best plan is to remove the people of Baxi and Zitong to the farther side of River Fu, burn all the granaries, fortify the city, and let starvation defeat him.
Let us reject all challenges to battle, and in a hundred days his troops will go off of their own accord.
Then we can do with him as we will.” “I like not the plan,” said Liu Zhang.
“Oppose invaders in order that tranquillity may prevail is a well-worn maxim, but till now I have never heard of disturbing the people in order to oppose the march of an enemy.
Your words are not such as safety.” Just at the moment the letter from Fa Zheng arrived.
It was opened and the Imperial Protector read:
“I was sent to Jingzhou to negotiate an alliance, but the opposition of those about you to their lord has resulted in the present situation.
However, the ruler of Jingzhou still remembers old friendship and is mindful of the ties of relationship.
If you, my master, could reverse your policy and lend your support to your relative, I think you would be generously treated.
I hope you will consider this carefully.” Liu Zhang flew into a passion.
He tore the letter to fragments and began to abuse its writer, crying, “That traitor, ingrate, and renegade! How dares he talk thus to me?” And Liu Zhang drove the bearer of the letter from his presence.
He then sent an army under the leadership of Fei Guan, his wife's brother, to reinforce Mianzhu.
Fei Guan at once recommended as his assistant one Li Yan of Nanyang, and the two mustered their troops, thirty thousand, and set out for the city.
At this juncture Dong He, the Governor of Yiazhou City, wrote advising to borrow aid from Hanzhong, but Liu Zhang rejected this plan, saying, “It will be useless to try to obtain help from a region under the influence of our relentless enemy Zhang Lu.” Dong He replied, “He may be an enemy, but Liu Bei is in possession of Luocheng, and the situation is extremely dangerous. When the lips are gone, the teeth are cold.
If you clearly indicate the dangers to him, he must come to our help.” So a letter was written and sent to Hanzhong. Two years had elapsed since Ma Chao had been defeated and gone over to the Qiang tribes in the northwest. He had made friends with them and with their aid had conquered portions of Longxi. His expeditions had been very successful, the people opening their gates at the first summons.
Only Jicheng had stood out, but ever this was on the point of yielding.
The Governor of Jicheng, Wei Kang, had sent many urgent appeals for help to Xiahou Yuan, who, however, would do nothing without his master's order.
Wei Kang was in despair, and at a council his officers advised him to yield.
However, one of them, Yang Fu, earnestly opposed yielding, saying, “We cannot surrender to a lot of rebels such as are Ma Chao and his colleagues.” “What is there to hope for?” asked Wei Kang despairingly.
Although Yang Fu besought Wei Kang with bitterness to hold out, it was useless; Wei Kang rejected his advice, opened the city gates, and bowed his head in submission.
“You only yield now as the last resource,” cried Ma Chao, angry at the delay he had suffered.
“This is no real submission.” Whereupon he put to death Wei Kang and all his family to the number of two score. But when one told Ma Chao that Yang Fu had been really responsible for the long delay, in that Yang Fu had urged his master to hold out, Ma Chao did not put him to death but praised him and said, “Yang Fu had but done his duty.” Ma Chao further showed his approval by employing Yang Fu and two of his friends in his own army.
These two friends were named Liang Kuan and Zhao Qu.
One day Yang Fu went to his new chief and said, “My wife has died in Lintao; I wish to take leave for two months to bury her.” Wherefore Yang Fu was granted leave and went away from the army.
On the way, he went to his maternal cousin, General Jiang Xu, Commander of Licheng.
The general's mother, then an old lady of eighty-two was Yang Fu's aunt. When Yang Fu saw her, he wept before her, saying, “Behold an unfortunate man!
The city I had to defend is lost; my master is dead; and I have survived him. I am ashamed to look you in the face.
Now this Ma Chao ravages the countryside, and everyone hates him. Yet my cousin sits still and does nothing against Ma Chao. Is this fitting conduct for a state servant?” Yang Fu wept bitterly.
The old lady was moved by his grief, called in her son and said to him reproachfully, “You are the cause of the evil that has come upon the noble Wei Kang.” Then turning once more toward Yang Fu, she said, “But what can now be done?
You have surrendered and, more than that, you have accepted service under your late enemy.” “It is true,” replied Yang Fu.
“I have surrendered and I have accepted service, but it is with the desire to preserve my miserable life till I can avenge my master.” “A bold man is Ma Chao, and difficult to destroy,” said Jiang Xu.
“Not very difficult,” replied Yang Fu, “for though he is bold, yet he is unskillful.
Already I have two friends Liang Kuan and Zhao Qu by his side, and they would help against him if you, my brother, would only supply a force.” “What is to be gained by delay?” then said the old lady.
“Is there any who will not have to die? To perish in the way of loyalty and righteousness is to die in the right path.
Do not think of me, for if you do, and heed not the call of your cousin, then will I die at once so that you may be free to make up your mind.” There was now no excuse for delay, and Jiang Xu had to act.
He summoned two of his officers, Zhao Ang and Yin Feng, and took counsel with them.
Now Zhao Ang had a son, Zhao Yue, who was an officer in the army of Ma Chao. When Zhao Ang had to consent to take part against his son's chief, he became very unhappy and went home to talk over it with his wife, Lady Wang. He said, “I have today been led into a scheme to destroy Ma Chao and avenge Wei Kang.
But there is our son there in Ma Chao's service, and Ma Chao will certainly put our son to death as soon as he hears that we are arming against him.
What is to be done?” But his wife replied angrily, “Should anyone grudge even his life to avenge his liege lord or his father? How much less a son?
My lord, if you let the thought of your son stay your hand, then will I die forthwith.” This decided the matter, and without further parley Zhao Ang decided to share the expedition and set about preparations.
The army was soon on the way.
Jiang Xu and Yang Fu camped at the city of Licheng; Zhao Ang and Yin Feng camped at Qishan.
The wife of Zhao Ang sold her ornaments and went in person to her husband's camp to feast his soldiers. The fears of Zhao Ang concerning the fate of his son were only too soon justified. At the first news of the march of an army against him, Ma Chao beheaded the young Zhao Yue.
Then Ma Chao marched his force, together with Pang De and Ma Dai, to Licheng, and the troops under Jiang Xu and Yang Fu went out to oppose it.
The two leaders on the avenging side went to battle dressed in mourning white. They railed at Ma Chao, crying, “Wicked traitor!
Rebel!” Ma Chao angrily dashed across toward them, and the fight began. From the very first it was seen that the defenders of the city could not hope to beat off the attack, and they turned to flee.
Ma Chao pursued them.
But soon he heard the shouting of soldiers behind him and found the other army led by Zhao Ang and Yin Feng was attacking his rear.
Wherefore he was between two armies and had a double battle to fight. As he turned toward that in his rear, Jiang Xu and Yang Fu returned again to the attack.
And while engaged with these two, there suddenly appeared a third force under Xiahou Yuan, who had just received orders from Cao Cao to come against Ma Chao.
Three attacks at once were too much for Ma Chao, and he fled, his force in utter confusion.
He retreated all that night and at dawn reached his own city of Jicheng. He hailed the gate, but a flight of arrows was the response.
Soon after, Liang Kuan and Zhao Qu appeared and reviled him from the ramparts above.
More than this, they dragged his wife, Lady Yang, up upon the wall, hacked her before his face, and threw the bloody body at his feet.
They followed up this by the murder in like manner of his three sons and other members of his family to the number of ten and more. And all their dead bodies were flung from the wall.
Rage and despair filled Ma Chao's bosom; he almost fell from his steed.
But little time was allowed to grieve, for Xiahou Yuan was nearly upon him.
Knowing that he could not oppose this force with any chance of victory, he made no battle line, but set off with two of his generals, Ma Dai and Pang De, to cut his way through such parties of the enemy as they might meet.
Their sole object was escape, so when they fell upon Yang Fu and Jiang Xu, they only fought to get through, and in the same way they cut an arterial alley through the army under Yin Feng and Zhao Ang.
However, they lost most of their few followers, and at the end had only some sixty horsemen left. About the fourth watch they came to Licheng. In the darkness, the gate guards, thinking only of the return of their own troops, opened the gates and unwittingly let in the enemy.
Once in the city Ma Chao and his followers began the slaughter, and every one, soldier or common person, was slain, till the city was swept clear from the south gate to the very center.
Presently they came to the residence of Jiang Xu and dragged forth his aged mother.
She showed no sign of fear, but reviled Ma Chao till in his anger he slew her with his own sword.
Thence they went to the house of Yin Feng and Zhao Ang and slew all they found therein.
The only person who escaped the massacre was Lady Wang, wife of Zhao Ang, who had accompanied her husband. But the city proved no place of safety.
Xiahou Yuan with his army appeared the following day, and Ma Chao fled before him to the west.
But ere he had gone seven miles, he came face to face with another army drawn up in battle array. Yang Fu was the leader.
Grinding his teeth with rage, Ma Chao set his spear and rode at Yang Fu, while his two generals, Ma Dai and Pang De, attacked the rear.
Yang Fu was overcome, and his seven brothers who had gone with him into the battle were slain.
Yang Fu himself was wounded in five places, but still fought on till he was wounded down.
However, Xiahou Yuan had not left pursuing Ma Chao. He came up to the city, and Ma Chao fled before him to the west.
His army was now reduced to the two generals and about five or six of horsemen, and these few were left to go their way.
Cao Cao's general, Xiahou Yuan, set himself to restore order and tranquillity in the region of Xizhou, after which he apportioned its defense among Jiang Xu and other trustworthy commanders.
The wounded leader Yang Fu was sent to the capital in a carriage. When he arrived Xuchang, he saw Cao Cao who offered him the title of Lordship.
But Yang Fu declined the honor, saying, “I have neither the credit of a successful defense nor the merit of death with my master. Death should be my portion rather than honors.
How could I accept the offer?” Cao Cao praised him and insisted on granting the lordship.
Having escaped from their pursuers, Ma Chao and his few followers decided to make for Hanzhong and offer their services to Governor Zhang Lu.
Zhang Lu received them gladly, for he thought with such help he could certainly get possession of Yiazhou on the west as well as repel Cao Cao on the east. More than this, he thought to cement the friendship by giving Ma Chao a daughter to wife.
But this displeased one of his generals, Yang Bo. “The misfortune that befell Ma Chao's wife and family was entirely the fault of his own misconduct.
Would you give your daughter to such as he to wife?” said Yang Bo. Zhang Lu again considered the matter and abandoned his intention.
But a certain busybody told Ma Chao what had been proposed and that Yang Bo had defeated the scheme.
Whereupon Ma Chao was very annoyed and sought to compass the death of Yang Bo.
Yang Bo and his brother, Yang Song, on the other side conspired to destroy Ma Chao.
At this time a messenger from Liu Zhang of Yiazhou arrived in Hanzhong begging for assistance against the invader Liu Bei.
Zhang Lu refused help. But then Huang Quan came on the same errand.
He first saw Yang Song and talked to him and brought him to favor the scheme. Huang Quan said, “The Eastern and Western Lands of Rivers, which stand next each other as the lips are close to the teeth, are interdependent.
If Yiazhou is lost, Hanzhong has little chance to survive.
On the other hand, once relieved by your help, Imperial Protector Liu Zhang will reward twenty counties to Hanzhong as compensation.” So Huang Quan won over Yang Song, who led him to see his master.
To Zhang Lu again Huang Quan spoke forcibly and laid the matter before him so cogently that Zhang Lu promised his help.
Yan Pu, one of Zhang Lu's officers, tried to dissuade him by pointing out the old enmity between him and Liu Zhang, but another suddenly interjected, saying, “Useless I may be, but if you will give me troops, I will capture this Liu Bei and you will retain all your land.” The land's true lord goes west and then Hanzhong sends forth its bravest men. Who made this bold offer? The next chapter will tell.
CHAPTER 65. Ma Chao Battles At Jiameng Pass; Liu Bei Takes The Protectorship Of Yiazhou.
It was Yan Pu who thus opposed sending help to Liu Zhang. Then Ma Chao rose and said, “I have been the recipient of much kindness from my lord, which I feel I can never repay adequately. Now let me lead an army to take Jiameng Pass and capture Liu Bei. Then, my lord, Liu Zhang will surely lose his twenty counties, and they shall be yours.” This offer rejoiced Zhang Lu, who sent away Huang Quan without an answer and told off twenty thousand for Ma Chao to lead.
Pang De was too ill to take part in the expedition, so he remained in Hanzhong.
Zhang Lu ordered Yang Bo to be Army Supervisor. Ma Chao and Ma Dai chose the day to march to Jiameng Pass. Meanwhile, the messenger sent by Fa Zheng had returned to Luocheng to report:
“Zheng Du advised Liu Zhang to set fire to all the plains and valleys between the capital and the invaders, as well as the granaries, to move sway the people, and to stand solely on the defensive.” This news caused Liu Bei and Zhuge Liang great anxiety, for it would be a grave danger to them. However, Fa Zheng was more sanguine.
“Do not be anxious,” said he, “the plan would be extremely harmful, but it will not be carried out.
Liu Zhang will not do that.” Surely enough, very soon they heard that Liu Zhang had not adopted the suggestion; he would not remove the people. It was a great relief to Liu Bei.
Then said Zhuge Liang, “Now let us capture Mianzhu quickly, for, that done, Chengdu is as good as ours.” Liu Bei therefore told off Huang Zhong and Wei Yan to advance first.
When Commander of Mianzhu, Fei Guan, heard of their advance, he ordered Li Yan to go out to stop them, and Li Yan led out three thousand troops.
The two sides being arrayed, Huang Zhong rode out and fought some half hundred bouts with Li Yan. Neither was able to claim a victory, and so Zhuge Liang from the midst of the host ordered them to beat the gongs to cease from battle.
When Huang Zhong had got back to his side again, he said, “O Instructor, why did you sound the retirement just as I was getting the better of my opponent?” “Because I saw that Li Yan was not to be overcome by mere force.
Tomorrow you shall fight again, and then you shall lead him into the hills by the ruse of pretended defeat. There will be a surprise awaiting him.” Huang Zhong agreed to try this plan, and so on the morrow accepted Li Yan's challenge when it was offered.
After about the tenth bout, Huang Zhong and his troops pretended to be worsted and ran.
Li Yan pursued and was quickly lured into the mountains.
Suddenly his danger flashed into his mind, and he turned to go back.
But he found Wei Yan's troops drawn up across his path, while Zhuge Liang from a hill top near by cried, “You would better yield; if not, there are bows and crossbows on both sides of you—all ready to avenge the death of our Pang Tong.” Li Yan dropped off his horse, threw aside his armor, and offered submission.
Not a soldier of his had been hurt. The prisoner was conducted to Liu Bei, who was very affable and so won Li Yan's heart that Li Yan offered to try to seduce Fei Guan from his allegiance.
“Though he is related to Liu Zhang, yet Fei Guan and I are very close friends.
Let me go and persuade him.” Wherefore Li Yan was sent back to the city to induce his chief to come over to Liu Bei's side.
Li Yan talked to such effect of the kindness and virtues of Liu Bei that Fei Guan was won over, opened the city gates, and admitted the invaders.
As soon as Liu Bei had entered Mianzhu, he set out his forces to take the capital.
While thus engaged, a hasty messenger came to tell of the doings at Jiameng Pass: “There suddenly appeared an army from the east under Ma Chao, Ma Dai, and Yang Bo. They are attacking, and the Pass will certainly be lost if help is not sent quickly.” “We need both Zhang Fei and Zhao Yun for this,” remarked Zhuge Liang.
“Then we could oppose successfully.” “But Zhao Yun is away,” said Liu Bei. “However, Zhang Fei is here.
Let us send him quickly.” “Do not say anything, my lord,” said Zhuge Liang.
“Let me stir him to fight his noblest.” But as soon as Zhang Fei heard of the danger, he came rushing in, shouting, “I must say farewell, Brother!
I am off to fight Ma Chao.” However, Zhuge Liang made as if he heard not and said to Liu Bei, “That Ma Chao has invaded Jiameng Pass, and we have no one to drive him back.
Nobody can stand up to him, unless we can get Guan Yu from Jingzhou.
Guan Yu could do it.” “Why do you despise me, O Instructor?” cried Zhang Fei.
“Did I not once drive back a whole army with my mere voice?
Think you that I mind a stupid fool like Ma Chao?” Zhuge Liang said, “Yes, Zhang Fei; but when you forced back the waters and broke the bridge in the Long Slope, you succeeded because your enemies were doubtful.
If they had known, General, you would not have come off so easily.
All the world knows this Ma Chao and has heard about his six battles at River Wei; and how he made Cao Cao cut off his beard and throw away his robe. Ma Chao very nearly slew Cao Cao too.
This is no lightsome task like that, and even Guan Yu might fail.” “All I care for is to go, and if I do not overcome this fellow, I will take the consequences.” “Well, if you will put that in writing, you may lead the attack.
And I will ask our lord to lead another army to back you up this time.
He can leave the defense of this town to me till Zhao Yun returns.” “I also want to go,” said Wei Yan.
Wei Yan was allowed to go with five hundred of light horse in advance of Zhang Fei. Liu Bei marched third.
Wei Yan and his scouts soon arrived at Jiameng Pass and there fell in with Yang Bo.
They engaged; but after a few bouts Yang Bo fled.
At this success Wei Yan was seized with ambition to rival it and try to snatch the credit that would fall to Zhang Fei. So he pursued.
But he presently came across a line of battle all drawn up, the commander being Ma Dai.
Wei Yan, thinking it was the redoubtable Ma Chao, rode toward him whirling his sword.
Soon Ma Dai turned and ran away, and Wei Yan followed him. However, Ma Dai presently turned back and shot an arrow, which wounded Wei Yan in the left arm, so that he left the pursuit and turned his face the other way. Then Ma Dai came after him and chased Wei Yan nearly up to the Pass.
Here Ma Dai was suddenly confronted by a fierce thunder-roaring leader who dashed down from the Pass as on a flying steed.
It was Zhang Fei, who had just arrived. Hearing the noise of battle below the Pass, Zhang Fei had come to learn what it meant and saw the arrow wound Wei Yan. Soon Zhang Fei was in the saddle and off to the rescue; but before he engaged, he would ascertain if the foe was worthy of his steel.
“Who are you?
Tell your name,” cried Zhang Fei, “then I may fight with you.” “I am Ma Dai of Xiliang.” “As you are not Ma Chao, go away quickly, for you are no match for me.
You may bid Ma Chao himself come, and tell him that Zhang Fei of Yan is here.” “How dare you treat me with contempt?” cried Ma Dai in hot anger, and he came galloping up with his spear set ready to thrust.
But after a half score bouts he fled.
Zhang Fei was about to pursue when a rider came up to him hastily, crying, “Do not pursue, my brother.” The rider was Liu Bei and Zhang Fei stopped. The two returned together to the Pass.
“I knew your impulsive temper, and so I followed you.
Since you have got the better of him, you may well rest and recuperate for the fight tomorrow with Ma Chao.” The rolling of drums at dawn next day declared the arrival of Ma Chao. Liu Bei looked at the array from a point of vantage and saw Ma Chao emerge from the shadow of his great standard.
Ma Chao wore a lion helmet, and his belt was clasped with the shaggy head of a wild beast.
His breastplate was silver and his robe of white. As his dress and bearing were so extraordinary, so were his abilities superior. And Liu Bei looked at him, sighing admiringly.
“He justifies what people say,” said Liu Bei, “Handsome Ma Chao.” Zhang Fei was for going down at once, but his brother once more checked him, saying, “No; not yet.
Avoid the first keenness of his fighting ardor.” Thus below was Ma Chao challenging Zhang Fei, while, above, Zhang Fei was fretting at being unable to settle Ma Chao. Time after time Zhang Fei was setting out, but each time his brother checked him.
And so it continued till past midday, when Liu Bei, noticing signs of fatigue and weariness among Ma Chao's army, decided that it was time to let Zhang Fei try his fortune. Whereupon Liu Bei chose out five hundred horsemen to accompany his brother and let the party go.
Ma Chao seeing Zhang Fei coming with so small a force, signaled with his spear to his array to retire a bowshot, and Zhang Fei's troops halted.
When all his troops had taken their places, Zhang Fei set octane-serpent halberd and rode out. “Do you know who I am?” shouted Zhang Fei.
“I am Zhang Fei of Yan!” Ma Chao replied, “My family having been noble for many generations; I am not likely to know any rustic dolts!” This reply upset Zhang Fei, and in a moment the two steeds were rushing toward each other, both men with poised spears.
The fight began and continued for a hundred bouts. Neither had the advantage.
“A veritable tiger of a leader,” sighed Liu Bei.
But Liu Bei felt that Zhang Fei was running a risk, wherefore he sounded the gong as a signal to cease the fight. And each drew off to his own side.
Zhang Fei rested his steed for a time, then, leaving his helmet, he wound a turban about his head, mounted, and rode out to renew the fight.
Ma Chao also came out, and the duel continued. Presently Liu Bei thought his brother in danger. So he girded on his armor and went down into the plain.
He watched till they had fought another hundred bouts, and then as both seemed to wax fiercer than ever, he gave the signal again to cease the battle.
Both drew off and returned each to his own side.
It was then getting late, and Liu Bei said to his brother, “You would better retire for today; he is a terrible opponent. Try him again tomorrow.” But Zhang Fei's spirit was roused, and was it likely that such advice would be palatable?
“No,” shouted he, “I will die and not come back!” “But it is late; you cannot go on fighting,” said Liu Bei.
“Let them bring torches, and we will have a night battle,” said Zhang Fei.
Ma Chao having mounted a fresh steed, now rode out and shouted, “Dare you try a night battle, Zhang Fei?” Zhang Fei's excitement rose higher. He hastily changed horses with his brother and rode forth. “If I do not capture you, I will not go back to the Pass,” said Zhang Fei.
“And if I do not overcome you, I will not return to the camp,” said Ma Chao. Both sides cheered.
They lit many thousand torches till it seemed as light as day, and the two great generals went to the front to fight.
At the twentieth bout Ma Chao turned his steed and tied.
“Whither are you going?” called out Zhang Fei.
The fact was that Ma Chao had begun to see he could not win in direct and simple combat, so he thought to try a ruse. By a false flight, as though he knew he had lost, he would inveigle Zhang Fei into pursuit. He picked up a copper mace secretly and kept a careful watch on his opponent for the most favorable moment to strike.
But Ma Chao's flight only put Zhang Fei upon his guard, and when the moment came for the blow with the mace he dodged, so that the weapon flew harmlessly past his ear. Then Zhang Fei turned his horse. Whereupon Ma Chao began to pursue. Then Zhang Fei pulled up, took his bow, fitted an arrow to the string, and let fly at Ma Chao.
But Ma Chao also dodged, and the arrow flew by.
Then each returned to his own side.
Then Liu Bei came out to the front of his battle line and called out, “Note well, O Ma Chao, that I, who have never treated people other than with kindness and justice and truth and sincerity, swear that I will not take advantage of your period of repose to pursue or attack.
Wherefore you may rest awhile in peace.” Ma Chao, hearing these words, withdrew guarding the rear, and the other generals one by one returned, while Liu Bei drew off his army toward the Pass.
Early next day Zhang Fei was once more going down out of the Pass to fight, when they told him that the Directing Instructor had arrived. Liu Bei went to receive him, and Zhuge Liang at once began to speak of Ma Chao. “He is the most terrible leader of the age; if he fights a desperate battle with Zhang Fei, loss of a general will ensue. So I have come as quickly as I could.
I left Mianzhu in the safe hands of Zhao Yun and Huang Zhong.
I think I have a little ruse left that will bring Ma Chao over to our side.” “Now I have seen the man. I greatly admire him,” said Liu Bei. “If we could only win him over!” “Then listen, my lord,” said Zhuge Liang.
“Zhang Lu greatly desires the title of 'Prince of Hanzhong.' Among his most intimate subordinates, I know Yang Song open to bribery.
So we will send a person secretly to see him and give him gold and silver and so win his support. This done, we will write to Zhang Lu and tell him that you are set upon taking Yiazhou from its present ruler, which will give an opportunity to wipe out the enmity he has so long nourished against Liu Zhang, and that the reward of his remaining firmly on our side to the end will be that you will memorialize the Throne for the coveted title for him.
This will make him order Ma Chao to return, and, when that is done, I shall find a means of winning him over.” Liu Bei wrote a letter and sent it by the hand of Sun Qian together with gold and pearls.
Sun Qian went by secret roads to give these to Yang Song.
And when he found Yang Song and explained his mission in private, he was quickly led into the presence of Zhang Lu.
“How can Liu Bei memorialize the Throne to confer on me the rank of a prince when he is but a simple General himself?” asked Zhang Lu, when he understood the offer and its conditions.
“He is an Imperial Uncle;” said Yang Song, “with such a rank he could present such a memorial.” Zhang Lu assented.
He sent orders to Ma Chao to cease fighting, and Sun Qian remained as the guest of Yang Song till he should see whether Ma Chao would obey the command.
Before long the messenger returned with a word from Ma Chao that he could not cease fighting till he had been successful.
A second and third messenger returned with a similar response.
“This Ma Chao is untrustworthy,” said Yang Song. “He will not withdraw his soldiers because he contemplates rebellion. That is the real reason.” Yang Song set stories afloat rumoring:
“Ma Chao desires to make himself the ruler of the west and has said that he will no longer be content with subordinate rank.
And he means to avenge the death of his father.” The rumors came to the ear of Zhang Lu, and he asked Yang Song what should be done.
Yang Song proposed, saying, “Give Ma Chao a limit of a month in order to accomplish his task, provided he consents to three conditions.
And if he does not agree, he will have to be put to death.
The three conditions are the capture of the Western Land of Rivers, the head of Liu Zhang, and the repulse of the Jingzhou troops.
If he fails in any one of these, just bring his head.
Meanwhile, Zhang Wei should be sent as guard at one of the strategic points which will control Ma Chao's army in case of rebellion.” When Ma Chao heard the three demands made on him, he was greatly troubled, saying, “What can such a charge mean?” After taking counsel with Ma Dai, it seemed best to suspend fighting, and the army returned.
But Yang Song had not yet attained his end, so he said to Zhang Lu, “Ma Chao's return with an army will be a danger, and hence all the points of vantage on the homeward road must be guarded so that to stop him.” Thus Ma Chao was helpless and could see no way out of the difficulty.
Then Zhuge Liang said to his lord, “Now is my chance to use my little three inches of unworn tongue; Ma Chao is in a fix. I am going to his camp to persuade him to come over to your side.” “But I do not like you to run such a risk, Instructor.
You are my most necessary support, and if anything happened to you, what should I do?” Zhuge Liang was set upon going and persisted in his request. Liu Bei again and again refused.
At this juncture a messenger came with letters from Zhao Yun.
Liu Bei called him in and questioned him.
He was Li Hui of Jianning, the man who had formerly remonstrated so earnestly with Liu Zhang.
“You once pleaded with your master to keep me out; why are you here now?” “Because the prudent bird chooses its perch and the wise person his master. I did attempt to dissuade Liu Zhang of Yiazhou from a course which I felt to be disastrous, and thereby fulfilled my duty as his servant.
He rejected my counsel, and I knew he would fail.
Your liberality, O General, has won over all the region, and success must be yours.
I wish to serve under your banner.” “Your services will surely be of great advantage to me, Sir,” said Liu Bei. Then Li Hui began to talk of Ma Chao, “I knew him when we were in Longxi together.
He is now in great straits, and I may be able to talk him over.
What say you?” “Just the man to go instead of me,” interjected Zhuge Liang.
“But what arguments will you use?” Li Hui leaned over and whispered in his ear thus and thus.
What he said seemed to please Zhuge Liang mightily, and he was bidden to go forthwith.
Arrived at the camp, Li Hui sent in his name, at which Ma Chao remarked, “Yes; I know him—a glib and specious persuader. I know what he has come for too.” So Ma Chao placed a score of armed ruffians in hiding about his tent and told them to cut the visitor to pieces if the signal was given.
Then the guest was led in and came walking proudly. His host remained seated stiff and upright.
Ma Chao spoke roughly, saying, “What are you come for?” “I am here as persuader.” “This sword here in the scabbard is newly ground.
You may try me by words, but if the words do not penetrate, I shall ask you to try the sword.” Li Hui smiled, saying, “O, General, evil is not far off.
However, I am thinking the newly ground sword will not be tried on my head.
You will want to try it on your own!” “What evil were you talking about?” “The worst vilification could not hide the beauty of Lady Xi Shi of Yue, nor could the most fulsome praise gloze over the ugliness of Lady Wuyan of Qi .
The sun rises to the meridian and then declines; the moon waxes to the full and then wanes. All things obey the one law.
Now, General, you are at enmity with Cao Cao for your father's death, and in Longxi you carry a stubborn, grinding hate for your family's death.
You can neither rescue Liu Zhang by repulsing the army from Jingzhou, nor can you settle Yang Song by getting an interview with Zhang Lu.
The whole world now holds no place for a person without a lord; and if you experience further defeats, like that one on River Wei, or the loss of Jicheng, will you not be too shamed to look any human in the face?” Ma Chao bowed his head, saying, “You speak well, Sir.
But I am helpless.” “Now that you listen to me, I would ask why those fearsome ruffians are in hiding by your tent?” continued Li Hui.
Ma Chao, suddenly stricken with shame, ordered them to retire. Li Hui continued his speech.
“Liu Bei, the Imperial Uncle, is considerate to his subordinates, and I am certain he will succeed, and so I have forsaken Liu Zhang to cleave to him.
Your honored father joined him in destroying rebels. Why do you not flee from darkness into the light?
Thereby you would avenge your father and become famous.” Ma Chao, convinced of the wisdom of the course thus recommended, proved his conversion by sending for Yang Bo and slaying him forthwith. Taking with him the head of his victim, Ma Chao accompanied Li Hui to the Pass and tendered his submission.
Liu Bei welcomed him warmly and treated him as a highly honored guest.
Ma Chao bowed his head, saying, “Meeting you, O Illustrious Lord, is like seeing the clear sky when the clouds have been swept aside.” When Sun Qian returned from Yang Song's place, Liu Bei detached a force to go to the capture of Chengdu, left two generals, Meng Da and Huo Jun to guard Jiameng Pass, and made a triumphant entry into Mianzhu with the welcome of Zhao Yun and Huang Zhong.
Two generals of the Western Land of Rivers, Ma Han and Liu Jun, came to oppose Liu Bei, but Zhao Yun went out against them while Liu Bei was entertaining Ma Chao at a banquet on the city wall.
Ere it had concluded, Zhao Yun slew both the generals and brought their heads to the banquet chamber.
This exploit put Ma Chao on his mettle and doubled his respect for the conquerors.
“Let not my lord attack,” said Ma Chao. “I will make Liu Zhang surrender of his own accord.
Should he resist, my brother Ma Dai and I will take the city and offer it to you with both hands.” Liu Bei was very pleased with the course of events; the day was indeed one of rejoicing.
But Liu Zhang was greatly distressed at the news of his fresh misfortunes, which reached him with the return of his defeated soldiers.
He barred the gates and stopped all exits.
Before long came news of the approach of Ma Chao with an army of rescue. The Imperial Protector then ventured to mount the walls, and soon Ma Chao and Ma Dai rode up and stood below the ramparts.
And Ma Chao called out, “I wish to speak with Liu Zhang.” Then Liu Zhang showed himself, and Ma Chao plunged into the matter without more ado.
“I took the leadership of Zhang Lu's army to rescue Yiazhou, little thinking that, under the calumnious advice of Yang Song, Zhang Lu would try to slay me.
However, now I have gone over to the side of Liu Bei, the Imperial Uncle, and advise you, Sir, to do the same, you and all your officers.
Thereby you will all escape harm.
If any one holds on a misguided course, I shall take the city.” Such words came as a shock, and Liu Zhang paled. His feelings overcame him and he swooned.
When he came to his senses, he muttered, “I am stupid and I am sorry.
Better open the gates and end it. The city will be saved.” “No, no,” cried Dong He.
“There are thirty thousand of good soldiers in the city and ample money and stores for a year to come.
Hold out!” But Liu Zhang was broken, saying, “My father and I have ruled Shu for twenty years and have done no particular good for the people.
And we have fought for three years; the grass has been be stained with the blood of my people; and the fault is mine.
I could not bear it, and so I see no better way than to surrender, whereby I may bring peace to the people.” Those about him wept.
One man spoke, saying, “You speak as Heaven guides you.” Turning toward him they recognized a man of Baxi named Qiao Zhou, who had the reputation of being an astrologer. “I have studied the aspect of the heavens and a multitude of stars gathered over the west, one of which shone as the full moon:
a right royal star. And I recall a popular couplet of last year:
“When comes the ruler from the east, Then may you on new rice feast.
“None can withstand the decree of the Most High.” Liu Ba and Huang Quan, who heard these words, were very angry at such a speech and rose up to smite the speaker.
But Liu Zhang stayed them.
Next came news that Xu Jing, the Governor of the Shu District, had gone over to the invaders. This was the last blow.
Liu Zhang went home weeping.
Next day they reported that Liu Bei, the Imperial Uncle, had sent Jian Yong as legate to visit Liu Zhang and he was even then at the city gate.
Jian Yong was admitted, and he entered, riding in a carriage and looking about him most haughtily.
Suddenly he was hailed from the street by a man with a sword in his hand, who cried, “You have got your wish, wretched creature, and you seem to think there is no one to compare with you.
But do not look so contemptuously at us of Shu.” Jian Yong quickly got out of his carriage to speak to the speaker, who was a man of Mianzhu named Qin Mi. “Worthy brother,” said Jian Yong, “I did not recognize you.
I pray you not to be angry.” Both then went to visit Liu Zhang, and they spoke of the liberality and broad-mindedness of Liu Bei, said he had no intention to harm any one, and praised him to such effect that Liu Zhang then and there made up his mind finally that he would give up the struggle.
So he treated Jian Yong very honorably that day.
And the next day, taking his seal and insignia if of office and his archives, he accompanied Jian Yong out of the city and went to Liu Bei's camp. Liu Bei came out in person to receive him.
Taking Liu Zhang by the hand, Liu Bei wept, saying, “It is not that I wish to act cruelly or wrongly; I am the victim of circumstances and cannot help it.” They entered the camp together, where the seal of office and the documents changed hands. Afterwards they rode into the city side by side.
The people gave Liu Bei a cordial welcome, burning incense and illuminating the city.
The victor went to the residence of the chief of the region, where he took his seat and was saluted by all the subordinate officials.
However, Huang Quan and Liu Ba stayed away from the ceremony.
This annoyed the more violent of Liu Bei's supporters, and they wished to kill the delinquents. But Liu Bei would not allow violence and threatened condign punishment to any one who might interfere with these two.
When the reception was over, Liu Bei went to visit the two recalcitrants, whereupon both came out and made their obeisance.
Said Zhuge Liang to Liu Bei, “We have vanquished, and all opposition in Yiazhou is at an end. But there cannot be two rulers, so you must remove Liu Zhang to Jingzhou.” “But I do not wish to exile him,” said Liu Bei. “He lost his prestige through weakness.
If you are weak and undecided, you also will not last long.” Liu Bei saw his advice was good, and so he gave a great banquet whereat he begged Liu Zhang to pack up his treasures and prepare to move. He gave the dispossessed Imperial Protector the title General Who Spreads Prestige. Liu Zhang went away to Gongan in Jingzhou, taking with him his family and all his possessions.
Liu Bei thus became Imperial Protector of Yiazhou. He conferred gifts on the civil and military officers who joined him, confirming their ranks and titles.
Yan Yan was made General of the Front Army; Fa Zheng, Governor of the Shu District; Dong He and Xu Jing, Imperial Commanders; Liu Ba, General of the Left Army; Huang Quan, General of the Right Army; and others of Shu officers whose aid had been conspicuous were given high ranks and finer titles under the new rule, and the total of more than sixty of them were well rewarded. Naturally, honors were distributed freely to Liu Bei's immediate helpers, to whose efforts he owed his position.
Zhuge Liang was held Directing Instructor; Guan Yu, General Who Destroys Rebels and Lord of Hanshou; Zhang Fei, General Who Subdues Rebels and Lord of Xinxian; Zhao Yun, General Who Guards the West; Huang Zhong, General Who Conquers the West; Wei Yan, General Who Wages Successful War; Ma Chao, General Who Pacifies the West.
Sun Qian, Jian Yong, Mi Zhu, Mi Fang, Ma Liang, Ma Su, Jiang Wan, Yi Ji, Liu Feng, Guan Ping, Liao Hua, Zhou Cang, and others, many of whom had come to Liu Bei from Jingzhou, received promotions and rewards.
In addition, a special gift of five hundred ounces of gold, a thousand ounces of silver, much copper money, and a thousand rolls of Xichuan silk, was sent to Guan Yu.
And all the military and civil officers were given appointments.
Huge numbers of oxen and horses were slaughtered for banquets to the army, and the contents of the granaries were given to the common people. So that there were great rejoicings.
Yiazhou being settled, Liu Bei next desired to confiscate the lands of the more famous of the inhabitants about Capital Chengdu and divide them among his officers.
But here Zhao Yun and others dissuaded him, saying, “The sufferings of the people have been severe and losses great; it would be wise policy to let them settle down to their occupations as soon as possible.
It would be wrong to reward our own people at the expense of these people.” Liu Bei listened and gave in with good grace.
To Zhuge Liang, Liu Bei assigned the revision of the laws, the punishments to be made, on the whole, heavy.
Then Fa Zheng spoke up, “The founder of the Hans, Liu Bang, drew up three chapters of law, and the people were all profoundly affected by his virtue.
I would rather that the laws be few and liberal that people may be comforted.” Zhuge Liang replied, “You only look at one side.
The laws of Qin 1 were fiercely cruel and provoked resentment among the people; it was fitting that the Supreme Ancestor should temper them with kindness.
Under the weak administration of Liu Zhang, there has never been an efficient government, and there is a lack of respect for the law.
The proper relationship between ruler and minister has been gradually obscured.
Favor has been the means of rising, and the highest in rank have been the basest; kindness has been extended into license, and the most benefited have been the most contemptuous. And thereby have crept in many evils.
Now I mean to inculcate respect for the dignity of the law, and kindness shall follow its attainment:
there shall be moderation in conferring rank, but honor shall really follow on such promotion.
In the mutual cooperation of kindness and honor and in proper distinction between superiors and inferiors lies the efficiency of a government.” Fa Zheng had no argument to oppose.
In due time all became perfectly tranquil, and all the forty-one counties, with their respective garrisons, were peaceful and contented.
As Governor of the Shu District, Fa Zheng earned much hatred, caring for no one but himself, and one person told of the complaints to Zhuge Liang, urging his dismissal.
But Zhuge Liang referred to his meritorious services, saying, “When my lord was in Jingzhou, fearful of his enemy on the north and trembling lest he be attacked from the east, Fa Zheng was his sure support.
In these prosperous days one can hardly begin to discipline him.
Could we reasonably forbid him following somewhat his own way?” So no investigation was made, but Fa Zheng heard of the complaints and corrected his faults.
One day, when Liu Bei and Zhuge Liang were resting and at leisure, Guan Ping arrived with a letter from his father, thanking his elder brother for the handsome gifts.
Making obeisance and handing in his letter, Guan Ping said, “My father was anxious to come into Yiazhou to try conclusions with Ma Chao.” Said Liu Bei, “If he were to come and fight, I fear they would not both survive.” “There is nothing to be anxious about,” said Zhuge Liang. “I will write to Guan Yu.” Liu Bei feared that his brother's impulsive temperament might lead to trouble, so he told Zhuge Liang to compose a letter and send back by Guan Ping.
When Guan Ping came again to his father, the first question was: “Did you mention the contest with Ma Chao?” Then the letter was produced, and this is what it said:
“I hear you are anxious to decide whether of the twain, Ma Chao or yourself, is the better man.
Now I can measure Ma Chao. He may be unusually brave and bold, but he is only of the class of Ying Bu and Peng Yue of old.
He might be a worthy rival of your younger brother, but he is far from the standard set by you, O Lord of the Beautiful Beard. You have a most important charge.
If you come into the Western Land of Rivers, and Jingzhou should be lost, would you not be guilty of a terrible failure?
I think you will see this.” Guan Yu stroked his long beard and smiled as he read the letter. “The Instructor knows me thoroughly,” said he to himself.
He showed the letter to his clients and friends and thought no more of going westward. The successes of Liu Bei in the west had been duly noted by Sun Quan, who thought he was surely now going to obtain the much-coveted Jingzhou. So he called in Zhang Zhao and Gu Yong to ask advice.
Sun Quan said, “When Liu Bei occupied Jingzhou temporarily, he pledged he would return the region to the South Land when he would possess Yiazhou.
Now he has taken the forty-one counties of the Western Land of Rivers; if Jingzhou is not returned, I will take it by force.” Zhang Zhao said, “I have already a scheme that will need no fighting; Liu Bei will offer the place to you with both hands.” In Shu there shine new sun and moon, Wu dreams Jingzhou will be his soon.
We shall see in the next chapter the scheme to recover the much-desired region. CHAPTER 66.
Armed With Sword, Guan Yu Goes To A Feast Alone; For The State, Empress Fu Offers Her Life.
The scheme, which Zhang Zhao had in mind, he laid before his master thus: “The one man upon whom Liu Bei relies most is Zhuge Liang.
Now his brother is in your service and in your power. All you have to do is to seize Zhuge Jin's family and send him west to see Zhuge Liang and make Zhuge Liang persuade Liu Bei to return Jingzhou. If Liu Bei refuses, the family of Zhuge Jin will suffer, and Zhuge Liang will not be able to resist the claims of brotherhood.” “But Zhuge Jin is a loyal and true gentleman.
I could not lay hands upon his family!” said Sun Quan.
“Explain the ruse to him; that will set his mind at rest,” said Zhang Zhao.
Sun Quan consented and issued the command to confine the family of his retainer in the palace but not really imprison them.
Then he wrote a letter for Zhuge Jin to take with him on his mission.
Before many days Zhuge Jin reached Chengdu and sent to inform Liu Bei of his arrival. Liu Bei at once sought the advice of Zhuge Liang. “Why think you your brother has come?” “He has come to force the return of Jingzhou.” “How shall I answer him?” “You must do so and so,” said Zhuge Liang.
The plan of action being prepared, Zhuge Liang went out of the city to welcome his brother; but instead of taking him to his own residence, Zhuge Liang took him to the guest-house.
When the greetings were over, the visitor suddenly lifted up his voice and wept.
“If you have any trouble, my brother, tell; why do you weep thus?” asked Zhuge Liang.
My family are lost!” cried he.
“I suppose it is in the matter of the return of Jingzhou? If your family have been seized on my account, how can I bear it calmly? But do not be anxious, my brother.
I shall certainly find some way out of the difficulty.” This reply pleased Zhuge Jin, and the two brothers went to visit Liu Bei.
The letter of Sun Quan was presented, but when Liu Bei had read it he said, angrily, “He is related to me by marriage, and he has profited by my absence from Jingzhou to steal away his sister. That is a sort of kindliness I find it hard to bear.
When I am just going to lead my army to the South Land to take vengeance, is it likely he will get Jingzhou out of me?” At this point Zhuge Liang prostrated himself weeping at his lord's feet and said, “The Marquis of Wu has seized my brother's family, and he will put them all to death if the land be not given up.
Can I remain alive if such a fate befall them?
I pray my lord for my sake to give back the region and prevent any breach between my brother and me.” But Liu Bei refused.
He seemed obdurate, but Zhuge Liang persisted in his entreaty. Finally Liu Bei reluctantly consented. “Since things are so, and the Instructor pleads for it, I will return half,” said he.
“I will give up three territories—Changsha, Lingling, and Guiyang.” “Then, as you have consented, prepare letters ordering Guan Yu to yield these three territories,” said Zhuge Jin.
Liu Bei said, “When you see my brother, you must use most gracious words to him, for his nature is as a fierce fire, and even I fear what he may do.
So be very careful.” Zhuge Jin, having got the letter, took his leave and went straightway to Jingzhou.
He asked for an interview, and was received in the grand reception hall.
When both were seated in their respective places, the emissary produced the letter of Liu Bei, saying, “The Imperial Uncle has promised to return three territories to my master, and I hope, General, you will hand them over at once and let me return.” Guan Yu's countenance changed, and he said, “The oath sworn in the Peach Garden bound me and my brother to support the dynasty of Han.
Jingzhou is a portion of their domain, and how can any part be given to another?
When a leader is in the field, he receives no orders, not even those of his prince.
Although you have brought letters from my brother, yet will I not yield the territories.” “But the Marquis of Wu has laid hands upon my family, and they will be slain if the land be not given up.
I crave your pity, O General!” “This is but a ruse on his part, but it does not deceive me!” “Why are you so pitiless?” Guan Yu drew his sword, saying, “Let us have no more. This sword is pitiless!” “It will put the Instructor to shame,” said Guan Ping.
“I pray you not to be angry, my father.” “Were it not for my respect for the Instructor, you would never go back to the South Land,” said Guan Yu to Zhuge Jin.
Zhuge Jin, overwhelmed with shame, took his leave, sought his ship, and hastily returned to Chengdu to see his brother.
But Zhuge Liang had gone away upon a journey.
However, he saw Liu Bei and related what had happened, and said that Guan Yu was going to slay him.
“My brother is hasty,” said Liu Bei. “It is difficult to argue with him.
But return home for the present, and when I have finished my conquest of Hanzhong, I will transfer Guan Yu to another post, and then I may be able to return Jingzhou.” Zhuge Jin had no choice but to accept this reply and carry the unsatisfactory news to his master, who was greatly annoyed and said, “This running to and fro was nothing more than one of your brother's tricks.” The unhappy messenger denied, saying, “No, no! Zhuge Liang had interceded with many tears and obtained the promise to return three territories from Liu Bei. It was the obstinacy of Guan Yu that spoiled all.” “Since Liu Bei said he would return three territories, we may send officials to take over their administration.
Think you that might be done?” said Sun Quan.
“What you say, my lord, seems most proper.” The family of Zhuge Jin were restored to liberty, and officers were sent to take charge of the three territories of Changsha, Lingling, and Guiyang.
But they quickly returned, saying, “Guan Yu would have none of us, but had chased us away at once with threats to kill us if we did not hasten!” Sun Quan then summoned Lu Su and laid the blame on him.
“You are Liu Bei's guarantor in this matter; how can you sit quietly looking on while Liu Bei fails to perform his contract?” said Sun Quan.
“I have thought out a plan and was just going to impart it to you,” said Lu Su.
“And what is your plan?” Lu Su said, “There is a camp at Lukou; invite Guan Yu to a banquet there and try to persuade him.
If he still remains obstinate, have some assassins ready to slay him.
Should he refuses the banquet, then we must try conclusions with an army.” “This suits me,” said Sun Quan, “and it shall be done.” “It should not be done,” interrupted Kan Ze. “The man is as bold as a tiger and not at all like common humans.
The plan will fail and result in more harm.” “Then when may I expect to get my Jingzhou?” asked Sun Quan, angrily.
Sun Quan ordered Lu Su to carry out his plan, and Lu Su went to Lukou forthwith and settled the preliminaries of the banquet with Lu Meng and Gan Ning. The place selected was by the river. Then Lu Su wrote a letter and found a persuasive person to deliver it. The messenger set out and sailed across the river to the post, where he was received by Guan Ping, who conducted him to his father.
“As Lu Su invites me, I will come tomorrow; you may return,” was Guan Yu's reply. After the messenger had gone, Guan Ping said to his father, “Why did you promise to go?
I think Lu Su means you no good.” “Do you think I do not know?
This has all come out of my refusal to yield those three territories. They are going to try coercion at this banquet.
If I refuse, they will think I fear them.
I will go tomorrow in a small ship with just my ten personal guards, and we shall see whether Lu Su will dare to come near me.” “But, Father, why risk your priceless self in the very den of a tiger?
I think you are not giving due importance to my uncle's charge.” “I have been in the midst of million blades and arrows, yet I have been riding through all directions like traveling through a meadow of no one; think you that I shall begin to show fear of a few such rats as those?” Nor was the son alone in remonstrance.
Ma Liang also warned his chief. “Although Lu Su has a great repute, yet now he is pushed hard. He certainly is badly disposed toward you, and you must be careful, General.” Guan Yu replied, “I have given my word, and shall I withdraw from it?
In the days of the Warring States, Liu Xiangru of the state of Zhao had not the force even to bind a chicken, yet in the assembly at Shengchi Lake he regarded not the prince and the ministers of the powerful state of Qin, but did his duty without fear of consequences.
Have I not learned to face any number of foes?
I cannot break my promise.” “If you must go,” said Ma Liang, “at least go prepared.” “Tell my son to choose out ten fast ships and five hundred of good marines and be in readiness to help me at need.
And when he sees a red flag waved, he can come over to my aid.” The order was given and the little squadron was got ready.
The messenger returned to his master and told him that Guan Yu had boldly accepted the invitation, and Lu Su and Lu Meng took counsel together.
“What do you think of this?” asked Lu Su.
“If Guan Yu comes with a force, Gan Ning and I will be in readiness for him by the river-side. And you will hear our bomb as a signal that we are attacking.
If he has no force with him, the assassins can set on during the banquet.” Next day a look-out was kept on the bank, and early in the day a single ship came along. It was manned by very few men, and a simple red flag flew out on the breeze showing but two words, “Guan Yu”. Presently they could see him, a handsome figure in a green robe and navy-blue turban.
Beside him stood Zhou Cang, his sword-bearer, and near him were eight or nine finelooking men, each with a sword at his side. Guan Yu landed and was received by the trembling Lu Su, who conducted him to the hall, bowed his greetings, and led him to the banquet chamber.
When Guan Yu drank to his host, Lu Su dared not raise his eyes, but Guan Yu was perfectly composed.
When they had become mellow with wine, Lu Su said, “I have a word to say to you, Sir, if haply I may have your attention. You know that your illustrious brother, the Imperial Uncle, made me surety with my master that Jingzhou would be returned after Yiazhou had been taken.
Well, now that country is in his possession, but Jingzhou is still unreturned.
Is not this a breach of good faith?” “This is a government affair,” said Guan Yu.
“Such matters should not be introduced at a banquet.” “My master only has petty possessions in the east, and he allowed the temporary loan of Jingzhou out of consideration for the need in which you then were.
But now you have Yiazhou, and Jingzhou should be given up.
The Imperial Uncle has even yielded three territories, but you, Sir, seem unwilling to let them go.
This seems hard to explain on reasonable grounds.” Guan Yu replied, “My brother braved the arrows and the stones in the battle at Wuling and with all his strength drove back the enemy; did he get a single foot of land for all his efforts?
Now you come to force this place out of him.” “No; I do not,” said Lu Su.
“But at the time that you and your brother suffered defeat at Dangyang, when you were helpless and in the greatest straits, fugitives you knew not whither, then my master was moved with pity and did not grudge the land. So he gave your brother a foothold whence he might be able to accomplish other ends.
But your brother has presumed upon long-suffering. He has attained his end—the country of his desire—and still he occupies Jingzhou. Such greed and such treachery will make the whole world laugh him to shame, as you know quite well.” “All that is no affair of mine; it is my brother's.
I cannot yield the land.” “I know that by the oath in the Peach Garden you three were to live or die together.
But your brother has consented to yield; how are you going to get out of that?” Guan Yu was at a loss to reply.
However, Zhou Cang burst into the conversation, roaring out, “Only the virtuous get hold of territory, does that mean only you people of East Wu?” Guan Yu's anger now showed itself.
His face changed; he rose in his place, took his sword from his sword-bearer and said fiercely, “How dare you talk like this at a discussion of state matters? And go quickly!” Zhou Cang understood.
He left the hall, made his way to the river and waved the red call-flag.
The ships of Guan Ping darted across like arrows and were ready for action.
The mighty sword in his right hand, Guan Yu laid hold of Lu Su with his left and, simulating intoxication, said, “You have kindly invited me today, Sir, but do not say anything about Jingzhou, for I am so drunk that I may forget our old friendship.
Some other day I hope to invite you to Jingzhou, and then we will talk about that matter.” Poor Lu Su's soul almost left his body with fright as he was led down to the river bank in the grip of his guest.
Lu Meng and Gan Ning, who Lu Su had placed in ambush, dared not act and so made no move lest they should bring about the doom of Lu Su.
When they got to the bank, Guan Yu released his host, got on board, and then said farewell.
Lu Su stood stupidly staring at the ship while a fair breeze bore it quickly out of sight. This episode has been commemorated in verse:
He showed his contempt for the soldiers of Wu By going alone to their traitor feast; As Liu Xiangru of old he was much bolder; As the Shengchi Lake game was played again.
Guan Yu took his homeward way, while Lu Su and his two confederates talked over what had occurred. “What can be done now?” said Lu Su.
“The only thing is to tell our master and let him send an army,” replied Lu Meng.
Lu Su sent a messenger to Sun Quan, who, in his wrath, was for sending every available soldier at once against Jingzhou. But at this crisis there came news that Cao Cao was raising a huge army with the intention of attacking the South Land.
So hasty orders were sent to Lu Su to make no move, but to send all the troops he could from Hefei and Ruxu toward the north to repel Cao Cao. However, Cao Cao did not march south. One of his military advisers, Fu Gan, sent in a memorial against the scheme:
“I, Fu Gan, understand that inspiring fear is the chief consideration in war, as inculcating virtue is in government.
These two combined in one person fit him to be a prince.
Formerly, in the days of disturbance, you, Illustrious Sir, attacked the rebels and restored tranquillity almost everywhere, the only regions unsubdued and not under your control being Wu and Shu.
The former of these is protected by the Great River, the latter secured by its mountains, and both difficult to conquer by force of arms.
My humble opinion is that it is more fitting to increase the authority of civil government, to lay aside arms and rest weapons, to cease from war and train your soldiers until the times shall be favorable.
If your mighty legions be now sent to camp on the river bank and the rebels should take refuge behind their natural defenses, your soldiers will be unable to prove their prowess; and should extraordinary strategies be planned, the rebels will not be available. In such a case your high prestige would be impaired.
I trust, Illustrious Sir, you will deign to examine this.” After reading this, Cao Cao ceased to think of an expedition against the south. Instead, he established schools and set himself to attract people of ability.
About the same time four of his officers—Wang Can, Du Xi, Wei Kai, and He He—conceived the idea of getting for Cao Cao the honor of “Prince of Wei”.
But Xun You opposed this course, saying, “The Prime Minister's rank is already that of “Duke,” and he has received the additional honor of the Nine Dignities, so that his position is extremely high.
If he advances to the rank of kingship, it will be inconsistent with reasonableness.” But Cao Cao was annoyed at this opposition and said, “Does the man wish to emulate Xun Yu?” When Xun You heard of Cao Cao's anger, he was grieved and fell ill, so that in a few days he died. He was fifty-eight years of age.
Cao Cao had his remains interred honorably, and he stayed his ambition for princely rank.
But there came a day when Cao Cao entered the palace wearing his sword and made his way to the apartment where the Emperor and the Empress were seated.
The Empress rose in a fright, and the Emperor gazed at his minister in terror.
“Sun Quan and Liu Bei have each seized a portion of the empire and no longer respect the court; what is to be done?” To this abrupt speech the Emperor replied, “The matter lies within your province.” Cao Cao answered, angrily, “If such a remark be known outside, they will say I treat my prince without respect!” “If you will help me, I shall be most happy;” said His Majesty, “if not, then I trust to your kindness to let me alone.” At this Cao Cao glared at the Emperor and went out full of resentment.
The courtiers said, “It is said that the Duke of Wei desires to become Prince of Wei, and soon he will aspire to the throne.” Both the Emperor and his consort wept.
Presently Her Majesty said, “My father, Fu Wan, has long nourished a desire to slay this man. Now I will indite a secret letter to my father to accomplish his end.” “Remember the former attempt with Dong Cheng. The plot was discovered and great misery ensued.
I fear that this will leak out also, and both of us will be undone.” Said the Empress, “We pass our days in constant discomfort, like sitting on a rug full of needles. If life is to be like this, one were better dead.
But I know one loyal man among the attendants to whom I may entrust the letter. That one is Mu Shun, and he will deliver it.” Thereupon Empress Fu summoned Mu Shun within, and having sent away all others, they told their distress to the faithful one.
Emperor Xian said, “That fellow Cao Cao desires the dignity of a prince, and soon he will aspire to the throne itself.
I, the Emperor, wish to order the father of my consort to make away with the man, but the difficulty is that all the courtiers are his creatures and there is none whom I can trust save yourself.
I desire you to convey this secret letter to Fu Wan.
I know your loyalty and am sure you will prove no betrayer.” “I am the recipient of much graciousness for which not even death would prove my gratitude. Thy servant prays that he may be allowed to undertake this.” The letter was given to Mu Shun, who hid it in his hair, made his way out of the precincts and handed it to its owner.
Fu Wan recognized the handwriting of his daughter and read it.
Turning to the messenger, Fu Wan said, “You know the fellow's creatures are many, and one must act with extreme caution against him.
Unless we have the aid of Sun Quan's and Liu Bei's armies, Cao Cao will certainly attain his ends.
In this matter we must gain the support of every loyal and faithful one in the court so that within and without there may be a simultaneous attack.” “Then, O Father of the Empress, write a letter in reply asking for a secret edict, so that we may send to the south and the west to join in the attack.” So Fu Wan composed a reply, which he gave to Mu Shun to take into the Palace.
This time also the letter was concealed in his hair.
But there was a traitor, and Cao Cao heard of the letters.
So he waited at the palace gate for Mu Shun to come out.
“Where are you going?” asked Cao Cao, when Mu Shun appeared.
“The Empress is indisposed and has bidden me call a physician.” “Where is the summon for the physician?” “There is no summon.” Cao Cao bade his guards search Mu Shun, but they did not find the letter. So he was allowed to go.
But just then a gust of wind blew off his hat, and it struck Cao Cao that that had not been examined. So Mu Shun was called back.
Nothing was found in the hat, but when it was given back Mu Shun put it on with both hands.
There was something suspicious about the movement, and Cao Cao bade the searchers examine his hair.
Therein the letter of Fu Wan was found. Cao Cao read it; it said that Sun Quan and Liu Bei were to be induced to help.
The unhappy Mu Shun was taken away into a secret place and interrogated, but he would confess nothing.
That night three thousand soldiers surrounded the dwelling of Fu Wan, who was arrested with all his family.
Searching the house, they found the first letter in the handwriting of the Empress. Fu Wan and his family were then consigned to a gaol.
At dawn, a party of Imperial Guards, under Chi Lu, bearing ensigns of authority, entered the Palace with orders to take away the seal of the Empress.
On the way they met the Emperor, who asked the reason for a company of armed guards being in the Palace.
“I have orders from the Duke of Wei to get the Empress' seal,” said Chi Lu. The Emperor grew alarmed.
When Chi Lu reached the apartments of the Empress, she had just risen.
Chi Lu ordered to take the seal of the Empress and went away.
As soon as the Empress knew of this, she recognized her danger and hid herself in the hollow walls of her private apartments behind one of the ceremonial halls.
She had not been long in hiding when Hua Xin with a company of five hundred armed soldiers appeared and asked where she was.
The palace people said they did not know.
The red doors of the hall were burst open, and Hua Xin looked in, but he saw no lady there.
It occurred to him where she might be hidden, and he ordered his men to break open the wall.
With his own hands, he laid hold of the lady's hair and dragged her forth.
“Spare my life!” pleaded she.
“You may say what you have to say to the Duke,” cried he.
She pulled down her hair and kicked off her shoes, but a couple of soldiers pushed her along in front of them outside.
It may be said here that this Hua Xin had a reputation for learning. He and two others, Bing Yuan and Guan Ning, all good friends, made a little coterie which was known as “The Dragon”. Hua Xin was the “head”; Bing Yuan, the “belly”; and Guan Ning, the “tail”.
One day Guan Ning and Hua Xin were hoeing in their garden to grow some vegetables, when they turned up an ingot of gold. Guan Ning went on with his labors without giving a second glance at the find, but Hua Xin picked it up.
After regarding it a moment, he threw it away again.
Another day Guan Ning and Hua Xin were reading together when there arose a great shouting outside the window of the study. A minister from the Palace was passing.
Guan Ning took no notice, but kept his eyes on his book; Hua Xin rose and went to the window.
For this, Guan Ning despised his companion and the two parted for good.
Sometime after, in the disturbance of the empire, Guan Ning fled into Liaodong, where he led the life of hermit. He wore a white cap and lived in the upper part of a house, never touching the ground with his feet. He would have nothing to do with Cao Cao and would not enter his service.
But Hua Xin led a totally different life. For a time he was with Sun Quan; then he went over to Cao Cao and served him. And here he is found actually laying hands upon the Empress. His conduct in this particular is the subject of a poem:
That was a dastardly thing that Hua Xin did, When he broke don the wall where the Empress hid And dragged her forth by the hair. He lent his aid to a foul, foul crime And execrations throughout all time, Have been, and shall be, his share. A poet also wrote concerning Guan Ning:
East of Liaodong, so stories tell Is Guan Ning's tower, where long he dwelt.
Ignoble wealth was Hua Xin's quest, The hermit's simple life was best.
As Hua Xin hurried the unhappy woman out of the hall, the Emperor saw her.
He went over and clasped her to his bosom, weeping.
Hua Xin tried to force her onward, saying, “The Duke of Wei ordered no delay!” “My doom is sealed,” wept the Empress.
“And I know not when my turn will come,” sighed the Emperor.
The soldiers hustled the Empress onward, leaving His Majesty beating his breast in despair. “Can it be that such things happen in the world?” cried the Emperor to Chi Lu, who stood by.
And the Emperor swooned.
Chi Lu made the courtiers pick him up, and they bore him into the Palace.
Meanwhile, the unhappy Empress had been taken before Cao Cao.
“I have dealt well with you,” said he angrily, “and you requited me by plotting my murder.
It is the death of one of us, I see.” He ordered the executioners to beat her till she died.
After this, he went into the Palace, seized her two sons and had them poisoned.
In the evening of the same day the whole households of Mu Shun and Fu Wan were put to death publicly.
Such terrible deeds spread terror everywhere.
They happened in the eleventh month of the nineteenth year of Rebuilt Tranquillity .
As Cao Cao stands first in cruelty, So stands Fu Wan in loyalty.
A married pair of low estate, Had not been torn apart by fate.
The Emperor grieved bitterly over the loss of his consort, and in his despair refused all food. Cao Cao did not wish him to die of starvation and loneliness, so he proposed his own daughter as consort.
“Be not sad;” said Cao Cao, “thy servant is no rebel.
My daughter is already in your palace as a secondary lady. She is wise and dutiful, fit to be your consort and occupy the first rank.” Emperor Xian dared not refuse, and therefore at the new year , in the time of the festivities, Lady Cao's name was inscribed on the dynastic rolls as Empress.
And no one of the courtiers dared protest.
Wherefore Cao Cao became even more powerful.
But it pleased him not to have rivals in the land, so he again thought of subduing Liu Bei and Sun Quan.
Jia Xu proposed, saying, “Xiahou Dun and Cao Ren, who are serving on the frontiers, should be called to give their advice.” They were sent for, and Cao Ren was the first to arrive. As a relative, he felt he had the right to see the great minister without delay and went directly to the palace.
But it happened that Cao Cao had been drinking heavily, and his faithful henchman, Xu Chu, would not admit the new arrival.
“I am of the family,” said Cao Ren, angry at the hindrance.
“Dare you stop me?” “General, you may be a relative, but here you are but an officer from the frontier.
I am of little account, but a duty lies on me here in the palace.
Our lord is overcome with wine and asleep, and I dare not allow you to enter.” The refusal came to Cao Cao's knowledge, and he commended the loyalty of Xu Chu.
Soon after, Xiahou Dun came and was called to the council.
Xiahou Dun gave his opinion, saying, “The two rivals should be left until Zhang Lu of Hanzhong has been subdued.
The great army that can overcome Zhang Lu will be in condition to attack the Western Land of Rivers, and it will be conquered without difficulty.” The advice coincided with Cao Cao's own idea, and so he prepared an expedition for the west.
By a crime he showed his power over a feeble king; This done, at once he hastened to destroy his neighbor.
What happened will be told in later chapters. CHAPTER 67.
Cao Cao Conquers Hanzhong; Zhang Liao Spreads Terror At Flageolet Ford. The expedition against the Eastern Land of Rivers went out in three divisions.
Xiahou Yuan and Zhang He were Leaders of the Van; Cao Cao with his commanders marched in the center; and Cao Ren brought up the rear. Xiahou Dun was in charge of the commissariat.
The spies soon carried the news into Hanzhong, and Zhang Lu called in his brother Zhang Wei to consult how to meet the attack.
Said Zhang Wei, “The strategic point to hold is Yangping Pass, and there should be ten stockades there with the forest and hills to support them.
You, my brother, should make your depot of supplies at Hanning.” Thereupon two generals, Yang Ang and Yan Ren, were sent with Zhang Wei to the Pass, and they built ten stockades.
Soon Xiahou Yuan and Zhang He arrived and learned the Pass had prepared a defense. They camped at a point five miles away.
The soldiers were fatigued after the long march, and all lay down to rest without placing proper guards.
Suddenly the camp was attacked in the rear by Yang Ang and Yan Ren from different points.
Xiahou Yuan and Zhang He mounted quickly and tried to beat off the attackers, but the enemy poured in all round, and their army suffered great loss. They returned to the main body to tell of their defeat, and their chief abused them for their want of care. “Old soldiers like you should have known better and taken precautions against a raid of the camp when the enemy knew your soldiers were exhausted by a long march.” Cao Cao even desired to put them to death as a warning, but their fellowofficers interceded and he spared them. Soon Cao Cao himself marched in the van. Then he saw the dangerous and evil nature of the place, with its thick growth of trees; and as he knew nothing of the roads and was fearful of an ambush, he returned to his camp.
Calling up his two leaders, Xu Chu and Xu Huang, he said, “Had I known the dangerous nature of the place, I would never have come.” Xu Chu replied, “The soldiers are here now, my lord, and you cannot recoil before the hardships.” Next day Cao Cao with only Xu Chu and Xu Huang rode out to reconnoiter the enemy's camp.
As they rode over the hills, Cao Cao pointed out the position with his whip and said, “It will be very difficult to reduce a place as strong as this.” Just then there arose a shout in their rear, and a shower of arrows fell about them.
Yang Ang and Yan Ren were attacking and the danger became great. “Friend Xu Huang, you look after our lord!” cried Xu Chu, “I can hold the enemy.” Xu Chu galloped out, and the two leaders could not stand Xu Chu and took to flight, while their troops scattered.
In the meantime Xu Huang led his master over the hills.
Soon he met an army of soldiers led by Xiahou Yuan and Zhang He, who had heard the sound of fighting and had come to the rescue, and Cao Cao got back safely to camp.
The four generals were rewarded.
For fifty days the two armies held each other at bay without coming to a fight.
At the end of this time, orders were given to retire in the camp of Cao Cao. “We have not tried the strength of the enemy,” said Jia Xu.
“You should not retire, my lord.” “I see that they are always on the alert,” said Cao Cao. “I am only retiring to put them off their guard.
By and by I will send some light horse to attack their rear. I shall defeat them then.” “Ah!
Your skill is unfathomable!” cried Jia Xu.
Three thousand horsemen led by Xiahou Yuan and Zhang He got round behind the Yangping Pass by unfrequented roads, while Cao Cao broke up his camp and led his main body backward.
When Yang Ang heard of the retreat, he thought it would be a good chance to attack, but Yan Ren opposed it, saying, “Cao Cao is full of ruses.
The occasion is unclear; we should not lead an attack.” Yang Ang was willful and said, “I shall go; you may come or not, as you wish.” In spite of the protestations of his colleague, Yang Ang marched, taking with him the soldiers of five camps and leaving only a few defenders.
The day he set out was very foggy, so that one could hardly see his neighbor's face, and soon the force got into difficulties and could not advance. They bivouacked on the road.
Now, Xiahou Yuan was out with a reconnoitering force behind the hills when they heard the voices of troops and the neighing of horses. In the dense fog they could see nothing; but fearing an ambush, they hastened to retire. Somehow they lost their way and presently stumbled on the deserted camp of Yang Ang.
The few defenders thought their comrades had returned, so they threw open the gates to let the troops of Cao Cao in.
They found an empty camp, and they raised a great blaze, which frightened those few defenders in the other camps so that they fled.
As soon as the fog cleared, Yan Ren came to the rescue. But as Yan Ren and Xiahou Yuan were fighting, Zhang He suddenly appeared and attacked from the rear.
Between two armies, Yan Ren forced his way through and quickly fled toward Nanzheng.
By and by, when Yang Ang returned, he found his camp in the possession of Cao Cao's troops.
Soon Cao Cao's main army came up, and Yang Ang was between two forces.
There seemed no other way but to make a dash for it.
Falling in with Zhang He, the two engaged, and Yang Ang fell.
Those who escaped carried the news of the disaster to Zhang Wei, who abandoned Yangping Pass and fled.
So the invaders took possession of the Pass, and its late defenders, Zhang Wei and Yan Ren, had to go back and report failure.
Zhang Wei laid the blame on his generals, saying the Pass could not be held after its supporting positions had been lost.
Zhang Lu threatened to behead Yan Ren for his failure.
But Yan Ren said, “Yang Ang did not listen to my advice, and the defeat followed. Now I volunteer to make another attack.
If I fail to take Cao Cao's head, I will abide by the consequences without protest.” Zhang Lu took his formal pledge to succeed, gave him twenty thousand troops and sent him away.
Yan Ren marched to Nanzheng and made a stockade.
Before Cao Cao made any further advance, he sent Xiahou Yuan, with five thousand troops, to reconnoiter the road, and they fell in with the force led by Yan Ren. Both sides drew up their battle array.
From Yan Ren's side went out one general named Chang Qi to engage Xiahou Yuan. Before the fourth bout was fought, Xiahou Yuan disposed of Chang Qi.
Then Yan Ren set his spear and rode to the front. They two fought near forty bouts and neither could claim victory.
Then Xiahou Yuan pretended defeat and fled. The other rushed in pursuit.
The fugitive suddenly employed the “swinginghorse stab” and killed his pursuer.
Yan Ren's troops ran away.
As soon as Cao Cao knew of the death of Yan Ren, he brought up his army, marched straightway to Nanzheng and camped.
Zhang Lu became alarmed and called a council.
“I can propose a man able to stand against the best leader of the enemy,” said Yan Pu.
“Who is he?” asked Zhang Lu. “Pang De of Nanan.
Pang De surrendered at the same time as Ma Chao, but could not go with Ma Chao into Yiazhou as he was ill.
You have treated him generously; he will save you.” Pang De was summoned. He came, and Zhang Lu loaded him with gifts and gave him a force of ten thousand troops, with which he marched and camped three miles from the city, near the besieging force.
His camp made, Pang De rode out and challenged.
Now Cao Cao, remembering Pang De's boldness at the battle of River Wei Bridge, was desirous of winning the warrior for himself, so he told his generals, saying, “Pang De is a bold general of Xiliang formerly serving under Ma Chao.
Though he is now under Zhang Lu, that is not his real wish.
I want to win him over.
So you should try to weary him by prolonging the fights, and so make him captive.” Wherefore first rode out Zhang He to answer the challenger. He fought a few bouts and returned.
Then Xiahou Yuan did the same thing.
So did Xu Huang.
Lastly went Xu Chu, who kept up the fight to half a hundred bouts before he retired.
Still Pang De showed no signs of fatigue nor of fear, and all those who had fought with him praised his prowess and skill. “If only I could win him over to my side!” said Cao Cao longingly.
Said Jia Xu, “I know one of Zhang Lu's subordinates, Yang Song.
He is avaricious and open to bribes.
You might send him secret presents and get him to slander Pang De to his master so as to weaken Pang De's position.” “But how can one get at this man?
He is in Nanzheng.” “In the next battle, pretend defeat, flee, and let Pang De take possession of this camp.
Return in the night in force and drive him out, and he must retreat into the city.
Let one of our own people with a persuasive tongue mingle with his troops, disguised as one of his soldiers, and so gain entrance into the city.” A subtle agent was found, and goodly gifts were his in advance, and he was entrusted with a golden breastplate as a bribe.
He put it on and over it put on the dress of an ordinary soldier of Hanzhong. And he made his way quietly to a point on the road along which the soldiers of Hanzhong would retreat into the city. There he waited.
Next day, two parties under Xiahou Yuan and Zhang He were sent to lie in ambush, and Xu Huang was sent to challenge, but with orders to be defeated.
The scheme went well, and as Pang De came on to smite, Cao Cao's army retired before Pang De till he found himself at their very camp.
And therein he entered and was exceedingly pleased to find fodder and forage in great quantities. Having sent off a messenger to his chief, Pang De spread a feast in celebration of the victory; and when night came on they slept.
But about the second watch there was an alarm from three directions, and the camp was threatened by three forces: Xu Chu and Xu Huang attacking in the center, Zhang He from the left, and Xiahou Yuan from the right. It was the nightattack arranged by Cao Cao, and Pang De could not make any defense.
He got to horse, cut his way through, and made for the city.
With the attackers in close pursuit, Pang De reached the gate, got it opened, and rushed in.
And the false soldier got in amid the confusion. He made his way quickly to Yang Song's residence and saw him. He told Yang Song, saying, “The Great Prime Minister, Duke of Wei, knows you by reputation and holds you in great esteem.
And as a token thereof he has sent you his golden breastplate and a confidential letter as well.” Yang Song took it all in, read the letter, and said, “I will reply by and by, and the Duke of Wei needs feel no anxiety for I shall find a means of proving my gratitude.
You may return.” Soon after, Yang Song went to see Zhang Lu and told him, saying, “Pang De has been defeated because he has been bribed by Cao Cao.” Forthwith Zhang Lu summoned his general, abused him, and threatened to put him to death.
Yan Pu, however, protested and proposed to test Pang De in another encounter.
Zhang Lu then said, “Tomorrow, if you lose, I will take your head!” Pang De retired full of resentment.
The next day Cao Cao attacked, and Pang De went out to repel him.
Cao Cao sent out Xu Chu, but bade him pretend defeat.
When Pang De pursued, Cao Cao rode toward the hills, where he halted and presently got speech with Pang De, calling out, “Pang De!
Why not surrender?” But Pang De thought within himself that to capture Cao Cao would be a fine exploit, so he boldly faced his escort and rode up the hills.
But there arose a great shouting as if heaven and earth were clashing together, and he and his followers went headlong into ditches and pits that had been dug.
Out flew Cao Cao's troops with ropes and hooks, and Pang De was a prisoner. When he was taken to Cao Cao, he was received with the greatest kindness.
Cao Cao himself dismounted, loosed the captive's bonds, and asked him, “Do you surrender?” Pang De thought of the ill-treatment he had just received at the hands of his master and of his injustice, and gave in.
At once Pang De was helped to mount a horse by Cao Cao himself and led to the great camp. Soldiers placed for the purpose on the city wall saw what happened and reported to Zhang Lu:
“Pang De has ridden off on friendly terms with Cao Cao.” Whereby Zhang Lu was persuaded that Yang Song had spoken truly.
Soon after, scaling ladders were set against the city walls, and catapults threw in great stones.
The danger being imminent, Zhang Wei counseled, saying, “Set all supplies on fire and flight to the Southern Mountains, where we might be able to defend Bazhong.” On the other hand, Yang Song said, “The best course is to throw open the gates and surrender.” Zhang Lu could not decide which to do.
His brother, Zhang Wei, maintained that burning everything and flight was the only course.
Zhang Lu said, “I have been always loyal at heart and desired to return to allegiance when circumstances would permit. I have been unable to attain my desire, but now fight seems the only course open to me.
However, the granaries and treasures, the public offices and the government property of all kinds must be kept safe.” So the public buildings were all carefully barred and sealed.
The same night, in the late evening, Zhang Lu and his family went out through the south gate and found their way through.
Cao Cao let them go unpursued.
When Cao Cao entered the city and saw the proofs of Zhang Lu's care of the government property, he compassionated the Governor's misfortunes.
He then sent a messenger into Bazhong to induce Zhang Lu to surrender.
Zhang Lu was disposed to do so, but his brother would not hear of it.
Yang Song wrote a secret letter to Cao Cao urging him to attack and promising treacherous aid. Cao Cao presently attacked, and Zhang Wei came out to meet him.
But his opponent was the mighty Xu Chu, who made short work of him. The beaten soldiers fled back into the city, which Zhang Lu then decided to defend.
As this would not give Yang Song the chance to carry out his treacherous scheme, he persuaded his master, saying, “If we stay passive, death will surely come.
My lord should go out and fight the enemy to the conclusion, leaving me to defend the city.” Zhang Lu took this advice, although it was opposed by Yan Pu, and went out.
But before his van got near the enemy, his rear ranks began to desert, and Zhang Lu retreated.
Cao Cao pursued him to the city walls, where Zhang Lu found the gates shut against him. “Surrender, O Zhang Lu!” cried Cao Cao.
There being now no way open, Zhang Lu dismounted, prostrated himself, and gave in.
Because of this and his care of the public property, Cao Cao treated him with great kindness and consoled him with the title of General Who Guards the South.
Yan Pu and many others also were enrolled among the nobles.
To each county was appointed a Military Commander, in addition to the Governor. All the soldiers were feasted and rewarded.
Then Yang Song, who had sold his master, came and sued for honors. He was condemned to public execution and exposure.
Selling one's lord may make great service, But the gains thereof are vanity; No glory clings to his house but a shameful death; Wherefore Yang Song is an object of contempt forever.
When the Eastern Land of Rivers was quite subdued, First Secretary Sima Yi said, “The people of Shu are not loyal to Liu Bei because of his uprooting the late ruler, Liu Zhang; and if on the strength of your present success you press forward, Liu Bei will become as a shattered tile.
The wise person takes the occasion when it serves, and this should not be missed.” Cao Cao sighed, “There is no end—as human want has no limit; now that I have Hanzhong, I am forced into taking Yiazhou.” Liu Ye supported his colleague, saying, “Sima Yi spoke well.
If you delay, Zhuge Liang will have become top minister, while Guan Yu, Zhang Fei and the other bold warriors will be at the head of the army.
If the people of Shu once settle down, and the points of vantage are held, you will not be able to overcome them.” Cao Cao replied, “My soldiers have marched far and suffered much; beside we must show pity.” Wherefore he rested his army for a time.
Meanwhile the populace of Yiazhou, having heard of Cao Cao's success in the Eastern Land of Rivers, concluded that the Western Land of Rivers would suffer next, and fear spread among them. Whereupon Liu Bei called in the Directing Instructor and asked his advice.
Zhuge Liang replied, “I can make Cao Cao retreat of his own accord.” “What is that plan?” “A part of Cao Cao's army is camped at Hefei because of the fear of Sun Quan.
If now we restore three territories of Jingzhou—Changsha, Jiangxia, and Guiyang—, and send a specious person to talk, we can make Sun Quan attack Hefei, which will lead to Cao Cao going southward and not looking to the west.” “Who is a fit person for the messenger?” said Liu Bei.
And Yi Ji replied, “I will go.” Liu Bei, well-satisfied, wrote letters and prepared gifts, with which Yi Ji went, calling in at Jingzhou City on the way to tell Guan Yu.
Then he went on to the capital city of Moling and saw Sun Quan.
After the greetings, Sun Quan asked, “On what business do you come?” Yi Ji replied, “On a former occasion Zhuge Jin would have had the three territories of Changsha, Lingling, and Guiyang, but for the absence of the Directing Instructor, which prevented the actual transfer. Now I am the bearer of letters giving Changsha, Guiyang, and Jiangxia back to you.
Liu Bei and Zhuge Liang wanted to restore all the territories of Jingzhou, including those of Nanjun and Lingling, but now that Cao Cao has got possession of Eastern Land of Rivers, there is no place for General Guan Yu.
Hefei is weak, and we hope you will attack it so as to make Cao Cao withdraw to the south and let my master take the Eastern Land of Rivers, when he will restore the whole of the Jingzhou Region.” “Go back to the guest-house and let me take counsel in this matter,” said Sun Quan.
As soon as Yi Ji had gone, the Marquis of Wu turned to his officers and asked what should be done.
Zhang Zhao said, “All this is because Liu Bei fears that Cao Cao will attack him.
However, since Cao Cao is absent in Hanzhong, it would be well to seize the opportunity and attack Hefei.” Sun Quan accepted the advice.
After he had sent the messenger away, he began to prepare for the expedition. He left Lu Su in command over the three territories of Changsha, Jiangxia, and Guiyang. Then Sun Quan encamped at Lukou, withdrew Generals Lu Meng and Gan Ning, and sent to Yuhang for General Ling Tong.
Very soon, Lu Meng and Gan Ning returned, and the former suggested a plan, saying, “Cao Cao has sent Zhu Guang, Governor of Lujiang, to camp at the city of Huancheng and plant grain for the supply of Hefei.
Let us first take Huancheng and then attack Hefei.” “This scheme is just after my own heart,” said Sun Quan.
So Sun Quan appointed Lu Meng and Gan Ning as Van Leaders; Jiang Qin and Pan Zhang as Rear Guards; he himself with Zhou Tai, Xu Sheng, Dong Xi, commanded the center.
But the Commanders Cheng Pu, Huang Gai, and Han Dang were not called to take part in this expedition as they were guarding certain especial places.
The army crossed the river and captured Hezhou on the way.
Governor Zhu Guang sent an urgent message to Hefei for help and set himself to strengthen his fortifications for a siege.
Sun Quan went very near the city walls of Huancheng to observe its defense, and a flight of arrows greeted him, some striking his great official parasol.
He went back to camp and asked his officers to offer plans of attack.
Then Dong Xi said, “Pile up great hills of earth and attack from the summits.” Said Xu Sheng, “Set up long ladders and construct platforms whence you can look over the city walls and thus attack.” But Lu Meng said, “All such plans need a long time to prepare, and in the meantime the soldiers of Cao Cao will arrive from Hefei.
Do not try such long-drawn-out schemes, but take advantage of the fine, fresh spirit of our newly arrived troops and attack impetuously. Their elan will carry the wall.
If you attack tomorrow at dawn, the city will fall before noon.” So the early meal was taken at the fifth watch, and the army went to the attack.
The defenders sent down showers of arrows and stones.
Gan Ning took an iron chain in his hand and climbed up the wall.
They shot at him with bows and crossbows, but he turned aside the arrows and bolts, and he threw the chain round Governor Zhu Guang to pull him down.
Lu Meng beat the drum for the attack.
The soldiers made a rush forward to climb the wall, and they slew Zhu Guang.
His officers and soldiers gave in, and so Huancheng fell to Sun Quan. It was still a long time to noon.
In the meantime Zhang Liao was marching to the aid of the city. Half-way he heard that the city had fallen, and so he returned to Hefei.
Soon after the conqueror's entry into Huancheng, Ling Tong came there with his army. The next few days were devoted to feasting the army.
Special rewards were given to the two generals who had done such good work at the capture; and at the banquet to the officers, Gan Ning was seated in the seat of honor, which his colleague, Lu Meng, readily yielded to him for his late prowess.
But as the cup of felicitation was passing round, Ling Tong's thoughts turned to the enmity he bore Gan Ning for having slain his father, and the praises which Lu Meng now heaped upon Gan Ning filled Ling Tong's heart with bitterness. For some time he glared savagely at Gan Ning, and then he determined on revenge. Drawing his sword, he suddenly rose to his feet and cried, “There is nothing to amuse the assembly. I will give them a display of swordsmanship.” Gan Ning quickly saw his real intention.
He pushed back his table and laid hold of a halberd in each hand, crying, “And you may also watch an adept in the use of this weapon!” Lu Meng saw the evil meaning of both, and assuming his sword and shield, he hastily stepped between the two warriors, saying, “Neither of you gentlemen is so dexterous as I.” So he forced the two combatants asunder, while some one ran to tell Sun Quan.
The Marquis hastily jumped into the saddle and rode to the banquet hall.
At sight of their lord, they all three lowered their weapons.
“I have bidden you two to forget this old enmity,” said Sun Quan.
“Why do you revive it today?” Ling Tong prostrated himself in tears.
Sun Quan exhorted him to forget his quarrel, and once again there was peace.
The next day the army set out for Hefei.
Because of the loss of Huancheng, Zhang Liao grieved greatly.
Cao Cao had sent by the hands of Xue Ti a small casket sealed with his own seal and bearing outside the words, “If rebels come, open this.” So when he received the news of the coming of a powerful army, Zhang Liao opened the casket and read the letter therein, which said, “If Sun Quan comes to attack Hefei, the two Generals Li Dian and Zhang Liao are to go out to oppose him, and Yue Jin is to be left to guard the walls.” Zhang Liao sent the letter to the two men named therein.
“What do you think to do?” said Yue Jin.
Zhang Liao replied, “Our lord is away, and Wu is coming to attack for certain.
We must go out to repel them and exert ourselves to the utmost to inflict defeat upon their advanced guard.
Thus we shall appease the fears of the populace, and then we can hold as best we may.” But Li Dian was silent, for he was ever unfriendly to Zhang Liao.
Then seeing his colleague inclined to hold off, Yue Jin said, “I am for remaining on the defensive since the enemy is so much more numerous than we.” “Gentlemen, it seems you are selfish and not devoted to the common weal,” said Zhang Liao.
“You may have your private reasons for what you do, but I intend to go out and try to repel the enemy.
I will fight them to the death.” Thereupon Zhang Liao bade his servants saddle his steed.
At this, Li Dian's better feelings were aroused, and he rose, saying, “How can I be careless of the common weal and indulge my private feelings?
I am ready to follow you and do as you command.” Zhang Liao was elated at this moral victory, and said, “Since I can depend upon your help, my friend, then I would ask you to lie in ambush on the north of the Flageolet Ford in order to destroy the bridge there as soon as the army of Wu has crossed.
I, with my friend Yue Jin, will smite the enemy.” Li Dian went away to muster his troops and prepare the ambush.
As has been recorded, the leaders of the advance guard of the southern army were the veterans Lu Meng and Gan Ning. Sun Quan and Ling Tong were in the center; the other generals followed them.
The leaders of the van met Yue Jin first, and Gan Ning rode out and challenged him.
After a few bouts, Yue Jin pretended to be defeated and fled.
Gan Ning called to his colleague to join in the pursuit. When Sun Quan heard that this advance guard had been successful, he hastened his army to the Flageolet Ford. But then there came a series of explosions, and up came Zhang Liao and Li Dian, one on each flank.
Sun Quan was unprepared for this and sent messengers to call off the pursuit and ask for help from Lu Meng and Gan Ning. Before it could arrived, Zhang Liao had come up.
Manifestly, Ling Tong, who had with him only a small troop of three hundred horse, could not long withstand the army of Cao Cao, but he faced them and fought bravely and presently cried to his lord, “Cross the Flageolet Bridge and run back, my lord!” Sun Quan galloped for the bridge, but the southern end had been already broken down and there was a wide breach between the end of the bridge and the shore. Not a single plank was there by which to cross. What could be done?
Sun Quan was in a quandary, and helpless. “Go back and jump for it!” yelled one of the generals, Gu Li by name.
Sun Quan did so. Backing his horse some thirty spans or so, he then gave it its head and lashed it with his whip. The good beast leaped, cleared the chasm and his master wee safe on the southern shore.
Once Dilu leant across the Tan Torrent wide, And when defeat did Sun of Wu betide, And death came threateningly at Flageolet Ford, His steed too leapt, and saved him from the sword.
Having reached the farther shore, Sun Quan embarked on one of the boats of Xu Sheng and Dong Xi and was rowed to a place of safety, while Ling Tong and Gu Li were still fighting with Zhang Liao's army.
Gan Ning and Lu Meng, coming to their aid, were pursued by Yue Jin, and Li Dian also stayed their progress.
But the soldiers of the South Land fought bravely; half of their force fell, and Ling Tong's troop of three hundred horse perished all, while Ling Tong himself was wounded, but found his way to the bridge.
Finding it destroyed, he fled along the stream. Presently he was seen by Sun Quan from the boat and taken on board by Dong Xi.
Gan Ning and Lu Meng also cut their ways back to the southern shore.
The terrible slaughter at this battle put such fear into the minds of the people of the South Land that the name of Zhang Liao kept the very children quiet at night.
When Sun Quan reached his camp, he richly rewarded Ling Tong and Gu Li.
Then he led his army back to Ruxu and began to put his ships in order so that the army and navy might act in unison. He also sent home for reinforcements.
Zhang Liao reflected that he had insufficient force to meet another attack if it should be supported by the navy of the South Land, so he sent Xue Ti through the night to carry an urgent message to his master in Hanzhong. When the messenger arrived, Cao Cao saw that his western expedition would have to yield to the urgency of home defense.
However, he called in his counselors and put a direct question to them. “Can we take the Western Land of Rivers now, or not?” “Shu is too well prepared; we cannot,” replied Liu Ye.
“It is better to go to the succor of Hefei and then go down the river to take the South Land.” Wherefore, leaving Xiahou Yuan to station at the Dingjun Mountains to guard Hanzhong, and Zhang He to keep Mount Mengtou Pass, Cao Cao broke up his camp and went toward Ruxu with all his commanders.
The armored horsemen had conquered Hanzhong, The ensigns toward the south were turned again.
The subsequent course of the war will be unfolded in later chapters.
CHAPTER 68. Gan Ning's Hundred Horsemen Raid The Northern Camp; Zuo Ci's Flung-Down Cup Fools Cao Cao. Sun Quan was occupied in ordering his army at Ruxu when he heard of the coming of Cao Cao with four hundred thousand troops to the relief of Hefei.
He told off a fleet of fifty large ships to lie in the port while Chen Wu went up and down the river banks on the look-out.
“It would be well to inflict a defeat upon Cao Cao's army before they recover from the long march; it would dishearten them,” said Zhang Zhao.
Looking around at the officers in his tent, Sun Quan said, “Who is bold enough to go forth and fight this Cao Cao and so take the keen edge off the spirit of his army?” And Ling Tong offered himself.
“I will go!” said he.
“How many soldiers do you require?” “Three thousand troops will suffice,” replied Ling Tong.
But Gan Ning struck in, saying, “Only a hundred horse would be needed; why send three thousand?” Ling Tong was angry, and he and Gan Ning began to wrangle even in the presence of their chief.
“Cao Cao's army is too strong to be attacked recklessly,” said Sun Quan.
Finally he gave the commission to Ling Tong with his three thousand, bidding him reconnoiter just outside Ruxu, and fight the enemy if he met him.
Marching out, Ling Tong very soon saw a great cloud of dust, which marked the approach of an army.
As soon as they came near enough, Zhang Liao, who led the van, engaged with Ling Tong, and they fought half a hundred bouts without sign of victory for either.
Then Sun Quan began to fear for his champion, so he sent Lu Meng to extricate Ling Tong from the battle and escort him home.
When Ling Tong had come back, his rival Gan Ning went to Sun Quan and said, “Now let me have the hundred horsemen, and I will raid the enemy's camp this night.
If I lose a soldier or a mount, I will claim no merit.” Sun Quan commended his courage and chose a hundred of his best veterans, whom he placed under Gan Ning's command for the raid.
Sun Quan also gave him as a feast for the soldiers fifty flasks of wine and seventy five pounds of mutton.
Returning to the tents, Gan Ning drew up his little force and made them sit down in rows. Then he filled two silver goblets with wine, solemnly drank to them, and said, “Comrades, tonight our orders are to raid the camp of the enemy. Wherefore fill your goblets and call up all your strength for the task.” But the men did not welcome his words; instead they looked one at another uncertain.
Seeing them in this mood, Gan Ning adopted a fierce tone, drew his sword and cried, “What are you waiting for?
If I, a leader of rank, can risk my life, cannot you?” Moved by the angry face of the leader, the men rose, bowed their heads and said, “We will fight to the last.” Then the wine and meat were distributed to them and each one ate his fill.
The second watch was chosen as the hour to start, and each man stuck a white goose plume in his cap whereby they could recognize each other in the darkness.
At the time appointed they buckled on their armor, mounted and, galloping away, quickly came to Cao Cao's camp. Hastily throwing aside the thorny barriers, they burst in with a yell that rose to the very heavens. They made straight for the center, hoping to slay Cao Cao himself.
But the troops of the leader's brigade had made a rampart of their carts within which they were sheltered as if in an iron tun, so that the raiders failed to find a way in.
However, Gan Ning and his small force dashed hither and thither, cutting and slashing, till Cao Cao's men were quite bewildered and frightened. They had no notion of the number of their assailants. All their efforts only increased the confusion.
Wherefore the hundred men had it all their own way and rushed from point to point slaying whomever they met.
But soon the drums beat in every camp and torches were lit and shouts arose, and it was time for the raiders to get away.
Gan Ning led his little body of troops out through the south gate with never a soldier trying to stop him, and rode for his own camp.
He met Zhou Tai, who had been sent to help him in case of need; but the need had not arisen, and the hundred heroes with their leader rode back in triumph. There was no pursuit. A poem was written praising this exploit:
The drums of war make earth to shake When the South Land comes near even devils quake.
People long will tell of that night raid, That Gan Ning's goose-plumed warriors made.
On his return, Gan Ning took the tale of his men at the camp gate, not a man nor a horse was missing.
He entered to the sound of drum and fife and the shouting of his men.
“Long life!” shouted they, as Sun Quan came to welcome them.
Gan Ning dismounted and prostrated himself.
His lord raised him, and took him by the hand, saying, “This expedition of yours must have given those rebels a shaking.
I had yielded to your desire only I wished to give you the opportunity to manifest your valor.
I did not wish to let you be sacrificed.” Gan Ning's exploit was rewarded with gifts, a thousand rolls of silk and a hundred keen swords, all of which he distributed among his soldiers.
Sun Quan was very proud of his subordinate's doughty deed, and said, “Cao Cao may have his Zhang Liao, but I can match him with my friend Gan Ning.” Soon Zhang Liao came to proffer another challenge, and Ling Tong, impatient at being excelled by his rival and enemy, begged that he might go out to fight.
His request was granted, and he marched out a short distance from Ruxu with five thousand troops.
Sun Quan, with Gan Ning in his train, went out to look on at the encounter.
When both armies had come out on the plain and were arrayed, Zhang Liao, with Li Dian and Yue Jin, one on either side, advanced to the front.
Ling Tong, sword in hand, galloped out towards him and, at Zhang Liao's command, Yue Jin took the challenge and went to open the combat.
They fought half a hundred bouts, and neither seemed to have the better of the other.
Then Cao Cao, hearing of the great contest going on, rode up to the battlefield and took position under the great standard, whence he could see the fighting. Seeing both combatants were waxing desperate, he thought to decide the struggle by an unfair blow.
He bade Cao Xiu let fly a secret arrow, which he did by creeping up under cover of Zhang Liao. It struck Ling Tong's steed, which reared and threw its rider.
Yue Jin dashed forward to thrust at the fallen warrior with his spear, but before the blow could be given, the twang of another bow was heard and an arrow speeding by hit Yue Jin full in the face. He fell from his horse.
Then both sides rushed forward to rescue their champions; the gongs clanged, and the combat ceased.
Ling Tong returned to his camp and reported himself to his master.
“The arrow that saved you was shot by Gan Ning,” said Sun Quan. Ling Tong turned to his rival and bowed low.
“I could not have supposed you would have rendered me such a service, Sir,” said he to Gan Ning.
This episode ended the strife and enmity between the two leaders, who thereafter swore perpetual friendship.
On the other side Cao Cao saw to it that his general's wound was dressed, and next day he launched an attack against Ruxu along five different lines.
He himself led one army in the center; on the left Zhang Liao and Li Dian led two armies; on the right Xu Huang and Pang De commanded the other two.
Each army was ten thousand strong, and they marched to give battle on the river bank.
The crews and fighting troops of the South Land's naval squadron were greatly frightened by the approach of these armies.
“You have eaten the bread of your prince, and you must give loyal service; why fear?” said Xu Sheng.
Thereupon he put some hundreds of his best men into small boats, went along the bank, and broke into the legion under Li Dian.
Meanwhile Dong Xi on the ships beat drums and cheered them on.
But a great storm came on, lashing the river to fury, and the waves rolled mountains high.
The larger ships rolled as if they would overturn, and the soldiers of Wu were frightened. They started to get down into the bulkier cargo-boats to save their lives. But Dong Xi threatened them with his sword, cutting down some half score of the mutineers.
“My orders are to hold this point against the enemy;” shouted he, “we dare not abandon the ships.” However, the wind increased, and presently the bold Dong Xi was thrown into the river by the rolling of his ship and was drowned, together with his men.
Xu Sheng dashed hither and thither among Li Dian's army, slaying right and left.
Chen Wu, hearing the noise of battle, set out for the river bank. On his way Chen Wu met Pang De and the legion under him. A melee ensued.
Then Sun Quan with Zhou Tai and his troops joined in. The small force from the ships that had attacked Li Dian was now surrounded. So Sun Quan gave the signal for an onslaught that should rescue them. This failed, and Sun Quan was himself surrounded in turn and soon in desperate straits.
From a height, Cao Cao saw his difficulties and sent in Xu Chu to cut Sun Quan's column in halves so that neither half could aid the other. When Zhou Tai had cut an arterial alley out of the press and reached the river-side, he looked for his master. But Sun Quan was nowhere visible, so Zhou Tai dashed once again into the battle.
Coming to his own troops, he cried, “Where is our lord?” They pointed to where the press was most dense.
Zhou Tai stiffened and dashed in.
Presently he reached his lord's side and cried out, “My lord, follow me and I will hack a way out!” Zhou Tai fought his way out to the river bank. Then he turned to look, and Sun Quan was not behind him. So he turned back, forced his way in and once again found his way to his master's side.
“I cannot get out; the arrows are too thick,” said Sun Quan.
“Then go first, my lord, and I will follow.” Sun Quan then urged his steed as fast as he could go, and Zhou Tai kept off all pursuit.
Zhou Tai sustained many wounds and the arrows rattled on his helmet, but he got clear at last and Sun Quan was safe.
As they neared the river bank, Lu Meng came up with some of the naval force and escorted Sun Quan down to the ships.
“I owe my safety to Zhou Tai, who thrice came to my aid,” said Sun Quan.
“But Xu Sheng is still in the thick of the fight, and how can we save him?” “I will go to his rescue,” cried Zhou Tai.
Whirling his spear, Zhou Tai again plunged into the battle and presently brought his colleague safely out of the press.
Both were severely wounded.
Lu Meng ordered his troops to keep up a rapid flight of arrows so as to command the bank, and in this way the two leaders were enabled to get on board the ships.
Now Chen Wu had engaged the legion under Pang De. Being inferior in force and no aid being forthcoming, Chen Wu was forced into a valley where the trees and undergrowth were very dense.
He tried to turn, but was caught by the branches, and while so entangled he was killed by Pang De.
When Cao Cao saw that Sun Quan had escaped from the battle to the river bank, he urged his steed forward in pursuit. He sent flights of arrows toward the fugitives.
By this time Lu Meng's troops had emptied their quivers, and he began to be very anxious. But just then a fleet of ships sailed up led by Lu Xun, the son-in-law of Sun Ce, who came with one hundred thousand marines and drove back Cao Cao's army. Then he landed to pursue.
He captured many thousands of horses and slew many men, so that Cao Cao was quite defeated and retired.
Then they sought and found the body of Chen Wu among the slain. Sun Quan was much grieved when he came to know that Chen Wu had been slain and Dong Xi drowned, and wept sore. Men were sent to seek for Dong Xi's body, which at last was found. Both generals were buried with great honors.
As a recompense for Zhou Tai's services in Sun Quan's rescue, Sun Quan prepared in his honor a great banquet, where Sun Quan himself offered Zhou Tai a goblet of wine and complimented and embraced him while the tears coursed down his cheeks.
“Twice you saved my life, careless of your own,” cried Sun Quan, “and you have received many wounds. It is as if your skin had been engraved and painted. What sort of a man should I be if I did not treat you as one of my own flesh and blood? Can I regard you, noble Sir, merely as a unit in my army? You are my meritorious minister.
I share the glory you have won and mine are your joys and sorrows.” Then Sun Quan bade Zhou Tai open his dress and exhibit his wounds for all the assembly to see. The skin was gashed all over as if his body had been scored with a knife.
Sun Quan pointed to the wounds one after another and asked how each one had been received.
And, as Zhou Tai told him, for every wound Sun Quan made him drink off a goblet of wine till he became thoroughly intoxicated.
Sun Quan then presented him with a black silk parasol and bade him use it on all occasions as a sign of the glory that was his.
But Sun Quan found his opponents too stable; at the end of a month the two armies were both at Ruxu and neither had won a victory.
Then said Zhang Zhao and Gu Yong, “Cao Cao is too strong, and we cannot overcome him by mere force.
If the struggle continues longer, you will only lose more soldiers.
You would better seek to make peace.” Sun Quan followed this advice and dispatched Bu Zhi on a peace mission to Cao Cao's camp. Sun Quan offered a yearly tribute.
Cao Cao also saw that the South Land was too strong to be overcome, and consented.
Cao Cao insisted, “The Marquis should first send away his army, and then I would retire.” Bu Zhi returned with this message, and Sun Quan sent away the greater part, leaving only Zhou Tai and Jiang Qin to hold Ruxu. The army returned to Capital Moling.
Cao Cao left Cao Ren and Zhang Liao in charge of Hefei, and he marched the army back to Capital Xuchang.
On arrival, all Cao Cao's officers, military and civil, persuaded him to become Prince of Wei.
Only the Chair of the Secretariat, Cui Yan, spoke strongly against the scheme.
“You are, then, the only man who knows not the fate of Xun Yu,” said his colleagues. “Such times! Such deeds!” cried Cui Yan.
“You are guilty of rebellion, but you may commit it yourselves.
I will bear no part in it.” Certain enemies told Cao Cao, and Cui Yan was thrown into prison.
At his trial he glared like a tiger, and his very beard curled with contempt; he raged and cursed at Cao Cao for a betrayer of his prince, and a rebel.
The interrogating magistrate reported his conduct to Cao Cao, who ordered Cui Yan to be beaten to death in prison.
Cui Yan of Qinghe-Greenriver, Firm and unyielding was he, With beard crisp curling and gleaming eyes, Which showed the man of stone and iron within.
He drove the evil from his presence, And his glory is fair and high.
For loyalty to his lord of Han, His fame shall increase as the ages roll.
In the twenty-first year of Rebuilt Tranquillity , in the fifth month of that year, a great memorial signed by many officers went up to Emperor Xian, praying: “The Duke of Wei has rendered so great services that no minister before him, in Heaven as well as on Earth, not even Yi Yin and the Duke of Zhou, could match his manifest merits to the state.
Thus, the title of kingship should be granted to him.” The memorial was approved, and a draft edict was prepared by the famous Zhong Yao to make Cao Cao Prince of Wei.
Thrice Cao Cao with seeming modesty pretended to decline the honor, but thrice was his refusal rejected.
Finally he made his obeisance and was enrolled as Prince of Wei with the usual insignia and privileges, a coronet with twelve strings of beads and a chariot with gilt shafts, drawn by six steeds. Using the formalities of the Son of God, he decorated his imperial chariot with bells and had the roads cleared when he passed along. He built himself a palace at Yejun. Then he began to discuss the appointment of an heir-apparent.
His principal wife, Lady Ding, was without issue; but a concubine, Lady Liu, had borne him a son, Cao Ang, who had been killed in battle at the siege of Wancheng when Cao Cao fought against Zhang Xiu.
A second concubine, Lady Bian, had borne him four sons: Cao Pi, Cao Zhang, Cao Zhi, and Cao Xiong.
Wherefore he elevated Lady Bian to the rank of Queen of Wei in place of Lady Ding.
The third son, Cao Zhi, was very clever and a ready master of composition. Cao Cao wished him to be named the heir.
Then the eldest son, Cao Pi sought from the High Adviser Jia Xu a plan to secure his rights of primogeniture, and Jia Xu told him to do so and so.
Thereafter, whenever the father went out on any military expedition, Cao Zhi wrote fulsome panegyrics, but Cao Pi wept so copiously at bidding his father farewell that the courtiers were deeply affected and remarked that though Cao Zhi was crafty and clever, he was not so sincerely filial as Cao Pi.
Cao Pi also bought over his father's immediate attendants, who then rang the praises of his virtues so loud that Cao Cao was strongly disposed to name him as the heir after all. After hesitating a long time, the matter was referred to Jia Xu. “I wish to name my heir; who shall it be?” said Cao Cao.
Jia Xu would not say, and Cao Cao asked why. “I was just recalling the past in my mind and could not reply at once,” said Jia Xu.
“What were you recalling?” “I was thinking of two fathers, Yuan Shao and Liu Biao, and their sons.” Cao Cao smiled.
Soon after this he declared his eldest son his heir.
In the winter of that year, in the tenth month, the building of the palace of the new Prince of Wei was completed and the furnishing begun. From all parts were collected rare flowers and uncommon trees to beautify the gardens.
One agent went into the South Land and saw Sun Quan, to whom he presented a letter from Cao Cao asking that he might be allowed to proceed to Wenzhou to get some oranges.
At that period Sun Quan was in a most complaisant mood toward Cao Cao, so from the orange trees in his own city, he picked forty loads of very fine fruits and sent them immediately to Yejun.
On the way, the bearers of the oranges fell tired, and they had to stop at the foot of a certain hill. There came along an elderly man, blind of one eye and lame of one leg, who wore a white rattan head-dress and a black loose robe. He saluted the bearers and stayed to talk. Presently he said, “Your burdens are heavy, O porters; may this old Taoist lend you a shoulder? What do you say?” Naturally they were pleased enough, and the amiable wayfarer bore each load for two miles.
When they resumed their burdens, they noticed that the loads seemed lighter than before, and they felt rather suspicious.
When the Taoist was taking his leave of the officer in charge of the party, he said, “I am an old friend from the same village as the Prince of Wei. My name is Zuo Ci. Among Taoists I bear the appellation of 'Black-Horn'.
When you get to the end of your journey, you may say that I was inquiring after your lord.” Zuo Ci shook down his sleeves and left.
In due course the orange bearers reached the new palace, and the oranges were presented.
But when Cao Cao cut one open, it was but an empty shell of a thing; there was no pulp beneath the rind.
Cao Cao was rather puzzled and called in the porters, who told him of their falling in with the mysterious Taoist on the way.
But Cao Cao scouted the idea of that being the reason.
But just then the warden of the gate sent to say that a certain Taoist named Zuo Ci was at the gate and wished to see the king. “Send him in,” said Cao Cao.
“He is the man we met on the way,” said the porters when he appeared.
Cao Cao said curtly, “What sorcery have you been exercising on my beautiful fruit?” “How could such a thing happen?” said the Taoist.
Thereupon he cut open an orange and showed it full of pulp, most delicious to the taste.
But when Cao Cao cut open another, that again was empty, nothing but rind. Cao Cao was more than ever perplexed.
He bade his visitor be seated, and, as Zuo Ci asked for refreshment, wine and food were brought in.
The Taoist ate ravenously, consuming a whole sheep, and drank in proportion. Yet he showed no sign of intoxication or repletion.
“By what magic are you here?” said Cao Cao.
“I am but a poor Taoist. I went into Shu, and on Mount Omi, I studied the way for thirty long years. One day I heard my name called from out the rocky wall of my cell.
I looked, but could see nothing.
The same thing happened next day, and so on for many days.
Then suddenly, with a roar like thunder, the rock split asunder, and I saw a sacred book in three volumes called 'The Book of Concealing Method'.
From the first volume I learned to ascend to the clouds astride the wind, to sail up into the great void itself; from the second to pass through mountains and penetrate rocks; from the third, to float light as vapor, over the seas, to become invisible at will or change my shape, to fling swords and project daggers so as to decapitate a man from a distance.
You, O Prince, have reached the acme of glory; why not now withdraw and, like me, become a disciple of the Taoists?
Why not travel to Mount Omi and there mend your ways so that I may bequeath my three volumes to you ?” “Oft have I reflected upon this course and struggled against my fate, but what can I do? There is no one to maintain the government,” replied Cao Cao.
“There is Liu Bei of Yiazhou, a scion of the dynastic family; could you not make way for him?
If you do not, I may have to send one of my flying swords after your head one day.” “You are one of his secret agents,” said Cao Cao, suddenly enraged.
“Seize him!” cried he to his lictors.
They did so, while the Taoist laughed. And Zuo Ci continued to laugh as they dragged him down to the dungeons, where they beat him cruelly.
And when they had finished, the Taoist lay there gently respiring in a sound sleep, just as if he felt nothing whatever.
This enraged Cao Cao still more, and he bade them put the priest into the large wooden collar and nail it securely and then chain him in a cell.
And Cao Cao set guards over him, and the guards saw the collar and chains just fall off while the victim lay fast asleep not injured in the least.
The Taoist lay in prison seven days without food or water; and when they went to look at him, he was sitting upright on the ground, quite well and rosy looking.
The gaolers reported these things to Cao Cao, who had the prisoner brought in.
“I do not mind going without food for years,” said the victim, when Cao Cao questioned him, “yet I could eat a thousand sheep in a day.” Cao Cao was at the end of his resources; he could prevail nothing against such a man.
That day there was to be a great banquet at the new palace, and guests came in crowds.
When the banquet was in progress and the wine cup passing freely, suddenly the same Taoist appeared. He had wooden clogs on his feet.
All faces turned in his direction and not a few were afraid; others wondered.
Standing there in front of the great assembly, the Taoist said, “O powerful Prince, here today you have every delicacy on the table and a glorious company of guests. You have rare and beautiful objects from all parts of the world. Is there anything lacking?
If there be anything you would like, name it and I will get it for you.” Cao Cao replied, “Then I want a dragon's liver to make soup: can you get that?” “Where's the difficulty?” replied Zuo Ci.
With a pencil the Taoist immediately sketched a dragon on the whitewashed wall of the banquet hall.
Then he flicked his sleeve over it, the dragon's belly opened of itself, and therefrom Zuo Ci took the liver all fresh and bloody.
“You had the liver hidden in your sleeve,” said Cao Cao, incredulous. “Then there shall be another test,” said the Taoist.
“It is winter and every plant outside is dead.
What flower would you like, O Prince.
Name any one you will.” “I want a peony,” said Cao Cao.
“Easy,” said the Taoist.
At this request they brought out a flower-pot, which was placed in full view of the guests.
Then he spurted some water over it, and in a very short time up came a peony with two fully expanded flowers.
The guests were astonished, and they asked the Taoist to be seated and gave him wine and food.
The cook sent in some minced fish.
“The best mince is made from the perch of River Song,” said the Taoist. “How can you get fish five hundred miles away?” said Cao Cao.
“Not at all difficult.
Tell someone to get a rod and hook, and fish in the pond just below this banquet hall.” They did so, and very soon several beautiful perches lay on the steps.
“I have always kept some of these in my ponds, of course,” said Cao Cao.
“O Prince, do you think to deceive me?
All perches have two gills except the River Song perch, which has two pairs.
That is the distinguishing feature.” The guests crowded round to look, and, surely enough, the fish had four gills.
“To cook this perch one needs purple sprout ginger though,” said the Taoist.
“Can you also produce that?” asked Cao Cao.
“Easily.” Zuo Ci told them to bring in a silver bowl, which the magician filled with water.
Very soon the ginger filled the bowl, and he presented it to the host.
Cao Cao put out his hand to pick some, when suddenly a book appeared in the bowl and the title was “Cao Cao's New Treatise on the Art of War”.
He took it out and read it over. Not a word of his treatise was missing.
Cao Cao became more mystified. Zuo Ci took up a jade cup that stood on the table, filled it with fine wine, and presented it to Cao Cao. “Drink this, O Prince, and you will live a thousand years.” “Drink of it first yourself,” said Cao Cao.
The Taoist took the jade pin from his head-dress and drew it across the cup as if dividing the wine into two portions.
Then he drank one half and handed the cup with the other half to Cao Cao.
But Cao Cao angrily refused it. The Taoist then threw the cup into the air, where it was transformed into a white dove which circled round the banquet hall and then flew away.
All faces were turned upward following the flight of the dove, and so no one had noticed the going of the Taoist.
But he was gone; and soon the gate warden reported that he had left the palace.
Said Cao Cao, “A magician like this ought to be put to death, or he will do some mischief.” The redoubtable Xu Chu and a company of three hundred armed men were sent to arrest the Taoist.
They saw the Taoist, still wearing his wooden clogs, not far ahead but striding along quickly.
Xu Chu rode after Zuo Ci, but in spite of all his horse could do, he could not come up with Zuo Ci.
He kept up the chase right to the hills, when he met a shepherd lad with a flock of sheep. And there walked the Taoist among the sheep. The Taoist disappeared.
The angry warrior slew the whole flock of sheep, while the shepherd lad looked on weeping.
Suddenly the boy heard a voice from one of the severed heads, telling him to replace the heads on the bodies of his sheep.
Instead of doing so, he fled in terror, covering his face.
Then he heard a voice calling to him, “Do not run away; you shall have your sheep again.” He turned, and lo!
the sheep were all alive again, and Zuo Ci was driving them along.
The boy began to question him, but the Taoist made no reply.
With a flick of his sleeves, he was gone.
The shepherd lad went home and told all these marvels to his master. He could not conceal such a story, and it reached Cao Cao.
Then sketches of the Taoist were sent everywhere with orders to arrest him.
Within three days were arrested in the city and outside three or four hundred persons all blind of one eye, lame of one leg, and wearing a rattan head-dress, a black loose robe and wooden clogs. They were all alike and all answered to the description of the missing Taoist. There was a great hubbub in the street.
Cao Cao ordered his officer to sprinkle the crowd of Taoists with the blood of pigs and goats in order to exorcise the witchcraft and take them away to the drill ground on the south of the city.
Thither he followed them with his guards, who surrounded the crowd of arrested persons and slew every one.
But from the neck of each one, after the head was severed, there floated up into the air a wreath of black vapor, and all these wreaths drifted toward a center where they joined up into the image of another Zuo Ci, who presently beckoned to him a white crane out of the sky, mounted it and sat as on a horse.
Clapping his hands, the Taoist cried merrily, “The rats of the earth follow the golden tiger, and one morning the doer of evil shall be no more.” The soldiers shot arrows at both bird and man. At this a tremendous storm burst over the city.
Stones were driven along, sand was whirled about, and all the corpses arose from the ground, each holding his own head in his hands.
They rushed toward Cao Cao as if to strike him.
The officials covered their eyes, and none dared to look another in the face.
The power of a bold man will overturn a state, The art of a necromancer also produces wonders.
Read the next chapter and you will know the fate of Cao Cao. CHAPTER 69. Guan Lu Sees Things In The Book Of Changes; Five Loyal Subjects Die For Their State.
The sight of the corpses of his victims rising to their feet in the storm and running toward him was too much for Cao Cao, and he swooned.
However, the wind quickly fell and the corpses disappeared.
His followers assisted Cao Cao to his palace, but he was very ill. A poet celebrated the episode of the murdered Taoist: He studied his magical books, He was learned in mystical lore, And with magical fleetness of foot He could travel the wide world over.
The magical arts that he knew, He employed in an earnest essay To reform the bad heart of Cao Cao.
But in vain; Cao Cao held on his way. Cao Cao's illness seemed beyond the art of the physicians, and drugs seemed of no avail.
It happened that Minister Xu Zhi came from the capital to visit the prince, who bade the latter take a cast from the “Book of Changes.” “Have you ever heard of Guan Lu?
He is more than human in his skill at divination,” said Xu Zhi.
“I have heard a lot about him, but I do not know how clever he is; you tell me about him,” replied Cao Cao. “He is from Pingyuan.
His face is ugly and coarse; he drinks to excess and is rather dissipated.
His father was an elder of Langye.
From a lad Guan Lu loved to study the stars, staying up all night to watch them, in spite of the prohibition of his father and mother.
He used to say that if domestic fowls and wild geese knew the seasons naturally, how much more should humans.
He often used to play with other boys at drawing pictures of the sky on the ground, putting in the sun, moon, and stars.
When he grew older he studied the 'Book of Changes' very deeply and observed the winds. He was a marvelous calculator and excellent physiognomist.
“His fame reached the ears of Shan Zichun, the Governor of Langye, who called him to his residence for an interview.
There were present some hundred or so other guests, every one of whom could be called able of speech.
“'I am young and not over-bold,' said Guan Lu to the Governor.
'I pray you give me three flasks of wine to loosen my tongue.' The request was astonishing, but the wine was brought in, and when he had drunk it, Guan Lu, looking contemptuously at the other guests, said, 'Now I am ready; are these the sort of opponents you have got together for me to contend with?
Are these gentlemen sitting around me disputants?' “'I myself am anxious for a match with you,' said Shan Zichun.
Then they began upon the meaning of the Book of Changes.
Guan Lu's words poured forth like a torrent, and his ideas were most recondite.
The Governor replied, stating difficulties; Guan Lu swept them away in a stream of eloquence.
So it went on the whole day without a pause even for refreshment.
Neither Shan Zichun nor his other guests could help praising Guan Lu and agreeing with him.
“His fame spread wide after this encounter, and people spoke of him as the 'Supernatural Boy.' After this he became famous in another way.
There was a certain Guo En, a man of the people, who had two brothers. All three became lame, and they called in Guan Lu to cast lots and discover the reason.
Guan Lu said, 'By the lots there is a female demon in your family tomb, an aunt, the wife of one of your father's brothers.
Some years ago, in a time of famine, for the sake of a few carts of grain, she was pushed into a well and a great stone was thrown in on her, crushing her head so that she suffered intensely. She complained to the Most High, and your lameness is the retribution for that crime.
No prayers will avert the evil. The three brothers wept and acknowledged their guilt.
“Governor Wang Ji of Anping, heard of the diviner's fame and invited him to come on a visit, and he went.
It happened that another guest of the Governor was the magistrate of Xindu, whose wife suffered from headaches and his son from pains in the heart. Guan Lu was asked to discover the reason.
He cast lots and said that at the west corner of the main hall there were buried two corpses, one of a man who held a spear, the other of a man who had a bow and arrows. The wall was built across them.
The spearman's master had gashed his head, and so his head pained.
The archer's master had stabbed him in the heart, and so his heart suffered anguish.
They dug where Guan Lu indicated and, about eight spans down, found two coffins, one with a spear inside and the other with a strung bow and wooden arrows. All were much decayed.
Guan Lu bade them remove the bones and bury them three miles outside the walls. Thereafter the woman and her son suffered no more.
“A certain Zhuge Yuan, Magistrate of Guantao, newly promoted to Governor, was leaving for his new post, and Guan Lu went to see him off.
One of the guests mentioned that Guan Lu could divine what was hidden from sight. The Governor doubted such powers and said he would put a test.
He got a swallow's egg, a wasp's nest, and a spider, and concealed them in three separate boxes. He asked Guan Lu to guess the contents. The divination made, Guan Lu wrote three quatrains:
'The latent life will declare itself; It will cling to your lordly hall, Or male or female, flung into space, Wide wings will prevent its fall. This seems to indicate a swallow's egg.
'A many-chambered dwelling Is hanging to your eaves. Each room has a poisonous tenant; Who'll be flying when he leaves.
This answers to a wasp's nest. 'Therein is a long-legged, trembling thing, Who spins a thread from his inside And spreads a fine spun net for flies; He profits most at eventide.
And this it a spider.' “The guests were amazed.
“An old woman in his village having lost a cow, came to consult him.
After the divination, he told her that seven men had taken away the cow and were cooking and eating it on the bank of a certain mountain stream. She would better go there quickly and see who they were.
If she went with all speed, she would find the skin and the flesh.
The woman went and found the seven men hidden behind a small shanty, boiling beef. Most of the cow's flesh was still there.
She told Governor Liu Bin, who arrested the seven men and punished them.
Then the Governor asked the old lady how she got to know exactly who the offenders were, and she told him. “Governor Liu Bin was dubious, too. He sent for Guan Lu and put him to the following test.
He placed his seal and a pheasant feather in a box and asked what were the contents. The reply was:
'Square within, without so round, Beauteous colors here abound; The jewel within is held secure And what it witnesses is sure.
Is not this a seal in its bag? 'There's a bird on the precipice steep, Its body with flame seems aglow.
Its wings are barred yellow and black. At sunrise it never fails to crow. And I think this hints at a pheasant feather.
“Governor Liu Bin treated the marvelous diviner with great honor.
“One day Guan Lu saw a youth plowing a field. After watching him for a long time, Guan Lu suddenly asked his name and age.
“'My name is Zhao Yan, and I am nineteen,' said the young man.
'Pray, who may you be, Sir?' “'I am Guan Lu; you may have heard of me.
I see an air of early death about you, and you will be done with life in three days.
It is a pity that one so handsome should die so young.' “Zhao Yan forsook his plow, hurried home and told his father.
The father at once set out to find Guan Lu, and, having found Guan Lu, threw himself on the ground and besought the diviner to save his son. “'How can I avert the doom? It is fate,' said Guan Lu. “'Alas!
I have but this one son, I pray you save him.' “And the son added his tears and prayers to those of his father. Guan Lu was deeply touched.
Then he turned to the lad and said, 'You get ready some good wine and some venison. Tomorrow go into the forest on the south there, and underneath a lofty tree you will see two men seated on boulders playing chess. One of them will be dressed in white, and he will be facing the south. He is very evil looking.
The other will be seated opposite, dressed in red. He is very handsome.
They will be deeply absorbed in their game and will not notice who offers them food and wine, which you will humbly present on your knees.
When they have eaten and drunk, you will prostrate yourself and with tears pray them to grant you length of days. You will gain an increased span of life, but, above all things, do not mention that I told you what to do.' “The father kept Guan Lu as a guest, and the next day the son followed out his instructions.
He entered the forest and soon came upon the two men seated beneath a pine, playing chess. They seemed oblivious to all around them.
Zhao Yan presented the wine and the food, and the two men ate absentmindedly, for the game went on.
“But when Zhao Yan threw himself on the ground and implored the gift of long life, they seemed startled.
“'This must be some of Guan Lu's doing,' said Red-Robe.
'Still, as we have accepted a gift at his hand, we must have pity on him.' “He who was dressed in white then lifted up a book that hung at his side and looked therein. “'You are nineteen this year,' said White-Dress to Zhao Yan. 'You ought to die.
But we will insert a number nine over the number one and so make it read ninety-nine, and that is the age you will attain.
But when you go back, tell Guan Lu he is not to betray the secrets of fate, or Heaven will surely punish him.' “Then Red-Robe took out a pen and added the figure.
A gust of wind passed, and the two old men were transformed into two cranes that rose into the sky and flew away.
“Zhao Yan came back home and told what he had seen.
Guan Lu told him the red-robed man was the Southern Dipper Constellation, and the whiterobed, the Northern Dipper.
“'But the Northern Dipper consists of nine stars, and there was only one man,' objected the lad.
“'Separately they are nine, but they combine to form one.
The Northern Dipper records deaths; the Southern Dipper, births.
Now the extra figure has been added, you need have no anxiety; you will live long.
“Father and son both thanked him most sincerely, but thereafter Guan Lu was very careful how he divined for people lest he should betray celestial secrets.
“Now, this man is at Pingyuan, and you, O Prince, can seek your fate of him.
Why not call him?” Cao Cao was greatly glad. Guan Lu was sent for and came.
As soon as the salutations were over, Cao Cao asked him to cast lots for him.
Guan Lu at once found the cause and said, “The illness is only due to magical machinations; it should not create anxiety.” Cao Cao was much relieved in his mind, and his health began to improve. Next Cao Cao wished to know about the conditions in the empire's affairs.
After the necessary calculations the prophet said, “Three and eight cross; the yellow boar meets the tiger; the southern expedition causes the loss of one limb.” Then Cao Cao asked him to inquire whether his life should be long or not.
Guan Lu replied, “Lion in the Palace to preserve the talents of ancestors:
the Prince's way is securely renewed, and his son and grandson shall come to high honor.” Then Cao Cao asked concerning himself.
“Divination concerning the fate of the universe may not be foreknown; wait a time and I will look into it.” Cao Cao was pleased and would like to keep such a man near him, so he offered him the post of historiographer  at his court, but it was declined.
“My destiny is mean, my luck despicable; I am not equal to such an office and dare not undertake it,” said Guan Lu. “Why not?” said Cao Cao.
“My forehead has no lofty fullness; my eyes no steady expression; my nose no bridge; my feet no round, solid heels; my back lacks the triple armor .
I can only control evil spirits securely; I cannot rule living humans.” “What think you of my physiognomy?” “What can a minister of extremely exalted rank like yourself desire further?” said Guan Lu.
Cao Cao pressed him to say; the soothsayer only laughed.
Then Cao Cao asked him to look at the many officers of all kinds standing around.
“Every one of them is a servant equal to the administration of the empire,” said Guan Lu.
But when Cao Cao asked whether good or bad fortune was to be his, the soothsayer would not give a clear and full reply. A poem says: Guan Lu was a seer of old. Stars to him their secrets told.
Mysteries, occult and dim, Were as daylight unto him.
His so subtle intellect Could the shade of death detect, But the secrets of his skill Died with him,—are secrets still.
Again Cao Cao asked him to divine concerning his rivals Wu and Shu.
Guan Lu said, “The south just lost a famous leader, and the west is encroaching on your territory.” Cao Cao's doubts as to the accuracy of one of these events were soon set at rest, for a messenger came from Hefei to report:
“Lu Su, the Supreme Commander of the South Land, has died in Lukou.” Then Cao Cao sent hurriedly into Hanzhong, and the scout returned to report:
“Zhang Fei and Ma Chao have taken the Xiabian Pass and are threatening Hanzhong.” Cao Cao was angry and inclined to march at once against the invaders; but he consulted the great soothsayer, who advised him not to move. “Do not act in haste.
In the coming spring there will be a conflagration in Xuchang,” said Guan Lu.
Having been witness of the verification of Guan Lu's words, Cao Cao was in no mood to neglect the warning.
He stayed on in his palace, but he sent Cao Hong with fifty thousand troops to assist in the defense of the Eastern Land of Rivers, while Xiahou Dun, with thirty thousand troops, went to Xuchang to keep careful watch and be ready against any surprises.
He placed High Minister Wang Bi in command of the Imperial Guard.
Sima Yi warned Cao Cao against this Wang Bi, saying, “The man is given to wine, and slack. He is not a fit person for such a post.” Cao Cao replied, “He is very fit. He has followed me through all difficulties and dangers.
He is loyal and diligent, solid as stone or iron.” Wang Bi was appointed and led the guard into camp at the capital, outside the East Gate of the Imperial Palace.
Now there was a certain Geng Ji, a Luoyang man, who had long been employed in the Prime Minister's palace in a subordinate capacity and afterward had been promoted to a post of Minister. He and Minister Wei Huang were close friends.
These two were greatly distressed at Cao Cao's advance to princely rank, and more especially at his use of the imperial chariots.
In the early months of the twenty-third year , Geng Ji and Wei Huang came to a secret exchange of views on Cao Cao's conduct.
Geng Ji said, “The man is rebellious and wicked, every day behaving worse.
He intends to go farther, and how can we, as servants of the dynasty, help him in his wickedness?” Wei Huang said, “I have a friend named Jin Yi, who also is a servant of Han and an enemy of Cao Cao's. He is a descendant of the old Great Minister Jin Midi.
Beside, he is friendly with Wang Bi.
If we all tried our best, we ought to succeed.” “But if he is friendly Wang Bi, he will not assist us!” said Geng Ji.
“Let us go and sound him,” said Wei Huang.
So the two went to see Jin Yi, who received them in his private rooms. There they talked.
Said Wei Huang, “O virtuous Jin Yi, we know you are on most friendly terms with Commander Wang Bi, and so have come to beg a favor.” “What is it you ask?” “The Prince of Wei will soon receive the abdication of the Emperor and himself ascend to the seat of the mighty. Then you and your friend Wang Bi will advance to places of great honor; and when that day comes, we pray you not to forget us, but to recommend us for employment.
We should feel no shallow gratitude for your kindness.” Jin Yi flicked down his sleeves and arose looking very angry.
At that instant arrived the tea for the visitors. He snatched it away from the serving man and emptied it on the floor. Wei Huang started up in feigned alarm.
“How have I offended you, my good friend?” cried he.
“I have been friends with you because you are descendants of people who have served the Hans faithfully.
Now, instead of trying to repay the debt of gratitude you ought to feel, you turn aside to assist one who is their enemy, think you that I can regard you as friends?
How could I look the world in the face?” “But if it be destiny, one cannot help it,” said Geng Ji.
“One must accept it.” Jin Yi grew still more angry, so that the two visitors were convinced that at heart he was still loyal to the dynasty.
Then they began to tell him the true state of the case.
“Our real desire is to destroy this rebel, and we have come to ask your help in that.
What we said at first was only a test to find out what you thought.” “Think you, with my ancestry, generation after generation in the confidence and service of the Hans, that I would willingly follow a rebel?
If you, Sirs, really think of restoring the dynasty, pray tell me your plans.” “Though we have the desire to prove our gratitude, yet we lack the means to destroy the enemy,” said Wei Huang.
Said Jin Yi, “We desire helpers within and supporters without. If we could slay Wang Bi, we could use his name and troops to help the Emperor.
With the help of Liu Bei, the Imperial Uncle, we should be able to destroy the rebel Cao Cao.” Hearing Jin Yi's plan, the others clapped their hands in approval.
“And I have two friends outside of the city who will go with us,” said Jin Yi. “Both of them have the murder of a father to avenge. We can get their helps.” “Who are they?” “They are sons of the great physician Ji Ping and are called Ji Mao and Ji Mu.
Cao Cao put their father to death for his connection with the plot organized by Dong Cheng, when Dong Cheng received the secret edict conveyed in the robe and girdle, which was conferred upon him by the Emperor.
The two sons escaped that time by flight, but they have since secretly returned to the capital.
With their help all will go well.” Geng Ji and Wei Huang rejoiced at the prospect of further help, and a messenger was sent to call in the two Reilly brothers.
Soon they arrived, and the plot was laid before them. They were deeply affected and shed copious tears.
Their wrath rose to the sky and they swore to aid in the destruction of the rebel.
“On the fifteenth day of the first month there will be grand illuminations in the city,” said Jin Yi, “and felicitations will continue on every side.
Geng Ji and Wei Huang will each lead out their retainers and make their way quickly to Wang Bi's camp to wait till they see the fire begin.
Then they will dash in, slay Wang Bi, and follow me inside the Palace. We will then request the Emperor to ascend the Tower of the Five Phoenixes, assemble his officers, and issue orders to destroy the rebels. The two Reilly brothers will make their way into the city and set fires going. Then all will raise their voices and summon the populace to their aid.
They are to hold up any rescue force in the city till the Emperor has issued the edict and disturbance is allayed, when they will rush toward Yejun and seize Cao Cao. Then a messenger will be dispatched with a summons for Liu Bei, the Imperial Uncle.
We will begin our work that night at the second watch, and we will escape the ill success that attended Dong Cheng's attempt.” All five swore before Heaven to be true, and they smeared their lips with blood in earnest of their oath. After this, each returned to his own home to prepare arms and call up their people.
Geng Ji and Wei Huang each had four or five hundred retainers, whom they armed.
Ji Mao and Ji Mu also got together three hundred men. They gave out a story of a hunting party to explain the gathering.
When the preparations were complete, and before the time fixed for the rising, Jin Yi went to see Wang Bi and said, “Everything in the world seems now tranquil, and the power of the Prince of Wei extends over all the land.
It is a season of joy and felicitation, and everyone is hanging out lanterns and putting up decorations for the occasion.” The night of full moon was very clear, moon and stars most brilliant.
The people of the capital took advantage of the night and thronged the “six streets and the three market places.” The lanterns were hung out in profusion, and all went merrily. No official interfered with the crowd, no one thought of the flight of time; all was simple gaiety.
That night the Commander of the Imperial Guards, Wang Bi, and his officers had a feast in their camp.
Just after the second watch had begun, they heard a great shouting in the camp, and someone came in to say that a fire had started in the rear.
Wang Bi hurriedly left the table and went outside.
He saw flames leaping up and rolling by and heard shouts of “Kill!” rising on every side and echoing to the very sky. He thought the camp had certainly mutinied, and, jumping on his horse, went out at the south gate. Just outside he ran against Geng Ji, who loosed an arrow which struck him in the shoulder. He nearly fell with the shock, but he got away toward the west gate.
He found he was pursued by armed men, so he got flurried, dismounted, and went on foot.
Presently he came to the house of Jin Yi and hammered at the door.
Now the fire that had created such a scare had been raised by Jin Yi's own people sent for that purpose, and Jin Yi had followed them to fight when the time came. Hence there was no one but the woman folk left in his house.
When the women heard the clamor at the door, they thought Jin Yi had come back, and his wife, from the door of the women's quarter, called out, “Have you killed Wang Bi?” This was a shock, but it told Wang Bi that his quondam friend was now an enemy.
Wherefore he fled further to the house of Cao Xiu and told him, “Geng Ji and Jin Yi have raised a disturbance.” Cao Xiu immediately armed himself, got to horse, and led a thousand troops into the city.
He found fires on all sides, and the Tower of the Five Phoenixes was in flames.
The Emperor had fled into the recesses of the Palace, but Cao Cao's friends and partisans were defending the Palace gates like grim death.
In the city the crowd was shouting one to another:
“Slay Cao Cao and restore the Hans!” When Xiahou Dun had received thirty thousand troops and the command to keep watch and ward over the capital, he had gone into camp three miles from the city.
When he saw the conflagration start, he set the army in motion and surrounded the city. He also sent reinforcements to Cao Xiu within. Inside the city the fighting went on all night.
No one joined the conspirators; the small band were left to their own efforts.
Soon it was reported that Jin Yi, Ji Mao, and Ji Mu were slain.
Geng Ji and Wei Huang found their way to one of the gates, but there they met Xiahou Dun's main force and were made prisoners. The handful of men with them were cut to pieces.
When the fighting subsided, Xiahou Dun went into the city and set his troops to put out the fires. He also laid hands on the whole households of the five conspirators. Then he sent a report to Cao Cao, who sent back orders to execute the two conspirators and put to death in public all the members of the five families. He was also to arrest every official and send the whole batch to Yejun for interrogations.
Xiahou Dun sent his two chief prisoners to the place of execution.
They shouted against Cao Cao.
“Living we have failed to slay you, Cao Cao; dead we will be malicious spirits smiting rebels in all places!” The executioner smote Geng Ji on the mouth with his sword, so that the blood gushed out, but he continued to shout as long as he could.
Wei Huang, his fellow-conspirator, dashed his temples on the ground crying, “How I hate him!” and ground his teeth till he broke them to fragments. And they both died of hatred and exhaustion.
Who can with outstretched hands uphold the sky Or thrones maintain by simple loyalty? Han's day was done; two would avert the doom, But failed, and carried anger to the tomb. Xiahou Dun carried out his chief's orders and sent the officials he had arrested to Yejun.
There Cao Cao set up two flags, one red and one white, in the drill ground and sent all the officials thither. Then he addressed them.
“In this late rebellion some of you went out to extinguish the fire, some of you stayed within doors.
Let those who went forth to put out the fire take their stand by the red flag, and those who remained in their houses go to the white flag.” The officials thought within themselves, “Certainly there can be nothing wrong in trying to put out a fire,” so they nearly all placed themselves under the red flag; only about a third went to the white.
Then the order was given to seize all those by the red flag. They protested.
“We are guiltless!” cried they.
Cao Cao said, “At that time you intended not to put out the flames but to aid the rebels.” He sent them all down to River Zhang and had them put to death on the bank. There were more than three hundred victims.
He rewarded those who were under the white flag and sent them to their homes in the capital.
Wang Bi died from his wound and was buried with great honor.
Cao Xiu was placed over the guards; Zhong Yao was created Prime Minister of the princedom of Wei, Hua Xin became High Minister.
The occasion was taken to create six grades of the title of Lordship with three divisions each, eighteen in all. There were seventeen grades of Marquis West of the Pass. And all these had golden seals of office with purple ribbons.
There were also sixteen ranks of Interior Marquis and Exterior Marquis. They had silver seals with tortoise ornaments on the back and black ribbons. There were five classes of Minister with three grades in each class.
These had brass seals, with chain ornaments and ribbons.
And with all these various gradations of ranks and nobility reorganized, the court was entirely reformed.
There were new ranks and new people in office.1 Cao Cao then remembered the warning about a conflagration in the capital and wished to reward Guan Lu for his prescience, but he would receive nothing.
Cao Hong with an army went into Hanzhong. He placed Xiahou Yuan and Zhang He in command at points of importance, while he went on to the attack.
At that time Zhang Fei and Lei Tong were holding Baxi.
Ma Chao marched to Xiabian and sent Wu Lan out as Van Leader to reconnoiter. He fell in with Cao Hong, and Wu Lan was going to retire. But General Ren Kui advised against this. “The enemy are newly arrived, why not fight and take the keen edge off their pride?
If we do not fight, how can we look our chief in the face when we return?” So it was decided to offer battle, and Ren Kui rode out and challenged Cao Hong.
The challenge was accepted, and the warriors advanced.
Cao Hong cut Ren Kui down in the third encounter and pressed the advantage, and Wu Lan was beaten off.
When Wu Lan returned and told Ma Chao, he was blamed.
“Why did you attack without orders and bring about this defeat?” “It was the fault of Ren Kui, who disobeyed orders.” “Defend the Pass most carefully; do not engage,” said Ma Chao.
Ma Chao sent a report to Capital Chengdu and awaited orders for a further action.
Cao Hong suspected some ruse when Ma Chao remained so long inactive, and retired to Nanzheng.
Here he was visited by Zhang He, who asked, “General, why did you retire after the successful attack and slaughter of one of the enemy leaders?” “Seeing that Ma Chao declined to come out to fight, I suspected some ruse,” replied Cao Hong.
“Beside, when I was at Yejun that wonderful soothsayer, Guan Lu, foretold the loss of a leader here.
I heeded what he said and so was careful.” Zhang He laughed, “You have been a leader of soldiers for half your life, and yet you heed the sayings of a soothsayer!
I may be of small wit, but I would take Baxi with my own troops, and the possession of Baxi would be the key to the whole of Shu.” “The defender of Baxi is Zhang Fei,” said Cao Hong. “He is no ordinary man to meet. One must be careful.” “All of you fear this Zhang Fei, but I do not. I look upon him as a mere nobody.
I shall have to capture him this time.” “But if you fail, what then?” “Then I shall be content to pay the penalty according to military rules.” Cao Hong made him put his undertaking in writing, and then Zhang He marched to the attack.
The proud are often defeat; Lightsome attacks oft fail.
The following chapter will tell how Zhang He fared. CHAPTER 70. Zhang Fei Takes Wakou Pass By Tactics; Huang Zhong Captures Tiandang Mountain By Stratagem. Zhang He's army, with which he felt so sure of victory, consisted of thirty thousand troops, and they were in three camps—Camp Dangqu, Camp Mengtou, and Camp Dangshi—which were protected by the hills.
When Zhang He marched, he left half the soldiers in each camp as defenders.
The news soon reached Baxi, and Zhang Fei called in his colleague Lei Tong to give his opinion.
Lei Tong said, “The country is bad and the hills full of danger in the area of Langzhong; let us lay an ambush.
You, O General, go out to give battle, and I will help you by a sudden and unexpected attack.
We ought to get Zhang He.” Whereupon Zhang Fei gave five thousand troops to Lei Tong, and himself led out ten thousand troops to a point ten miles from Langzhong. Having set them in order, he rode out and challenge Zhang He to single combat. Zhang He galloped out to meet him.
After the thirtieth or so bout, Zhang He's ranks suddenly began to shout and soon showed signs of confusion. The reason was the appearance of the banners of Shu from the cover of some hills.
Zhang He dared not continue to fight, and he fled. Zhang Fei pursued him.
Lei Tong also appeared in his road and attacked, and so, with enemies on both sides, Zhang He forced his way out and lost the day.
Both Zhang Fei and Lei Tong continued to smite him, even into the night, till he got back to his camp at Dangqu.
Zhang He reverted to his old plan of defending the three camps, rolling down logs and hurling stones. But he remained behind his defenses. Zhang Fei made a camp three miles off.
Next day Zhang Fei went forth and offered battle, but Zhang He took no notice.
Zhang He ascended to the summit of the hill and drank wine to the accompaniment of trumpets and drums, but he would not fight.
Zhang Fei bade his soldiers shout insults, but these had no effect.
Lei Tong was sent up the hill, but the rolling logs and hurtling stones forced him to retire. Then the defenders of the other two camps came out to the attack, and Lei Tong was discomfited.
Next day Zhang Fei again offered battle, but there was no response.
Again the soldiers yelled every form of insult, but Zhang He from the hill top only replied by similar abuse.
Zhang Fei was at his wits' ends; and this game was played for more than fifty days. Then Zhang Fei made a strong stockade just in front of the hill, and therein he sat day after day drinking till he became half drunk.
And when he was so, he reviled his opponent.
About this time Liu Bei sent gifts to the army, and when the messenger went back, he told Liu Bei that his brother was giving himself over to wine. This made Liu Bei anxious, so he lost no time in asking advice from Zhuge Liang.
Zhuge Liang was jocular, saying, “Since that is so, let us send him fifty vessels of the best brew of Chengdu. He probably has but poor stuff in the camp.” “But he has always had a weakness for wine, and he has failed because of it.
Yet you would encourage him to drink by sending him more wine?” “My lord, is it that you do not understand your brother even after all these years?
He is brave and steady, yet when we first invaded the Western Land of Rivers, he released Yan Yan, which was not what a mere brave would have done.
He is face to face with Zhang He, and has been for nearly two months, and day after day he drinks and rages and insults his enemy openly.
He treats Zhang He with most perfect contempt. But this is not only the wine-cup; it is a deep plan to get the better of Zhang He.” “This may be so,” replied Liu Bei, “but let us not rely upon it too much.
Let Wei Yan go to help him.” Zhuge Liang sent Wei Yan with the wine, and the carts set out, each flying a yellow flag with a writing in large characters: “Fine Wine for the Frontier Army”.
When Wei Yan reached the army, he handed over the wine, which he said was a gift from the Lord of Shu. And Zhang Fei received it with due respect.
Zhang Fei told Wei Yan and Lei Tong each to take a thousand troops and move out on the two wings, ready to act when they saw a red flag displayed.
And then he had the wine laid out and called up some soldiers to drink with a great display of flags and a rolling of drums.
The spies reported all these doings on the hill-top, and Zhang He came out to look for himself. There he saw his opponent drinking, and two of the soldiers were boxing before Zhang Fei for his amusement.
“He despises me too much,” said Zhang He. And Zhang He gave orders to prepare for a night attack on the enemy camp.
His own troops in Camp Dangqu should do the raiding, and those from Camp Mengtou and Camp Dangshi were to support them.
There was little moon that night, and Zhang He took advantage of the obscurity to steal down the side of the hill.
He got quite close to the enemy camp and stood for a time looking at Zhang Fei sitting amid a blaze of lamps and drinking.
Suddenly Zhang He dashed forward with a yell, and at the same moment his drums on the hill-top rolled out their defiance. Zhang Fei never stirred. Zhang He rushed at him and delivered a mighty thrust with his spear. Zhang Fei toppled over—it was a Zhang Fei of straw. Zhang He checked and turned his steed.
At that moment he heard a string of detonations, and a warrior appeared before him barring his way.
It was the real Zhang Fei, as the round head and thundering voice speedily made manifest. With the octane-serpent halberd set, Zhang Fei rode toward Zhang He.
The two warriors fought many bouts under the gleaming lights. No help came to Zhang He. In vain he yearned for the assistance, which the two camps were to bring him.
He did not know that his reinforcements had been driven back by Wei Yan and Lei Tong, and that the two camps, Mengtou and Dangshi, were now in possession of his enemies.
As the help did not come, Zhang He was powerless; and, to add to his discomfiture, the glare of fire out in the moutains of Dangqu told him of the seizure of his third camp by Zhang Fei's rear force.
Nothing could be done, and Zhang He cut an arterial alley, forced out of the press, and fled to Wakou Pass. The victory was all to Zhang Fei.
The news of the success delighted Liu Bei, and he knew then that Zhang Fei's drinking had been part of a stratagem to entice his enemy into the open and defeat them.
Zhang He reached Wakou Pass, but with the loss of twothirds of his army of thirty thousand troops. He stood on defense and sent urgent messages to Cao Hong to come to his rescue.
Cao Hong angrily replied, “He disobeyed my orders and marched; he has lost an important point and now he sends to me for help!” While refusing aid, Cao Hong sent to urge his colleague to go out and fight. But Zhang He too greatly feared. At length Zhang He decided upon a plan of action.
He sent out two parties into ambush and said to them, “I will pretend defeat and fly.
They will follow and you can cut off their retreat.” When he did march out, he met Lei Tong.
The two engaged in battle and Zhang He presently ran away.
Lei Tong pursued and fell into the ambush. Then Zhang He returned and slew Lei Tong.
His troops went back and told Zhang Fei, who came up to provoke another fight.
Zhang He again tried his stratagem, but Zhang Fei did not pursue. Again and again the ruse was tried, but Zhang Fei knew it was only a ruse and simply retired to his own camp.
He said to Wei Yan, “Zhang He has compassed the death of Lei Tong by leading him into an ambush, and he wants to inveigle me into another. What say you to meeting trick with trick?” “But how?” said Wei Yan.
“Tomorrow I will lead the army forward, you following me with some reliable soldiers. When his army come out from their ambush, you can smite them, sending half your men against each party.
We will secretly fill the byroads with loads of combustibles, entice the enemy among them and start a fire.
In the confusion, I shall try to capture Zhang He.
So will we avenge our comrade's death.” So Zhang Fei went out, and Zhang He's troops came and began to fight.
After a half score bouts, Zhang He ran away, and this time Zhang Fei pursued. Zhang He, now fleeing, now stopping to exchange a blow or two, led Zhang Fei through the hills to a valley.
Here, suddenly changing front, he halted, made a camp, and offered battle. It was now the time when Zhang He expected his hidden troops to appear and surround Zhang Fei. But none appeared.
He knew not that his ambush had been broken up by Wei Yan's army and driven into the valley where the road was filled with cartloads of combustibles, and that the valley even then was all aflame. Then Zhang Fei came to the attack, and the rout was complete. Zhang He, fighting desperately, got through to the Wakou Pass and there mustered the remnant of his force. He strengthened the position and remained behind his ramparts.
Zhang Fei and Wei Yan then tried to take the Pass, but day after day they failed. Zhang Fei, seeing no hope of success, retired seven miles and bivouacked. From this point he sent out scouts under Wei Yan to explore the country.
While going along, they observed some burden-bearers, men and women, going up a very retired path, pulling down the creepers, and pushing aside the grasses.
“That is the way to take Wakou Pass,” cried Zhang Fei, pointing with his whip to the wayfarers.
He ordered his soldiers not to scare the people, but to call a few gently and bring them to him.
They soon had several standing before their leader, who spoke to them kindly and put them at ease.
“Whence come you?” asked Zhang Fei.
“We belong to Hanzhong and are going home.
We heard that you were out fighting and the high road to Langzhong was blockaded, and so we have come across the Mist Torrent and Zitong Mountains and down River Guijin.
We are going to our homes in Hanzhong.” “Can one reach Wakou Pass by this road?
And how far is it?” The country people replied, “A small road leads past to the rear of the Pass from Zitong Mountains.” For this piece of information Zhang Fei rewarded them by taking them into his camp and giving them a good meal.
Then he sent off Wei Yan to make a frontal attack on the Pass, while he himself with five hundred light horse attacked it from the rear by way of Mount Zitong.
Zhang He was grieved and disappointed that Cao Hong sent no help, and the news of Wei Yan's attack only added to his sorrow.
But he girded on his armor and was about to ride out when they told him that fires had started at half a dozen places behind the Pass.
They most likely indicated soldiers.
However, he went out to meet them, and, to his horror, when the flags opened out, his eyes fell on the figure of Zhang Fei.
Away he ran along a by-road.
But his steed was not fast, and as Zhang Fei pressed him close, Zhang He dismounted and ran up the mountain side. So Zhang He escaped. He had, however, some ten followers, and it was a small and dejected party that presently found its way into Nanzheng.
He saw Cao Hong, and Cao Hong was very angry at his plight. “I told you not to go, but you were willful. And you gave in your written pledge.
You have lost all your soldiers, yet you do not commit suicide.
What will you do next?” Cao Hong ordered the lictors to put Zhang He to death. But Marching General Guo Huai, interceded.
“An army is easily raised; a leader is hard to find.
Though Zhang He is guilty, he is a great favorite with our prince. I think you should spare him.
Rather give him command of another army and send him to take Jiameng Pass and so hold up the soldiers at all the stations. Hanzhong will be tranquil of its own accord.
If he fails a second time, you can punish him for both faults.” Cao Hong was satisfied to do this, and instead of dealing with his fault, he gave Zhang He five thousand troops and told him to take the Pass. The Commanders of the Pass were Meng Da and Huo Jun.
They were at variance—Meng Da desiring to go out to meet Zhang He, but Huo Jun being in favor of defense.
Meng Da being set on having his way went out, gave battle, and was defeated.
Huo Jun reported this to the capital, where Liu Bei at once called in the Directing Instructor to ask advice.
Zhuge Liang assembled all the chief generals into the hall. “Jiameng Pass is in danger; we must get Zhang Fei from Langzhong to drive off Zhang He,” said Zhuge Liang.
Fa Zheng replied, “Zhang Fei is encamped at Wakou Pass, and Langzhong is no less important than Jiameng Pass. I do not think he should be recalled.
Choose one among the generals to go and defeat Zhang He.” Zhuge Liang laughed, “Zhang He is renowned in Wei; no ordinary leader will avail.
Zhang Fei is the only man to send, the only one equal to the task.” Then among the generals one started up crying angrily, “Instructor, why do you thus despise us?
I will use what little skill I have in slaying our enemy and will lay his head at the foot of our standard.” The speaker was Veteran General Huang Zhong, and all eyes centered on him.
“Friend Huang Zhong, you are bold enough, but what about your age?
I fear you are no match for Zhang He.” Huang Zhong's white beard bristled, and he said, “I know I am old. But these two arms can still pull the four-hundred-fifty-pound bow, and the vigor of my body is not yet departed.
Am I not strong enough to meet such a poor thing as Zhang He?” “General, you are nearly seventy; can you still hold you are not aged?” Huang Zhong tore down the hall.
Seizing one of the great swords off the rack, he whirled it as if it flew.
And the stiffest bow that hung on the wall, he pulled till it snapped.
“Well, if you will go, who will second you?” said Zhuge Liang. “I would prefer Veteran General Yan Yan.
And if there is the least anxiety, well, here is this hoary head.” Liu Bei was pleased to let these two go to fight Zhang He. However, Zhao Yun put in a protest. “Zhang He has already got through Jiameng Pass, so that the fighting will be no child's play, and the loss of that Pass endangers the whole of Yiazhou.
It is no task to set to a couple of old men.” Replied Zhuge Liang, “You regard the two as too old and stupid to succeed, but I think the attainment of Hanzhong depends upon these two.” Zhao Yun and many others sniggered as they went from the hall; they did not agree with Zhuge Liang. In due course the two Veteran Generals arrived at the Pass.
At sight of them, Meng Da and Huo Jun, the defenders of the Pass, laughed in their hearts, thinking:
“Zhuge Liang has slipped up in his calculations in sending such a pair of dotards on such an important mission.” Huang Zhong said to Yan Yan, “You see the behavior of these people?
They are laughing at us because we are old. Now we will do something that will win admiration from all the world.” “I should be glad to hear your orders,” replied Yan Yan.
The two generals came to a decision how to act.
Huang Zhong led his army down below to meet Zhang He in the open plain. Both drew up their array.
When Zhang He rode out and saw his venerable opponent, he laughed in his face. “You must be very old, and yet you are unashamed to go into the battle, eh?” said Zhang He.
“You menial!” replied the veteran. “Do you despise me for my age?
You will find my good sword, however, young enough.” So he urged forward his steed and rode at Zhang He.
The two chargers met and a score of bouts were fought. Then suddenly a great shouting came from the rear. Yan Yan had come up and fallen upon the rear portion of Zhang He's army.
Thus attacked on two sides, Zhang He was defeated.
The pursuit did not cease with nightfall, and Zhang He was driven back near thirty miles.
Contented with this success, Huang Zhong and Yan Yan went into their camp, where they rested their soldiers for a time.
When Cao Hong heard of Zhang He's new defeat, he was going to exact the penalty. But Guo Huai persuaded him to forbear.
“If he is pressed too hard, he may take refuge in Shu,” said Guo Huai.
“Rather send him help. You will thus keep a hold over him and prevent his desertion.” Wherefore Xiahou Shang and Han Hao were sent with reinforcements.
Xiahou Shang was a nephew of Xiahou Dun, and Han Hao was the brother of Han Xuan, the late Governor of Changsha. They had five thousand troops.
The two generals soon reached Zhang He, and asked how now the situation was going.
“That old man Huang Zhong is really a hero;” said Zhang He, “and with Yan Yan's help he is very formidable.” “When I was at Changsha, I heard the old man was very fierce.
He and Wei Yan yielded the city to Liu Bei and killed my own brother. Now that I shall meet him, I can have my revenge,” said Han Hao.
So he and Xiahou Shang led out the new army.
Now, by means of spies Huang Zhong had got a thorough knowledge of the country, and Yan Yan said, “Hereabout there is a mountain named Tiandang Mountain wherein Cao Hong has stored his supplies.
If we can gain its possession, we shall reduce the enemy to want and we shall get Hanzhong.” Huang Zhong replied, “I think so, too, and so let us do so and so.” Yan Yan agreed with him and marched off with a body of troops to carry out his part in the stratagem.
At news of the coming of new armies, Huang Zhong marched out to meet them.
He found Han Hao in front of his array, and Han Hao began to abuse the veteran, shouting out, “Disgraceful old ruffian!” Then Han Hao whipped up his steed and set his spear at Huang Zhong.
Xiahou Shang also rode out and took part in the combat. The veteran held them both at bay for some half score bouts and then fled.
They pursued him for seven miles, when they reached and seized his camp.
Huang Zhong, however, quickly made another defense of brushwood.
Next day Xiahou Shang and Han Hao renewed the pursuit, which ended with the capture of the temporary camp of the day before. And they had advanced seven miles further. Then they called upon Zhang He to protect the rear camp. When Zhang He came up, he dissuaded them from continuing.
“Huang Zhong has retreated before you for two days; there is some deep stratagem behind this,” said Zhang He.
Xiahou Shang scoffed at him, saying, “You are such a coward that you have been defeated many times.
Now say no more, but let us accomplish something.” Zhang He retired much mortified and shamed.
Next day the two generals again went out to battle, and again Huang Zhong fled from them for seven miles.
The two generals pursued as quickly as they could.
The day after, Huang Zhong fled without any pretense of showing fight, except at short intervals. He got to Jiameng Pass and went on the defensive. The pursuers knocked at the very gate of the Pass and made a camp close by.
Then Meng Da secretly wrote to Liu Bei that Huang Zhong had been repeatedly defeated and now was in the Pass and unable to go out.
Liu Bei became alarmed and consulted Zhuge Liang, who said, “The old general is making the enemy over-confident—to their ultimate destruction.” But Zhao Yun did not share this opinion, nor did many others, and Liu Bei decided to send Liu Feng to reinforce his aged general.
The young man came to the Pass and saw Huang Zhong, who asked him, “General, what makes you come here?” “My father heard that you have sustained several defeats, and he has sent me,” said Liu Feng.
“But I am only employing the ruse of leading on the enemy,” said Huang Zhong, smiling.
“You will see tonight that in one battle I shall regain all the camps and capture their supplies and many horses. I have only lent the camps to them to store their supplies.
Tonight I shall leave Huo Jun to guard the Pass, while General Meng Da will gather up the spoils for us.
Now, young Sir, you shall see the destruction of the enemy.” That same night, at the second watch, Huang Zhong left the Pass with five thousand troops.
But now Xiahou Shang and Han Hao, seeing no move from the Pass for many days, had become careless and so their camps were unable to resist.
Their troops had no time to don their armors or to saddle their horses. All the leaders did was to flee for their lives, while their troops trampled each other down and were killed in great numbers.
All three camps were recovered by dawn, and in them were found all sorts of military equipment.
Horses and their caparisons also fell to the victors, and all the booty was carried off by Meng Da and stored in the Pass. Huang Zhong pressed on his victory.
Liu Feng ventured to say, “Our soldiers need repose.” “Can you seize the tiger's whelps without going into the tiger's den?” cried Huang Zhong.
And he urged on his steed.
The soldiers also were eager. Zhang He's own army was thrown into confusion by the flying men from the defeated armies, and he could not maintain his station, but was forced to retreat.
They abandoned all their stockades and rushed to the bank of River Han.
Then Zhang He sought the two generals who had brought about the misfortune and said to them, “This is Tiandang Mountain, where our stores are. Close by is Micang Mountain.
The two mountains are the very source of life of the Hanzhong army.
Lose them and Hanzhong is gone too.
We must see to their security.” Xiahou Shang said, “My uncle, Xiahou Yuan, will look out for the defense of Micang Mountain, which is next to his station at Dingjun Mountain; there need be no anxiety about that.
And my brother, Xiahou De, guards Tiandang Mountain. Let us go to him and help to protect that.” Zhang He and the two generals set out at once.
They reached the mountain and told Xiahou De all that had happened.
“I have one hundred thousand troops in camp here,” replied he. “You may take some of them and recover your lost camps.” “No,” replied Zhang He.
“The only proper course is to defend.” Almost as they spoke the rolling of drums and the clang of gongs were heard, and the look-outs came to say that Huang Zhong was near.
“The old ruffian does not know much of the art of war; after all,” said Xiahou De with a laugh, “he is only a brave.” “Be not mistaken; he is crafty and not only bold,” said Zhang He. “This move is against the rules and not at all crafty.
He is worn from a long march and his soldiers are fatigued, and they are deep in an enemy's country.” “Nevertheless, be careful how you attack,” said Zhang He.
“You would still do well to depend upon defense only.” “Give me three thousand good soldiers, and I will cut him to pieces,” cried Han Hao.
They told off the three companies for him, and down he went into the plain.
As he approached, Huang Zhong arrayed his army.
Liu Feng put in a note of warning, saying, “The sun is setting, and our men are weary. Let us retire for the fight tomorrow.” But Huang Zhong paid little attention, saying, “I do not hold with your objections.
This is the one God-given opportunity to make good, and it would be a sin not to take it.” So saying, the drums rolled for a great attack.
Han Hao came forward with his troops, and the aged general went toward him whirling his sword. In the first encounter Han Hao fell.
At this the soldiers of Shu gave a yell and went away up the hill, whereupon Zhang He and Xiahou Shang hastily moved out to withstand them.
But a great red glare sprang into the sky from behind the hill, and a shouting arose. Hastily Xiahou De led off his troops to meet the danger there and went straight into the arms of Yan Yan.
The Veteran General's arm rose, the sword fell, and Xiahou De dropped from his steed to rise no more. This ambush, into which the dead general had rushed, had been carefully prepared by Huang Zhong, who had sent Yan Yan away before he marched himself and given Yan Yan orders what to do. It was the brushwood that Yan Yan's men had spent the time in collecting that now sent forth the flames reaching up to the heavens and filling the valleys.
Yan Yan, after slaying Xiahou De, came round the hill to aid in the attack so that the defenders were taken both in front and rear.
They could do nothing and presently left the battlefield and rushed toward Dingjun Mountain to seek refuge with Xiahou Yuan.
Meanwhile the victors took steps to hold the position they had won and sent the good news of victory to Capital Chengdu.
And when the news arrived, Liu Bei called together all his officers to rejoice. Then said Fa Zheng, “Not long ago Zhang Lu submitted to Cao Cao, and thereby Cao Cao got possession of Hanzhong quite easily. Instead of following up this by an advance westward, he left two generals to guard it and went south.
That was a mistake. Now, my lord, do not make a mistake yourself, but take advantage of the present favorable position, with Zhang He newly defeated and Tiandang Mountain captured, to attack Hanzhong and you will have it at once.
Once that is yours, you can train your army and amass supplies ready for a stroke against the arch-rebel himself. This God-given advantage will be confirmed to you and you should not miss it.” Both Liu Bei and Zhuge Liang saw the wisdom of this scheme and prepared to act.
Zhao Yun and Zhang Fei were to lead the van, while Liu Bei with Zhuge Liang commanded the main army of one hundred thousand troops.
A day was chosen to set out, and orders were sent to everyone to keep careful guard for Yiazhou.
It was a certain auspicious day in the seventh month of the twenty-third year that the army marched .
Reaching Jiameng Pass, Huang Zhong and Yan Yan were summoned and well rewarded for their services.
Liu Bei said to Huang Zhong, “People said you were old, General, but the Directing Instructor of the army know you better than they, and you have rendered amazing service.
Still, Dingjun Mountain is yet to be captured, and it is both a great central store and a major defense of Nanzheng.
If we could get Dingjun Mountain, we could be quite easy about the whole region of Hanzhong.
Think you that you are equal to taking Dingjun Mountain?” To this harangue of Liu Bei, the veteran nobly answered that he was willing to try and was ready to start when they would.
Said Zhuge Liang hastily, “Do not be hasty. You are brave enough, General, but Xiahou Yuan is a man of different stamp from Zhang He.
Xiahou Yuan is a real strategist and tactician; so much so that Cao Cao relies upon him as his defense against Xiliang. It was he who was set to defend Changan when threatened by Ma Chao.
Now he is in Hanzhong, and Cao Cao puts his whole confidence in him and his skill as a leader.
You have overcome Zhang He, but it is not certain you will conquer this man.
I think I must send down to Jingzhou for Guan Yu for this task.” Huang Zhong hotly replied, “Old Lian Po was eighty years old and yet he ate a bushel of rice and ten pounds of flesh, so that his vigor frightened the nobles and not one dared encroach upon the borders of the state of Zhao. I am not yet seventy.
You call me old, O Instructor; then I will not take any helper, but go out simply with my own three thousand troops, and we will lay Xiahou Yuan's head at your feet.” Zhuge Liang refused to allow him to go; Huang Zhong insisted. At last Zhuge Liang consented, but said he would send an overseer.
They put upon his mettle the man who was to go, Youth's vigor may be lesser worth than age's powers, we know.
The next chapter will tell who the overseer was. CHAPTER 71.
At The Capture Of Opposite Hill, Huang Zhong Scores A Success; On The River Han, Zhao Yun Conquers A Host. “If you are really determined to undertake this expedition, I shall send Fa Zheng with you,” said Zhuge Liang to the veteran leader.
“You will have to discuss everything with him.
I shall also dispatch supports and reinforcements.” Huang Zhong agreed, and the expedition set out.
Then Zhuge Liang explained to Liu Bei, “I purposely tried to spur on the old general that he will really exert himself, else he fears he will not do much.
But he will need reinforcement.” After this, Zhuge Liang ordered Zhao Yun to march after the first army and help, if help was needed.
So long as the old man was victorious, Zhao Yun was to do nothing; if he was in difficulties, then Zhao Yun was to rescue.
Also, three thousand troops under Liu Feng and Meng Da were sent out among the hills to take position at strategic points and set up many banners and make a brave show in order to spread the impression of huge forces, and so frighten and perplex the enemy.
In addition, Zhuge Liang sent to Xiabian Pass to tell Ma Chao what part to play in the campaign; Yan Yan was to hold Langzhong and Baxi in place of Zhang Fei and Wei Yan, who also went in expedition in Hanzhong.
The refugees, Zhang He and Xiahou Shang, reached Xiahou Yuan's camp and told their doleful tale, “Tiandang Mountain has been captured, and Xiahou De and Han Hao have died with the loss.
Liu Bei is about to invade Hanzhong. Send a swift messenger to inform the Prince of Wei and ask for help.” The news was sent to Cao Hong, who bore it quickly to Capital Xuchang.
Cao Cao lost no time in calling a council.
Then High Minister Liu Ye said, “The loss of Hanzhong would shake the whole country.
You, O Prince, must not shrink from toil and hardship, but must yourself go to lead the army.” “This state of things comes of my not heeding your words before, gentle Sir,” said Cao Cao, then repentant.
However, Cao Cao hastily prepared and issued an edict to raise an army of four hundred thousand troops which he would lead.
The army was ready in the seventh month, the early autumn, in the twenty-third year , and marched in three divisions. The leading division was under Xiahou Dun, Cao Cao commanded the center, and Cao Xiu was the rear guard.
Cao Cao rode a white horse, beautifully caparisoned. His guards were clad in embroidered silk. They carried the huge red parasol woven of silk and gold threads.
Beside him in two lines were the symbols of kingly dignity, the golden melons, silver axes, stirrups, clubs, spears, and lances; banderoles embroidered with the sun and moon, dragon and phoenix, all were borne aloft.
His escort of twenty-five thousand stout warriors led by bold officers, marched in five columns of five thousand each, under banners of the five colors, blue, yellow, red, white, and black. The five companies made a brave show as they marched, each column under its own flag with soldiers in armor and horses in caparisons all of one color and all glittering in the sun.
As they debouched through Tong Pass, Cao Cao noticed in the distance a thick wood, very luxuriant, and asked those near him what it was called.
“This place is the Indigo Field,” they replied.
“And in that wood is the estate of the late Minister Cai Yong.
His daughter, Cai Yan, and her present husband, Dong Si, live there.” Now Cao Cao and Cai Yong had been excellent friends at one time.
Cai Yong's daughter had been first married to Wei Zhongdao.
Then she was abducted by the frontier tribes and taken away to the north, where she had borne two sons. She had composed a ballad called “Eighteen Stanzas for the Mongol Flageolet,” which was widespread to the empire.
Cao Cao had been moved by pity for her sorrows and sent a messenger with a thousand ounces of gold to ransom her.
The Prince of the frontier Xiongnu State, Ce Xian the Khan, overawed by Cao Cao's strength, had restored her to Cai Yong. Ordering his escort to march on, Cao Cao went up to the gate with only a few attendants, dismounted and inquired after the lady of the house.
At this time Dong Si was absent at his post, and the lady was alone. As soon as she heard who her visitor was, she hastened to welcome him and led him into the reception room.
When Cao Cao was seated and she had performed the proper salutations, she stood respectfully at his side.
Glancing round the room, Cao Cao saw a rubbing of a tablet hanging on the wall. So he got up to read it, and asked his hostess about it. “It is a tablet of Cao E, or the fair Lady Cao.
In the time of the Emperor He , in the Xiongnu State there was a certain magician named Cao Xu, who could dance and sing like the very Spirit of Music.
On the fifth of the fifth month he was out in a boat, and being intoxicated, fell overboard and was drowned.
He had a daughter, Cao E, then fourteen years of age. She was greatly distressed and sought the body of her father for seven days and nights, weeping all the while.
Then she threw herself into the waves, and five days later she floated to the surface with her father's body in her arms.
The villagers buried them on the bank, and the magistrate reported the occurrence to the Emperor as a worthy instance of daughterly affection and remarkable piety.
“A later magistrate had the story inscribed by Handan Chun in memory of the event.
At that time Handan Chun was only thirteen, but the composition of the inscription was so perfect that neither jot nor tittle could be added, and yet he had written it impromptu without revision. The stone was set up beside the grave, and both inscription and story were the admiration of all the people of that day. My father went to see it. It was evening, but in the obscurity he felt out the inscription with his fingers.
He got hold of a pencil and wrote eight large characters on the reverse of the stone and, later, some person recutting the stone engraved these eight words as well.” Cao Cao then read the eight words; they formed an enigma.
Literally they read, “yellow silk, young wife, a daughter's child, pestle and mortar.” “Can you explain?” asked Cao Cao of his hostess.
“No; although it is a writing of my father's, thy handmaid cannot interpret it,” she replied.
Turning to the strategists of his staff, Cao Cao said, “Can any one of you explain it?” But no one made any reply.
Suddenly, they heard one voice, “I have grasped the meaning of it.” The man who said he had fathomed the meaning was First Secretary Yang Xiu.
“Do not tell me yet; let me think it out,” said Cao Cao.
Soon after they took leave of the lady, went out of the farm, and rode on.
About one mile from the farm, the meaning suddenly dawned upon Cao Cao, and he laughingly turned to Yang Xiu, saying, “Now, you may try.” “This is the solution of the enigma,” said Yang Xiu.
“'Yellow silk' is silk threads of natural color, and the character for 'silk' placed beside that for 'color' forms a word meaning 'finally, decidedly;' the 'young wife' is a 'little female,' and the character for 'female' with 'little,' or 'few,' placed beside it forms a word meaning 'admirable, fine;' the 'daughter's child' is 'daughter' and 'child,' which side by side make the word 'good;' and a 'pestle and mortar' suggest pounding together the five bitter herbs in a receptacle:
the character for 'receptacle' and 'bitter' form a word meaning 'to tell.' So the four words are 'Decidedly fine and well told.'“ Cao Cao was astonished at Yang Xiu's cleverness, and said, “Just what I made it.” Those around greatly wondered at Yang Xiu's ingenuity and knowledge.
In less than a day they reached Nanzheng, where Cao Hong welcomed them. He told the tale of Zhang He's misfortunes.
“To suffer defeat is no crime;” said Cao Cao, “that and victory are things that happen constantly in war.” “Liu Bei has sent Huang Zhong to take Dingjun Mountain,” said Cao Hong. “Xiahou Yuan, hearing you were coming, O Prince, has been defending the position and not going out to give battle.” “But standing always on the defensive is showing weakness,” said Cao Cao.
Thereupon he bade a man carry an authority flag to the Mountain Commander and so order him to attack the enemy.
“Xiahou Yuan is very stern and inflexible, and he may be carried too far and fall victim to some vile ruse,” said Liu Ye.
Wherefore the Prince wrote a letter to him to accompany the authority flag.
And when the messenger arrived and the letter was opened, it read:
“Every leader must exercise a combination of inflexibility and yielding.
Boldness is not the only thing that counts; if he makes it so, then is he a mere creature to fight.
Now I am camped at Nanzheng ready to watch the deeds of your admirable prowess and capacity, and all I have to say is, 'Do not disgrace your previous reputation.'“ The letter pleased the Commander mightily.
Having sent away the bearer, Xiahou Yuan called in Zhang He to consult. “The Prince has a great army at Nanzheng ready to destroy Liu Bei.
We have been on the defense here long enough, and it is time we rendered some solid service.
Tomorrow I am going out to battle, and hope to capture Huang Zhong.” “Your opponent combines ready resource with boldness and prevision,” said Zhang He. “Beside, he has Fa Zheng to aid him; and you must be cautious, for the country is very difficult and dangerous.
You would better keep on the defensive.” “How shall we be able to look our prince in the face when other leaders render good services?
However, you just keep the hill, and I will go out to battle.” Then an order was issued asking who would go out to reconnoiter and provoke a battle.
Xiahou Shang volunteered.
Xiahou Yuan said to him, “You are not to make a real stand, but merely to begin the fight.
You are to lose and not win, for a grand ruse is ready for the enemy.” He explained his plans, and Xiahou Shang went away with a small column.
Now Huang Zhong and his helper Fa Zheng were camped quite close to the Dingjun Mountain.
They had endeavored to entice Xiahou Yuan out into the field to fight, but failed to attack him as he stood in that difficult, mountainous country. So thus far no advance had been made.
But as soon as Xiahou Shang's troops appeared and seemed to offer battle, Huang Zhong was ready to march out to meet them at once.
But General Chen Shi, offered his services.
“Do not trouble yourself to move, O General,” said Chen Shi, “for I will go out to fight them.” Huang Zhong consented, and placed three thousand troops under Chen Shi, who went out of the valley and set his army in array.
And when Xiahou Shang came up and, as arranged, merely fought a few bouts and ran away. Chen Shi followed to take advantage of his success.
But he was soon brought to a standstill by the rolling of logs and hurling of stones on the part of his opponents.
As he turned to retire, Xiahou Yuan brought out his troops and attacked. Chen Shi had no chance against them and was quickly made prisoner.
Many of his soldiers joined the enemy, but a few escaped to their own side and told Huang Zhong of the misfortune.
Huang Zhong at once asked advice from Fa Zheng, who said, “This Xiahou Yuan is easily provoked to anger, and being angry he is bold without discretion.
Your way now is to work up the enthusiasm of your soldiers, then break camp and advance. Do this in a series of marches, and you will excite him up to the point of giving battle, when you can capture him.
They call this the 'Ruse of the Interchange of Host and Guest.'“ So Huang Zhong collected all the things his soldiers liked, and made them presents, till the sound of rejoicing filled the whole valley and the men were hot to fight.
Then camp was broken, and the army marched forward a certain distance. Then they encamped.
After some days' rest the march was repeated; and then again.
When tidings of the advance reached Xiahou Yuan, he proposed to go out and fight. “No, no,” said the prudent Zhang He. “This is a well known ruse, and you should remain on the defensive.
You will lose if you fight.” Xiahou Yuan was not the man to stomach this moderate advice, so he sent out Xiahou Shang to give battle.
As soon as this force reached the camp of Huang Zhong, the Veteran General mounted and rode out to fight. In the very first bout he captured Xiahou Shang.
Those who escaped told how their leader had been captured, and Xiahou Yuan at once sent to offer an exchange of prisoners.
This was agreed to, to be effected the following day in front of both armies.
So next day both sides were arrayed in a spot where the valley widened, the two leaders on horseback beneath their respective standards. Beside each stood his prisoner.
Neither was encumbered with robe or helmet, but each wore thin, simple dress.
At the first beat of the drum each started to race over to his own side.
Just as Xiahou Shang reached the ranks of his own side, Huang Zhong shot an arrow and wounded him in the back.
The wounded man did not fall, but went on.
But Xiahou Yuan, mad with rage, could contain himself no longer.
He galloped straight at Huang Zhong, which was exactly what the latter wanted to irritate him into doing.
The fight that then ensued went on for twenty bouts, when suddenly the gongs clanged out from Xiahou Yuan's side and he drew off.
Huang Zhong pressed on and shattered the army of Wei.
When Xiahou Yuan reached his own side, he asked why the gong had sounded.
“Because we saw the banners of Shu through openings in the mountains in several places, and we feared an ambush,” said Zhang He.
Xiahou Yuan believed him and did not return to the battlefield; he simply remained defensive.
Before long, Huang Zhong had got quite near to Xiahou Yuan's camp, and then he asked further advice from his colleague.
Fa Zheng pointed over to the hills and said, “There rises a steep hill on the west of Dingjun Mountain, difficult of access, but from its summit one has a complete view of the defenses of the enemy.
If you can take this hill, the mountain lies in the hollow of your hand.” Huang Zhong looked up and saw the top of the hill was a small tableland and there were very few defenders there.
So that evening he left his camp, dashed up the hill, drove out the small host of one hundred under Xiahou Yuan's General Du Xi and took it.
It was just opposite to Dingjun Mountain.
Then said Fa Zheng, “Now take up position half way up the hill, while I go to the top.
When the enemy appears, I will show a white flag.
But you will remain quiet till the enemy become tired and remiss, when I will hoist a red flag.
That will be the signal for attack.” Huang Zhong cheerfully prepared to act on this plan.
In the meantime Du Xi, who had been driven from the hill-top, had run back and reported the loss of the hill to Xiahou Yuan.
“With Huang Zhong in occupation of that hill, I simply must give battle,” said he.
Zhang He strongly dissuaded him, saying, “The whole thing is but a ruse of Fa Zheng.
General, you would better defend our position.” But Xiahou Yuan was obstinate.
“From the top of that hill the whole of our position is visible, our strength and our weakness; I must fight.” In vain were the remonstrances repeated.
Xiahou Yuan set out his troops to surround the opposite hill and then began to vent his rage at his enemy so as to incite Huang Zhong to give battle.
Then the white flag was hoisted.
However, Xiahou Yuan was allowed to fume and rage in vain. He tried every form of insult, but no one appeared.
In the afternoon the soldiers became weary and dispirited. Plainly their eagerness had gone; and Fa Zheng unfurled the red flag. Then the drums rolled out, and the men of Shu shouted till the earth seemed to shake as the hoary old leader rode out and led his force down the slope with a roar as of an earthquake. Xiahou Yuan was too surprised to defend himself.
His chief enemy rushed straight to his standard; and with a thundering shout, Huang Zhong raised his sword and cleft Xiahou Yuan through between the head and shoulders so that he fell in two pieces.
Hoary headed is he, but he goes up to battle; Gray haired, yet recklessly mighty; With his strong arms he bends the bow, The arrows fly.
With the swiftness of the wind he rides, The white sword gleams.
The sound of his voice is as the roar of a tiger, His steed is fleet as a dragon in flight.
Victory is his and its rich rewards, For he extends the domain of his lord.
At the death of their general, the soldiers of Wei fled for their lives, and Huang Zhong attacked Dingjun Mountain.
Zhang He came out to oppose the army of Shu, but, attacked at two points by Huang Zhong and Chen Shi, he could not stand. He lost the day and fled.
However, before he had gone far, another cohort flashed out from the hills and barred his way.
And the leader cried out, “Zhao Yun of Changshan is here!” Confused and uncertain what to do, Zhang He led his troops toward Dingjun Mountain.
But a body of soldiers came out to stop him.
The leader was Du Xi, who said, “The mountain is in the hands of Liu Feng and Meng Da.” So Zhang He and Du Xi joined their forces and went to River Han, where they camped. Thence they sent to tell Cao Cao of their defeat. At the news of the death of Xiahou Yuan, Cao Cao uttered a great cry and then he understood the prediction of the soothsayer, Guan Lu, that the cast showed opposition: It was the twenty-fourth year of Rebuilt Tranquillity .
The affection between Cao Cao and his general had been very close, for he considered Xiahou Yuan as his limb.
Cao Cao sent to inquire the whereabouts of Guan Lu, but no one knew.
Cao Cao nourished feelings of resentment against the slayer of his friend, and he led his army out against Dingjun Mountain to avenge Xiahou Yuan's death. Xu Huang led the van.
When the army reached River Han, Zhang He and Du Xi joined them.
They said to Cao Cao, “Dingjun Mountain is lost. Before marching farther, the stores in Micang Mountain should be moved to the Northern Mountain.” And Cao Cao agreed.
Huang Zhong cut off the head of Xiahou Yuan and took it to Liu Bei when he reported his victory.
For these services, Liu Bei conferred upon him the title General Who Conquers the West, and great banquets were given in his honor.
While these were going on, General Zhang Zhu brought the news: “Cao Cao's army of two hundred thousand troops is on the way to avenge Xiahou Yuan's loss; and the supplies on Micang Mountain are being moved to the Northern Mountain.” Then said Zhuge Liang, “Cao Cao is certainly short of supplies.
If we can burn what he has and destroy his baggage train, he will have but little spirit left to fight.” “I am willing to undertake the task,” said Huang Zhong.
“Remember Cao Cao is a different sort of man from Xiahou Yuan.” Liu Bei said, “Though Xiahou Yuan was the Mountain Commander, after all he was but a bold warrior.
It would have been ten times better to have killed Zhang He.” “I will go and kill him,” said the aged general, firing up.
“Then go with Zhao Yun;” said Zhuge Liang, “act in concert and see who can do best.” Huang Zhong agreed to this condition, and Zhang Zhu was sent with him as Marching General.
Soon after the army had marched out, Zhao Yun asked of his colleague, “What plan have you prepared against Cao Cao's army of two hundred thousand in their ten camps, and how are the stores of grain and forage to be destroyed?” “I am going to lead,” said Huang Zhong.
“No wait; I am going first,” said Zhao Yun.
“But I am the senior leader; you are only my second,” said Huang Zhong.
“No; you and I are equal in responsibility and both anxious to render good service. We are no rivals.
Let us cast lots for who is to lead the way.” They did so, and the Veteran General gained precedence.
“Since you have won the right to make the first attempt, you must let me help you,” said Zhao Yun.
“Now let us decide upon a fixed time, and if you have returned by that time, I shall not need to stir.
But if at that time you have not come back, then I shall come to reinforce you.” “That suits me admirably,” said Huang Zhong.
So they decided upon noon as the time; and Zhao Yun went back to his own camp, where he called in his Deputy General, Zhang Yi, and said, “My friend Huang Zhong is going to try to burn the stores tomorrow.
If he has not returned at noon, I am to go to aid him.
You are to guard our camp, which is in a dangerous place by the river, but you are not to move out unless compelled.” Huang Zhong went back to his camp and said to his general, Zhang Zhu, “I have slain Xiahou Yuan and cowed Zhang He.
I am going to destroy the enemy's store of grain tomorrow, taking with me most of the troops.
You are to come and assist me.
A meal for the men is to be ready about midnight tonight, and we shall move at the fourth watch.
We shall march to the foot of their hill, capture Zhang He, and then start the fire.” All being ready, they set out—Huang Zhong leading—and stole across River Han to the foot of the hills.
As the sun got up out of the east, they saw before them mountains of grain and only a few guards on watch.
These fled at first sight of the army of Shu.
The horsemen dismounted and began to collect brushwood and pile it round the grain heaps.
Just as they were starting the fire, there appeared a cohort led by Zhang He, who at once began a fight with Huang Zhong.
Then Cao Cao heard of the fight and sent Xu Huang to help.
Xu Huang came up in the rear, and Huang Zhong was surrounded.
Zhang Zhu with three thousand troops tried to get away to their camp, but they were intercepted by Wen Ping; and more troops of Wei coming up by the rear, Zhang Zhu also was surrounded. Both were in difficulties.
Meanwhile, time passed and noon came with no news of Huang Zhong. Wherefore Zhao Yun girded on his armor, took three thousand troops with him and went to his aid.
Just as he was leaving, he again warned Zhang Yi to keep good watch.
“Guard the camp most carefully; see that you have archers and crossbowmen on both sides.” “Yes, yes,” said Zhang Yi.
Zhao Yun rode off, spear in hand, and went out to give battle where he could find the enemy.
Soon he fell in with one of Wen Ping's companies led by General Murong Lie.
Zhao Yun plunged in, cut Murong Lie down, and disposed of the troops of Wei. Then he came to the real press.
A cohort barred his way, led by General Jiao Bing.
“Where are the soldiers of Shu?” cried Zhao Yun.
“All killed,” cried Jiao Bing.
Zhao Yun angrily dashed forward and thrust Jiao Bing through so that he died.
The cohort scattered, and Zhao Yun went on to the foot of Northern Mountain, where he found Huang Zhong surrounded.
With a yell Zhao Yun dashed at the encircling ring, thrusting this way and shoving that, so that every one shrank and recoiled before him.
The mighty spear laid low his opponents as the whirlwind scatters the petals of the wild pear tree till they lie on the bosom of the earth like snowflakes.
Panic seized Zhang He and Xu Huang so that they dared not stand in his way, and thus Zhao Yun fought his way through and rescued his fellow warrior.
Then they fought their way out and none could withstand them.
Cao Cao had been watching the course of the fighting from a high place, and when he saw a doughty warrior forcing his way into the press and all going down before him, he asked of his officers if they knew who the hero was.
“That is Zhao Yun of Changshan,” replied one who knew.
“So the hero of Dangyang is still alive,” said Cao Cao, marveled.
Then Cao Cao gave general orders to his soldiers not to attack Zhao Yun without being sure of success, no matter where they met him. Having rescued his colleague and got clear of the battle, Zhao Yun was told Zhang Zhu hemmed in on a hill not far off.
Wherefore Zhao Yun went to his relief before going back to his own camp.
He had little need to fight, for Cao Cao's soldiers no sooner saw the name emblazoned on the banners than they fled without more ado.
But it filled Cao Cao with rage to see his troops falling away before Zhao Yun, who marched on as though no one would think of standing in his way, and he went in pursuit himself with his officers. Zhao Yun reached his own camp, where he was welcomed by Zhang Yi. But a cloud of dust was seen in the distance, and they knew Cao Cao was in that cloud and coming upon them. “Let us bar the gates while we make preparation,” said Zhang Yi.
“Do not bar the gates,” said Zhao Yun.
“Have you never heard of my exploit at Dangyang, when I laughed at Cao Cao's many legions?
Now that I have an army at my back and generals to help, what is there to fear?” Then Zhao Yun placed the archers and the bowmen in a covered position outside, while he threw down all the weapons and flags within.
And no drums beat.
But he himself, alone, stood outside the gate of the camp.
It was dusk when Zhang He and Xu Huang neared the camp of the army of Shu.
They saw that the ensigns and weapons had been overthrown, and no drums beat at their approach. They also saw the one figure of the doughty warrior at the gate, and then they halted and dared advance no farther.
While they hesitated, Cao Cao arrived and urged his army to march quicker.
They answered with a shout and made a dash forward, but they saw the one figure at the gate, and every man halted. And before long, one by one they turned about and went away.
Then Zhao Yun gave a signal to his troops to come out of the moat, and the archers and bowmen began to shoot.
The soldiers of Cao Cao knew not in the dusk how many their enemies were, but terror seized upon them and they ran, each trying to be first.
And as they ran, the drums rolled, and the soldiers of Shu shouted and pursued, till the flight became a perfect rout and a confused mass of troops reached the banks of River Han.
The press continuing, many soldiers of Cao Cao were forced into the river and were drowned.
Zhao Yun, Huang Zhong, and Zhang Zhu followed close on the heels of the routed army; and while Cao Cao was making off with all speed, two other generals of Shu, Liu Feng and Meng Da, came from Micang Mountain and set fire to all the army stores of food and forage in Northern Mountain.
Then Cao Cao abandoned the stores in Northern Mountain and set out hastily for Nanzheng.
Zhang He and Xu Huang could make no stand, and they also abandoned their camps, which Zhao Yun at once occupied. Beside the stores of food, the victors collected countless weapons along the banks of the river.
They sent news of the victory to Liu Bei, who came with Zhuge Liang to the scene of the victory, and there they heard the full story of Zhao Yun's prowess.
Liu Bei was glad, and when he had seen the steepness and difficulties of the surrounding hills and understood the fine deeds of valor that had been done, he turned to Zhuge Liang and said, “Truly, the man is brave all through!” Behold Zhao Yun of Changshan, Whose whole body is valor; Formerly he fought at Dangyang, And his courage today is no less.
He rushes into the array to manifest his heroism; Surrounded by his enemies, He is dauntless and daring.
Devils howl and spirits cry, The sky is afraid and earth trembles.
Such is Zhao Yun, the brave. Whose whole body is valor.
For his services Liu Bei gave Zhao Yun the title of General Who Possesses Tiger Prowess. And the soldiers of his army were rewarded, and there was banqueting to a late hour. Soon it was reported:
“Cao Cao is coming again down through the Xie Valley to try to capture River Han.” But Liu Bei laughed, saying, “He will not succeed, for I think that we shall gain command of the river.” Then Liu Bei led his army west of the river to oppose Cao Cao.
When Cao Cao drew near, he sent out Xu Huang to lead the van and open the battle.
A General named Wang Ping said, “I know the country well, and I wish to help General Xu Huang to destroy the army of Shu.” Wang Ping was sent as second in command.
Cao Cao camped on the north of Dingjun Mountain, and his advanced guard marched away making for River Han. And when they reached the bank, Xu Huang gave orders to cross to the other side.
“To cross the river is well,” said Wang Ping, “but what if you have to retreat?” “Of old, when Han Xin made his array with a river in his rear, he said that out of the place of death one could return to life.” “You are mistaken now.
The cases are not the same, for then Han Xin knew his opponents were unskillful.
Have you reckoned upon the skill of our opponents, Zhao Yun and Huang Zhong?” “You may lead the footmen to hold the enemy while I destroy them with the horsemen,” said Xu Huang.
Then bridges were built and the army crossed.
A man of Wei blindly quoted Han Xin, A minister of Shu would be another Zhang Liang?
Who won the victory will next be revealed.
CHAPTER 72. Zhuge Liang's Wit Takes Hanzhong; Cao Cao's Army Retires To The Ye Valley. In spite of the most earnest dissuasion, Xu Huang crossed the river and camped.
Huang Zhong and Zhao Yun asked to be allowed to go against the host of Cao Cao, and Liu Bei gave his consent.
Then said Huang Zhong, “Xu Huang has been bold enough to come; we will not go out against him till evening, when his soldiers are fatigued.
Then we will fall upon him one on either side.” Zhao Yun consented, and each retired to a stockade.
Xu Huang appeared and for a long time tried to draw them into a fight, but they refused to go forth.
Then Xu Huang ordered his bowmen to begin to shoot straight before them, and the arrows and bolts fell in the Shu camp.
Huang Zhong said, “He must be thinking of retreat or he would not shoot thus.
Now is our time to smite him.” Then the scouts reported that the rearmost bodies of the enemy had begun to retreat.
The drums of Shu rolled a deafening peal, and Huang Zhong's army from the left and Zhao Yun's army from the right came to the attack, and the double fight began.
Xu Huang was badly defeated, and the flying soldiers were forced to River Han, where many were drowned. But Xu Huang escaped after fighting desperately, and when he got back to camp, he blamed his colleague Wang Ping for not having come to his aid.
“Had I done so, these camps would have been left unguarded,” said Wang Ping.
“I tried to dissuade you from going, but you would not hear me, and you brought about this reverse yourself.” Xu Huang in his wrath tried to slay Wang Ping; but Wang Ping escaped to his own camp.
In the night, Wang Ping set fire on both camps, and great confusion reigned in the lines.
Xu Huang ran away, but Wang Ping crossed the river and surrendered to Zhao Yun, who led him to Liu Bei.
Wang Ping told Liu Bei all about River Han and the country near by.
“I shall surely capture Hanzhong now that you are here to help me, friend Wang Ping,” said Liu Bei.
Liu Bei made Wang Ping General and Army Guide.
Xu Huang reported Wang Ping's defection, which made Cao Cao very angry.
Cao Cao placed himself at the head of a force and tried to retake the bank of the river.
Zhao Yun, thinking his troops too few, retired to the west side, and the two armies lay on opposite sides of the stream. Liu Bei and his adviser came down to view the position.
Zhuge Liang saw in the upper course of the stream a hill which might well screen a thousand soldiers, so he returned to camp, called in Zhao Yun and said, “General, you lead five hundred troops, with drums and horns, and place them in ambush behind the hill, to await certain orders which will come some time during the night or at dawn.
When you hear a detonation, you are not to appear, only give a long roll of the drums at every report.” Zhao Yun departed to play his part in the drama, while Zhuge Liang went to a hill whence he could overlook the scene.
When next the army of Cao Cao approached the camp of Shu and offered battle, not a man came out, nor was an arrow or a bolt shot. They retired without any result.
But in the depths of the night, when all the lights in the camp were extinguished and all appeared tranquil and restful, Zhuge Liang exploded a bomb, and at once Zhao Yun beat his drums and blared his trumpets.
Cao Cao's soldiers awoke in alarm, thinking it was a night raid.
They rushed out, but there was no enemy, and as the hubbub ceased they went back to sleep. Soon after there was another bomb, and again the drums and the trumpets seeming to shake the earth itself, and the fearsome roar echoing along the valleys and from the hills again scared Cao Cao's soldiers.
Thus the night passed in constant alarms. The next night was the same, and the next.
On the fourth day Cao Cao broke up his camp, marched his troops ten miles to the rear and pitched his camp in a clear, wide space among the hills. Zhuge Liang was pleased at the result of his ruse.
Said he, smiling, “Cao Cao is skilled in war, but still he is not proof against all deceitful tricks.” The troops of Shu then crossed the river and camped with the stream behind them. When Liu Bei asked the next move, he was told, but also told to keep the plan a secret.
Seeing Liu Bei thus encamped, Cao Cao became doubtful and anxious, and, to bring things to a decision, he sent a written declaration of war, to which Zhuge Liang replied that they would fight a battle on the morrow.
On the morrow the armies faced each other half way between the two camps in front of the Mountain of Five Borders, and there they arrayed.
Cao Cao presently rode up stood beside his banner; with his officers right and left and the dragon and phoenix banners fluttering in the wind. His drums rolled thrice, and then he summoned Liu Bei to a parley.
Liu Bei rode out supported by Liu Feng, Meng Da, and other leaders. Then Cao Cao insolently flourished his whip and vilified his opponent.
“Liu Bei, you have forgotten kindness and lost the sense of right; you are a rebel against the government.” Liu Bei answered, “I am related to the imperial family, and I hold an edict authorizing me to seize all rebels.
You have dared to lift up your hand against Empress Fu, made yourself a king, and arrogantly presume to an imperial chariot.
If you are not a rebel, what are you?” Then Cao Cao ordered Xu Huang out to give battle, and Liu Feng went to meet him.
As the combat began, Liu Bei retired within the ranks of his array. Liu Feng was no match for his opponent, and fled.
Cao Cao issued an order to capture Liu Bei, saying, “He who captures Liu Bei will be made Prince of Hanzhong.” At this the army of Wei uttered one great roar of rage, then they came surging on.
The troops of Shu fled toward the river abandoning everything, even throwing aside their weapons, which littered the road.
But as Cao Cao's army pressed forward, he suddenly clanged the gongs, called a halt and drew off.
“Why did you call us off, O Prince, just as we were on the point of success?” said his commanders.
“Because I saw the enemy had encamped with the river in their rear, which was very suspicious.
They also abandoned their steeds and weapons, which made me doubt. Wherefore I could only retire.
But retain your armor.
Let not a person take off his harness on pain of death.
Now retire as quickly as you can march.” As Cao Cao turned about to retire, Zhuge Liang hoisted the signal to attack, and the retreating soldiers were harassed on every side both night and day till they were all disordered.
Cao Cao ordered his army to retire to Nanzheng. Presently they saw flames rising all around, and soon it was known that their city of refuge was in the hands Zhang Fei and Wei Yan, who, after Yan Yan had taken the command of Langzhong, had launched a double attack and captured Nanzheng.
Disappointed and saddened, Cao Cao bade them march to Yangping Pass.
Liu Bei with the main army followed them to Baozhou and Nanzheng and there pacified the people and restored confidence.
“Cao Cao was exceedingly quickly overcome this time;” said Liu Bei, “how was that?” “He has always been of a suspicious nature,” said Zhuge Liang, “and that has led to many failures although he is a good leader of armies.
I have defeated him by playing upon his doubts.” “He is rather weakened now,” said Liu Bei.
“Can you not devise a plan to drive him away finally?” “That is all thought out.” Next Zhang Fei and Wei Yan were sent along two different roads to cut off Cao Cao's supplies. Two other cohorts led by Huang Zhong and Zhao Yun were bidden to go and fire the hills and forests.
All these four armies had natives of the place to act as guides and show the way.
Cao Cao's scouts sent out from Yangping Pass returned to report:
“The roads far and near are blocked by the troops of Shu, and every place seems to be burning.
No soldier is seen.” Cao Cao knew not what to do.
Then other scouts told him, “Our stores are being plundered by Zhang Fei and Wei Yan.” At this, Cao Cao called for a volunteer to drive off the plunderers; and Xu Chu offered.
He was given a thousand veterans, and went down the Pass to act as escort of the grain wagons.
The officers in charge of the transport were very glad to receive a general of such renown.
“Except for you, O General, the grain could never reach Yangping Pass.” They entertained Xu Chu with the wine and food on the carts; and he ate and drank copiously, so that he became very intoxicated. And in that state he insisted on marching, urging the convoy to start at once.
“The sun has nearly set,” said the transport officers, “and the road near Baozhou is bad and dangerous, so that we cannot pass there at night.” “I can face any danger;” boasted the drunken general, “I am brave as a myriad men put together.
What do you think I fear? Beside, there is a good moon tonight, just the sort of thing to take grain carts along by.” Xu Chu took the lead, sword in hand.
By the second watch they were passing Baozhou.
About half the train had passed when the rolling drums and the blare of horns came down to them through a rift in the hills. It was soon followed by the appearance of a cohort led by Zhang Fei.
With spear ready, he came racing down straight for Xu Chu, who, whirling his sword, dashed to the front to meet the enemy.
But Xu Chu was too drunk to stand against such a warrior.
After a few bouts he received a spear thrust in the shoulder, turned round in his saddle, and fell from his horse.
His men rushed to his help, and they carried him away as they retreated, while Zhang Fei took the whole transport train of fodder and forage away to his own camp.
The defeated escort carried their wounded leader back to Cao Cao's camp, where he was placed in the care of physicians.
Then Cao Cao himself led out his army to fight a decisive battle with the army of Shu.
Liu Bei went out to meet him, and, when both sides were arrayed, Liu Feng went out to challenge. Cao Cao at once let loose a torrent of taunts and reproaches.
“Seller of shoes, you are always sending out this pretended son of yours to fight for you.
If I only call my golden-bearded son Cao Zhang, your so-called son will be chopped to mincemeat!” These words enraged Liu Feng, who raised his spear and galloped toward Cao Cao.
Cao Cao bade Xu Huang do battle with the young man, and Liu Feng at once ran away.
Cao Cao led on his legions, but he was harassed by the explosion of bombs, the beating of drums, and the blare of trumpets that came from every side.
He concluded that he was being led into an ambush, and he hastened to retire.
The retreat was unfortunate, for the soldiers trampled upon each other and many were killed. Anon they all ran off to Yangping Pass as quickly as they could.
But the soldiers of Shu came right up to the walls of the Pass, and some burned the east gate while others shouted at the west.
Others, again, burned the north gate while drums rolled at the south.
Leaders and led were alike harassed and frightened, and presently they left the Pass and ran away. They were pursued and sore smitten. The road to safety was not easy. In one direction Zhang Fei barred the way, while Zhao Yun attacked the rear.
Then Huang Zhong came from Baozhou and pressed a slaughter on the flank.
Cao Cao's army lost many troops, and he was severely defeated in this triple attack.
His commanders gathered about him and took him off toward the Xie Valley. Here a great cloud of dust was seen in the distance. “If that is an ambush, it is the last of me,” sighed Cao Cao.
The soldiers came nearer, and then Cao Cao recognized not a enemy but his second son, Cao Zhang.
As a lad Cao Zhang was a good horseman and an expert archer.
He was more powerful than most men and could overcome a wild beast with his bare hands. Cao Cao did not approve of the young man's bent, and often warned him to study instead.
“You do not study, but only love your bow and your horse; this is the courage of a mere person. Think you that this makes for an honorable career?” But Cao Zhang replied, “The really noble person ought to imitate such grand men as Wei Qing and Huo Qubing.
They won their reputation in the Gobi Desert, where they led a mighty host of hundred thousand, able to overrun the whole world and go anywhere. What have I to do with scholarship?” Cao Cao used to ask his sons what career they found admirable, and Cao Zhang always replied that he would be a leader of armies.
“But what should a leader be like?” asked Cao Cao.
“He should be endued with firmness and courage, never turn aside from a difficulty, but be in the van of his officers and troops.
Rewards should be certain; and so should punishments.” Cao Cao smiled with pleasure.
In the twenty-third year of Rebuilt Tranquillity , the Wuhuan Peoples revolted in Daichun, and Cao Cao sent this son with fifty thousand troops to suppress them. Just as Cao Zhang was leaving, his father read him a homily on his duty.
“At home we are father and son, but when a task is given you, you have to consider your duty as a servant of your ruler.
The law knows no kindness, and you must beware.” When the expedition reached the north of Daichun, Cao Zhang led the array and smote as far as Sanggan in the Gobi Desert, and peace was restored.
He had lately heard that his father was at Yangping Pass, and had come to help him to fight.
His coming greatly pleased his father, who said, “Now that my goldenbearded son has arrived, we can destroy Liu Bei for certain.” Then the army was marched back again and pitched camp at the Xie Valley.
Someone told Liu Bei of the arrival of Cao Zhang, and he asked for a volunteer to go out against the newcomer. Liu Feng offered.
Meng Da also desired to go, and Liu Bei decided to let both go. “Vie with each other,” said he.
Each general had five thousand troops, and Liu Feng led the way. Cao Zhang rode out and engaged him, and in the third bout Liu Feng was overcome and ran off. Then Meng Da advanced, and a battle was just beginning when he saw that Cao Cao's troops were in confusion. The cause was the sudden coming of Ma Chao and Wu Lan.
Before the enemy had recovered from the panic, Meng Da attacked on another side.
Ma Chao's force, who had been nursing their courage for a long time, fought brilliantly, so that none could withstand their onslaught, and they won the day.
But in his flight, Cao Zhang met Wu Lan, and he thrust and slew Wu Lan with his spear.
After a great fight, Cao Cao ordered his army to retire into camp at the Xie Valley.
Here he remained many days, prevented from advancing by Ma Chao and fearing the ridicule of Shu if he should retreat.
One day, while he was anxiously trying to decide what to do, his cook sent in some chicken broth.
He noticed in the broth some chicken tendons, and this simple fact led him into a train of reflection.
He was still deep in thought when Xiahou Dun entered his tent to ask the watchword for that night.
Cao Cao at once involuntarily replied, “Chicken tendon.” The word was passed on in orders.
When First Secretary Yang Xiu saw the order that the watchword was “chicken tendon,” he told all his people to pack up their belongings ready for the march.
One who saw this went and told Xiahou Dun, who sent for Yang Xiu and asked why he had packed up.
Yang Xiu replied, “By tonight's orders I see that the Prince of Wei is soon going to retire. 'Chicken tendons' are tasteless things to eat, and yet it is a pity to waste them.
Now if we advance, we cannot conquer; and if we retire, we fear we shall look ridiculous. There being no advantage here, the best course is to retire. You will certainly see the Prince of Wei retreat before long.
I have made my preparations so as not to be hurried and confused at the last moment.” “You seem to know the Prince's inmost heart,” said Xiahou Dun, and he bade his servants pack.
The other generals seeing this, also made preparations for departure.
Cao Cao's mind was too perturbed for sleep. In the night he got up, took a steel battle-ax in his hand, and wandered privily through the camp.
When he got to Xiahou Dun's tents, he saw everything packed and ready for a move.
Much surprised, he made his way back to his own tent and sent for that officer.
“Why is everything in your camp packed as if ready for the march?” “Yang Xiu, the First Secretary, seems to have private knowledge of the Prince's design to retire,” said Xiahou Dun.
Cao Cao summoned Yang Xiu and questioned him, and Yang Xiu replied with the chicken tendon incident.
“How dare you invent such a story and disturb the hearts of my army?” Cao Cao called in his lictors and told them to take Yang Xiu away and behead him and hang his head at the camp gate.
Yang Xiu was a man of acute and ingenious mind, but inclined to show off. His lack of restraint over his tongue had often wounded Cao Cao's susceptibilities. Once Cao Cao was having a pleasance laid out, and when it was completed, he went to inspect the work.
He uttered no word of praise or blame; he just wrote the word “alive” on the gate and left. Nobody could guess what he meant till Yang Xiu heard of it.
“'Gate' with 'alive' inside it makes the word for 'wide,'“ said he.
“The Prime Minister thinks the gates are too wide.” Thereupon they rebuilt the outer walls on an altered plan. When complete, Cao Cao was asked to go and see it. And he was then delighted.
“But who guessed what I meant?” said he.
“Yang Xiu,” replied his people. Cao Cao thereafter lauded Yang Xiu's ingenuity, but in his heart he feared.
Another time Cao Cao received a box of cream cheese from Mongolia.
Cao Cao just scribbled three words “One Cream Box” on the top and left it on the table. The words seemed to have no meaning.
But Yang Xiu happened to come in, saw the box and at once handed a spoonful of the contents to each guest in the room.
When Cao Cao asked why he did this, he explained that that was the interpretation of the words on the box, which, resolved into primary symbols, read, “Each person a mouthful.” “Could I possibly disobey your orders?” said he.
Cao Cao laughed with the others, but hatred was in his heart.
Cao Cao lived in constant fear of assassination, and said to his attendants, “Let none of you come near me when I am sleeping, for I am likely to slay people in my dreams.” One day he was enjoying a siesta, and his quilt fell off. One of the attendants saw it and hastened to cover him again.
Cao Cao suddenly leaped from the couch, cut down the intruder with his sword, and lay down again to sleep.
Some time after he awoke, simulated surprise and asked who had killed his attendant.
When they told him, Cao Cao wept aloud for the dead man and had him buried in a fine grave.
Most people thought that Cao Cao had slain the man while asleep, but Yang Xiu knew better, and at the funeral of the victim Yang Xiu remarked, “The Prime Minister was in no dream, but only you were asleep.” This only increased the hatred.
Cao Cao's third son, Cao Zhi, took great delight in Yang Xiu's cleverness and often invited him, when they would talk the whole night.
When Cao Cao was considering the nomination of his heir and desired to name Cao Zhi, Cao Pi got to hear of the proposal to set him aside in favor of his younger brother, so he secretly requested the Master of the Court Singers, Wu Zhi, to come and discuss this matter.
Then fearing that someone might see his visitor, Cao Pi got a large basket made, in which his friend was smuggled into the Palace.
Cao Pi gave out that the basket contained rolls of silk.
Yang Xiu heard the truth and informed Cao Cao, who sent guards to watch at the gates.
Cao Pi, in alarm, told Wu Zhi, who said, “Be not afraid, but to fill a basket actually with rolls of silk on the morrow and have it carried in as before.” The searchers peeped into the basket and found the rolls of silk.
They told Cao Cao the result of their search, and Cao Cao began to think Yang Xiu was plotting against his son. This also added to his hatred.
Another time Cao Cao, wishing to compare the abilities of his two sons Cao Pi and Cao Zhi, told them both to go out of the city, at the same time ordering the gate wardens to forbid their exit.
Cao Pi first came to the gate, was stopped by the wardens and returned to his palace.
But his brother Cao Zhi consulted Yang Xiu, who said, “You have received orders from the Prince to go out; simply cut down any who may try to prevent you.” When Cao Zhi went to the gate and was stopped, he shouted out to the wardens, “I have the Prince's order to go out; dare you stop me?” He slew the man who would have prevented him.
Wherefore Cao Cao considered his younger son the more able.
But when some other person told him that the device came from Yang Xiu, he was angry and took a dislike to his son Cao Zhi.
Yang Xiu also used to coach Cao Zhi in preparing replies to likely questions, which were learned by heart and quoted when necessary.
Cao Cao was always asking this son his opinion on military matters, and Cao Zhi always had a fluent reply ready.
His father was not without suspicions, which were turned into certainties when Cao Pi gave his father the written replies which Cao Pi had bribed a servant to filch from his brother's apartments. Cao Cao was quite angry. “How dare he throw dust in my eyes like this?” said Cao Cao. Yang Xiu very nearly lost his life for his share in that business.
Now sending him to execution on the charge of destroying the morale of the soldiers was only a subterfuge.
Yang Xiu was but thirty-four when he met his end.
Talented was Yang Xiu, Born of an illustrious stock, His pen traced wonderful characters, In his breast were beautiful words. When he talked, his hearers were astonished, His alert responses overpast every one.
He died because of misdirected genius And not because he foretold retreat.
Cao Cao thus put to death the prime mover and simulated anger against Xiahou Dun. He threatened to execute Xiahou Dun, but listened to those who begged him to show mercy.
“Get out of this!” said he.
Next he issued an order to advance on the morrow. The army moved out of the valley and came face to face with the troops of Shu led by Wei Yan.
He summoned Wei Yan to surrender, but received abuse and contumely in return.
Pang De went out to fight Wei Yan; but while the combat was in progress, fires broke out in Cao Cao's camp, and a soldier came flying to say that the rear and center camps had been seized by Ma Chao.
Fearing lest this should lead to a rout, he drew his sword and stood before the army, crying out, “Death for any officer who flinches!” Wherefore the men of Wei pressed forward valiantly, and Wei Yan, pretending defeat, retreated.
Having driven back this army, Cao Cao gave the signal to turn toward camp and fight with Ma Chao. He took up his station on the top of a hill whence he could survey the field.
Suddenly a cohort appeared just below him, and the leader cried, “Wei Yan is here!” Wei Yan fitted an arrow to his bow, shot, and wounded Cao Cao right in his lip.
Cao Cao turned and fell.
Wei Yan threw aside his bow, seized his sword, and came charging up the hill to finish his enemy. But with a shouting Pang De flashed in.
“Spare my lord!” cried Pang De.
He rushed up and drove Wei Yan backward.
Then they took Cao Cao away. Ma Chao also retired, and the wounded prince slowly returned to his own camp.
As has been said, Cao Cao was wounded full in the face, and the arrow knocked out two of his front teeth. When in the hands of the physicians, he lay thinking over Yang Xiu's words.
In a repentant mood he had Yang Xiu's remains decently interred. Then he gave the order to retreat.
Pang De was the rear guard.
Cao Cao set out homeward in a padded carriage, escorted by his Tiger Guard.
Before they had gone far, there was an alarm of fire and ambush in the Xie Valley.
The soldiers of Wei were all fear-stricken.
That was something like the danger once at Tong Pass met, Or like the fight at the Red Cliffs which no one could never forget.
How Cao Cao fared will next be told. CHAPTER 73.
Liu Bei Becomes Prince Of Hanzhong; Guan Yu Attacks Xiangyang. When Cao Cao retired to the Xie Valley, Zhuge Liang considered it to mean the abandonment of his attempt to acquire possession of Hanzhong, and he sent out several parties to harass and hasten his retreat by guerrilla attacks.
For this reason the retreating army had to keep on the move.
Beside, Cao Cao was suffering from his wound, and marched as hurriedly as possible.
But it was a dejected army, when the leading legions encountered fire on both flanks, which had been raised by troops placed in ambush while Ma Chao's main force kept driving the army before it.
Every one in the Cao Cao army was dispirited, and there was no more courage in them.
They pressed forward day and night alike without halting to rest.
It was only after reaching Jingzhao that they had some repose. Then Liu Bei sent Liu Feng, Meng Da, and Wang Ping to take Shangyong. The Commander of the city, Shen Dan, and his colleagues, knowing that Cao Cao had retreated, offered their submission. After confidence had been restored among the people, Liu Bei rewarded his army generously, and they were all joyful. It was after this that the general body of the officers decided to urge Liu Bei to assume the title of “Emperor,” but they dared not tell him so. However, they sent up a petition to Zhuge Liang, who replied that he had already decided on this course.
So he and Fa Zheng headed a deputation that went in to see their lord.
They said, “Now that Cao Cao really holds the reins of authority, the people are without a true sovereign.
Our lord, your kindness and sense of justice have spread throughout the empire. You have restored peace over the two Lands of Rivers, and your becoming an emperor would be according to God's will and the desire of the people. Then by right and title you could destroy rebels.
This matter should not be delayed, and we pray you choose the auspicious day.” But Liu Bei evinced great surprise, and replied, “Your words, O Instructor of the Army, are wrong.
Although I am of the imperial house, yet I am but a minister; and to do this thing would be rebellion against Han.” Zhuge Liang replied, “Not so.
Today the empire is riven, and many of the bolder spirits have seized upon and claim the rule of various portions. The talented of the empire and the virtuous among officers, who have risked death and lost their lives in serving those above them, all desire to have the opportunity of serving a true emperor and doing service for a true throne.
Now, if you insist on modestly maintaining your righteous way, I fear that you will lose popular support.
My lord, I wish that you should reflect upon this.” “But you desire me to usurp a place of great honor in the state, and I dare not.
Let there be more delay and discussion.” But with one voice they said, “Our lord, if you reject this, the hearts of the people will turn from you.” “My lord,” said Zhuge Liang, “you have made rectitude your motto all your life.
If you really object to the most honored title, then, since you have Jingzhou, Yiazhou, and Hanzhong, take temporarily the title of 'Prince of Hanzhong.'“ “Gentlemen, though you may desire to honor me by the title of Prince, yet, without an edict from the Emperor, such action would be usurpation.” Said Zhuge Liang, “The time demands recognition of the actual state of authority, and not a rigid adherence to all the rules of propriety.” And Zhang Fei roared out, “All sorts of people with all sorts of names are making themselves rulers; how much more ought you, O Brother, who are of the dynastic stock?
It ought not to be Prince of Hanzhong but Emperor. What prevents it?” “Brother, say no more,” said Liu Bei, roughly.
“My lord,” said Zhuge Liang, “it is fitting to follow political changes and suit one's conduct to circumstances. Wherefore first take the princedom, and then memorialize the Throne.” As there seemed no option, Liu Bei listened and complied.
In the twentyfourth year of Rebuilt Tranquillity , in the seventh month, an altar was set up at Mianyang, nine square miles, which was set around with the proper flags and banners and symbols.
In the presence of all his civil and military officers assembled according to their rank, and at the request of the two Ministers Xu Jing and Fa Zheng, Liu Bei received the head dress and seat of a prince. Then he took his seat, facing the south as a ruler should, and received the salutes and felicitations of all his officers as the Prince of Hanzhong.
And his son Liu Shan was nominated his heir-apparent.
Xu Jing was given the title of Royal Guardian; Fa Zheng that of Chair of the Secretariat.
Zhuge Liang was reappointed Directing Instructor of the Forces, with the additional powers of control over the whole state policy.
Guan Yu, Zhang Fei, Zhao Yun, Huang Zhong, and Ma Chao were the Five Tiger Generals.
Wei Yan was made Governor of Hanzhong, and all the others who had assisted were given ranks and offices. As soon as the investiture was completed, Liu Bei composed a memorial and sent it to Capital Xuchang. This is the document: “I, Liu Bei, have but ordinary talents, yet was I made a general of high rank and led a great army.
Though I received a commission to purge the empire of rebels, I was unable to cleanse it and so renew the tranquillity to Your Majesty's house and restore the dynasty. Too long have I delayed to spread Your Majesty's sacred governance. The world is evil and not in good case, and as I sorrowfully think it over and over, I am distressed as one in severe pain.
“Rebellion began with Dong Zhuo, and all kinds of evils have spread abroad; cruelty and ferocity have become rife.
Strong in faith in Your Majesty's sacred virtue and inspiring presence, many banded together to help.
The loyal exerted themselves to destroy the rebels, but others of them were smitten of heaven. The fierce and the contumacious have been exterminated, and gradually rebellion has melted away.
“Only Cao Cao now remains, too long unpunished. He has arrogated to himself the authority of the state. His wicked heart is very rebellious.
Once I, with General Dong Cheng, the State Uncle, conspired against him, but the plot was discovered and my fellow conspirator suffered. Thenceforward I was a wanderer and my loyalty availed nothing.
It only allowed Cao Cao further license and liberty to do evil, till he dared even to accomplish the death of the Empress and the destruction of her sons.
Although we might band together and form associations, yet, with all our energy, we had to recognize that we were too weak for war. Wherefore the years passed and nothing was accomplished.
In constant fear of destruction, we even forgot our duty to the state.
Waking and sleeping we sighed, and our nights were times of anxiety. “Now my fellows consider that history has repeated itself. They attach the utmost importance to the family and would manifest it with all their might.
Hereditary succession of rulers is still a principle.
The rulers of Zhou, taking the two preceding dynasties as models, strengthened its position through all the states, and it reinforced itself with the support of the states of Jing and Zheng.
When the great Founder of the Hans came into his own, he ennobled his whole family with kingships and lordships. Later, the dynasty had to issue a general command throughout the whole of the nine regions in order to destroy the widespread Lu Family and to enhance the Liu Family.
“Now Cao Cao is an enemy of all rectitude, and his followers are all evil. His treachery is manifest.
Since the members of the imperial clan are few and weak, the clan is not honored. Having reflected upon the ancient models and being desirous of temporary alleviation, my fellows have made me assume the title of Prince of Hanzhong with the addition of Regent Marshal. “I have deeply considered these things.
If one receives kindness from the Throne and accepts the responsibility for a portion of the state and fail, then such a fault would only be made the more serious by holding high rank and thereby increasing the burden of reproach.
But my fellows have urged me, and they have convinced me that it would be right; and, should I refuse, the wicked will not be destroyed and the danger to the state will not be removed.
The temple of our ancestors is in danger, and the imperial prerogatives are failing.
A faithful servant, who in the day of tribulation can undertake a suitable policy whereby to preserve the dynasty, should not refuse his help at any cost. Wherefore I have yielded and accepted the position for the glory of the state.
“Humbly I think of such a title and its exalted position and the favor vouchsafed me, and I would endeavor to show true gratitude.
My anxiety is deep, for the responsibility is heavy.
I am as one on the brink of a great gulf.
I must surely exert myself to the utmost and encourage my armies and lead all disciples of rectitude, in accordance with the will of Heaven and as occasion serves, to smite rebellion so as to restore the dynasty.” When this memorial reached Capital Xuchang, Cao Cao was in his palace at Yejun, and it annoyed him greatly. “How dare this mean weaver of straw shoes behave thus?” said he.
“Now I swear that I will destroy him.” So he issued orders for the whole force of the state to go out against the two Lands of Rivers to wage fierce war with the new Prince of Hanzhong. But a remonstrance came from the mouth of one man.
“Let not the great Prince of Wei trouble himself to go on a distant expedition because of a temporary annoyance.
I can propose a plan of which the execution will need not the bending of a single bow, and yet it will make Liu Bei bring down disaster upon his own head.
When his army shall have become exhausted, it will only be necessary to send one single general against him and victory will be ours.” Cao Cao looked at the officer; it was First Secretary Sima Yi.
“What is your exalted view, my friend?” said Cao Cao.
“Sun Quan's sister is wife to Liu Bei, but Sun Quan has found an occasion to steal away the bride.
Liu Bei is in possession of Jingzhou still, and he and Sun Quan are bitter enemies.
Therefore send some able speaker with a letter to Wu to persuade the Marquis to send an army to recover Jingzhou.
That will draw thither all the armies of Shu, when you can send your army to Hanzhong. Liu Bei will be helpless and his strength will be wasted.” The scheme pleased Cao Cao. He at once drew up a letter and sent it by the hand of Man Chong, who soon arrived in Wu.
As soon as Sun Quan knew of the mission, he summoned his advisers to consult.
Zhang Zhao said, “Wei and Wu are primarily enemies because of the dissension fomented by the words of Zhuge Liang. They have been fighting for several years and many lives have been lost.
Now this messenger has surely come to discuss terms of friendship, and he should be welcomed.” On the strength of this, Man Chong was well received and conducted into the city and into the presence of Sun Quan.
He presented his letters at the conclusion of the ceremonies of reception and declared his mission.
“Wu and Wei have no fundamental quarrel, and their dissension has been brought about by Liu Bei.
My master sends me to covenant with you for an attack on Jingzhou, while he goes against Hanzhong.
This double attack being successful, the conquered country can be divided between us two, and we can both swear to respect each other's territory.” Having read the letter, Sun Quan prepared a banquet in honor of Man Chong and then sent him to the guest-house to rest while he discussed the matter with his council of advisers.
Said Gu Yong, “Although the messenger's speech was all special pleading, it was correct in form.
I propose that the messenger be allowed to return and that a covenant be made with Cao Cao for joint attack.
In addition, let spies be sent over the Great River to find out Guan Yu's movements, and then we may act.” Zhuge Jin said, “I hear that since Guan Yu has been in Jingzhou, Liu Bei has found him a wife, who has borne him a son and a daughter.
The daughter is too young to have been betrothed, wherefore let me go to ask her in marriage with your heir.
If Guan Yu agrees, then we can arrange with him to attack Cao Cao.
If Guan Yu refuses, then let us aid Cao Cao in an attack on Jingzhou.” Sun Quan took this advice.
So he sent Man Chong away and sent Zhuge Jin to Jingzhou to try to arrange the betrothal.
Zhuge Jin was received; and when the time came to state the reason for his coming, Guan Yu asked him, “What have you come for, Zhuge Jin?” “I have come seeking to ally the two houses.
My master, the Marquis of Wu, has a son who is quite clever.
Hearing that you have a daughter, General, I ask her in marriage, hereby the two houses may join in an attack on Cao Cao.
This would be an admirable result, and I pray you consider the proposal.” But the warrior flared up.
“How can my tiger's daughter marry with a dog's whelp?
Were it not for your brother, I would take your head. Say no more!” Guan Yu called his servants to hustle forth the hapless messenger, who ran away with his hands over his head, too astonished to look any one in the face.
And reaching his own place, he dared not hide the manner of his reception, but told the whole truth.
“What ruffianism!” exclaimed the Marquis.
Thereupon Sun Quan ordered the council again to consider an attack on Jingzhou.
Bu Zhi rose and said, “It has been long manifest that Cao Cao wishes to usurp the Throne, but he is afraid of Liu Bei.
Now we are to attack Shu with an army, and Cao Cao want to shift the misfortune to us indeed.” “But I also want the place,” said Sun Quan. Said Bu Zhi, “Cao Ren is already camped at Fankou and Xiangyang and in no danger from the river.
If Cao Cao can take Jingzhou by land, why does he not take it?
However, he wants you, my lord, to send your army, and you can judge his real intention from this. Send to Cao Cao and tell him to make Cao Ren attack by land.
Then Guan Yu must take the army from Jingzhou to Fankou.
When Guan Yu has left Jingzhou, you can send an army to seize it.” Sun Quan thought the scheme good and sent letters with these proposals to Cao Cao.
Cao Cao adopted the plan, and having sent the messenger back to the South Land, he next sent Man Chong to help Cao Ren at Fankou as Assistant Adviser in the matter of attack.
He also sent dispatches to the South Land to ask for the assistance of Sun Quan's marine force.
Having laid on Wei Yan the task of holding the Eastern Land of Rivers, the Prince of Hanzhong, with his officers, returned to Chengdu and began to set his new house in order.
A palace was begun and public guest-houses were built, and between Chengdu and Baishui, at selected places, they built four hundred rest-houses and post stations.
The Prince of Hanzhong also set himself to accumulate great stores of grain and forage and to till his arsenals with weapons with the design of mastering the capital in the north and the whole empire.
Then his spies told him of the treaty between Cao Cao and Sun Quan, with designs upon Jingzhou, and he hastily called in Zhuge Liang to ask what should be done.
“I felt that Cao Cao would try to do this,” said Zhuge Liang, “and most of the advisers in the South Land will persuade Cao Cao to order Cao Ren to begin the campaign.” “But what am I to do?” asked the Prince.
“First send a special messenger to Guan Yu with his new title, telling him to capture Fankou, which will so damp the ardor of the enemy that they will break off themselves.” Therefore Liu Bei sent Fei Shi, a minister from his Board of War, to take the patent of the new title to Guan Yu, who received the delegate with great deference and conducted him into the city.
After they had arrived at the official residence, Guan Yu inquired what new title had been conferred upon him.
“The First of the Five Tiger Generals,” replied Fei Shi.
“And who are the five?” “Their names are Guan Yu, Zhang Fei, Zhao Yun, Ma Chao, and Huang Zhong.” “The second is my brother,” said Guan Yu.
“Ma Chao comes of a famous family, and Zhao Yun has been with my elder brother so long that he is as a brother. It is right for them to be put on a level with me.
But what sort of a man is this Huang Zhong that he is ranked with us?
The really great man does not stand shoulder to shoulder with any old soldier that comes along.” And Guan Yu refused both title and seal. “You do wrong to refuse,” said Fei Shi.
“Of old, Xiao He and Cao Shen helped Liu Bang, the Founder of the Han Dynasty, in his great enterprise and were very dear friends, while Han Xin was but a runaway leader from Chu.
Yet Liu Bang made Han Xin a prince, and so placed over the heads of the other two. I have never heard that these two resented it.
The Prince of Hanzhong has his Five Tiger Generals, but he is still your brother and all that that means. As his brother, you are he and he is you.
Is there any comparison with any other?
The Prince has always treated you with the greatest kindness. You two are one in sorrow and joy, sharers of disaster and good fortune. No such question as that of a mere title ought to reckon at all.
I pray you, Sir, reflect.” Guan Yu understood, and thanked Fei Shi, saying, “You have prevented me from making a great mistake due to my ignorance.” Guan Yu then received the seal with all humility.
Next Fei Shi produced the edict ordering the capture of Fankou.
Guan Yu lost no time in obeying its command. He appointed Fu Shiren and Mi Fang Leaders of the Van to take the first army out of the city into camp.
This done, a banquet was prepared for Fei Shi, and they sat late at their wine.
While still at table there was an alarm of fire in the new camp, and Guan Yu hastened out of the city to see.
He found that the two generals had also been feasting, and the fire had started behind their tent, a spark having fallen into some explosives, whence it spread and destroyed the whole camp and all that was in it.
Guan Yu and his soldiers did what they could to put out the fire and then reentered the city. There Guan Yu summoned the two generals before him, abused them for their lack of care, and sentenced them to death.
However, Fei Shi interceded for them, saying, “It is not well to put two leaders to death at the beginning of a campaign, before even the army has marched.
You might reprieve them at least.” Guan Yu's anger had by no means subsided, but he recalled the two generals and said, “Were it not that I have the greatest regard for Chairman Fei Shi here, I had let the sentence take its course.
Now I will only flog you.” So the two officers received forty blows each and were degraded from leading the van. Their seals were taken away, and Mi Fang was sent to Nanjun, Fu Shiren to Gongan. “Now be warned,” said Guan Yu.
“If, when I return from my victories, there is the least sign of disorder on your part, you will suffer for both faults.” The two men flushed crimson and went out. Then two new officers were appointed, Liao Hua and Guan Ping.
Next Guan Yu took command of the main army, and he had two advisers—Ma Liang and Yi Ji.
Then it was that Hu Hua's son, Hu Ban, came to Jingzhou and joined Guan Yu, who loved him for the sake of his father and the good service Hu Ban had rendered when he saved Guan Yu.
Guan Yu sent Hu Ban to the Prince of Hanzhong in the train of Fei Shi.
The day that Guan Yu sacrificed to his standard before starting, he was lying in his tent resting when suddenly there dashed into his tent a huge boar, very large, as big as a bullock and quite black. It bit his foot.
He jumped up to kill the creature, when it squealed with the sound of tearing cloth—and he awoke.
It was a dream, but he had a pain in his foot.
The dream perplexed him, and he could not explain it.
He related it to his son, who interpreted it happily, saying, “The boar is a royal beast, like the dragon, and coming to your feet means a rise of your dignity.” When the dream got noised abroad, for he told his officers, some interpreted it as auspicious and some the reverse.
“When a person nears sixty, he ought not to be greatly disturbed by the thought of death,” said Guan Yu.
“After all, I am a warrior.” Just about that time came an edict from the Prince of Hanzhong making him Commanding General, with honorable insignia of rank and control over the nine territories of forty-one counties in Jingzhou. When the officers congratulated him on his new honors, they did not forget the dream.
“This shows what a dream of boars means.” This new distinction pleased Guan Yu greatly, and he had no more perplexing doubts. Soon he marched away along the great road to the point of danger.
Cao Ren was in Xiangyang when he heard that Guan Yu was coming against him. He was much put about, and inclined to trust solely to defense.
But his next command, Zhai Yuan, did not support this course and argued against it. “The Prince of Wei has ordered you to act in concert with Wu and take Jingzhou.
For the other side to come against such a combination is to walk in the way of death; certainly we have no occasion to avoid a conflict.” On the other hand the newly sent Adviser Man Chong inculcated caution.
Said he, “Guan Yu is brave and cunning and one not to be met lightly.
I think defense is best.” Then General Xiahou Cun said contemptuously, “This is all the talk of a lot of book-folk.
When the flood approaches, bank up to keep it out.
Let the enemy come with their tired soldiers, and we shall go out, defeat them, and receive our reward, for we are sure of victory.” Cao Ren was won over to the side of those of action.
He placed Man Chong in command of the defenses while he went outside to beat off Guan Yu.
When the two forces met, Guan Yu called to his side Guan Ping and Liao Hua, to whom he gave certain orders.
These two advanced, settled their array, and Liao Hua then rode out and offered a challenge. Zhai Yuan accepted it; but soon after the combat began, Liao Hua made as if he was defeated and turned to leave the field.
Zhai Yuan went after him.
The Jingzhou troops retired seven miles or so.
Soon the Jingzhou soldiers came again and offered battle, when Xiahou Cun and Zhai Yuan both went out. The maneuver of the preceding day was repeated, and the Jingzhou army retreated another seven miles.
But suddenly there was a detonation behind the army of Cao Cao, and the rolling of drums as for attack.
Cao Ren hastily called upon his troops to return. They did so; but Guan Ping and Liao Hua then turned and followed on their heels so that the troops of Cao Cao were thrown into confusion.
Cao Ren by this time had seen that a trap had been laid and he had fallen therein, so he hastily marched with one army to Xiangyang.
He got to within a short distance of the city when he saw before him a handsome banner waving in the wind, and out came Guan Yu with his green-dragon saber ready to slay.
Cao Ren was powerless from fear, and, fighting being impossible, he turned off in a diagonal direction for Xiangyang.
Then Xiahou Cun came.
He fell into a rage at the sight of the old warrior and went to fight him. But Xiahou Cun was slain in the first encounter.
Zhai Yuan fled, but Guan Ping pursued and slew him. Then the pursuit was continued, and the loss of Cao Cao's side was very heavy.
More than half were drowned in River Xiang.
This phase ended with Cao Ren fleeing to Fankou and Guan Yu in possession of Xiangyang. “You have obtained this city very easily,” said the Marching General, Wang Fu, “but the task is not ended. Cao Cao's army have been beaten and their courage broken, but there is danger from the side of Wu. Lu Meng is at Lukou, and he has long cherished the desire to lay hands on Jingzhou.
Suppose he now attacks; what will happen?” “I was even thinking of that myself. You may go and attend to this matter.
You will certainly be able to find certain elevated spots on the river bank, about seven miles apart, suitable for alarm beacons, whence could be signaled any attempt of the marines of Wu to cross the river. Fifty soldiers could guard each station.
Let there be a flame by night and a smoke by day.
If they cross the river, I must go and smite them.” Wang Fu replied, “Fu Shiren and Mi Fang are defending important places, but they may not be able to defend the Passes well.
There ought to be a commander-in-chief over Jingzhou City.” “There is no need for anxiety; Army Inspector Pan Jun is guarding the city.” “The objection is the character of Pan Jun. He is jealous and selfish and not a fit person for the task.
I think you would do well to replace him by Zhao Lei, now of the Chief of the Commissariat.
Zhao Lei is loyal, trusty, cleanhanded, and straight, a much more desirable man for the post.” “I know Pan Jun very well, but I have delegated him for that duty and cannot change now.
The work Zhao Lei has to do in the supplies is also most important.
I do not think you need be anxious.
Just get along with those beacons for me.” Wang Fu, annoyed, took his leave.
Then Guan Ping was bidden to prepare ships ready to cross the river and attack Fankou, whither Cao Ren had retired after his defeat.
Now Cao Ren said to Man Chong, “Neglecting your advice, I lost my soldiers, my two generals, and the city of Xiangyang. What am I to do now?” “Guan Yu is very dangerous, too brave and skillful for us to try to defeat. We would better remain on the defensive,” replied Man Chong.
Just about this time came the tidings that Guan Yu was crossing the river on the way to attack. Man Chong maintained his policy of defense.
But one of Cao Ren's generals, Lu Chang, was for going out to meet the enemy. “I ask for a few thousand troops,” said Lu Chang, “and I will meet the enemy on the way.” “You cannot do any good,” said Man Chong.
“According to the advice of you and the other bookish officials, there is only one thing to do.
But will defense drive off the enemy?
The proper way is to attack your enemy while he is crossing a river, and as Guan Yu is doing that now, why not attack?
It will be quite another matter if you let him reach the walls and get possession of the moat.” As a result of his arguments and protest, Lu Chang got command of two thousand troops, whom he led to the river. And there he found Guan Yu already arrayed for battle.
Guan Yu at once rode out, and the bold Lu Chang was going to attack him.
But his soldiers were panic-stricken at the sight of Guan Yu's fierce countenance and ran away. Lu Chang called them to come back, but they would not stop, and as Guan Yu came on with a rush, the army of Cao Cao again lost the day. Many were slain, and the remainder ran into Fankou.
Cao Ren sent off a hasty messenger for help and a letter to Xuchang to tell what Guan Yu had done and how Fankou was in imminent danger of falling.
The letter reached Cao Cao, who chose a certain general among his leaders and assigned the task, “You go and defend Fankou!” The man at once stepped out and accepted the assignment. The man was Yu Jin.
“Let me have another general to lead the van,” said Yu Jin.
“Who volunteers?” asked Cao Cao, looking around. “I do;” cried a man, “I will give my poor services for what they are worth.
And I will capture this fellow Guan Yu and bring him as an offering before your standard.” The soldiers of Wei began the war Even before Wu had sent out armies. But who was the man bold enough to say he would capture Guan Yu?
For his name see the next chapter.
CHAPTER 74. Pang De Takes His Coffin On A Decisive Campaign; Guan Yu Drowns The Seven Armies. The bold and self-confident leader of Cao Cao's army who promised to make an end of Guan Yu was Pang De. Cao Cao was glad to find such a man. “That fellow Guan Yu has a great reputation, and in the whole country he has no rival.
He has not met his match yet, but now you are going, he will find all his work cut out.” So spoke Cao Cao.
He conferred on Yu Jin the title of General Who Corrects the South and on Pang De that of General Who Corrects the West, and he made Pang De Leader of the Van. The two generals marched out with their seven armies to Fankou.
These seven armies were composed of sturdy fellows from the north, led by two of their own commanders named Dong Heng and Dong Chao.
Hearing who was to command them, these two, supported by their generals, went to see Yu Jin and represented that the Leader of the Van was unsuitable.
Dong Heng said, “Sir General, the expedition you lead is for the relief of Fankou, and it can confidently expect victory, but is it not unwise to place such as Pang De in command of the van?” “Why?” said Yu Jin, surprised.
“Because Pang De was once under the command of Ma Chao. He had no alternative but to surrender and fight for Wei.
But his former chief is now in high honor in Shu, one of the Five Tiger Generals, and his own brother Pang Rou is there, too, as an officer.
To send Pang De as Leader of the Van just now seems like trying to extinguish a fire with oil.
Would it not be well to inform the Prince of Wei and ask him to exchange this man for another?” Without further argument or delay, Yu Jin went to see the Prince and laid before him the objections to Pang De's appointment.
As soon as Cao Cao understood, he summoned Pang De to the steps and bade him yield his seal as Leader of the Van.
“O Prince, why do you reject my services?
I was just about to do my best for you.” “I do not doubt you, but Ma Chao is now in the west, and your brother also; both in the service of Liu Bei.
I myself have no doubts, but it is what all the crowd are saying. What can I do?” Pang De took off his head-dress and prostrated himself, bitter tears rolling down his cheeks.
“Since I surrendered to you, O Prince, I have experienced much kindness, so that I would undergo any sufferings to show my gratitude. I hope you will trust me.
When my brother and I were at home together, his wife was a wicked woman and I slew her, pretending I was drunk. My brother has never forgiven me, but is permeated with hate for me.
He swears never to see me again, and we are enemies.
For my old master, Ma Chao, I have profound contempt. He is bold, but only that, and was in a pitiable and dejected state when he found his way to the west. Now, like me, he serves his own master, but our friendship is at an end.
How could I think of another after your kindness to me?” Cao Cao raised Pang De from the ground and soothed him, saying, “I have always known what a noble man you are, and what I said just now was to satisfy the feelings of other people.
Now you can strive to win fame; and if you do not turn your back on me, I shall not on you.” Then Pang De took his leave and returned to his house, where he ordered the artificers to make him a coffin.
Next he invited all his friends to a banquet, and the coffin was set out in the reception room for all to see.
And they asked one another, “What can that inauspicious thing mean putting out on the eve of a campaign?” By and by, drinking to them, Pang De said, “The Prince of Wei has been generous to me, and I am pledged to show my gratitude to the death.
I am about to go out against this Guan Yu, and I have to kill him or he must kill me.
If he does not kill me, I must commit suicide, and so I have prepared what is necessary.
I will not return leaving my task unachieved.” The terrible omen saddened the guests, and they fell to sighing.
Then Pang De called in his wife, Lady Li, and bade her bring their son Pang Hui, whom he commended to her care. “I have been appointed Leader of the Van of this new expedition against Guan Yu, and my duty bids me seek death or glory on the battlefield.
If I die, our son is in your special care.
Alas, the child has been born ill-starred, and when he grows up he will have to avenge a father.” Both mother and son wept as they bade him farewell. When the army marched, the coffin was carried in its train.
He bade his officers, saying, “I will fight to the end with Guan Yu. Place my body therein if I fall in combat. And if I slay him, then will I bring his head in this coffin as an offering to our Prince.” Then out spoke his five hundred veterans and said, “If you are like this, O General, then we also will follow you to the end.” The vanguard then marched away.
A certain man told the story of these happenings to Cao Cao, who was very pleased, saying, “I have no anxiety with such a general to lead my armies.” But Jia Xu said, “I am anxious for Pang De's safety.
He is over-bold and imprudent to fight with Guan Yu to the death.” Cao Cao thought such an act would be unwise, and he hastily sent a messenger with an edict warning Pang De against his antagonist. “This Guan Yu lacks neither cunning nor valor. You are to be most cautious in engaging him.
If you can conquer, then conquer; but if there be any doubt, remain on the defensive.” “How highly does our Prince regard this fellow Guan Yu!” said the general to his officers when he heard this new command.
“But I think I shall be able to take the keen edge off his thirty-year reputation.” “The command of the Prince is to be obeyed,” said Yu Jin.
Pang De hastened to Fankou in all the pomp and panoply of war, his gongs clanging, his drums rolling as he marched. Guan Yu was sitting in his tent when his spies came to report: “Seven armies of the north under Yu Jin are approaching.
They are ten miles away. The van leader is Pang De.” Rage took possession of Guan Yu.
His face changed color, his beard shook, and he roared out, “There is never a fighting man in all the world who has heard my name without trembling.
Does this fellow dare disdain me?” Then he ordered Guan Ping to attack Fankou while he went out to stay the impudent boaster who dared him.
“Father,” said Guan Ping, “Taishan Mountain in its majesty does not quarrel with a pebble.
Let me go and fight this Pang De.” “Well, my son, go and try; I will support you.” So Guan Ping took his sword, mounted his steed, and went out with his troops.
Both sides being drawn up for battle. On the side of Wei there flew a single black flag on which was inscribed “Pang De, Corrector of the West” in white.
The leader himself wore a blue robe with a silver helmet and rode a white charger.
He stood out in front backed by his five hundred veterans, and a few foot soldiers were there too, bearing the gruesome coffin. Guan Ping was very angry, crying out, “Turncoat!
Traitor!” “Who is that?” asked Pang De of his followers.
A certain one replied, “That is Guan Yu's adopted son, Guan Ping.” Pang De cried, “I have an edict from the Prince of Wei to take your father's head. You are but a weakling and I will spare you.
But call your father.” Guan Ping dashed forward flourishing his sword.
Pang De went to meet him, and there followed thirty odd bouts with no advantage to either. Both sides then drew off to rest. Soon the news of this combat reached Guan Yu, and he was not pleased.
He sent Liao Hua to assault the city while he went to do battle with Pang De.
Guan Ping met his father and related the story of the indecisive fight.
So Guan Yu rode out with his green-dragon saber ready, and he shouted to Pang De, “Come quickly and be slain!” The drums reechoed as Pang De rode out and replied, “The edict from the Prince of Wei tells me to take your head.
In case you disbelieve it, here is the coffin ready to receive it.
If you fear death, down from your horse and surrender.” “I hold you for a simple fool,” cried Guan Yu. “What can you do?
It is a pity to stain my blade with the blood of such a rat.” Then he galloped out toward Pang De, flourishing the saber.
Pang De whirled his blade and came to meet him, and they two fought a hundred bouts.
And as they fought, the lust of battle seemed to grow and both armies were lost in amazement.
But the army of Wei began to fear for their champion, and the gongs sounded the retirement.
At the same time Guan Ping began to think of his father's fatigue, and his gongs clanged too.
So that both armies drew off at the same time.
“People rumor Guan Yu is a mighty man of war; today I really believe that,” said Pang De, when he had got back among his own line.
Then his chief, Yu Jin, came to see him and said, “O General, you fought the great combat of a hundred bouts, which ended indecisively. I think it would be prudent to retire out of his way.” But Pang De replied haughtily, “What makes you so soft?
Yet the Prince gave you the command of the seven armies!
But tomorrow I will fight again and that to the death.
I swear I will never give way.” Yu Jin could not overcome his decision, so he went back to his own camp.
When Guan Yu had got back to his camp, he extolled Pang De, saying, “His swordsmanship is perfect; he is my worthy enemy.” “The new-born calf fears not the tiger,” said Guan Ping.
“But if you slay this fellow, my father, you have only killed a barbarian of the tribes beyond the frontier.
If any accident occurs, then you will have the reproach of not having considered your brother's charge.” “How can my resentment be assuaged save by the death of this man?” returned Guan Yu.
“I have decided to fight, so say no more.” Next day Guan Yu took the field first, but Pang De quickly came out. Both arrayed their troops and then went to the front at the same moment.
This time neither spoke, but the combat began forthwith.
It went on for fifty bouts, and then Pang De pulled his horse, sheathed his sword, and fled.
Guan Yu went in pursuit, and Guan Ping followed lest there should be need of him.
Guan Yu roared out reviling to his flying foe, “Traitor!
You want to use the 'swinging-horse stab,' but here I am, never afraid of that.” But the fact was that Pang De had only pretended to try for a foul stroke in order to cover a resort to his bow.
He pulled in his horse, fitted an arrow to the string, and was just on the point of shooting when Guan Ping, who was sharp-eyed, shouted out a warning.
“The bandit is going to shoot!” Guan Yu saw it, but the bowstring twanged, and the arrow came flying.
He was not nimble enough to avoid it and it wounded his left arm.
Guan Ping at once went to his father's assistance and led him away to the camp.
Pang De wished to follow up this advantage and came back whirling his sword, but, ere he could strike, the gongs of his own side rang out. He thought there was something amiss in the rear and stopped. The signal for retreat had been sounded by Yu Jin out of jealousy, for he had seen that Guan Yu had been wounded, and he grudged his colleague the glory which would eclipse his own.
Pang De obeyed, but when he got back, he wanted to know why retreat had been sounded on the very verge of a great success.
“Why did the gongs clang?” asked Pang De.
“Because of our Prince's warning.
Though Guan Yu was wounded, I feared some trick on his part.
He is very cunning.” “I should have killed him if you had not done that,” said Pang De.
“Haste makes slow going; you can postpone your fight with him,” said Yu Jin.
Pang De, though ignorant of the real reason why he was made to miss success at the critical moment, was still very vexed.
Guan Yu went back to camp, and the arrow-head was puled out of the wound.
Happily it had not penetrated very deeply, and the usual remedies against injuries by metal were applied.
Guan Yu was very bitter against his enemy and declared, “I swear I will have my revenge for this arrow.” “Never mind anything but recovering now,” said his officers.
“Rest and get well; then you may fight again. Before long, Pang De renewed his challenge, and Guan Yu was for going out to fight; however, he yielded to the entreaties of his officers.
And when Pang De set his soldiers to reviling the warrior, Guan Ping saw to it that his father never heard it.
After ten days of challenges hurled uselessly at an army that ignored them, Pang De took council with Yu Jin. “Evidently Guan Yu is helpless from the effects of that arrow-wound.
We ought to advance all our seven armies against him while he is ill and destroy his camp.
Thereby we shall relieve Fankou.” Thus spoke Pang De, but jealousy of the glory that might accrue to his next in command again made Yu Jin urge caution and obedience to the command of the Prince of Wei. Yu Jin refused to move his army in spite of Pang De's repeated persuasion; still more, Yu Jin led the army to a new camping ground behind the hills some three miles north of Fankou. There his own army prevented communication by the main road, while he sent Pang De into a valley in the rear so that Pang De could do nothing.
To Guan Ping's great joy, Guan Yu's wound soon healed.
Soon after they heard of Yu Jin's new camp, and as Guan Ping could assign no reason for the change, and suspected some ruse, he told his father, who went up to a high place to reconnoiter.
Looking round, Guan Yu noted that there seemed much slackness about everything—from flags to soldiers—in Fankou, that the relief armies were camped in a valley to the north, and that River Xiang seemed to run very swiftly. After impressing the topography on his mind, he called the guides and asked the name of the gully about three miles north of the city.
“Zengkou Stream,” was the reply. He chuckled.
“I shall capture Yu Jin,” said he.
Those with him asked how he knew that.
He replied, “Why, how can any fish last long in such a trap?” Those in his train gave but little weight to what he said, and presently he went back to his own tent.
It was just then the time for the autumn rains, and a heavy downpour came on, lasting several days.
Orders were given to get ready boats and rafts and such things. Guan Ping could not think what such preparations meant in a dry land campaign. So he asked his father.
“Do you not know even?” replied his father.
“Our enemies have camped in difficult ground instead of the open country and are crowded in the dangerous valley there.
After some days of this rain, River Xiang will swell, and I shall send people to dam up all the outlets and so let the water rise very high.
When at its highest, I shall open the dams and let the water out over Fankou. That valley will be flooded too, and all the soldiers will become aquatic animals.” The Wei armies had camped in the gully, and after several days of heavy rain, Army Inspector Cheng He ventured to speak to his commander.
He said, “The army is camped near the mouth of a stream in a depression.
There are hills around us, but they are too far off to keep the water away.
Our soldiers are already suffering from these heavy rains, and, moreover, they say the Jingzhou troops have moved to higher ground.
More than that, at River Han they are preparing boats and rafts so that they can take advantage of the floods if there are any.
Our army will be in great danger, and something should be done.” But Yu Jin scoffed at his words, saying, “You fool! Do you want to injure the spirit of our soldiers? Talk no more, or your head will be fallen.” Cheng He went away greatly ashamed.
Then he went to Pang De, who saw the force of his words and said, “What you said is excellent.
If Yu Jin will not move camp tomorrow, I myself will do so.” So Cheng He left it at that.
That night there came a great storm.
As Pang De sat in his tent, he heard the sound as of ten thousand horses in stampede and a roar as of the drums of war seeming to shake the earth.
He was alarmed, left his tent, and mounted his charger to go and see what it meant.
Then he saw the rolling waters coming in from every side and the seven armies flying from the flood, which speedily rose to the height of ten spans.
Yu Jin, Pang De, and several other officers sought safety by rushing up the hills.
As day dawned, Guan Yu and his marines came along in large boats with flags flying and drums beating.
Yu Jin saw no way of escape, and his following was reduced to about fifty or sixty soldiers. They all said they must surrender.
Guan Yu made them strip and then took them on board.
After that he went to capture Pang De, who was standing on a hillock with Dong Heng, Dong Chao, Cheng He, and his five hundred troops, all unarmed.
Pang De saw his archenemy approach without a sign of fear, and even went boldly to meet him.
Guan Yu surrounded the party with his boats, and the archers began to shoot. When more than half the troops had been struck down, the survivors became desperate.
Dong Heng and Dong Chao pressed their chief to give in, saying, “We have lost more than half of our men.
Surrender is the only course.” But Pang De only raged, saying, “I have received great kindness from the Prince; think you that I will bow the head to any other?” Pang De cut down Dong Heng and Dong Chao right in the battlefield and then shouted, “Anyone who says surrender shall be as these two.” So the survivors made a desperate effort to beat off their enemies, and they held their own up to midday.
Then Guan Yu's marines redoubled their efforts, and the arrows and stones rained down upon the defenders, who fought desperately hand to hand with their assailants.
“The valorous leader fears death less than desertion; the brave warrior does not break faith to save his life,” cried Pang De.
“This is the day of my death, but I will fight on to the last.
And you, General, should fight to your end, too.” So Cheng He pressed on till he fell into the water by an arrow of Guan Yu, and then the soldiers yielded.
Pang De fought on. Then one of the boats happened to close in to the bank. With a tremendous leap Pang De lighted on it and slashed at the marines, killing ten of them. The others jumped overboard and swam away.
Then Pang De one hand still holding his sword, tried to maneuver the boat across the river to Fankou.
Then there came drifting down a raft, which collided with and upset his boat so that he was struggling in the water.
But a general on the raft jumped into the water, gripped him, put him on the boat again.
The captor was Zhou Cang, a skillful waterman who, having lived in Jingzhou for many years, was thoroughly expert in boat navigation.
Beside, he was very powerful and so was able to make Pang De a prisoner.
In this flood perished the whole of the seven armies, except the few that saved themselves by swimming; these latter, having no way of escape, surrendered to the victors.
In the depth of night rolled the war drums, Summoning the warriors as to battle; But the enemy was no man, For the waters had risen and the flood came. This was the plan of Guan Yu, the crafty, To drown his enemies. More than human was he in cunning.
The ages hand on his fame As his glory was told in his own day.
Guan Yu then returned to the higher ground, where his tent was pitched and therein took his seat to receive his prisoners.
The lictors brought up Yu Jin, who prostrated himself humbly.
“How dared you think to oppose me?
To execute you would be like killing a hog. It would be soiling weapons for nothing,” said Guan Yu, stroking his beard.
Yu Jin was hound and sent to the prison in Jingzhou. “I will decide your fate when I return,” said Guan Yu.
The general having thus dealt with the chief, Pang De was sent for.
He came, pride and anger flashing from his eyes; he did not kneel but stood boldly erect.
“You have a brother in Hanzhong, and your old chief was Ma Chao, also in high honor in Shu.
Would you not better join them?” “Rather than surrender to you, I would perish beneath the sword,” cried Pang De.
He reviled his captors without ceasing till, losing patience at last, Guan Yu sent him to his death.
Pang De was beheaded. He stretched out his neck for the headsman's sword.
Out of pity he was honorably buried.
The floods were still out, and taking advantage of them, the troops of Jingzhou boarded the boats to move toward Fankou, which now stood out as a mere island with waves breaking against the walls.
The force of the waters being great, the city wall was beginning to give way, and the whole population, male and female, were carrying mud and bricks to strengthen it. Their efforts seemed vain, and the leaders of Cao Cao's army were very desperate.
Some of the generals went to see Cao Ren, who said, “No ordinary person's strength can fend off today's danger.
If we can hold out till nightfall, we may escape by boat. We shall lose the city, but we shall save our skins.” But Man Chong interposed before the boats could be got ready.
He said, “No!
Though the force of these mountainous waters is great, we only have to wait ten days or so, and the flood will have passed.
Though Guan Yu has not assaulted this city, yet he has sent another army to Jiaxia, which indicates he dares not advance lest we should fall upon his rear.
Remember, too, that to retire from this city means the abandonment of everything south of the Yellow River.
Therefore I decide that you defend this place.” Cao Ren saluted Man Chong as he concluded his harangue, saying, “What a tremendous error I should have committed had it not been for you, Sir!” Then riding his white charger he went up on the city walls, gathered his officers around him, and pledged himself not to surrender.
“The Prince's command being to defend this city, I shall defend it to the last.
And I shall put to death anyone who even mentions abandonment,” said he. “And we desire to defend it to out last gasp,” chimed in his officers. Then they saw to it that the means of offense were good.
Many hundreds of archers and crossbowmen were stationed on the wall and kept watch night and day.
The old and the young of ordinary people were made to carry earth and stones to strengthen the wall.
After some ten days the flood was at an end.
Then the news of Guan Yu's success against the Wei campaign got abroad, and the terror of his name spread wider and wider.
About the same time, too, his second son, Guan Xing, came to visit his father in camp.
Guan Yu thought this a good opportunity to send his report of success to Capital Chengdu and entrusted to Guan Xing a dispatch mentioning each officer's services and requesting promotion for them.
Guan Xing accordingly took leave of his father and left.
After Guan Xing's departure, the army was divided into two halves, one under Guan Yu to attack Fankou, and the other to go to Jiaxia. One day Guan Yu rode over to the north gate.
Halting his steed, he pointed with his whip toward the defenders on the wall, and called out, “You lot of rats will not give in then!
What are you waiting for?” Cao Ren, who was among his soldiers on the wall, saw that Guan Yu had no armor on, so he ordered his men to shoot. The archers and bowmen at once sent a great flight of arrows and bolts that way.
Guan Yu hastily pulled the reins to retire, but an arrow struck him in the arm. The shock of the blow made him turn in the saddle, and he fell from his horse.
Just now a mighty army perished By the river's overflow; A crossbow bolt from the city wall Lays a valiant warrior low.
What further befell Guan Yu will be told in the next chapter. CHAPTER 75. Guan Yu Has A Scraped-Bone Surgery; Lu Meng In White Robe Crosses The River.
At the sight of Guan Yu falling from his charger, Cao Ren led his army out of the city to follow up with an attack, but Guan Ping drove him off and escorted his father back to camp.
There the arrow was extracted, but the arrow head had been poisoned. The wound was deep, and the poison had penetrated to the bone. The right arm was discolored and swollen and useless.
Guan Ping consulted with the other leaders and proposed, saying, “As fighting is impossible for the moment, we should withdraw to Jingzhou, where my father's wound can be treated.” Having decided upon this, they went to see the wounded warrior.
“What have you come for?” asked Guan Yu when they entered.
“Considering that you, Sir, have been wounded in the right arm, we fear the result of the excitement of battle. Moreover, you can hardly take part in a fight just now, and we therefore propose that the army retire till you are recovered.” Guan Yu replied angrily, “I am on the point of taking the city, and if I succeed, I must press forward to Capital Xuchang, and destroy that brigand Cao Cao, so that the Hans may be restored to their own.
Think you that I can vitiate the whole campaign because of a slight wound?
Would you dishearten the army?” Guan Ping and his colleagues said no more, but somewhat unwillingly withdrew.
Seeing that their leader would not retire and the wound showed no signs of healing, the various generals inquired far and near for a good surgeon to attend their general.
One day a person arrived in a small ship and, having landed and come up to the gate of the camp, was led in to see Guan Ping.
The visitor wore a square-cut cap and a loose robe. In his hand he carried a small black bag.
He said, “My name is Hua Tuo, and I belong to Qiao.
I have heard of the wound sustained by the famous general and have come to heal it.” “Surely you must be the physician who treated Zhou Tai in the South Land,” said Guan Ping. “I am.” Taking with him the other generals, Guan Ping went in to see his father.
Guan Yu was engaging in a game of chess with Ma Liang, although his arm was very painful. But Guan Yu kept up appearances so as not to discourage the troops.
When they told him that a physician had come, he consented to see him.
Hua Tuo was introduced, asked to take a seat and, after the tea of ceremony, was shown the injured arm.
“This was caused by an arrow,” said the doctor. “There is poison in the wound, and it has penetrated to the bone.
Unless the wound is soon treated, the arm will become useless.” “What do you propose to do?” asked Guan Yu.
“I know how to cure the wound, but I think you will be afraid of the remedy.” “Am I likely to be afraid of that when I am not even afraid of death? Death is only a return home after all.” Then Hua Tuo said, “This is what I shall do. In a private room I shall erect a post with a steel ring attached.
I shall ask you, Sir, to insert your arm in the ring, and I shall bind it firmly to the post.
Then I shall cover your head with a quilt so that you cannot see, and with a scalpel I shall open up the flesh right down to the bone. Then I shall scrape away the poison. This done, I shall dress the wound with a certain preparation, sew it up with a thread, and there will be no further trouble.
But I think you may quail at the severity of the treatment.” Guan Yu smiled.
“It all sounds easy enough;” said he, “but why the post and the ring?” Refreshments were then served; and after a few cups of wine, the warrior extended his arm for the operation.
With his other hand he went on with his game of chess. Meanwhile the surgeon prepared his knife and called a lad to hold a basin beneath the limb. “I am just going to cut; do not start,” said Hua Tuo.
“When I consented to undergo the treatment, did you think I was afraid of pain?” The surgeon then performed the operation as he had pre-described.
He found the bone much discolored, but he scraped it clean.
When the knife went over the surface of the bone and made horrible sounds, all those near covered their eyes and turned pale.
But Guan Yu went on with his game, only drinking a cup of wine now and again, and his face betrayed no sign of pain.
When the wound had been cleansed, sewn up and dressed, the patient stood up smiling and said, “This arm is now as good as it ever was; there is no pain.
Indeed, Master, you are a marvel.” “I have spent my life in the art;” said Hua Tuo, “but I have never seen such a patient as you, Sir.
You are as if not from the earth but heaven.” Here as surgeons, there physicians, all boast their skill; Bitter few are those that cure one when one's really ill.
As for superhuman valor rivals Guan Yu had none, So for holy touch in healing Hua Tuo stood alone.
When the cure was well advanced, Guan Yu gave a fine banquet in honor of Hua Tuo and offered him a fee of a hundred ounces of gold.
But Hua Tuo declined it, saying, “I had come to treat you, O General, from admiration of your great virtue and not for money.
Although your wound is cured, you must be careful of your health, and especially avoid all excitement for a hundred days, when you will be as well as ever you were.” Then Hua Tuo, having prepared dressings for the wound, took his leave, refusing fees to the very last.
Having captured Yu Jin and accomplished the death of Pang De, Guan Yu became more famous and more fear-inspiring through the whole empire than even before. Cao Cao called together his advisers to help him decide upon what he should do.
Said Cao Cao, “I must acknowledge this Guan Yu as the one man who, in skill and valor, overtops the whole world. Lately he has obtained possession of Jingzhou and the territory near it, and has so become very terrible. He is a tiger with wings added.
Pang De is no more; Yu Jin is his prisoner; the armies of Wei have lost their morale; and if he led his armies here, Xuchang, we should be helpless.
I can only think of avoiding the peril by removal of the capital.
What think you?” “No; do not take that step,” said Sima Yi, rising to reply.
“Yu Jin and all the others you lost were victims of the flood and slain in battle.
These losses do no harm at all to your great plan.
The Suns and Lius are no longer friends since Guan Yu has accomplished his desire.
You may send a messenger into Wu to foment the quarrel and cause Sun Quan to send his armies to attack the army of Guan Yu from the rear, promising that, when things are tranquil, you will reward the south to Sun Quan.
In this way you will relieve Fankou.” Here Minister Jiang Ji said, “Sima Yi speaks well, and the messenger should lose no time.
Do not move the capital or send an army.” Cao Cao therefore did not carry out his first proposal.
But he was sad at the loss of Yu Jin, and spoke of him affectionately, “Yu Jin had followed me faithfully for thirty years, yet in that moment of truth he was less than Pang De.” It was necessary to send someone with the letters to Wu and also to find another leader willing to face Guan Yu.
Cao Cao had not long to wait for the latter, as an officer stepped out from the ranks of those in waiting and offered himself.
It was Xu Huang.
Xu Huang's offer was accepted, and he was given fifty thousand of veterans. Lu Qian was sent as his second, and the army marched to Yangling Slope, where they halted to see if any support was coming from the southeast.
Sun Quan fell in with the scheme of Cao Cao as soon as he had read Cao Cao's letter. He at once prepared a reply for the messenger to take back, and then gathered his officers, civil and military, to consult. Zhang Zhao was the first speaker. “We know Guan Yu has captured one leader and slain another. This has added greatly to his fame and reputation. Cao Cao was going to move the capital rather than risk an attack. We also know that Fankou is in imminent danger.
Cao Cao has asked for our help; but when he has gained his end, I doubt whether he will hold to his promise.” Before Sun Quan had replied they announced the arrival of Lu Meng, who had come in a small ship from Lukou with a special message. He was at once called in and asked what it was.
Said Lu Meng, “The armies of Guan Yu being absent at Fankou, the opportunity should be taken to attack Jingzhou.” “But I wish to attack Xuzhou in the north; what of this plan?” said Sun Quan.
“It would be better to attack Jingzhou, and so get control of the Great River. Cao Cao is far away to the north and too occupied to regard the east. Xuzhou is weakly held and could be taken easily, but the lie of the land favors the use of an army rather than a navy force.
If you capture it, it will not be easy to hold; but once you hold Jingzhou, you can evolve other schemes.” “Really, my desire was to attack Jingzhou, but I wished to hear what you would say to the other plan.
Now, Sir, make me a plan speedily and I will act upon it.” So Lu Meng took his leave and went back to Lukou.
But soon they heard that Guan Yu had had beacon towers erected at short distances all along the Great River, and that the army of Jingzhou was being put into most efficient condition. “If this is so, it is hard to make a plan that will ensure success,” said Lu Meng.
“I have already advised my master to attack Jingzhou, but I am unable to meet this complication.” Therefore he made illness an excuse to stay at home, and sent to inform Sun Quan, who was very distressed at the news.
Then said Lu Xun, “The illness is feigned; he is quite well.” “If you know that so well, go and see,” said Sun Quan.
Away went Lu Xun and speedily arrived at Lukou, where he saw Lu Meng, who indeed appeared to be in perfect health. Nor did his face bear any signs of recent illness.
“The Marquis of Wu has sent me to inquire after your honorable complaint,” said Lu Xun.
“How distressed I am that the state of my wretched carcass has caused the Marquis the inconvenience of inquiring” replied Lu Meng.
“The Marquis placed a very heavy responsibility on your shoulders, but you are not making the best use of the opportunity. However, what is the real origin of your distress?” Lu Meng sat gazing at his visitor a long time without replying. “I have a little remedy,” said Lu Xun.
“Do you think you might use it?” Lu Meng dismissed the servants, and when the two were alone, he said, “This remedy, my friend, please tell me what it is.” “Your ailment is due simply to the efficiency of the Jingzhou soldiers; and I know how to keep the beacons from flaring, and I can make the defenders of Jingzhou come to you with their hands tied.
Would that cure you?” “My friend, you speak as if you saw into my inmost heart.
Pray unfold your good scheme.” “Guan Yu thinks himself too much of a hero for anyone to dare to face him, and his only anxiety is yourself.
Now you must take advantage of this excuse you have made of illness actually to resign this post so that the farce may be kept up and another person be appointed to your place. Let this person, your successor, humbly praise Guan Yu till that general becomes so conceited that he will withdraw all the troops from Jingzhou to send them against Fankou.
When Jingzhou is left undefended then is our chance, and the city will fall into our hands.” “The plan seems most excellent,” said Lu Meng.
Wherefore Lu Meng's malady waxed worse, so that he was confined to bed; and he gave Lu Xun his letter of resignation to carry back to Sun Quan.
The messenger hastened back and explained the ruse to his master, who soon after issued a command for Lu Meng to retire and attend to the recovery of his health.
But Lu Meng came to Sun Quan to discuss the matter of a successor. Sun Quan said to him, “As to the appointment at Lukou, you know Zhou Yu recommended Lu Su, who at his last moment proposed you.
Now you ought to be able to mention some other talented and well-known officer to succeed you.” “If you choose a well-known man, Guan Yu will certainly be on his guard against him.
Now Lu Xun is deep and farseeing, but he has no widespread fame. Hence no particular notice would be taken of his appointment and no countermeasures taken.
So he is the most suitable person to send.” Sun Quan agreed and thereupon promoted Lu Xun to the rank of General of the Right Army and Admiral of the Right Fleet, and sent him to defend the port.
“I am very young,” said Lu Xun, “and feel unequal to such a post.” “Lu Meng has proposed you, and you will not make any mistakes.
Pray do not decline,” said Sun Quan.
So the appointment was made, and Lu Xun set out at once.
When he had assumed charge of the cavalry, the infantry, and the marines, he set about drawing up a letter to Guan Yu, and he selected fine horses and beautiful silks and good wines and delicacies suitable for gifts to go with the letter. He sent all by the hand of a trusty messenger to Fankou.
The news of the change of command reached Guan Yu when he lay ill from the effects of his wound and unable to conduct any military operations.
Close upon the news came the letter and the gifts from Lu Xun, and the bearer was called in to see the warrior.
“Friend Sun Quan was not very prudent when he made a general out of a mere scholar,” said Guan Yu, pointing to the messenger.
The messenger said, “General Lu Xun sends this letter and some presents, which he hopes you will accept.
He also sends his felicitations, and would rejoice if the two houses could become friends.” Guan Yu read the letter, which was couched in most modest language, and then threw back his head and laughed loud. He bade the attendants receive the various gifts, and sent the bearer away.
The messenger forthwith returned to Lukou and said the old warrior had seemed very gratified and would henceforward feel no anxiety that danger might threaten from their direction.
Spies were sent out to report on proceedings, and they returned to say that half the troops of Jingzhou had been sent to assist in the siege of Fankou. That city was to be seriously assaulted as soon as Guan Yu had recovered.
This news was promptly sent on to Sun Quan, who at once called in Lu Meng to decide upon the next move. “Now is the favorable moment to get possession of Jingzhou,” said Sun Quan.
“I propose to send you and my brother, Sun Jiao, to lead the army.” This Sun Jiao was really only a cousin, as he was the second son of Sun Quan's uncle, Sun Jing. But Lu Meng objected.
“My lord, if you think to employ me, then employ me only; if Sun Jiao, then Sun Jiao only.
You cannot have forgotten that Zhou Yu and Cheng Pu were associate commanders, and although the final decision lay with Zhou Yu, yet the other presumed upon his seniority and there was some unfriendliness between the two.
All ended well because Cheng Pu recognized the ability of his colleague and so supported him.
I know I am not so clever as Zhou Yu, but Sun Jiao's consanguinity will be a greater obstacle than mere length of service, and I fear he may not be wholly with me.” Sun Quan saw the force of the contention, and appointed Lu Meng to sole command with Sun Jiao to help him in the commissariat.
Lu Meng thanked his lord for his commission, soon got his thirty thousand marines together and assembled eighty ships for the expedition. Lu Meng dressed a number of sailors in the plain white costumes of ordinary merchants and put them on board to work his vessels. He concealed his veterans in the compartments.
He selected seven generals—Han Dang, Jiang Qin, Zhu Ran, Pan Zhang, Zhou Tai, Xu Sheng, and Ding Feng—to serve under him and settled the order of their successive movements.
The remainder of the forces was left with Sun Quan as supports and reserves.
Letters were also written to Cao Cao that he might cooperate by sending his army to attack Guan Yu in the rear, and to Lu Xun that he would act in concert.
Then the sailors in plain white dress navigated the ships to River Xunyang as quickly as possible, and then crossed to the north bank.
When the beacon-keepers came down to question them, the men of Wu said, “We are traders forced into the bank by contrary winds.” And they offered gifts to the beacon-keepers, who accepted them and let the ships come to an anchor close to the shore.
At about the second watch the soldiers came out of hiding in the holds of the transports, suddenly fell upon the beacon-keepers and made them prisoners, officers and soldiers. Next the signal for a general landing was given, and all the soldiers from the eighty ships went ashore. The guard stations were attacked, and all the troops captured and carried off to the ships, not one being allowed to escape.
Then the force of Wu hurried off to the city of Jingzhou, having so far carried out their plans that no one knew of their coming.
Nearing Jingzhou, Lu Meng spoke kindly to his captives, and gave them gifts and comforted them in order to induce them to get the gates opened for him to enter the city. He won them over to his side, and they promised to aid him. They would show a flare as a signal that the gates were free.
So they went in advance and arrived at the gates about midnight.
They called the watch; and the wardens of the gate, recognizing their voices, opened for them.
Once within, they shouted and lit the flares.
Immediately the soldiers of Wu came in with a rush and were soon in possession.
The first order issued by Lu Meng was to spare the people. Instant death should be the punishment for any murder or robbery.
The various officials in the city were retained in their offices and continued their functions.
Special guards were set over Guan Yu's family dwelling, and none dared break open any other house.
A messenger was sent with tidings to Sun Quan.
One very wet day Lu Meng, with a few horsemen as escort, was going round the walls and visiting the gates.
One of the soldiers took from a passerby a broad-brimmed hat and put it on over his helmet to keep his armor dry. Lu Meng saw it, and the offender was seized. He was a fellow-villager of Lu Meng, but that did not save him.
“You are an old acquaintance, but you knew my order; why did you disobey it?” “I thought the rain would spoil my uniform, and I took the hat to protect it. I did not take it for my own advantage, but to protect official property.
Spare me, O General, for the sake of our common dwelling-place.” “I know you were protecting your armor, but still it was disobedience to the order against taking anything from the people.” The soldier was beheaded, and his head exposed as a warning.
But when all was over, Lu Meng had the body buried decently and wept at the grave for the loss of his friend. Never after this was there the least laxity of discipline.
When Sun Quan visited the city, Lu Meng met him at the boundary and led him to the official residence, where Sun Quan issued rewards and commendations.
This done, Sun Quan ordered Pan Jun to take charge of the new possession.
Yu Jin, who was in prison, was freed and sent back to Cao Cao.
When the people had been comforted and the soldiers rewarded, there was a great banquet in honor of the success of the expedition.
Then said Sun Quan to Lu Meng, “We have got the city of Jingzhou, but now Fu Shiren is holding Gongan and Mi Fang Nanjun. How can we get these two territories?” Suddenly Yu Fan started up and offered his services.
“You will need neither bows nor arrows,” said Yu Fan, “unless my little tongue is worn out.
I can persuade Fu Shiren to surrender.” “Friend Yu Fan, how will you do it?” asked Sun Quan. “Fu Shiren and I are very old friends, ever since we were boys; and if I explain the matter to him, I am sure he will come over to this side.” So Yu Fan, with an escort, left quickly for Gongan, where his friend was in command.
Now when Fu Shiren heard of the capture of Jingzhou, he closed his gates. Yu Fan arrived, but was refused entrance.
So Yu Fan wrote a letter, attached it to an arrow, and shot it over the city wall.
A soldier picked it up and took it to his commander, who found therein much persuasion to surrender.
Having read all this, he thought within himself, “I think I should do well in surrender, for at his departure Guan Yu was very bitter against me.” Without further ado, he bade the wardens open the gate, and his friend came in.
After their greetings they talked of old times, and Yu Fan praised Sun Quan's magnanimity and liberality and greatness generally.
So finally Fu Shiren decided to exchange masters and went away, taking with him his seal of office.
He was presented to Sun Quan, who reappointed him to the command of Gongan under its new lord.
Lu Meng thought the appointment imprudent and said to Sun Quan, “Guan Yu is yet unconquered; we should not put Fu Shiren in Gongan. Instead, send him to Nanjun to induce his former colleague and fellow Mi Fang to join him in desertion to the enemy.” Lu Meng's advice was followed, and Fu Shiren was recalled.
“Go to Nanjun and win over Mi Fang, and I will reward you richly,” said Sun Quan.
Fu Shiren accepted the mission and duly left for Nanjun.
Jingzhou's defender failed when tried, So Wang Fu's words were justified.
For the events of the journey see the next chapter. CHAPTER 76. Xu Huang Fights At The River Mian; Guan Yu Retreats To Maicheng.
The fall of Jingzhou put Mi Fang in a quandary; and before he could decide upon any course, his old colleague Fu Shiren came to see him.
Fu Shiren was admitted, and when asked why he had come, he blurted out his business without beating about the bush.
“I am faithful enough, but I got into difficulties and danger and could not hold on, so I have surrendered to Wu.
And I advise you to do the same.” “You and I have both fed on the bounty of the Prince of Hanzhong, and I cannot understand how you can turn against him.” “Guan Yu went away hating both of us intensely; and even if he comes back victorious, I do not think he will forgive us.
Just think it over.” “My brother and I have followed the Prince these many years, and I do not like leaving him like this.” Mi Fang hesitated.
Before he could make up his mind, there came a messenger, saying, “The army in Fankou is short of grain, and I was sent to demand white rice for the soldiers. Nanjun and Gongan are to send ten thousand carts at once.
Delay will be most severely punished.” This sudden demand was a shock to Mi Fang. “Where am I to get the rice?” said he despairingly to his friend and tempter.
“Jingzhou is now in the hands of Wu.” “Do not dilly-dally,” said Fu Shiren.
Thereupon he drew his sword and slew the messenger as he stood in the hall.
“What have you done?” cried Mi Fang.
“Guan Yu wanted to slay us two and has forced me to this.
Are we to fold our hands and await death?
Either you give in at once and go over to Wu, or you will be put to death by Guan Yu.” Just then they heard that Lu Meng's troops had actually reached the city wall.
Mi Fang saw that nothing could save his life but desertion, so he went out with Fu Shiren and gave in his allegiance to Lu Meng, by whom he was led to Sun Quan.
Sun Quan gave both of them presents, after which he proceeded to restore order and to reward his army for their services.
At the time that great discussion about Jingzhou was going on in Xuchang, a messenger arrived with a letter from Sun Quan.
It told the tale of the acquisition of Jingzhou and begged Cao Cao to send an army to attack Guan Yu in the rear, enjoining the utmost secrecy.
At the meeting of advisers that Cao Cao summoned to consultation, First Secretary Dong Zhao said, “Now that the relief of Fankou is contemplated, it would be well to shoot letter into the city to let the besieged know, so that they may not yield to depression and to inform Guan Yu.
If Guan Yu hears that Jingzhou is in the hands of Wu, he will come back to try to recover it.
Then let Xu Huang take the chance to attack, and our victory will be complete.” Cao Cao agreed that the plan was good, and so he sent a messenger to urge Xu Huang to attack.
Cao Cao himself led a large force to Yangling Slope, south of Luoyang, to rescue Cao Ren.
Xu Huang was sitting in his tent when they told him that a messenger from the Prince of Wei had arrived.
The messenger was called in and said, “The Prince has led an army to Luoyang, and he wishes you to hasten to attack Guan Yu in order to relieve Fankou.” Just then the scouts came to report: “Guan Ping has encamped at Yencheng and Liao Hua at Sizhong.
The enemy have built a line of twelve stockades.” Xu Huang ordered two of his generals—Lu Qian and Xu Shang—to Yencheng to masquerade as if he himself was in command, by showing his ensigns.
Xu Huang himself, at the head of five hundred veterans, went along River Mian to attack Yencheng in the rear.
When Guan Ping heard of the approach of Xu Huang, he prepared his own division to meet him. When both sides were arrayed, Guan Ping rode out and engaged Xu Shang.
After three encounters Xu Shang had the worst of it and fled.
Then the other general, Lu Qian, went out.
He fought half a dozen bouts and also ran away. Thereupon Guan Ping went in pursuit and smote the flying enemy for seven miles.
But then there was an alarm of fire within Yencheng, and Guan Ping knew that he had been inveigled into the pursuit and was a victim. So he turned and set out for the city again.
On his way he met a body of troops, and standing under the great standard was Xu Huang. Xu Huang shouted out, “Guan Ping, my worthy nephew, it is strange that you do not recognize death when it stares you in the face.
Your Jingzhou has fallen into the hands of Wu, and yet you act so madly.” Guan Ping, whirling his sword, just rode hard at Xu Huang, and they engaged.
But after the third bout there was a tremendous shouting among the soldiers, for the flames within the city burst up higher than before. Guan Ping could not follow up his desire to continue the fight, but cut his way out and made a dash for Sizhong, where Liao Hua received him with the news of the disaster to Jingzhou.
“People say that Jingzhou has fallen to Lu Meng, and the news has frightened the whole army; what is to be done?” said Liao Hua.
“It is only a malicious rumor; do not let it spread.
If any one repeats it, put him to death.” Just then a man came running in to say that Xu Huang was attacking the first stockade on the north. “If that goes,” said Guan Ping, “the remainder will follow.
But as we have River Mian at our back, they will not dare attack this.
Let us go to the rescue.” So Liao Hua summoned his subordinate leaders and gave them orders to hold the camp and make a signal if the enemy came. “There is no danger here,” said they.
“The camp is defended by a tenfold line of thorny barriers; even a bird could not get in.” Guan Ping and Liao Hua mustered all the veterans they had and went away to the first stockade.
Seeing the Wei soldiers camped on a low hill, Guan Ping said to his colleague, “Those soldiers are stationed in an unsafe place; let us raid their camp tonight.” “You take half the force, General, and I will remain to keep the camp,” said Liao Hua.
When night fell, the attacking force went out. But on reaching the camp not a man opposed them. The camp was empty. Then Guan Ping knew he had been deceived, and turned to retreat.
He was at once attacked on two sides by Xu Shang and Lu Qian from left and right. Unable to stand, his troops ran for the camp.
The soldiers of Wei followed, and presently the camp was surrounded. They were compelled to abandon the position and set off for Sizhong.
As they drew near they saw torches, and presently knew by the ensigns displayed that the camp had also fallen to the enemy.
Retiring, they hastened along the high road toward Fankou, but presently their way was barred by a force under Xu Huang himself. By dint of hard fighting they got away and returned to their main camp, and Guan Ping went to his father.
“Xu Huang has got possession of Yencheng; Cao Cao's main army is on the way in three divisions; and many say that Jingzhou is in the enemy's hands.” Guan Yu bade him be silent.
“This is a fabrication of the enemy,” said Guan Yu, “but it may dishearten the soldiers.
We know Lu Meng is ill, and they have appointed that impractical fellow Lu Xun to succeed him at Lukou.
There is nothing to fear.” Then news came that Xu Huang had arrived .
At once Guan Yu bade them saddle his charger.
“Father, you are not strong enough to go into the battle,” said Guan Ping.
“Xu Huang and I were once friends, and I know what he can do and not do.
I will give him the chance to retire; and if he does not take it, then I shall just slay him as a warning to the others.” Mounting his charger, Guan Yu rode out as impetuously as of yore, and the sight of the old warrior made to quake the hearts of the troops of Wei.
When he came close enough to his enemy, Guan Yu checked his steed and said, “Where is my friend Xu Huang?” As a reply, the gate of the battle opened, and Xu Huang appeared under the standard. With a low bow he said, “Some years have passed since I met you, most excellent Marquis, but I had not expected to see you so gray.
I have not forgotten the old brave days, when we were together and you taught me so much, and I am very grateful.
Your new fame has spread throughout the whole empire, and your old friends cannot but praise you.
I am indeed glad that I have the happiness to see you.” Guan Yu replied, “We have been excellent friends, Xu Huang—better than most.
But why have you pressed my son so hardly of late?” Xu Huang suddenly turned to the officers about him and cried fiercely, “I would give a thousand ounces of gold for this Guan Yu's head.” Guan Yu, greatly shocked, said, “What did you say that for?” “Because today I am on state business, and I have no inclination to let private friendship override my public duty.” As he said this, he whirled his battle-ax and rode at Guan Yu, who, greatly enraged, threw up his great saber to strike.
They fought a half score bouts, but although his skill lacked nothing of its pristine vigor and excelled all the world, the old warrior's right arm was still weak from the wound. Guan Ping saw that his father failed somewhat, and so hastily beat the gong for retreat. Guan Yu rode back.
Suddenly the noise of a great shouting was heard; it came from the troops in Fankou, for Cao Ren, having heard of the arrival of troops of his own side, had made a sortie and was about to attack to help Xu Huang. His army fell on, and the army of Jingzhou were routed.
Guan Yu, with as many of his officers as could, fled away along the banks of River Xiang, hotly pursued by the army of Wei.
Crossing the river, he made for Xiangyang.
Suddenly the scouts reported: “Jingzhou has been taken by Lu Meng. Your family is now in the hand of enemy.” Guan Yu was shocked; thence he marched for Gongan. But the scouts told him:
“Fu Shiren has yielded Gongan to the hands of Wu.” Then some of the men he had dispatched for supplies came in and reported:
“Fu Shiren murdered the officer and persuade Mi Fang to surrender to Wu.” The story filled Guan Yu with boundless rage. It was too much.
The wound reopened, and he fell in a swoon.
“Wang Fu, you were right,” said he when he recovered consciousness. “How I regret that I did not heed what you said!
And now.” “But why were the beacon fires not lighted?” continued he presently.
“Lu Meng's marines in the guise of traders came over the river.
There were soldiers hidden in the ships, and they seized the beacon guards, so preventing them from kindling the fires.” Guan Yu sighed.
Beating the ground with his foot, he said, “Indeed I have fallen into their trap.
How shall I look my brother in the face?” Then outspoke Commissariat Commander Zhao Lei, saying, “We are in straits.
Send to Chengdu for help, and let us take the land road to Jingzhou to try to recover it.” So three messengers were sent by different routes to ask for help, while the army set out to return to Jingzhou, Guan Yu leading and Liao Hua with Guan Ping keeping the rear.
The siege of Fankou being thus raised, Cao Ren went to see his master. With tears he acknowledged his fault and asked pardon.
“It was the will of heaven, and no fault of yours,” said Cao Cao; and he rewarded the armies. When he visited Sizhong and had inspected the captured stockades, he remarked on the defenses, saying, “Xu Huang was very clever to overcome these.
With my thirty years of war, I should not have dared to penetrate such opposition.
He is valiant and wise, and both in a high degree.” “Aye,” said they with him, for they could not but agree.
Cao Cao's army marched back to Mopo and there camped.
When Xu Huang returned, Cao Cao went out of the stockade to meet him, and netted with joy when seeing the excellent order and discipline that his army showed. Every soldier was in his place, the ranks perfectly kept, all without a trace of disorder.
“General Xu Huang has the spirit of the old Zhou Yafu,” said Cao Cao, and on the spot conferred on his commander the title of General Who Pacifies the South.
Xu Huang was sent soon after to share in the defense of Xiangyang with Xiahou Shang to meet Guan Yu's army.
Jingzhou being still in turmoil, Cao Cao remained at Mopo waiting for news.
Guan Yu found himself at a standstill on the road to Jingzhou with the army of Wu in front and the men of Wei coming up behind. “What is to be done,” he discussed the position with Zhao Lei, “when we cannot advance nor retreat and the aid has not come?” Zhao Lei proposed a halt to try to shame Lu Meng into aiding Cao Cao.
Said he, “When Lu Meng was at Lukou, he used to write to you often, and you agreed to join hands in the destruction of Cao Cao. Now he is a traitor and fighting on the other side.
Send a letter and reproach him. Perhaps we may get a satisfactory reply.” So the letter was written and sent to Jingzhou.
Meanwhile, by Lu Meng's special command, the most complete protection was given to the families of all the officers who were serving under Guan Yu, and they were kept supplied with all they required.
Even the ailing members of their households were treated by physicians free of charge.
The result was that they were quite won over to the new order of things, and there was no attempt to disturb it.
When Guan Yu's letter came, the messenger was led into the city and well treated.
When Lu Meng read the letter, he said to the bearer thereof, “You must understand the different circumstances. When your general and I were leagued together, it was a personal matter between us two.
Now things have changed. I am sent here with certain orders and am not my own master.
I would trouble you, O Messenger, to return and explain thus to your master and in good words.” The bearer of the letter was entertained at a banquet and sent to repose himself in the guest-house, where the families of the absent officers sought him to have news of their husbands and fathers.
Moreover, they brought him letters and gave him messages for the officers, and the whole tenor of these letters and messages was that they were all in good health, all their needs were supplied, and they lacked nothing.
When he left the city, Lu Meng himself escorted him to the outskirts and set him on his way.
On his return to the army, he gave to Guan Yu the message of Lu Meng and told him that the families were all well and safe and well cared for. This, however, did not greatly please Guan Yu, for he saw in this merely a plan to gain favor and popularity. “The brigand!
If I cannot slay him while I live, I will after I am dead.
My hate shall not go unappeased.” He roughly dismissed the messenger, who went out and was at once surrounded by those whose families were in the city and who desired to have news of them.
And when he gave them the letters and messages and told them all were well, there was great rejoicing among the men in the camp, and kindly feelings for Lu Meng prevailed. And therewith died down the spirit of fighting.
Guan Yu led the army to attack Jingzhou, but day by day the men deserted and ran away to the very city they were moving to attack.
So day by day Guan Yu's bitterness and anger increased, and he advanced in angry haste. One day there was a great shouting and the noise of drums, and he found his way blocked. “Why do you not surrender, friend Guan Yu?” said the leader of this body, Jiang Qin.
“Could I give in to a rebel; I, a servant of the Hans and a leader of their army?” roared Guan Yu in a passion.
Thereupon he whipped his horse forward and swung up his sword to strike. However, Jiang Qin would not fight.
The two exchanged a few blows, and Jiang Qin fled. Guan Yu followed. When he had gone a long way, there suddenly appeared from a gully near him Han Dang, while Zhou Tai came out from the other side. Thereupon Jiang Qin wheeled round and once more came to do battle, so that three forces were opposed to Guan Yu.
Unable to withstand these, he retreated.
Before he had gone very far, he saw signs of many people bivouacking among the hills, and presently made out, on a huge white banner that flapped in the breeze, the words “Natives of Jingzhou”, and the people about were calling out, “All the inhabitants of this place have surrendered.” Guan Yu felt like rushing up and cutting these people to pieces, but just then two other cohorts appeared led by Ding Feng and Xu Sheng, who supported Jiang Qin.
The three bodies of troops then set on with shouting and loud beating of drums that seemed to make the very earth tremble. And Guan Yu was like the kernel in a nut, quite surrounded. This was not all.
He saw the number of his followers diminishing every moment.
He fought on till dusk, and looking about him he saw all the hills crowded with Jingzhou folks and heard them calling brother for brother and son for father, till his soldiers' hearts had melted within them. One by one they ran to their relatives, heedless of their leader and his voice.
Presently he had but three hundred left, but with them he kept up the battle till the third watch. Then there was another shouting in another note, for his leaders, Guan Ping, his son, and Liao Hua, came to his help. And they rescued him. “The soldiers' hearts are all melted,” said Guan Ping. “We must find some place wherein to camp till help can arrive.
There is Maicheng, small, but sufficient; let us camp there.” Guan Yu consented, and the exhausted army hurried thither as quickly as they could.
The small force was divided among the four gates to guard.
Zhao Lei said, “This place is near Shangyong where Meng Da and Liu Feng station. We should send for their help.
If their army marches to our relief until the grand army of Shu comes, the morale of our army will improve.” But disappointments dogged them.
Very soon the army of Wu came up and laid siege to the city.
“Who will try to break through and go away to Shangyong for assistance?” asked Guan Yu.
“I will go,” said Liao Hua.
“And I will escort you past the danger zone,” said Guan Ping.
Guan Yu wrote his letter, which Liao Hua concealed next his skin, and having eaten a full meal, he rode out at the gate.
The leader of the enemy, Ding Feng, tried to check him, but Guan Ping fought vigorously and drove him away. So Liao Hua escaped the siege and reached Shangyong, while Guan Ping returned. Then they barred the gates and hold their defense. Now, having captured Shangyong, Liu Feng and Meng Da had remained to guard it. Liu Feng had been created Governor General, and together with Meng Da, to defend that city. When they heard of the defeat of Guan Yu, they took counsel what to do.
When Liao Hua came, he was admitted into the city.
He told the tale of Guan Yu's straits, and asked for help.
“Guan Yu is closely besieged in Maicheng.
Help from the west will be a long time in coming, so I have been sent to beg your assistance.
I hope you will march the Shangyong troops thither as quickly as possible, for any delay will be fatal.” Liu Feng replied, “Sir, go to the rest-house for a time till we can decide.” So Liao Hua went, and the two leaders talked over the matter.
Liu Feng said, “This is bad news; what is to be done?” “Wu is very powerful,” replied his colleague.
“Now they have control over the whole region of Jingzhou, save this small clod of earth called Maicheng.
Cao Cao is at hand with five hundred thousand troops, and we cannot stand against the two mighty forces.
I say we must not move.” “I know all this.
But Guan Yu is my uncle, and I cannot bear to sit still and not try to save him.” “So you hold him as an uncle!” said Meng Da with a smile. “Yet I do not think he holds you much as a nephew.
When the Prince of Hanzhong adopted you, Guan Yu was greatly annoyed. And after the Prince had accepted his new dignity and was nominating his heir, I heard he consulted Zhuge Liang, who said the affair was one to be decided within the family and declined to advise. Then the Prince sent to ask Guan Yu's advice. Did Guan Yu name you? Not at all. You were only a son by adoption and could have no place in the succession. Further, Guan Yu advised that you be sent to a distance lest you might cause trouble.
This is common knowledge, and I am surprised that you are ignorant of it.
Yet today you make capital out of the relationship and are willing to run a great risk to support it.” “Granted that what you say is true, still what reply can we give?” “Simply say that this city is still unsettled, and you dare not move lest it be lost.” Liu Feng took his colleague's view, sent for the messenger and told him. Liao Hua was greatly disappointed. He threw himself on the ground and knocked his head, imploring assistance.
“If you act thus, there is an end of Guan Yu!” cried Liao Hua.
“Will a cup of water extinguish a wagon load of blazing wood?” said Meng Da.
“Hasten back and await patiently for the coming of help from the west.” Liao Hua renewed his entreaties. The two commanders simply rose, shook out their sleeves, and left him.
Liao Hua saw that things had gone against him and thought his best course would be to go at once to Chengdu. He rode out of the city cursing its defenders and went away west.
Guan Yu from his fortress looked anxiously, but vainly, for the coming of the expected aid. He was in a sorry plight.
His army numbered but a few hundred, many wounded; there was no food.
Then someone came to the foot of the wall and, calling out to the defenders on the wall not to shoot, said he had a message for the commander.
He was allowed to enter; it was Zhuge Jin. When he had made his salutations and taken tea, he began his harangue.
“I come at the command of my master, the Marquis of Wu, to persuade you to a wise course.
From of old it has always been recognized that the hero must bow to circumstances. The region with its nine territories and forty-one counties that you ruled have come under another, with the exception of this single city.
Within, there is no food, without, no help, so that it must fall quickly.
Wherefore, O General, why not hear me and join your fortunes to those of Wu? You shall be restored to your governorship, and you will preserve your family.
If haply, Sir, you would reflect thereon.” Guan Yu replied, quite calmly, “I am a simple soldier from the village of Jieliang. I am the 'hands and feet' of my lord. How can I betray him?
The city may fall, and then I can but die.
Jade may be shattered, but its whiteness remains; bamboo may be burned, but its joints stand straight. My body may be broken, but my fame shall live in history.
Say no more, but leave the city, I beg.
I will fight Sun Quan to the death.” “My master desires to enter into such a league with you as did Jin and Qin in former days, that you may mutually assist to destroy Cao Cao and restore the Hans.
That is his idea, and why do you persist in this wrong course?” As Zhuge Jin finished this speech, Guan Ping, who was by, drew his sword to slay him. But his father checked him.
“Remember his brother is in Shu, helping your uncle.
If you hurt him, you will injure the principle of fraternity.” Guan Yu then bade his servants lead Zhuge Jin away.
Zhuge Jin went, his face covered with shame, and left the city.
When he reached his master, he told of Guan Yu's obduracy and rejection of all argument.
“He is indeed a loyal servant!” said Sun Quan. “Still, what is to be done next?” “Take some casts in the Book of Changes,” said Lu Fan.
So the lots were taken and explained to mean that the Marquis' enemies should flee to a distance.
Then Sun Quan asked Lu Meng, saying, “If he flies to a distance, how can he be captured?” “The divination exactly fits in with my schemes;” replied Lu Meng, “and though Guan Yu had wings to soar to the skies, he would not escape my net.” The dragon in a puddle is the sport of shrimps, The phoenix in a cage is mocked of small birds.
The scheme of Lu Meng will be unfolded in the next chapter. CHAPTER 77.
Guan Yu Manifests His Sacredness At Mount of The Jade Spring; Cao Cao Is Possessed At Luoyang.
Sun Quan having asked Lu Meng for a plan, Lu Meng replied, “This Guan Yu has very few soldiers left, and he will not venture along the high road. North of Maicheng is a risky path, and he will try to escape along that.
Therefore you must lay an ambush for him seven miles away from the city, but do not stop him. Let him go by, and then harass his rear. Thus he will be forced into Linju.
Set another small ambush near there, and you will capture your enemy.
For the present, attack the city vigorously on all sides but one, leaving the north gate for escape.” Before carrying out this plan, Sun Quan bade Lu Fan consult the auspices.
He did so, announcing, “The enemy will flee toward the northwest, but will be caught that night before midnight.” So Zhu Ran was sent in command of the first ambush, and Pan Zhang was the second.
The troops sent were all veterans. When Guan Yu mustered his fighting men in the city of Maicheng, he had but three hundred.
The food was done.
That night many soldiers of Wu came to the city walls and called to their friends by name, and many of these slipped over the wall and deserted, reducing the small force still further.
No rescue force appeared, and Guan Yu was at the end of his resources.
Again he bewailed to Wang Fu, saying, “I regret that I have neglected your wise warning; in this danger what is to be done?” “I think even if Lu Wang could come to life again, he would be helpless in this case,” replied Wang Fu, weeping.
Said Zhao Lei, “Liu Feng and Meng Da have surely decided not to send help from Shangyong.
Let us abandon this miserable place, try to get to Yiazhou, and recover the army. We may then tempt our fortune once more.” “I agree with you that that is the best plan,” said Guan Yu.
Then he ascended the walls and surveyed the country.
Noting that the weakest side was the north, he called in some of the inhabitants and inquired the nature of the country on that side.
They replied, “There are only paths there, but by them one may get into the Western Land of Rivers.” “We will go that way tonight,” said Guan Yu.
Wang Fu opposed it, saying, “General, you will surely fall into an ambush.
The main road will be safer.” “There may be an ambush, but do I fear that?” said the old warrior. Orders were given to be ready to march. “At least be very cautious,” said Wang Fu.
“I will defend this city to the very last; I only need a hundred troops. Never will we surrender. Only I hope, most noble General, that you will send me speedy help.” The two parted in tears; Wang Fu and Zhou Cang remaining to guard Maicheng. Guan Yu, Guan Ping, and Zhao Lei marched with their weak force out of the north gate. Guan Yu, his green-dragon saber ready to hand, went first. About the third watch, seven miles lay between them and the city. There they saw a deep cleft in the hills wherefrom rolled the sound of beaten drums.
And men were shouting. Soon appeared a large force with Zhu Ran at their head. He came dashing forward, and summoned the small party, saying, “Guan Yu, do not run!
Surrender and live!” But Guan Yu whipped his steed to a gallop and bore down on the leader with anger in his eyes.
Then Zhu Ran ran away.
Guan Yu followed him till there came the loud boom of a large drum, and out sprang troops from all sides.
Guan Yu dared not engage such a number, and fled in the direction of Linju.
Zhu Ran came up behind and attacked the flying soldiers, so that Guan Yu's following gradually became smaller and smaller. Still he struggled on.
A few miles farther the drums rolled again, and torches lit up all round. This was Pan Zhang's ambush, and he appeared flourishing his sword.
Guan Yu whirled his blade and went to meet him, but Pan Zhang ran away after a couple of bouts.
However, Guan Yu saw they were too many for him, and sought refuge among the mountains. His son followed, and when he got within speaking distance, Guan Ping gave him the mournful tidings:
“Zhao Lei has fallen in the melee!” Guan Yu was very sad, and bade his son try to protect the rear while he should force his way forward.
With about ten men he reached Zhuxi, a place with mountains on both sides. At their foot was a thick mass of reeds and dried grass. The trees grew very close.
It was then the fifth watch.
Presently the small party stumbled into another ambush, and the ambushing soldiers thrust forth hooks and threw ropes.
Entangled in these, Guan Yu's horse fell, and Guan Yu reeled out of the saddle. In a moment Ma Zhong, the Marching General of Pan Zhang, made him a prisoner.
Guan Ping dashed to his rescue, but before he could do anything, he also was surrounded and held.
Father and son were both captives. With great joy Sun Quan heard of the success of his plans. In the morning, he assembled all his officers in his tent to await the arrival of the prisoners.
Before long, Ma Zhong came hustling his prisoner before his lord. “I have long had a friendly feeling for you,” said Sun Quan to Guan Yu, “on account of your great virtues. Now I would have made a covenant and alliance with you, if you would.
You and your son have long held yourselves to be invincible, but you see you are my prisoners today.
Yet I hope to win you over to my side.” But Guan Yu only answered roughly, “You green-eyed boy!
You redbearded rat! I made a covenant in the Peach Garden with my brothers to uphold the Hans. Think you that I will stand side by side with a rebel such as you are?
I am a victim of your vile schemes, but I can only die once.
And there is no need of many words.” “He is a real hero, and I love him,” said Sun Quan to those standing near.
“I will treat him well and endeavor to win him over. Do you think it well?” Said the First Secretary Zuo Xian, “When Cao Cao had hold of this man, Cao Cao treated him lavishly well.
Cao Cao created him a marquis; in threeday interval Cao Cao held a small banquet, in five days a great one; Cao Cao gave him gold and presented him with silver; all this, hoping to retain him at his side. But Cao Cao failed. The man broke through his gates, slew his six generals in five passes and went away. Today Cao Cao fears him, and almost moved the capital for dread of him.
Now he is in your power, destroy him, or you will rue the day. Evil will come if you spare him.” Sun Quan reflected for some time.
“You are right,” said he presently, and gave the order for execution.
So father and son met their fate together in the winter of the twentyfourth year  in the tenth month.
Guan Yu was fifty-eight. A poem says:
Peerless indeed was our Lord Guan Yu, of the latter days, Head and shoulders stood he out among the best; Godlike and terrible in war, elegant and refined in peace, Resplendent as the noonday sun in the heavens, Haloed as are the noblest of those early days, He stands, the brightest model for all ages, And not only for the strenuous days he lived in. And another: Seek ye a noble one?
Then take ye the way of Jieliang, Watch ye how all men revere Guan Yu, Each excelling others to honor him, Him, one of the three brothers of the Peach Garden Oath, Of whom two have won sacrifices, as Emperor and prince.
Incomparable their aura spreads through the world; They are resplendent as the great lights of the firmament; Temples to our Lord Guan Yu abound, no village lacks one, Their venerable trees at sundown are the resting places for birds. So Guan Yu ended his life.
His famous steed, Red-Hare, also captured with its master, was sent to Sun Quan, who gave it as a reward to his captor, Ma Zhong. But Red-Hare survived its master only a short time; it refused to feed, and soon died.
Foreboding of misfortune came to Wang Fu within the city of Maicheng.
His bones felt cold; his flesh crept; and he said to his colleague Zhou Cang, “I have had a terrible dream in which I saw our lord all dripping with gore.
I would question him, but I was overcome with dread.
May it augur no evil tidings!” Just then the troops of Wu came up to the city wall and displayed the gory heads of the two, father and son.
Wang Fu and Zhou Cang went up on the wall to see if the dread tokens were real. There was no doubt.
Wang Fu with a despairing cry threw himself over the wall and perished, Zhou Cang died by his own hand.
Thus Maicheng fell to Wu.
Now the spirit of Guan Yu did not dissipate into space, but wandered through the void till it came to a certain spot in Dangyang on a famous hill known as the Mount of the Jade Spring.
There lived a venerable Buddhist priest whose name in the faith was Transverse-Peace. He was originally of the Guardian Temple in the River Si Pass and abbot of that temple.
In the course of roaming about the world, he had reached this place. Entranced with its natural beauty, he had built himself a shelter of boughs and grass, where he sat in meditation on the “Way.” He had a novice with him to beg food and to attend to his simple wants.
This night, about the third watch, the moon was bright and the air serene. Transverse-Peace sat in his usual attitude in the silence of the mountains. Suddenly he heard a great voice calling in the upper air, “Give back my head; give back my head.” Gazing upward Transverse-Peace saw the shape of a man mounted on a horse. In the hand was a shining blade like unto the green-dragon saber.
Two military figures were with him, one on either side. He on the left had a white face; he on the right was swarthy of countenance with a curly beard. And they followed the figure with the shining blade. They floated along on a cloud which came to rest on the summit of the mountain.
The recluse recognized the figure as that of Guan Yu, so with his yak's tail flagellum he smote the lintel of his hut and cried, “Where is Guan Yu?” The spirit understood, and the figure dismounted, glided down, and came to rest at the door of the hut.
Interlacing its fingers, it stood in a reverential attitude and said, “Who is my teacher, and what is his name in the faith?” “In the state Guardian Temple in River Si Pass, I once saw you, O noble Sir, and I was not likely to forget your face,” replied the priest.
“I am deeply grateful for the help you gave me.
Misfortune has befallen me, and I have ceased to live. I would seek the pure instruction and beg you to indicate the obscure way.” “Let us not discuss former wrongdoings nor present correct actions.
Later events are the inevitable result of former causes. I know that Lu Meng has injured you.
You call aloud for the return of your head; who will also return the heads of your several victims—Yan Liang, Wen Chou, and the commanders of the five passes?” Thereupon Guan Yu seemed suddenly to comprehend, bowed in token of assent, and disappeared.
After this appearance to the recluse, his spirit wandered hither and thither about the mountain, manifesting its sacred character and guarding the people.
Impressed by his virtue, the inhabitants built a temple on the Mount of the Jade Spring, wherein they sacrificed at the four seasons. In later days, one wrote a couplet for the temple, the first member reading:
“Ruddy faced, reflecting the honest heart within, out-riding the wind on the Red-Hare steed, mindful of the Red Emperor;" “In the light of clear lamp, reading the histories, resting on the GreenDragon saber curved as the young moon, heart pure as the azure heaven.” The execution of Guan Yu gave Sun Quan undisputed possession of the whole of the Jingzhou Region.
He rewarded his soldiers and spread a great feast at which Lu Meng was in the seat of honor.
Sun Quan made a speech, saying, “After long waiting, the desire of my heart has come to me very easily through the magnificent efforts of my friend Lu Meng.” Lu Meng bowed and bowed deprecatingly, but Sun Quan continued, “My good Zhou Yu was superior to most humans, and he defeated Cao Cao at the Red Cliffs. He died too soon. My good Lu Su succeeded him.
In his first interview, he inaugurated the general policy of creating a state. That was the first instance of his keen insight.
When Cao Cao descended upon my country, and everyone counseled me to yield, he advised me to summon my good Zhou Yu to oppose and smite Cao Cao. That was the second instance of his keen insight.
He made only one fault; he advised me to let Liu Bei occupy Jingzhou.
Now today my good Lu Meng has succeeded, and in that he far surpasses both his predecessors.” Then Sun Quan filled a goblet and in person presented it to the guest of the evening.
Lu Meng took the cup, but as he raised it, a sudden change came over him.
Dashing the cup to the ground, he seized Sun Quan, crying, “O green-eyed boy!
O red-bearded rat! Do you know me?” Consternation seized the whole assembly, but many rushed to the rescue of their lord, who had been thrown to the floor by the guest he had so lately complimented.
Rushing forward over Sun Quan's body, Lu Meng sat himself in the host's seat, his eyebrows staring stiff and his eyes glaring. “After I quelled the Yellow Scarves, I went hither and thither for thirty years. Now I have fallen victim to your base plots, and you have overcome me. If living, I have been unable to gorge upon the flesh of my enemy; dead, I will pursue the spirit of this bandit Lu Meng.
I am the Lord of Hanshou, Guan Yu.” Terror-stricken, Sun Quan was the first to fall prostrate, and all his officers followed him.
Thereupon Lu Meng fell over dead, with blood gushing from the seven orifices of his body. In due time the body was coffined and interred.
Lu Meng was created posthumously Governor of Nanjun and Lord of Chanling.
His son, Lu Ba, was given hereditary nobility.
After this visitation Sun Quan lived in constant terror. Soon Zhang Zhao came in from Jianye to see him and blame him for the murder. “My lord, by the slaughter of Guan Yu you have brought misfortune very near to this state.
You know the oath sworn in the Peach Garden.
Now Liu Bei has the force of the two Lands of Rivers at his back, Zhuge Liang as adviser, and those heroes Zhang Fei, Zhao Yun, Huang Zhong, and Ma Chao to carry out his behests.
When Liu Bei hears of the death of both father and son, he will set in motion the whole force he has to avenge them, and I fear you cannot stand such an onslaught.” Sun Quan started up in a fright. “Yes; I have made a little mistake,” said he.
“But seeing it is so, what shall I do?” “You need have no fear,” replied Zhang Zhao.
“I have a plan to fend off the armies of the west from our borders and keep Jingzhou quite safe.” “What is your plan?” asked Sun Quan. “Cao Cao with his many legions is greedily aiming at the whole empire.
If Liu Bei wants revenge, he will ally himself with Cao Cao, and, should they combine against this country, we should be in great danger. Therefore I advise you to send Guan Yu's head to Cao Cao to make it appear that Cao Cao was the prime cause of his destruction.
This should divert Liu Bei's extreme hatred toward Cao Cao and send the armies of Shu against Wei instead of toward Wu.
After carefully considering the whole matter, I counsel this as the best course of action.” Sun Quan thought the move worth making, and so the head of the great warrior was placed in a box and sent off as quickly as possible to Cao Cao.
At this time Cao Cao's army had marched back from Mopo to Luoyang. When he heard of the coming of the gruesome gift, he was glad at heart and said, “So Guan Yu is dead; now I can stick to my mat and sleep soundly at night.” But Sima Yi saw through the ruse and said from his place by the steps, “This is a trick to divert evil from Wu.” “What do you mean? How?” said Cao Cao.
“The Peach Garden Oath bound the three brothers to live and die together. Now Wu is fearful of revenge for the execution of one of the three and sends the head to you to cause Liu Bei's wrath to fasten on you, O Prince. Sun Quan wishes Liu Bei to attack you instead of himself, the real perpetrator of the crime.
Then he will find a way of accomplishing his ends while you two are quarreling.” “You are right, friend;” said Cao Cao, “and now how can we escape?” “I think escape is easy.
You have the head of Guan Yu; make a wooden image of the remainder of the body, and bury the whole with the rites suitable to a minister of state.
When Liu Bei hears of this, he will turn his hate toward Sun Quan and raise all his forces to attack him.
If you will think it out, you will see that whichever is victor the other will be smitten; and if we get one of the two, the other will follow before very long.” Cao Cao was pleased with the solution.
Then he ordered the messenger to come in with the box, which was opened, and he looked upon the face of the dead. The features had not changed; the face bore the same appearance as of old.
Cao Cao smiled. “I hope you have been well since our last meeting, Guan Yu,” said Cao Cao.
To his horror, the mouth opened, the eyes rolled, and the long beard and hair stiffened. Cao Cao fell to the ground in a swoon. They rushed to him, but it was a long time before he recovered consciousness. “General Guan Yu is indeed a spirit,” he said.
Suddenly the messenger who had brought the dead warrior's head became also possessed by the spirit of Guan Yu, and fell to cursing and reviling his master, Sun Quan, and he told the story of what had befallen Lu Meng.
Cao Cao, filled with dread, prepared sacrifices and performed the rites for the honored dead. An effigy was carved out of heavy fragrant wood and buried outside the south gate with all the rites of a princely noble, a huge concourse of officials of all grades following in the procession. At the funeral Cao Cao himself bowed before the coffin and poured a libation. He also conferred on the dead the posthumous title of Prince of Jingzhou, and appointed guardians of the tomb.
The messenger was sent back to Wu.
The Prince of Hanzhong returned to his capital Chengdu. Fa Zheng memorialized, saying, “O Prince, thy consort has passed away and the Lady Sun has returned to her maiden home, perhaps never to come again.
Human relations should not be set at nought, wherefore a secondary consort should be sought, so that all things may be correctly ordered within the palace.” The Prince having signified his acceptance of the principle, Fa Zheng continued, “There is the sister of Wu Yi, comely and good, and declared by the physiognomist as destined to high honor.
She was betrothed to Liu Mao, son of Liu Yan, but he died in youth, and she has remained unwedded.
Take her as a wife.” “It is incompatible with propriety; Liu Mao and I are of the same ancestry.” “As to the degree of relationship, would it differ from the marriage of Duke Wen of Jin and Huai Ying?” Upon this precedent the Prince gave his consent and wedded the lady, and she bore to him two sons, the elder of whom was named Liu Yung and the younger Liu Li.
Meanwhile, the whole land of Shu was prospering, the people were tranquil, and the state was becoming wealthy. The fields yielded bountiful harvests.
Suddenly there came one who told of the attempt of Sun Quan to ally himself with Guan Yu by marriage, and the indignant rejection of the proposal.
“Jingzhou is in danger,” said Zhuge Liang.
“Recall and replace Guan Yu.” Then began to arrive a series of messengers from Jingzhou, bearers of news of the moves in the game. At first they brought good tidings, then evil.
Guan Xing came first to tell of the drowning of the seven armies of Yu Jin.
Then one reported the installation of beacon towers along the river bank, and other preparations which seemed as near perfect as any could be. And Liu Bei's anxiety ceased. But evil tidings were on the way. Liu Bei was ill at ease and felt a creepiness of the skin that boded evil.
He was restless by day and sleepless by night. One night he rose from his couch and was reading by the light of a candle when drowsiness overcame him, and he fell asleep over the low table by his side. He dreamed.
A cold gust of wind swept through the chamber, almost putting out the candle flame. When it brightened again he glanced up and saw a figure standing near the light.
“Who are you, who thus come by night to my chamber?” asked he. The figure made no reply, and Liu Bei got up to go over and see who it was. Then the figure took the shape of his brother. But it avoided him, retreating as he advanced.
Liu Bei said, “Brother, there is nothing wrong, I hope.
But surely something of great importance brings you here thus in the dead of the night.
And why do you avoid me, your brother, who loves you as himself?” Then the figure wept and said, “Brother, send your armies to avenge me.” As Guan Yu said that, a chilly blast went through the room, and the figure disappeared.
Just then Liu Bei awoke and knew that he had dreamed.
The drums were beating the third watch as he awoke. He felt greatly worried and disturbed.
So he went into the front portion of the palace and sent for Zhuge Liang. Soon he came, and Liu Bei told him of the vision.
“You have been thinking too deeply of Guan Yu lately, my lord,” said Zhuge Liang.
“There is no need to be distressed.” But Liu Bei could not find comfort, and Zhuge Liang was long in calming his feelings and arguing away his fancies.
As Zhuge Liang left the palace, he met Xu Jing, who said, “Instructor, I went to your residence to deliver a very secret piece of news, and they told me to find you here.” “What is your secret?” “There is a report about that Wu has got possession of Jingzhou; Lu Meng has taken it. And more than that, Guan Yu is dead. I had to come to tell you.” “I saw it in the sky some nights ago. A large star of a general fell over against Jingzhou, and I knew some evil had befallen Guan Yu. But I feared the effect upon our master, and I forbore to say anything.” They did not know that Liu Bei was standing just within the door.
Suddenly he rushed out, seized Zhuge Liang by the sleeve and said, “Why did you hide from me? Why, when you had such terrible news?” “Because it is only a rumor,” replied they. “It is too improbable for belief.
We pray you not to be distressed.” “By our oath we live or die together; how can I go on living if he is lost?” The two men soothed their lord as best they could; but even as they spoke to him, one of the private attendants said that Ma Liang and Yi Ji had arrived.
Liu Bei called them in and questioned them eagerly.
They said, “Jingzhou has indeed been lost, and Guan Yu begs for instant help.” The letters they brought had not been read before Liao Hua was ushered in.
He prostrated himself and, weeping, told the story of the refusal of help on the part of Liu Feng and Meng Da.
“Then is my brother lost!” cried Liu Bei.
“If those two have really behaved so badly, the offense is even too great for death,” said Zhuge Liang. “But calm yourself, O Prince. I will see about an army and lead it to the rescue.” “If Guan Yu is gone, I cannot live,” moaned Liu Bei.
“Tomorrow I myself will set out with an army to rescue him.” Liu Bei sent off a messenger to Zhang Fei in Langzhong and gave orders to muster horse and foot for instant departure.
Before day dawned other messengers arrived, giving step by step the sequence of the tragedy: “Guan Yu had cut his way to Linju at night and been captured by a general of Wu. He had refused to bend, and both father and son had gone to the Nine Springs.” When he heard of the final catastrophe, Liu Bei uttered a great cry and fell swooning.
His mind went back to the pledge of days gone by; Could he live still and let his brother die? What happened will be told in the next chapter.
CHAPTER 78. Treating A Headache, A Famous Physician Dies; Giving The Last Words, The Crafty Hero Departs. As has been said, the Prince of Hanzhong swooned on hearing the terrible news of the death of the two Guans, father and son.
His officers went to his help, and when he had recovered sufficiently, they led him to his private apartments.
“My lord, control your grief,” said Zhuge Liang.
“Life and death are fixed by fate.
Guan Yu brought the evil upon himself by his harshness and haughtiness.
You must now take care of your health and mature your vengeance.” “When we swore brotherhood in the Peach Garden, we pledged ourselves to live or die together.
What enjoyment of riches and honors is there for me now that my brother is gone?” Just then he saw Guan Yu's son, Guan Xing, coming in weeping in deep distress.
At sight of the youth, Liu Bei uttered a great cry and again sank to the earth. By and by he came to, and spent the whole day weeping and swooning at intervals.
For three days he refused all nourishment, and he wept so bitterly that his garments were wetted, and there were spots of blood. Zhuge Liang and the others tried every means to soothe him, but he was inconsolable.
“I swear I will not live under the same heaven as Sun Quan,” cried he.
“It is said that the head of your brother has been sent to Cao Cao, but Cao Cao has buried the remains with the rites of a princely noble,” said Zhuge Liang. “Why did he do that?” asked Liu Bei.
“Because Sun Quan thought thereby to bring evil upon Cao Cao. But Cao Cao saw through the subterfuge and has buried your brother with great honor so that your anger may burn against Wu.” “I want to send my armies to punish Wu and appease my wrath,” said Liu Bei.
“No; you may not do that. Wu wishes to move you to smite Wei, and Wei wishes you to attack Wu, each harboring the malevolent design of taking advantage of the quarrel.
You would do well, my lord, to keep your armies at home.
Put on mourning for Guan Yu, and wait till Wei and Wu are at war. That will be your time.” The other officers supported Zhuge Liang, and Liu Bei listened. Presently his grief spent itself, and he began to take food again.
An edict was promulgated enjoining mourning dress upon all officials.
The Prince went outside the south gate to summon the spirit home, and sacrificed and wailed a whole day for the dead warrior, his brother.
Although Cao Cao had given honorable burial to the remains of Guan Yu, yet he was continually haunted by the dead man's spirit. Every night when he closed his eyes, he saw Guan Yu as he knew the warrior so well in the flesh.
These visions made him nervous, and he sought the advice of his officers.
Some suggested the building of new rooms for his own use. “There is much witchcraft and malign influence in this old palace at Luoyang; build a new palace for your own occupation,” said they.
“I would, and it should be called 'The Firm Foundation,'“ said he.
“But where is the good architect?” Jia Xu said, “There is one Su Yue, a very cunning artificer in Luoyang.” Su Yue was called and set to work on the plans for a nine-hall pavilion for Cao Cao's own use. It had verandahs and upper rooms as well. His plans pleased Cao Cao greatly.
“You have planned just such a place as I wished, only where will you find the main beam for such a building?” “I know a certain tree that will serve,” said the architect.
“About ten miles from the city there is the Pool of the Leaping Dragon.
Near it is a shrine, and beside that grows a fine pear tree.
It is over a hundred spans high, and that will serve for the roof tree.” Cao Cao at once sent people to fell the tree.
But after one whole day of labor they came back to say they could make no impression on it neither with saw nor ax. Cao Cao, doubting their word, went to see.
When he had dismounted and stood by the tree, he could not but admire its size and proportions, as it rose above him tall, straight and branched till the widespreading and symmetrical top reached into the clouds.
But he bade the men attack it again. Then a few aged people of the village came and said, “The tree has stood here some centuries and is the haunt of a spirit.
We think it should not be cut down.” Cao Cao grew annoyed, saying, “I have gone to and fro in the world now some forty years, and there is no one, from the Emperor to the commoner, who does not fear me.
What spirit is there who dares oppose my wish?” Drawing the sword he was wearing, Cao Cao went up to the tree and slashed at the trunk.
The tree groaned as he struck, and blood stains spattered his dress.
Terror-stricken, he threw down the sword, mounted his horse and galloped off.
But that evening when he retired to rest, he could not sleep. He rose, went into the outer room, and sat there leaning on a low table.
Suddenly a man appeared with his hair unbound, dressed in black and carrying a naked sword. The visitor came straight toward Cao Cao, stopped in front of him and, pointing, cried out, “Behold the Spirit of the Pear Tree.
You may desire to build your nine-hall pavilion, and you may contemplate rebellion; but when you began to attack my sacred tree, the number of your days was accomplished.
I am come now to slay you.” “Where are the guards?” shouted Cao Cao in terror.
The figure struck at him with the sword. Cao Cao cried out and then awoke.
His head was aching unbearably.
They sought the best physicians for him, but they failed to relieve the terrible pain. Sympathy for their lord was universal among Cao Cao's subordinates.
Hua Xin one day said to his master, “My lord, have you heard of Hua Tuo?” “Do you mean him of Qiao who cured Zhou Tai?” “Yes; that is he,” replied Hua Xin.
“I have heard something of his fame, but I know nothing of his capabilities in his art.” “He is very clever; there are few so skillful.
If one is ill and calls him in, he knows immediately whether to use drugs, or the needle, or the cutlery, and the patient finds relief at once.
Let one suffer from an internal complaint and drugs are ineffectual, with a dose of hashish he throws the patient into a state of perfect insensibility and then opens the abdomen and washes the affected organs with a medicament. The patient feels no pain.
When the cleansing is complete, he sews up the wound with thread, dresses it, and in a month or less the patient is well. This shows you how skillful he is.
“One day Hua Tuo was traveling, when he heard a man by the wayside groaning with pain.
'That is dyspepsia,' said Hua Tuo.
And further questions confirmed the diagnosis.
He prescribed long draughts of the juice of garlic as an emetic, and the man vomited a worm; after this the man was quite well.
“Chen Deng, the Governor of Guangling, suffered from a heavy feeling at the heart. His face was red and congested, and he had no appetite.
Hua Tuo gave him a drug, and he threw up many internal wriggling parasites with red heads.
The Governor asked what had caused the trouble, and Hua Tuo told him that he ate too much strong smelling fish.
He could cure Chen Deng this once, but in three years the disease would recur, and then nothing could save him.
Three later Chen Deng died.
“Another man had a tumor between the eyes, and it itched intolerably.
Hua Tuo examined it and said there was a bird in it.
The tumor was opened, and, surely enough, a canary flew out.
The patient was relieved. “A dog bit a man's toe, and two tumorous growths ensued, one of which itched intolerably and the other pained severely.
Hua Tuo said the painful one contained ten needles, and the other a couple of chess pips, black and white.
He opened the two swellings, and the contents were as he had said. Really he is of the same class of physician as masters Bian Que and Zang Kong of old times.
He lives at Jincheng, not far away, and could be here very soon.” Cao Cao summoned him; and as soon as he arrived, Hua Tuo felt the pulse and made careful examination.
“Prince, your headaches are due to a malignant humor within the brain case. The humor is too thick to get out. Swallowing drugs will do no good.
But I propose to administer a dose of hashish, then open the brain case and remove the thickened humor.
That will be a radical cure.” “You mean you want to kill me?” cried Cao Cao angrily.
“O Prince, you have heard how I cured Guan Yu of the poison that had got into his bones? I scraped them, and he did not hesitate a moment.
Your malady is trifling, and why do you mistrust me?” “A painful arm may be scraped, but how can you cut open a man's head?
The fact is you have conspired with some of Guan Yu's friends to take this opportunity to make away with me in revenge for his death.” Cao Cao told his lictors to hale Hua Tuo to gaol, and there he was tortured to try to find who were his accomplices.
Jia Xu pleaded for him, saying, “The man possesses rare skills; to kill him is to waste his talents.” But the intervention was of no avail.
“The man wants to get a chance to kill me; he is the same sort of scoundrel as Ji Ping.” The wretched physician was subjected to worse sufferings.
His gaoler was a certain Wu, nicknamed “The Gaoler” by nearly everybody.
He was kindly disposed to Hua Tuo and saw that he was well fed.
Hua Tuo conceived a liking for his gaoler and said to him one day, “I am doomed, I know. The pity is that my Black Bag treatise on medicine may be lost.
You have been most kind to me, and as I have no other way of recompensing you, I will give you a letter to my wife telling her to send the Black Bag, and I will give it to you that you may carry on my art.” Wu the Gaoler rejoiced greatly, thinking that he would throw away the menial position of gaoler and travel about the country healing sick folks, and so he told Hua Tuo to write the letter and promised to carry on his work.
The letter was written and given to Wu the Gaoler, who lost no time in traveling to Jincheng to meet with Hua Tuo's wife, and she gave him the Black Bag to bring back to Hua Tuo.
After Hua Tuo had read through the book carefully, he presented it to Wu the Gaoler, who took it home and hid it away.
Ten days after this, Hua Tuo died in prison.
Wu the Gaoler bought a coffin and had him buried. This done, he quitted the prison and went home. But when he asked for the book, he found that his wife had discovered it and was using it to light the fire. He snatched away what was left of it, but a whole volume was missing, and what was left amounted only to a few pages.
He vented his anger in cursing his wife, and she retorted, saying, “If you become such a learned person as Hua Tuo, you will only die in prison like him.
What good did it all do him?” It struck Wu the Gaoler that there was something in what she said, and he ceased grumbling at her.
But the upshot of all this was that the learning in the “Treatise of the Black Bag” was finally lost to the world, for what was left only contained a few recipes relating to domestic animals.
Hua Tuo was the ablest of physician, Seeing what diseases were lurking within beings.
That he died, and his writings Followed him to the Nine Golden Springs. Meanwhile, Cao Cao became worse, the uncertainty of the intentions of his rivals aggravating his disease not a little.
Then they said an envoy had come with letters from Wu, the gist of which was satisfactory, as it ran like this:
“Thy servant, Sun Quan, has long seen whom destiny indicates as master of all, and looks forward with confidence to his early accession to the dignity of the Son of God. If he will send his armies to destroy Liu Bei and sweep rebellion from the two Lands of Rivers, his servant at the head of his armies will submit and accept his land as a fief.” Cao Cao laughed as he read this, and he said to his officers, “Is this youth trying to put me on a furnace?” But Minister Chen Qun and the attendants seriously replied, “O Prince, the Hans have been feeble too long, while your virtues and merits are like the mountains.
All the people look to you, and when Sun Quan acknowledged himself as your minister, he is but responsive to the will of God and the desire of humans. It is wrong that you oppose when such contrary influences work to a common end, and you must soon ascend to the high place.” Cao Cao smiled.
“I have served the Hans for many years; and if I have acquired some merit, yet I have been rewarded with a princedom and high rank. I dare not aspire to greater things.
If the finger of heaven points to me, then shall I be as King Wen of Zhou.” “As Sun Quan acknowledges himself your servant and promises obedience, you, my lord, can confer a title upon him and assign to him the duty of attacking Liu Bei,” said Sima Yi.
Approving of the suggestion, Cao Cao gave Sun Quan the titles of General of the Flying Cavalry and Lord of Nanzhang, and appointed him to the Imperial Protectorship of Jingzhou. Forthwith this command was sent away to Sun Quan.
Cao Cao's condition grew worse daily.
One night he had a dream of three horses feeding out of the same manger. Next day he told it to Jia Xu, saying, “I saw three horses feeding on the same manger before the family of Ma Teng was harmed. Last night I saw the same dream again. How do you interpret it?” “It is auspicious to dream of dignity,” replied Jia Xu. “And naturally such an honor comes to the Caos.
I do not think you need feel any misgivings.” Cao Cao was comforted.
Cao Cao dreamed three steeds together fed, The vision seers could not explain, None guessed how soon, when Cao Cao was dead, One dynasty would rule again.
Ah, yes; Cao Cao had vainly wrought; Of none avail each wicked wile, For, later, in Wei court, there fought Against him one with equal guile.
That night Cao Cao became worse. As he lay on his couch he felt dizzy and could not see, so he rose and sat by a table, upon which he leaned.
It seemed to him that someone shrieked, and, peering into the darkness, he perceived the forms of many of his victims—the Empress Fu, the Consort Dong, Fu Wan, Dong Cheng, and more than twenty other officials—, and all were bloodstained.
They stood in the obscurity and whispered, demanding his life. He rose, lifted his sword and threw it wildly into the air. Just then there was a loud crash, and the southwest corner of the new building came down. And Cao Cao fell with it.
His attendants raised him and bore him to another palace, where he might lie at peace. But he found no peace.
The next night was disturbed by the ceaseless wailing of men and women's voices.
When day dawned, Cao Cao sent for his officers, and said to them, “Thirty years have I spent in the turmoil of war and have always refused belief in the supernatural.
But what does all this mean?” “O Prince, you should summon the Taoists to offer sacrifices and prayers,” said they.
Cao Cao sighed, saying, “The wise Teacher said, 'He who offends against heaven has no one to pray to.' I feel that my fate is accomplished, my days have run, and there is no help.” But he would not consent to call in the priests.
Next day his symptoms were worse. He was panting and could no longer see distinctly. He sent hastily for Xiahou Dun, who came at once. But as Xiahou Dun drew near the doors, he too saw the shadowy forms of the slain Empress and her children and many other victims of Cao Cao's cruelty.
He was overcome with fear and fell to the ground. The servants raised him and led him away, very ill.
Then Cao Cao called in four of his trusty advisers—Cao Hong, Chen Qun, Jia Xu, and Sima Yi—that they might hear his last wishes.
Cao Hong, speaking for the four, said, “Take good care of your precious self, O Prince, that you may quickly recover.” But Cao Cao said, “Thirty and more years have I gone up and down, and many a bold leader has fallen before me. The only ones that remain are Sun Quan in the south and Liu Bei in the west. I have not yet slain them.
Now I am very ill, and I shall never again stand before you; wherefore my family affairs must be settled.
My first born—Cao Ang, son of Lady Liu—fell in battle at Wancheng, when he was young.
The Lady Bian bore four sons to me, as you know.
The third, Cao Zhi, was my favorite, but he was vain and unreliable, fond of wine and lax in morals. Therefore he is not my heir.
My second son, Cao Zhang, is valiant, but imprudent.
The fourth, Cao Xiong, is a weakly and may not live long.
My eldest, Cao Pi, is steady and serious; he is fit to succeed me, and I look to you to support him.” Cao Hong and the others wept as they heard these words, and they left the chamber.
Then Cao Cao bade his servants bring all of the Tibetan incenses and fragrances that he burned every day, and he handed out to his handmaids. And he said to them, “After my death you must diligently attend to your womanly labors.
You can make silken shoes for sale, and so earn your own living.” He also bade them go on living in the Bronze Bird Pavilion and celebrate a daily sacrifice for him, with music by the singing women, and presentation of the eatables laid before his tablet.
Next he commanded that seventy-two sites for a tomb should be selected near Jiangwu, that no one should know his actual burying place, lest his remains should be dug up.
And when these final orders had been given, he sighed a few times, shed some tears, and died.
He was sixty-six, and passed away in the first month of the twenty-fifth year .
A certain poet composed “A Song of Yejun” expressing sympathy for Cao Cao, which is given here: I stood in Yejun and saw the River Zhang Go gliding by. I thought no common human Ever rose from such a place. Or he was great In war, a poet, or an artist skilled. Perchance a model minister, or son, Or famous for fraternal duty shown.
The thoughts of heroes are not ours to judge, Nor are their actions for our eyes to see.
A man may stand the first in merit; then His crimes may brand him chief of criminals.
And so his reputation's fair and foul; His literary gifts may bear the mark Of genius; he may be a ruler born; But this is certain; he will stand above His fellows, herding not with common people.
Takes he the field, then is he bold in fight; Would he a mansion build, a palace springs. In all things great, his genius masters him. And such was Cao Cao. He could never be Obedient; he a rebel was, foredoomed.
He seized and ruled, but hungered for more power; Became a prince, and still was not content. And yet this man of glorious career When gripped by sickness, wept as might a child. Full well he knew, when on the bed of death, That all is vanity and nothing worth. His latest acts were kindly.
Simple gifts Of fragrant incense gave he to the maids.
The ancients' splendid deeds or secret thoughts We may not measure with our puny rule.
But criticize them, pedants, as ye may The mighty dead will smile at what you say.
As Cao Cao breathed his last, the whole of those present raised a great wailing and lamentation.
The news was sent to the members of the family, the Heir Cao Pi, Lord of Yanling Cao Zhang, Lord of Linzi Cao Zhi, and Lord of Xiaohuai Cao Xiong.
They wrapped the body in its shroud, enclosed it in a silver shell, and laid it in a golden coffin, which was sent at once home to Yejun.
The eldest son wept aloud at the tidings and went out with all his following to meet the procession and escort the body of his father into his home.
The coffin was laid in a great hall beside the main building, and all the officials in deep mourning wailed in the hall.
Suddenly one stood out from the ranks of the mourners and said, “I would request the heir to cease lamentation for the dead and devote himself to the present needs of state.” It was Sima Fu, and he continued, “The death of the Prince will cause an upheaval in the empire, and it is essential that the heir should assume his dignity without loss of time. There is not mourning alone to be seen to.” The others replied.
“The succession is settled, but the investiture can hardly proceed without the necessary edict from the Emperor.
That must be secured.” Said Chen Jiao, who was Minister of War, “As the Prince died away from home, it may be that disputes will ensue, and the country will be in danger.” Then Chen Jiao slashed off the sleeves of his robe with a sword and shouted fiercely, “We will invest the prince forthwith, and any one who do not agree, let him be treated as this robe.” Still fear held most of the assembly. Then arrived Hua Xin most haste from the capital.
They wondered what his sudden arrival meant.
Soon he entered the hall and said, “The Prince of Wei is dead and the world is in commotion; why do you not invest his successor quickly?” “We await the command,” cried they in chorus, “and also the order of Princess-Mother Bian concerning the heirship.” “I have procured the Imperial edict here,” cried he, pulling it out from his breast.
They all began to congratulate him.
And he read the edict.
Hua Xin had always been devoted to Wei, and so he drafted this edict and got it sealed by Emperor Xian almost by force.
However, there it was; and therein Cao Pi was named as Prince of Wei, First Minister, and Imperial Protector of Jizhou.” Cao Pi thereupon took his seat in the princely place and received the congratulations of all the officers. This was followed by a banquet. However, all was not to pass too smoothly. While the banquet was in progress, the news came:
“Cao Zhang, Lord of Yanling, with an army of one hundred thousand troops, is approaching from Changan.” In a state of consternation, the new Prince turned to his courtiers, saying, “What shall I do?
This young, golden-bearded brother of mine, always obstinate and determined and with no little military skill, is marching hither with an army to contest my inheritance.” “Let me go to see the Marquis; I can make him desist,” said one of the guests.
The others cried, “Only yourself, O Exalted One, can save us in this peril!” Quarrel between two sons of Cao Cao Just as in the House of Yuan Shao.
If you would know who proposed himself as envoy, read the next chapter. CHAPTER 79. Brother Oppressing Brother: Cao Zhi Composes Poems; Nephew Harming Uncle: Liu Feng Receives Punishment.
All eyes turned toward the speaker, High Minister Jia Kui, and the young prince commanded him to undertake the mission.
So he went out of the city and sought to speak with Cao Zhang. Cao Zhang came quickly to the point.
“Who has the late Prince's seal?” asked he.
Jia Kui replied seriously, “There is an eldest son to a house, and an heirapparent to a state.
Such a question from your lordship is unbecoming.” Cao Zhang held his peace, and the two proceeded into the city to the gates of the palace.
There Jia Kui suddenly asked him, “You come as a mourner or as a rival claimant?” “I am come as a mourner; I never had any ulterior motive.” “That being so; why bring in your soldiers?” Whereupon Cao Zhang ordered his escort to retire, and entered the city alone.
When the Cao brothers met, they fell into each other's arms and wept.
Then Cao Zhang yielded command of all his army, and he was directed to go back to Yanling and guard it. He obediently withdrew.
Cao Pi, being now firmly established, changed the name of the period of his rule to the Prolonged Repose Era, the First Year .
He made Jia Xu Grand Commandant, Hua Xin Prime Minister, and Wang Lang High Minister, and made many promotions.
To the late Prince, he gave the posthumous title of the King of Great Might, and buried him in Gaoling. To the superintendence of the building of King Cao's tomb, Cao Pi nominated Yu Jin, but with malevolent intent.
For when Yu Jin reached his post, he found the walls of the rooms decorated with chalk sketches depicting the drowning of the seven armies and the capture of himself by Guan Yu. Guan Yu was looking very dignified and severe. Pang De was refusing to bow to the victor, while Yu Jin himself was lying in the dust pleading for his life.
Cao Pi had chosen this method of putting Yu Jin to open shame, because Yu Jin had not preferred death to the dishonor of capture, and had sent an artist on purpose to depict the shameful scenes.
When Yu Jin saw them, shame and rage alternately took possession of him till he fell ill. Soon after he died. War waged he for many a year, Yet fell prey to craven fear.
None can know another's heart, Drawing tigers, with bones start.
Soon after the accession, Hua Xin memorialized the Prince of Wu, saying, “The Lord of Yanling has cut himself loose from his army and gone quietly to his post, but your other two brothers did not attend the funeral of their father.
Their conduct should be inquired into and punished.” Cao Pi took up the suggestion and sent commissioners to each. They who were sent to the younger quickly returned to report:
“Cao Xiong, the Lord of Xiaohuai, had hanged himself rather than suffer for his fault.” Cao Pi ordered honorable burial for Cao Xiong and gave him the posthumous title of Prince of Xiaohuai. Soon after, the envoy to Linzi returned to report:
“The Lord of Linzi, Cao Zhi, is spending his time in dissipation, his especial boon companions being two brothers named Ding Zhengli and Ding Jingli. They were very rude. When we presented ourselves, Cao Zhi sat bolt upright, but would not say a word.
Ding Zhengli used insulting words, saying, 'King Cao intended our lord to succeed, but was turned there from by the slanderous tongues of certain among you.
As soon as he is dead, your master begins to think of punishment for his own flesh and blood.' “The other brother Ding Jingli said, 'In intellect our lord leads the age, and he ought to have been heir to his father.
Now, not only does he not succeed, but he is treated in this harsh way by a lot of courtiers of your sort, ignorant of what genius means.' “And then Cao Zhi, in a fit of anger, had ordered his lictors to beat the chief envoy and turn him out.” This treatment of his messenger annoyed Cao Pi greatly, and he dispatched a force of three thousand Imperial Tiger Guards under Xu Chu to arrest his brother and all his immediate surroundings. When Xu Chu arrived Linzi, the gate commander stopped him.
Xu Chu slew that general and entered the city, unchallenged.
He went to the residence and found Cao Zhi and all his companions dead drunk; so he bound them, put them into carts, and sent them to court in Yejun. He also arrested all the officers of the palace.
Cao Pi's first order was to put to death Ding Zhengli and Ding Jingli. The two brothers were not wholly base; they had a reputation for learning, and many were sorry for them.
Cao Pi's mother, Lady Bian, was alarmed at the severity of the new rule, and the suicide of her youngest son wounded her deeply.
When she heard that Cao Zhi had been arrested and his comrades put to death, she left her palace and went to see her eldest son.
As soon as he saw her, the Prince hastened to meet her. She began to weep.
“Your brother has always had that weakness for wine, but we let him go his way out of consideration for his undoubted ability.
I hope you will not forget he is your brother and that I bore you both.
Spare his life that I may close my eyes in peace when I set out for the deep springs.” “I also admire his ability, Mother, and have no intention to hurt him.
But I would reform him. Have no anxiety as to his fate,” said Cao Pi.
So the mother was comforted and withdrew.
The Prince then went to a private room and bade them call his brother.
Said Hua Xin, “Surely the Princess-Mother has just been interceding for your brother; is it not so?” “It is so,” replied the Prince.
“Then let me say that Cao Zhi is too clever to be content to remain in a humble station.
If you do not remove him, he will do you harm.” “I must obey my mother's command.” “People say your brother simply talks in literature. I do not believe it myself, but he might be put to the test.
If he bears a false reputation, you can slay him; if what they say is true, then degrade him, lest the scholars of the land should babble.” Soon Cao Zhi came, and in a state of great trepidation bowed low before his elder brother, confessing his fault.
The Prince addressed him, saying, “Though we are brothers, yet the proper relation between us of prince and minister must not be overlooked. Why then did you behave indecorously?
While the late Prince lived, you made a boast of your literary powers, but I am disposed to think you may have made use of another's pen.
Now I require you to compose a poem within the time taken to walk seven paces, and I will spare your life if you succeed.
If you fail, then I shall punish you with rigor.” “Will you suggest a theme?” asked Cao Zhi.
Now there was hanging in the hall a black and white sketch of two bulls that had been fighting at the foot of a wall, and one of them had just fallen dead into a well.
Cao Pi pointed to the sketch and said, “Take that as the subject.
But you are forbidden to use the words 'two bulls, one bull, fighting, wall's foot, falling, well and dead.'“ Cao Zhi took seven paces and then recited this poem:
Two butcher's victims lowing walked along, Each head bore curving bones, a sturdy pair, They met just by a hillock, both were strong, Each would avoid a pit new dug there.
They fought unequal battle, for at length One lay below a gory mass, inert.
It was not that they were of unequal strength Though wrathful both, one did not strength exert.
This exhibition of skill amazed the Prince and the whole court.
Cao Pi thought he would use another test, so he bade his brother improvise on the theme of their fraternal relationship, the words “brotherhood" or “brother” being barred.
Without seeming to reflect, Cao Zhi rattled off this rhyme: They were boiling beans on a beanstalk fire; Came a plaintive voice from the pot, “O why, since we sprang from the selfsame root, Should you kill me with anger hot?” The allusion in these verses to the cruel treatment of one member of a family by another was not lost upon Cao Pi, and he dropped a few silent tears.
The mother of both men came out at this moment from her abiding place and said, “Should the elder brother thus oppress the younger?” The Prince jumped from his seat, saying, “My mother, the laws of the state cannot be nullified.” Cao Zhi was degraded to the rank of Lord of Anxiang.
He accepted the decision without a murmur and at once left his brother's court by horse.
Cao Pi's accession was the signal for a set of new laws and new commands. His behavior toward Emperor Xian was more intemperate than his father's had ever been.
The stories of his harshness reached Chengdu and almost frightened Liu Bei, who summoned his counselors to discuss what he should do. Said he, “Since the death of Cao Cao and the accession of his son, the position of the Emperor has changed for the worse.
Sun Quan acknowledges the lordship of Wei, and its influence is becoming too great.
I am disposed to destroy Sun Quan in revenge for the death of my brother. That done.
I will proceed to the Capital District and purge the whole land of rebellion.
What think you?” Then Liao Hua stood out from the ranks of officers and threw himself upon the earth, saying with tears, “Liu Feng and Meng Da were the true cause of the death of your brother and his adopted son; both these renegades deserve death.” Liu Bei was of the same opinion and was going to send and arrest them forthwith, but here Zhuge Liang intervened and gave wiser advice.
“That is not the way; go slowly or you may stir up strife.
Promote these two and separate them. After that you may arrest.” The Prince of Hanzhong saw the prudence of this procedure and stayed his hand.
He raised Liu Feng to the Governorship of Mianzhu, and so separated the two delinquents.
Now Peng Yang and Meng Da were old friends. Hearing what was afoot, the former hastened home and wrote warning his friend. The letter was confided to a trusty messenger to bear to Meng Da.
The messenger was caught as he went out of the city and carried before Ma Chao, who thus got wind of the business.
He then went to Peng Yang's house, where, nothing being suspected, he was received kindly and wine was brought in.
The two drank for some time. When Ma Chao thought his host sufficiently off his guard, he said, “The Prince of Hanzhong used to look on you with great favor; why does he do so no longer?” The host began to rave against his master. “The obstinate old leather-belly!
But I will find some way to pay him out.” In order to see to what lengths he would go, Ma Chao led him on, saying, “Truth to tell, I have long hated the man too.” “Then you join Meng Da and attack, while I will win over the people of Eastern and Western Lands of Rivers. That will make it easy enough,” said Peng Yang.
“What you propose is very feasible, but we will talk it over again tomorrow,” said Ma Chao, and took leave.
Taking with him the captured man and the letter he carried, Ma Chao then proceeded to see the Prince, to whom he related the whole story.
Liu Bei was very angry and at once had the intended traitor arrested and put in prison, where he was examined under torture to get at full details.
While Peng Yang lay in prison, bitterly but vainly repentant, Liu Bei consulted his adviser.
“That fellow Peng Yang meant to turn traitor; what shall I do with him?” “The fellow is something of a scholar, but irresponsible,” replied Zhuge Liang.
“He is too dangerous to be left alive.” Thereupon orders were given that he should be allowed to commit suicide in gaol. The news that Peng Yang had been made away frightened his sympathizer and friend, Meng Da, and put him in a quandary. What would he better do on the top of this?
Liu Feng's promotion and transfer to Mianzhu arrived, and frightened him still more.
So he sought advice from two friends and commanders, the brothers Shen Dan and Shen Yi, who lived in Shangyong. “My friend Peng Yang and I did much for the Prince of Hanzhong.
But now Peng Yang is dead, and I am forgotten. More than that, the Prince wishes to put me to death. What can I do?” said Meng Da.
Shen Dan replied, “I think I can find a plan that will secure your safety.” “What is it?” asked Meng Da, feeling happier. “Desertion. My brother Shen Yi and I have long desired to go over to Wei. You just write the Prince of Hanzhong a memorial resigning your service and betake yourself to the Prince of Wei, who will certainly employ you in some honorable way.
Then we two will follow.” Meng Da saw that this was his best course, so he wrote a memorandum, which he gave to the messenger who had brought the recent dispatches to take back with him.
That night Meng Da left his post and went to Wei.
The messenger returned to Chengdu, handed in Meng Da's memorial and told the story of his desertion.
The Prince was angry. He tore open the letter and read: “In the humble opinion of thy servant, O Prince, you have set out to accomplish a task comparable with that of Yi Yin, and to walk in the meritorious footsteps of Lu Wang in building the fame of Kings Wen and Huan. When the great design was rough-hewn, you had the support of the lands of the states of Wu and Chu, wherefore many people of ability incontinently joined you.
Since I entered your service, I have committed many faults; and if I recognize them, how much more do you see them!
Now, O Prince, you are surrounded by famous people, while I, useless as a helper at home and inept as a leader abroad, should be shamed were I to take a place among them.
“It is well known that when Fan Li saw certain eventualities, he went sailing on the lakes, and Zi Fan acknowledged his faults and stayed by the rivers.
Inasmuch as one cannot take means of safeguarding one's self at the critical and dangerous moment, I desire—as is my duty—to go away as I came, untainted.
Moreover, I am stupid and without use or merit, merely born in these days as the sport of circumstances.
“In the days of old, Shen Sheng, though perfectly filial, incurred the suspicions of his father and died; Zi Xu, though perfectly loyal, was put to death.
Meng Tian, though he extended the borders of Qin, suffered the extreme penalty; and Yue Yi, though he destroyed the might of Qi, was the victim of calumny.
Whenever I have read of these men, I have been moved to tears, and now I am in like case and the more mortified.
“Lately Jingzhou was overwhelmed, and I, an officer of rank, failed in my duty, not one in a hundred behaving as I should.
Only I return Fangling and Shangyong and seek service abroad.
Now I desire you, O Prince, graciously to understand, to sympathize with thy servant and to condone the step he is about to take.
Really I am but a mean man, incapable of great deeds.
I know what I am doing, and I dare to say it is no small fault. “They say that dissolution of bonds should not occasion recrimination, and the dismissed servant should take leave without heart-burning.
I have taken your orders many times, and now, O Prince, you must act yourself.
I write this with extreme trepidation.” But the reading gave rise to great anger in the breast of the Prince. “The unmerited fellow!” said he.
“He turns traitor and dares to insult me by sending a letter of farewell.” Liu Bei was just giving orders to send a force to seize the deserter, when Zhuge Liang interposed, saying, “You would better send Liu Feng to capture him and let the two tigers worry each other to weakness.
Whether Liu Feng succeeds or fails, he will have to come to the capital, and you can kill him. Thus will you cut off two evils.” Liu Bei took his advice.
Orders were sent to Mianzhu, and Liu Feng obediently led out his troops.
Now Meng Da arrived when Cao Pi was holding a great council.
When the attendants told him that General Meng Da of Shu had come, Cao Pi summoned him to enter and said to him, “Is not this an insincere surrender?” Meng Da replied, “I was in fear of death for not having relieved Guan Yu. That is my only reason for coming.” However, Cao Pi did not trust him.
When they reported that Liu Feng was coming to arrest him, with a large army, and had attacked Xiangyang and was challenging Meng Da to battle, Cao Pi said, “You seem to be true.
Go then to Xiangyang and take Liu Feng.
If you bring me his head, I shall no longer doubt.” Meng Da replied, “I will convince him by argument; no soldiers will be needed.
I will bring him to surrender too.” So Meng Da was made General Who Establishes Strong Arms, Lord of Pingyang, and Governor of Xincheng, and sent to guard Xiangyang and Fankou.
Now there were two generals there already, Xiahou Shang and Xu Huang, who engaged in reducing the surrounding territories.
Meng Da arrived, met his two colleagues, and was told that Liu Feng was fifteen miles from the city. Whereupon Meng Da wrote him a letter urging him to surrender.
But Liu Feng was in no mood to surrender; instead he tore up the letter and put the messenger to death.
“The renegade has already made me offend against my duty to my uncle, and now would sever me from my father so that I shall be reproached as disloyal and unfilial,” said Liu Feng.
Meng Da went out with his army to give battle. Liu Feng rode to the front, pointed with his sword at his opponent and railed against him.
“Death is very near you,” replied Meng Da, “yet you continue blindly in the way of foolishness and will not understand.” Liu Feng rode out flourishing his sword.
He engaged Meng Da, who ran away before the conflict had well begun. Liu Feng pursued hotly to seven miles. Then he fell into an ambush and found himself attacked on two sides by Xiahou Shang and Xu Huang. Also Meng Da returned to the attack.
Liu Feng was forced to fly. He made straight for Shangyong, pursued all the way. When he reached the city and hailed the gate, he was met by a volley of arrows.
“I have surrendered to Wei,” cried Shen Dan from the city tower.
It was impossible to attack the city, as the army of Wei was close behind, and having no resting place, he set off for Fangling. He arrived there to find the banners of Wei set out along the walls. Then he saw Shen Yi wave a signal from the tower, and at once there appeared from the shelter of the wall a body of soldiers led by Xu Huang. Then Liu Feng made for home.
But he was pursued, and only a hundred riders of his remained to him when he regained Chengdu.
Seeking an interview with his father, he found but scant sympathy, for in response to his petition, made prostrate, and weeping, Liu Bei said, “Shameful son!
How are you come to see me at all?” “My uncle's mishap was not due to my refusal of help, but because Meng Da thwarted me.” “You eat as a man, you dress as a man; but you have no more the instincts of a man than an image of clay or wood.
What mean you by saying another wretch thwarted you?” Liu Bei bade the executioners expel Liu Feng and put him to death.
But the Prince felt some compunction later when he heard of Liu Feng's treatment to the messenger who had brought Meng Da's letter inviting him to become a traitor.
And he gave way to grief for the death of Guan Yu until he fell ill.
So no military movements were made.
After he had succeeded to the princedom, Cao Pi raised all his officers to high rank and had an army prepared of three hundred thousand, and maneuvered them over the southern territories and made great feasts in the county of Qiao in the old state of Pei, which was the land of his ancestors.
As the grand army passed by, the aged villagers lined the roads offering gifts of wine, just as when the Founder of the Hans returned home to Pei.
When it was announced that the Regent Marshal Xiahou Dun was near death, Cao Pi hastened back to Yejun, but arrived too late to see him.
He put on mourning for the great leader and instituted magnificent funeral ceremonies.
In the late summer of this same year, it was reported that a phoenix had been seen to bow at Shiyi, and a linlion had appeared at Linzi, while a yellow dragon was observed in Yejun.
Whereupon Imperial Commander Li Fu and Minister Xu Zhi discussed these appearances, and putting them all together they concluded, saying, “Those splendid signs presage that Wei is about to supplant Han, and the altar of abdication should be set up.” Presently a deputation of forty high officers, both military and civil, led by Hua Xin, Wang Lang, Xin Pi, Jia Xu, Liu Ye, Liu Yi, Chen Jiao, Chen Qun, and Huan Jie went into the Palace and proposed to Emperor Xian that he should abdicate and yield to the Prince of Wei, Cao Pi.
It is time to set up the throne of Wei, And steal the land from the Hans.
The next chapter will record the Emperor's reply. CHAPTER 80.
Cao Pi Deposes The Emperor, Taking Away The Fortunes of Hans; Liu Bei Assumes The Throne, Continuing The Heritage. Hua Xin was the spokesman of the deputation of officers that went into the palace, and he spoke thus:
“Since the inauguration of the Prince of Wei, virtue has spread to the four corners of the empire and humanity has permeated all the earth to a degree unexcelled in all the ages, even in the days of the ancient rulers, King Tang and King Yu.
We, your servants, have taken account of these things and have reached the conclusion that the fortunes of Han is worn out, wherefore we trust Your Majesty, in imitation of the great prototypes King Yao and King Shun, will yield the mountains, the rivers, and the peoples to a more able guardian and high priest of the sacrifices in the person of the Prince of Wei, thereby pleasing Heaven and satisfying the hearts of humans, and enabling Your Majesty to enjoy the happiness of freedom and repose from the exacting duties of the chief ruler. The happiness of your ancestors and of humanity at large would thereby be enhanced.
Having thoroughly debated this matter, we have come to lay it before you.” The Emperor listened in amazement, and for a time could not reply.
Then, looking at the assembly, he said sadly, “How can I abandon my empire for the sake of repose—the empire won by my Great Ancestor, its Founder, when, with a three-span sword, he slew the Snake and restored Right, and consolidated when he reduced Qin and overwhelmed Chu—the empire which has been handed down for four centuries?
Though I possess not brilliant talents, yet I have done no wrong.
Go back and debate this again in a just and moderate spirit.” Then Hua Xin led forward Xu Zhi and Li Fu nearer the throne, saying, “If Your Majesty thinks we may be mistaken, pray ask these two, who will explain.” Said Li Fu, “Since the Prince of Wei has taken his seat, the Linlion has descended, the Phoenix has appeared, the yellow Dragon has come forth, the Grain of Felicity has flourished, and Sweet Dew has watered the earth.
All these things augur that Heaven decrees a change and Wei must replace Han.” Xu Zhi continued, “The astrologers, watching the aspect of the skies at night, have seen the blazing light of the star of Han gradually fade away and Your Majesty's own star become dim.
On the other hand, the aspect of the sky and the attitude of the earth have been wholly bright in favor of Wei to a degree hard to state in words.
Moreover, the lots have been cast, and they gave the word 'Devil, at the side, has been sent, there must be an inroad upon Han without word'; another lot, 'Word, in east, light moves west, two suns radiating as the air blows south.' These oracles gave two words which, joined, compose Xu; 'two suns, one on the other,' which is Chang.
These signs are unmistakeable, for when put together the whole reads, 'Wei at Xuchang is to receive the abdication of Han.' If you consider, Your Majesty must admit this.” “All empty words and madness, this talk of auguries and lots!
Is it reasonable that I should suddenly abandon the great heritage for such nonsense?” Then Wang Lang said, “Wax and wane has been the law of all things from the beginning; every period of glory is followed by one of obscurity.
Has any rule endured forever or any House never failed?
The rule of Han, handed down through four centuries to Yourself, has lost its vigor, and the time has come to yield.
Retirement may not be delayed or confusion will ensue.” The Emperor wept aloud and retired to his private chamber, while the officers left the hall laughing.
Next morning they assembled in the court, but the Emperor did not appear. So they sent the palace officers to request his presence.
Still he feared to show himself.
The Empress Cao asked him, “Why do Your Majesty not hold the court as usual, especially when you are requested to go out?” “Because your brother wishes to depose me and become Emperor himself.
He has set the whole host of officers against me to force me to abdicate, and I will not expose myself to this compulsion.” “But what can have induced my brother to do such a dreadfully rebellious thing?” said she angrily.
Just as she spoke, Cao Hong and Cao Xiu, both armed, forced their way into the inner apartments and requested His Majesty to come to the Hall of Audience. The Empress broke out into abuse:
“So you are two of the disorderly rebels who, for the sake of your own ends, have conspired to upset all the good service of my father.
Though he overshadowed the whole land, yet he never dared to aspire to the sacred Throne. But my brother, who has only just succeeded him, sets no bounds to his ambition and temerity and would usurp the Throne.
Heaven will surely cut off his offspring!” She wept bitterly as she went away, and the attendants sobbed and wept too.
But Cao Xiu and Cao Hong still urged the Emperor to go to the Hall of Audience, and at last he had to yield. There Hua Xin took up the question again.
“Your Majesty should act as was advised yesterday and so avoid any misfortune.” The Emperor sobbed, “All of you have eaten of the bounty of Han for years, and among you are many whose fathers and grandfathers were conspicuous for merit.
How can you bring yourselves to act thus improperly toward me?” “If Your Majesty refuses to follow advice, I fear that there will soon be trouble in the family.
Really we are not disloyal.” “Who would dare to murder me?” cried the Emperor.
“Everyone knows that Your Majesty lacks the happy attributes of a successful ruler and that is why there is so much confusion in the country.
If it was not for the presence of the Prince of Wei in your court, many a man would murder you.
Your Majesty has never yet learned how to treat people; is your sole desire to set people against you?” The Emperor, alarmed at the violence of his language, shook out his sleeves and rose to go away.
Then Wang Lang glanced at Hua Xin, who rushed forward and seized the Emperor by the sleeve. “Is it consent or not?” cried he angrily.
“One word!” The Emperor was dumb with terror.
“Where is the Keeper of the Seal?” shouted Cao Hong and Cao Xiu, drawing their swords.
“The Keeper of the Seal is here,” said Zu Bi, stepping calmly to the front.
They tried to force the seal from him, but he cried, “The Seal belongs to the Emperor, and I will not yield it!” Cao Hong called up the executioners and told them to behead him, which they did.
Zu Bi abused the ruffians to the last breath.
Dethroned by wicked traitors was the ruling House of Han, They falsely claimed as precedent the deeds of Yu and Tang.
The crowd of officers at court were all on Cao Pi's side, Save one, Zu Bi the Keeper of the Seal, and loyally he died.
The Emperor was in a state of abject terror, and when he saw the whole court filling up with armed guards, all the soldiers of Wei and so enemies, he burst into tears.
“Yes; I will give up the throne to the Prince, if haply I may be spared to live out the few years Heaven has assigned me,” wailed he.
“The Prince will always take care of Your Majesty,” said Jia Xu.
“It would be as well to prepare the abdication manifesto quickly so as to preserve tranquillity.” Such a hint could not be missed, and Chen Qun was directed to draft the document.
As soon as it was finished, Hua Xin followed by a host of officers, took it off to the palace and presented it, with the Imperial Hereditary Seal, in the name of the Emperor.
Very joyfully, Cao Pi read this writing:
“During the whole of my thirty-two years of reign the land has been in a state of turmoil, but the spirits of my ancestors have preserved me in the midst of danger.
Now from the signs of the heavens and the hearts of the people, I see that the virtue of the Hans is exhausted, and happy fortune has devolved upon the House of Wei, as may be seen from the success in war enjoyed by the late King Cao and the resplendent virtue of the present Prince, which answers to the times.
“By all noble principles the empire is no private possession, but a public trust.
Wherefore the great King Yao, to his eternal glory, passed over his own son. How I admire this deed!
Now in imitation thereof I have resolved to abdicate in favor of my Chief Minister, the Prince of Wei, who will not, I hope, disappoint my wishes.” Cao Pi heard this and was going to accept it as final.
But Sima Yi said no:
“Although the declaration and the seal have been sent, yet decorum demands refusal at first so as to silence people's criticism.” Then Wang Lang drafted a memorial modestly declining the proposal of succession on the ground of unfitness and asking that some other be sought.
When this reached the Emperor, he was much perturbed and asked what was to be done next.
Replied Hua Xin, “When his father was offered a princedom, he declined thrice, but he finally accepted. Wherefore Your Majesty should renew the offer.
The Prince will end by acceptance.” There was no help for it, and so Huan Jie was bidden to draft another declaration of offer, which was sent by the hand of the Officer of the Dynastic Temple, Zhang Yin, together with the emblems and the seal. This new declaration read thus: “To the Prince of Wei. You have sent your modest refusal of our offer to abdicate.
But I have long since seen that the virtue of Han is passing, and I could only rely upon the late Prince, your father, who virtuously undertook the great task of removing the evil oppressors and purging the land. Now his son Cao Pi has succeeded.
His perfect virtue is resplendent, his fame universal and his benevolence is wafted to all parts.
The divine choice rests upon him.
“In the days of old, Yao the Great would abdicate, and did so in favor of Shun, who possessed merit after his twenty accomplishments; and the Godking Shun in the same manner handed the Throne to Yu after he had labored to control the floodwaters.
The House of Han succeeded in the course of ages to the work of Yao and now passes on the sacred trust, to promote the repose of the Earth and manifest the command of Heaven. “By the hand of the Minister Zhang Yin, this is sent with the emblems and the seal.” Greatly rejoicing, Cao Pi received this.
But he said to Jia Xu, “Although I have received two such declarations, yet I fear that I may not escape being branded as a usurper by posterity.” “That is easily arranged,” replied Jia Xu.
“Direct Zhang Yin to take the seal back again, and tell Hua Xin to cause the Emperor to set up a Terrace of Abdication and select an auspicious day for the ceremony.
Then assemble all the officers at the terrace, and cause the Emperor to offer the seal with his own hands and surrender the empire to you.
Thus can you dissipate all doubts and prevent any caviling.” So the seal was once more rejected with a memorial to say so.
Zhang Yin returned and the Emperor inquired of the courtiers how he was to understand this act.
Then Hua Xin said, “Your Majesty can set up a Terrace of Abdication and assemble nobles, officers, and common people to witness the act of abdication.
Thereafter the descendants of your House shall receive favor at the hands of Wei.” The Emperor consented and sent officials in the Office of Imperial Ceremonies to select a site at Fanyang.
And there they built a terrace of three stories, and they chose an auspicious day of the tenth month for the act of abdication.
On the appointed day, Emperor Xian requested Cao Pi to ascend the terrace and receive his abdication. At the foot of the terrace stood the officials, more than four hundred, and the Imperial Guards and the Tiger Guards, and soldiers to the number of three hundred thousand. Thereupon the Emperor presented the seal, which Cao Pi received into his hands.
Then all those about the terrace knelt to listen to the reading of the manifesto: “To the Prince of Wei.
In days of old, Yao yielded the empire to Shun, and Shun in turn gave it to Yu. The will of Heaven does not follow the way of mortals, but seeks the virtuous.
The rule of Han has lost its virility and the times are out of joint.
When my turn came to rule, great disorder arose, and evils stalked abroad till the empire was in danger of subversion.
I trusted to the military genius of the late Prince of Wei to restore order and purge away the evil, whereby to ensure tranquillity to my House.
What could my single hand do to correct this and ensure peace for my Nine Domains?
“The present Prince has succeeded to his father; he is also resplendent in virtue, capable as Wu the Military King and Wen the Scholar King of the great task, brilliant in the glory of his father.
The spirit of the empire is upon him; gods and humans declare his worth.
To him be the bright reward, and let him accept this mandate. For all say his capabilities fit him to stand beside Yu.
“As did my great predecessor, I respectfully retire that you may be set up.
The revolution of Heaven brings the glory upon your person, and you will accept the high office and comfort all people by reverently obeying.
the decree of Heaven.” The reading finished, the Prince of Wei, Cao Pi, proceeded to the terrace and ascended to the place of the Emperor.
Then Jia Xu, at the head of the great concourse of officers, came to the foot of the terrace, and a court was held.
The year of reign was changed from Prolonged Wealth, the First Year, to Yellow Dawn, the First Year , and the government became that of Great Wei.
An edict was then published proclaiming a general amnesty, and the title of “Founder of the Dynasty” was conferred upon the late Prince, Cao Cao.
Then said Hua Xin, “As heaven has but one sun, so the people can have but one ruler.
The Hans have abdicated, and it is fitting that they withdraw to a distance.
I pray for an edict naming the place of residence of the Liu family.” Taking the late Emperor by the arm, Hua Xin led him forward and made him kneel below the terrace to hear the command.
Then the new Emperor Pi conferred upon him the title of Duke of Shanyang, bidding him depart forthwith.
Thereupon Hua Xin drew his sword and in a harsh voice said, “It is an old rule that the setting up of one Emperor means the degradation of another.
Now, through the gracious kindness of His Majesty, you are spared personal injury and created a duke.
Proceed at once and return not to court without express command.” The late Emperor Xian controlled his emotion, thanked the Emperor Pi for his clemency and left on horseback.
But those who saw the departure could not help a feeling of pity for him.
Said Cao Pi to his courtiers, “Now I understand the story of Shun and Yu.” Then they all shouted: “O ruler, may thy life be eternal!” The ruling policy of Han had failed them, Dangers pressed in upon the House, And the land they had held so long Passed from them forever.
Little thought he, who then snatched their scepter, That the precedent he then claimed Would be used in due time by another To justify the destruction of his own House.
The officials then requested Cao Pi to make a solemn declaration to Heaven and Earth, which he did with humble obeisance.
But at this moment a sudden storm burst whirling up the dust and rolling along stones till no one could see the face of his neighbor.
All the lights on the terrace were extinguished. The newly enthroned Emperor was terrified and fell prostrate. He was borne away unconscious.
When he revived, he was assisted into the palace, but for many days he was too ill to hold a court.
When he had somewhat recovered, he met his courtiers and received their felicitations.
He rewarded Hua Xin, who had taken so active and prominent a part in the late scenes, with the post of Minister of Instruction, and Wang Lang with that of Minister of Works.
All the officers were advanced in rank.
But as his recovery was slow, he began to think there was too much witchcraft about the palaces at Xuchang and left it for Luoyang, where he erected a large palace complex.
The tale of these doings reached Chengdu and caused great grief to the Prince of Hanzhong, for it was told him the late Emperor had been put to death. He issued an order for mourning to be worn and instituted sacrifices, and he conferred the posthumous title of Emperor Xian the Filial on the late Emperor.
This worry brought on an illness, so that he could not transact the business of the court, which was left in the hands of Zhuge Liang.
Then Zhuge Liang and some of his colleagues took counsel one with another, saying, “The empire cannot be one single day without its ruler, wherefore we desire that our Prince should be honored with the title of 'Emperor.'“ Qiao Zhou said, “There have been auspicious indications.
A yellow vapor has been seen in the northwest of Chengdu rising to the clouds, and the star of emperor has greatly increased in splendor and shined like the moon.
These signs mean that our Prince is to become Emperor in succession to the House of Han.
There can be no doubt.” Whereupon Zhuge Liang and Xu Jing, at the head of a large number of officers, presented a memorial requesting the Prince to assume the title of Emperor. But Liu Bei objected.
“O Nobles, do you desire to set my feet in the way of disloyalty and wrongdoing?” “Not so,” said Zhuge Liang.
“But Cao Pi has usurped the Throne, while you are a scion of the House.
It is right and proper that you succeed and prolong the line.” But the Prince suddenly showed anger, saying, “Can I imitate the deeds of such a rebel?” He rose and left the chamber, going to his own apartments.
So the officials dispersed.
But three days later Zhuge Liang again led a deputation to the court, and they requested that the Prince should come forth and hear them.
He came, and they all prostrated themselves.
Xu Jing spoke, “The late Emperor of the Hans has been slain by Cao Pi.
You, O Prince, will fail both in loyalty and rectitude if you do not assume the succession and destroy the wrong-doers.
The whole empire requests you to rule that you may avenge the death of the late Emperor, and the people will be disappointed if you do not accede to their wishes.” The Prince replied, “Although I am descended from the grandson of Emperor Myers, I have not been of the least advantage; and if I assumed the title of 'Emperor,' how would that act differ from usurpation?” Zhuge Liang pleaded with him again and again, but the Prince remained obdurate.
Then Zhuge Liang bethought that where argument failed a ruse might succeed. So having arranged the parts his several colleagues were to play, he pleaded illness and remained at home.
Presently it was told the Prince that his adviser's condition was becoming serious, wherefore Liu Bei went to see him as he lay on his couch. “What illness affects you, my Commander-in-Chief?” asked Liu Bei.
“My heart is sad like unto burning, and I shall soon die.” “What is it that causes you such grief?” But Zhuge Liang did not reply.
And when the question was repeated again and again he said nothing, but just lay with his eyes closed as if he was too ill to speak.
The Prince, however, pressed him to reply, and then with a deep sigh he said, “Great Prince, from the day I left my humble cottage to follow you, you have always listened to my words and accepted my advice, and now this western domain, the whole of the two Lands of Rivers is yours just as I said it would be.
But this usurpation of Cao Pi means the annihilation of the Hans and the cessation of their sacrifices, wherefore my colleagues and I desired you to become Emperor in order to crush this upstart Wei and restore the Hans. We all worked for this end, never thinking that you would refuse so obstinately to accede to our wishes.
Now the officers are all annoyed, and they will drift away before very long.
If you are left alone and Wu and Wei come to attack, it will be difficult for you to hold on to what you have.
Do you not think this sufficient reason for me to feel grieved?” “Unless I refused, the whole land would blame me; and I am afraid,” replied the Prince.
Quoting Confucius the Teacher, Zhuge Liang replied, “'If names be not correct, language is not in accordance with the truth of things.' In other words, if one be not really straight, people will not speak of one favorably. O Prince, you are straight, and people speak of you favorably. What more is there to say?
You know when Heaven offers and you refuse, you are certainly to blame.” “When you have recovered, it shall be done,” said the Prince.
Up leapt Zhuge Liang from his bed, tapped at the screen in front of a doorway and in rushed a number of high officers, who prostrated themselves, crying, “So you have consented.
O Prince! Then choose the day for the ceremony.” They were all the most trusted of his court: Imperial Guardian Xu Jing, General Who Brings Peace to Han Mi Zhu; Lord of Qingyi Xiang Ju, Lord of Yangquan Liu Bao, Deputy Governor Zhao Zuo; First Secretary Yang Hong, Counselor Du Qiong, Secretary Zhang Shuang, Minister Lai Gong, Minister He Zong, Doctorate Scholar Yin Mo, Minister Qiao Zhou, Commander Yin Chun, Commander Zhang Yi, Doctorate Scholar Yi Ji, Counselor Qin Mi, and many others.
The Prince was greatly startled, and said, “You are committing me to doing what is dishonorable!” But Zhuge Liang said, “Since consent has been given, let a terrace be built and a day chosen for the great ceremony.” The Prince was escorted back to his palace, and Academician Xu Ci and Minister Meng Guang were told off to see to the building of the terrace south of Chengdu.
And when all was ready, a great concourse of officers solemnly escorted the Prince, seated in a carriage of the imperial pattern, to the ground prepared, and he went up to the altar and performed the appointed sacrifice. This done, the solemn announcement was read in a loud voice:
“On this twelfth day of the fourth month of the year of the Rebuilt Tranquillity Era, Liu Bei, the Emperor, makes this solemn announcement to Heaven and Earth. “The dynasty of Han has possessed the empire for years without end.
Formerly Wang Mang rebelled against his sovereign, and Liu Xiu the Founder of Later Han rose in his wrath and put him to death, thus restoring the prerogatives of the great sacrifices to him who rightly exercised them.
Lately Cao Cao, powerful and cruel, slew the Empress, and his crimes cry aloud to Heaven for vengeance.
His son, Cao Pi, carrying evils into every quarter, then seized the scepter.
“My subordinates, regarding the dynasty as having been overthrown, think it fitting that I, Liu Bei, would continue the line. As successor to my two warrior ancestors, Liu Bang and Liu Xiu, I will punish as Heaven decrees.
“Fearing lest my virtue be inadequate to the Imperial Throne, I consulted the voices of the people, and all, even the most distant, have said that the mandate of Heaven may not be disobeyed, and the great task of my ancestors may not continue in the hands of another; the land must have a lord, and they aver the cynosure of all eyes is myself.
Now I, respecting the mandate of Heaven and fearing lest the great achievements of Liu Bang and Liu Xiu may be overthrown, have reverently selected this auspicious day to ascend the altar, sacrifice and announce my assumption of the Imperial Seal in order to comfort all the people, rejoice the ancestors of the Dynastic House, and bring eternal tranquillity to all the domains.” When the reading was ended, and the sacrifice and the prayer, Zhuge Liang, in the name of all those assembled, presented the Imperial Seal.
The Prince received it in both hands, laid it upon the altar, and again declined acceptance, saying, “I, Liu Bei, am unfitted; I pray that another, more able, may be chosen.” But Zhuge Liang said, “Our lord has settled the empire, and his merits are manifest to the whole world. Moreover, he is of the Dynastic Family and it is fitting that he succeed.
Now that the great announcement has been made, such self-abnegation is impossible.” So all the officers shouted, “Eternal life to the Emperor!” And they did obeisance.
Then the style of the reign was announced to be Manifest Might, the First Year .
The Lady Wu was declared Empress, and the eldest son, Liu Shan, was declared Heir-Apparent.
The second son Liu Yung was made Prince of Lu, and the third son Liu Li, Prince of Liang .
Zhuge Liang became Prime Minister, and Xu Jing, Imperial Guardian.
Many others were promoted, and a general amnesty was proclaimed, so that there was great rejoicing throughout all the length and breadth of the two Lands of Rivers.
Next day the first court was held, and after the ceremonial prostration, and when they were all arranged in due order, the First Ruler made a pronouncement. “In the Peach Garden I and my brothers Guan Yu and Zhang Fei pledged ourselves to live and die together.
Unhappily my brother Guan Yu came to his end at the hands of Sun Quan of Wu, and I must avenge him lest I fail to fulfill the oath. Therefore will I devote the whole force of my kingdom to the destruction of Wu and the capture of its rebellious chief, whereby to wipe away my reproach.” But just as he closed this oration, an officer threw himself down at the foot of the throne, crying, “It may not be so.” All eyes turned to this man; he was Zhao Yun.
“Dire vengeance will I wreak!” so cried the King, His minister replied, “Do no such thing.” What arguments were used will appear in the next chapter.
CHAPTER 81.
Eager For Vengeance, Zhang Fei Is Assassinated; Athirst Of Retribution, The First Ruler Goes To War. Zhao Yun was opposed to the attempt to fight Wu, and spoke against the plan.
“The real rebel was not Sun Quan, but Cao Cao; and now it is his son who has usurped the Imperial Throne and called forth the anger of gods and men.
You should first aim at the inside by camping on the River Wei, from which to attack the rebel. After that the right-thinking sort on the east of the Passes will do their utmost to help you.
If you leave River Wei out of consideration in order to fight Wu, your military force will be engaged, and could you disengage it quickly in case of necessity?
It is worth reflection.” The First Ruler replied, “Sun Quan slew my brother.
Furthermore, Fu Shiren, Mi Fang, Pan Zhang, and Ma Zhong are on his side, all of whom I hate so much that I could eat their flesh with gusto and devour their relatives, whereby I should have my vengeance.
Why, Noble Sir, do you obstruct me?” “Because the enmity against Cao Cao is a public matter; vengeance for the manner of your brother's end is private.
The empire should be placed first.” “What care I for myriads of square miles of territory as long as my brother is unavenged?” So Zhao Yun's remonstrance was disregarded, and orders went forth to prepare an army against Wu.
The First Ruler also sent into the Five Valleys to borrow the aid of fifty thousand of tribesmen.
He sent a messenger to Langzhong conferring on Zhang Fei the rank of General of Chariots and Cavalry and the title of Lord of Xiliang. Zhang Fei became also Governor of Langzhong.
When Zhang Fei heard the tidings of Guan Yu's death at the hands of Sun Quan, he wept very bitterly day and night, so that his raiment was soaked with his tears.
His subordinates tried to cheer him with wine, but he overdrank, and this increased his ill-humor, which he vented on any offender in his camp.
Some of his people even died under the lash.
Every day he gazed southward, grinding his teeth with rage and glaring. He wept and groaned without ceasing. Then a messenger was announced.
He was summoned immediately, and Zhang Fei at once tore open and read his dispatches.
When Zhang Fei read the edict, he accepted his new rank in all humility, bowing northward toward the imperial mandate. Then he gave a banquet to the messenger.
He said, “My enmity for the death of my brother is deep as the sea.
Why do not the officers at the court propose an avenging expedition?” The messenger replied, “Most of them favor first the destruction of Wei; Wu is to follow.” “What sort of talk is this?” cried Zhang Fei angrily.
“When we three swore brotherhood in the Peach Garden, we pledged ourselves to die together. Now, alas!
my brother has perished by the way, and can we enjoy wealth or honors without him? I must see the Son of Heaven and pray to be allowed to lead the van.
I will wear mourning, and in that garb I will smite Wu and capture the bandit that rules there. Sun Quan shall be sacrificed to my brother's manes in virtue of our oath.” Zhang Fei accompanied the messenger to Capital Chengdu.
In the meantime the First Ruler had been training his armies. Day after day he went to the drill ground, and he decided upon a day to start, and he would accompany the expedition.
Thereupon a number of courtiers went to the palace of the Prime Minister to talk with Zhuge Liang, trying to get this intention modified. They said, “It is not in accordance with the importance due to the Emperor's position that he should go in personal command of this army, particularly as he has but lately assumed his throne.
You, Sir, hold the weighty post of adviser in such a matter, and why do you not dissuade him?” “I have done so, most sincerely and repeatedly, but he will not listen.
But now you all come with me to the drill ground, and we will try once more.” So they proceeded thither, with Zhuge Liang at their head, and he said, “Your Majesty has but lately taken the imperial seat.
If the expedition was one to march northward to destroy the rebels against Han and in the interest of rectitude, it would be perfectly correct for the Emperor to lead the army, but an officer of high rank should more properly be sent against Wu.
Why should Your Majesty expose yourself to such fatigues?” The First Ruler was touched by the depth of his minister's concern and the sincerity of his counsel, and was on the point of yielding when the arrival of Zhang Fei was announced.
Zhang Fei was immediately summoned and came to the pavilion on the drill ground, where he threw himself on the ground and clasped the First Ruler's feet, weeping bitterly.
The First Ruler joined in the lamentation.
“Your Majesty is now ruler and too quickly forgets the oath in the Peach Garden; why is our brother's death not avenged?” The First Ruler replied, “Many officers dissuade me from such a course; I cannot act rashly.” “What do others know of our oath?
If Your Majesty will not go, then let me sacrifice myself to avenge our brother.
If I cannot, then would I rather die and see your face no more.” “Then will I go with you,” said the First Ruler.
“Bring your own troops from Langzhong, and I will bring my veterans to meet you at Jiangzhou.
We will both attack Wu and wipe out the reproach.” As Zhang Fei rose to take leave, the First Ruler said to him, “I know that your weakness for wine leads you astray, and you become very cruel in your cups, and hog your people, and keep the beaten ones near you. They may be dangerous, and it is certainly the road to misfortune.
Now you must be more kindly and not give way to passion as before.” Thus admonished, Zhang Fei said farewell and left.
Soon after, when the First Ruler was preparing to march out, the High Minister Qin Mi memorialized, saying, “That Your Majesty, the Lord of a Myriad Chariots, should risk his person in what is not the way of perfect rectitude is not what the ancients would have done.
I pray that this may be reflected upon.” But the First Ruler replied, “Guan Yu and I were as one body, and the way of perfect rectitude is here.
Have you forgotten?” But the officer remained at his feet and said, “I fear disaster if Your Majesty disregards your servant's words.” The First Ruler replied angrily, “Why do you use such bad words when I desire to march?” He bade the executioners thrust forth and put to death the bold speaker. Still Qin Mi's face showed no sign of fear.
He only smiled, saying, “I die without regret. It is a pity that this newly established state should be overturned ere it be well begun.” Other officials interceding, the death punishment was remitted, but the faithful officer was committed to prison.
“Your fate will be decided when the army of vengeance return,” said the First Ruler.
Zhuge Liang sent up a memorial in favor of Qin Mi, saying:
“I, Zhuge Liang, address Your Majesty in my own name and those of my colleagues; we regard as most grievous the recent events—Wu's perfidy, by which Jingzhou was lost, the star of a great general was brought down, and the pillar holding the sky was broken—, and we shall never forget.
But it is to be remembered that the crime of overturning the Throne of Han rests on Cao Cao, and the fault of driving away the Liu Family lies not on Sun Quan.
We venture to think that the destruction of Wei would involve the submission of Wu, wherefore we beg consideration of the valuable words of Qin Mi.
Thus the army will be spared needless exertion and occasion given to make other plans for the prosperity of the Throne and the happiness of the people.” But having listened to the memorial, the First Ruler threw it to the floor, saying, “I have decided, and no remonstrance should be raised!” Then he appointed the Prime Minister to take care of his son and the two Lands of Rivers.
Then the Generals of the Flying Cavalry—Ma Chao and Ma Dai—, together with the General Who Defends the North, Wei Yan, were ordered to guard Hanzhong against Wei.
The Tiger General Zhao Yun was to be in reserve and to control the supplies; Huang Quan and Cheng Ji were made Counselors; Ma Liang and Chen Zhen, Recorders; Huang Zhong, the van leader, assisted by the Marching Generals Feng Xi and Zhang Nan; Fu Tong and Zhang Yi, Marching Commanders of the Center Army; Zhao Rong and Liao Chun, the rear guards.
The whole army, including the borrowed foreign troops, numbered seven hundred fifty thousand, and high-rank officials amounted several hundred. And the “tiger” day of the seventh month of the first year of Manifest Might was selected as the most propitious day for the start.
As soon as Zhang Fei had got back to his post, he issued orders that his soldiers should be ready to march in three days and the whole body was to be in mourning, white uniforms and whitened arms.
Just after the order appeared, two generals named Fan Jiang and Zhang Da came to their chief, saying, “The time allowed is insufficient to make white flags and armors. Pray give us more time, General.” “I am hot to avenge my brother,” said Zhang Fei.
“My only regret is that I cannot reach the miserable wretch's country tomorrow.
Do you dare to disobey my order?” Zhang Fei called in the lictors, had the two officers bound to trees, and ordered each to receive fifty lashes.
At the close of the flogging, he said, “Now you will be ready tomorrow; if you are not, I will put you to death as an example!” The two generals returned to their place, spitting blood and hot with anger, and they said one to another, “We have been beaten today; what about tomorrow?
This man's temper is unbearable; and if things are not ready, we shall suffer death.” “Suppose we slay him,” suddenly said Zhang Da, “since if we do not, he will kill us.” “But how can we get near him?” “If we are to have a chance to live, he will get drunk and go to bed; if we are to die, he will remain sober.” They made all their arrangements for the crime. That day Zhang Fei was greatly disturbed in his mind and restless.
He told some of his subordinates, saying, “I feel nervous and creepy and shivery and cannot not rest.
What does it mean?” “This is due to too much brooding over the loss of your brother,” said they.
Then Zhang Fei bade them bring in wine, and he drank with his officers. Presently he became quite intoxicated and lay down on a couch in his tent.
Meanwhile the two assassins had followed all his doings, and when they knew he was lying on his couch intoxicated and incapable, they went into the tent, each armed with a water-sharp dagger. They got rid of the attendants by saying they had confidential matters to talk about and so got into the inner rooms.
But even then they dared do nothing, for Zhang Fei slept always with open eyelids, and he lay on his couch as if still awake.
However, huge snores soon convinced them that their victim really slept, and they crept to the side of the couch.
Then both stabbed simultaneously deep into the body. Zhang Fei uttered one cry and lay still.
So he died at the hand of assassins at the age of fifty-five years. He who whipped the inspector in Anxi, Who swept vile rebels from the land of Han, And thereby won great glory for the Lius, Whose valor shone at Tiger Trap Pass, Who turned the tide of victory at Long Slope Bridge, Who freed Yan Yan and thus won a friend That helped him and his brothers conquer Shu, Whose wisdom defeated Zhang He to get Hanzhong, Is dead, the victim of assassins' blows.
Not his avenge his brother's death on Wu, Langzhong will grieve him all the ages through. Having done their victim to death, the two murderers hacked off his head and made off for the country of Wu without loss of time; and when the deed was known, they had got too far for capture.
The assassination was reported in a memorial by a commander of Zhang Fei named Wu Ban, who had left Jingzhou to see the First Ruler and then had been sent to serve under Zhang Fei.
He wrote a memorial to the First Ruler and bade the eldest son, Zhang Bao, prepare a coffin for the remains.
After the ceremony, leaving his younger brother, Zhang Shao, to hold Langzhong, Zhang Bao went to see the Emperor.
The day of departure had already come, and the First Ruler had left the capital.
Zhuge Liang and many officers had escorted him out of the city for three miles and taken leave.
Returning to Chengdu, Zhuge Liang felt ill at ease, and he remarked to his colleagues, “If Fa Zheng had been alive, he would have been able to interdict this expedition.” One night the First Ruler felt nervous and shuddered from time to time.
He could not sleep, so he went out of his tent and looked up at the stars.
Suddenly he saw a bright meteor fall in the northwest, and began to wonder what the portent meant.
He sent at once to ask Zhuge Liang to tell him. Zhuge Liang sent back the reply:
“This means the loss of a great leader, and there will be bad news in a few days.” So the army was halted and did not march.
Then the arrival of a message from Wu Ban of Langzhong was announced.
The First Ruler's foreboding increased, and he stamped his foot, saying, “Alas!
My other brother is gone!” Opening the letter he found it was indeed so.
As he read the news of the assassination, he uttered a loud cry and fell in a swoon.
He was raised, and presently they brought him back to life.
Next day they reported a body of horsemen coming.
The First Ruler went out of the camp to look at them and presently saw a young general, dressed all in white armor, sweeping forth in quite a terror. The First Ruler recognized that was Zhang Bao.
As soon as he reached the First Ruler's presence, he dismounted and bowed to the earth, weeping, “My father has been killed by Fan Jiang and Zhang Da.
They have gone over to Wu, taking my father's head with them.” The news was very grievous, and the First Ruler burst into tears and even refused food.
His officers remonstrated, saying, “Now Your Majesty has the loss of two brothers to avenge, and you must not destroy yourself.” So after a time he began to eat and drink, and he then offered the leadership of the van to Zhang Bao, saying, “Are you and Wu Ban willing to lead your troops to attack Wu and to avenge your father?” “For my country or for my father, I would shrink from no sacrifice,” said the young man.
Just as the force for the young man's leadership was being organized, another party of horsemen approached, also dressed in white armors. This was a small force under Guan Xing, son of Guan Yu. The youth also threw himself to the ground and wept.
At sight of him, thoughts stirred in the First Ruler's breast, and he burst into tears. Neither reason nor persuasion could stop them. “I think of the plain and simple days of long ago when we pledged ourselves one to the other. Now I am Emperor. How I should rejoice to share my good fortune with them!
But they have met violent deaths, and the sight of these two youths wrings my heart to the very core.” “Young gentlemen, please retire,” said the officers to the two youthful generals, “and let our Sacred One repose his dragon body.” They went.
Said the attendants, “Your Majesty is no longer young; you are over sixty, remember, and it is not fitting that you give way to such extreme sorrow.” “But my brothers—dead,” wailed the First Ruler.
“How can I live without them?” He broke into a fresh paroxysm and beat his head on the ground.
“What can be done?” asked the officers one to another. “He is in such trouble!
How can we comfort him?” Ma Liang said, “Sire, it is bad for the army to spend whole days in wailing and tears when leading against the enemy.” And then Chen Zhen said, “There is a certain hermit living among the Blue Mountains, near Chengdu, who is said to be three hundred years old. He is called Li Yi, and people say he is a seer.
Let us tell His Majesty and let him send for this old man that he may know what the future may have in store.
It will have more weight than anything we can say.” They went to the First Ruler and told him; he agreed to summon the seer and sent Chen Zhen with the command. Soon the messenger reached the town near the hills and asked the people where the prophet dwelt.
They led him far into a secluded valley like a fairy village, very unlike any ordinary spot.
Soon a lad came to receive the visitor.
“You are surely Chen Zhen.” Chen Zhen was startled that the lad knew him, and still more so at the familiar address, and said, “O superhuman boy, how do you know my name so well?” “Last evening my master told me that a messenger with an imperial command would come today and mentioned your name.” “Truly he is more than wise;” said Chen Zhen, “and people have not believed him.” So the two proceeded to the old man's abode, and Chen Zhen declared his errand.
The old man said he was too aged to travel.
“But the Emperor anxiously desires to see you face to face, if haply you would not mind making the effort.” In the end, and after much persuasion, the old fellow consented and went.
The First Ruler received him affably, surprised at the contrast between his hoary head and fresh boyish complexion. The venerable one had blue eyes, with square and sparkling pupils. His carriage was erect, and he stood straight as a pine tree. “This is no common man,” thought the First Ruler, and he treated him with distinguished courtesy.
The seer said, “I am but an old man of the barren hill country, without learning or wisdom; you shame me, O Emperor, by calling me, and I know not why.” “I and my two brothers, both now deceased, swore a mutual oath some thirty years ago. Both have gone, both by violent deaths.
I would lead a great army to avenge them and wish to know how the expedition will end.
Hearing that you, Venerable Sir, are learned in the deeper mysteries, I sent for you and beg you to tell me.” “But this is fate; it is not for an old man like me to know.” But the First Ruler pressed him to say. However, the aged one got paper and a brush and wrote:
“Soldiers, horses, weapons”—again and again on many sheets of paper. Having done this, he suddenly tore them into fragments.
Further, he drew a picture of a tall man lying supine and another above him digging a grave. And over all he wrote: “White.” After this he bowed and departed, leaving the First Ruler annoyed.
“This is only a demented man; what he says is not worthy of confidence,” said the First Ruler.
And he burned the paper. Then he ordered an advance at full speed.
Zhang Fei's son, Zhang Bao, came in, saying, “Wu Ban and his army have come; I pray that I may be appointed to lead the van.” The First Ruler admired his noble intent and gave him a van-leader's seal.
But just as he was attaching the seal to his girdle, another youth boldly stepped forth and said, “Leave that seal to me!” It was Guan Xing, son of Guan Yu.
“I have already received my commission,” said Zhang Bao.
“What abilities have you for such a task?” cried Guan Xing.
“That I have been training as a soldier since my boyhood.
I can shoot and never miss.” “I should like to see your prowess,” said the First Ruler, “that I may decide who is the better.” Zhang Bao ordered some of his people to set up a flag at a hundred paces, and on the flag he drew a heart in red.
Then he took his bow and shot three arrows, each of which went through the heart.
Those present commended the performance.
Then Guan Xing seized his bow, saying, “What is it to hit such a mark?” Just as he said this a flock of wild geese flew over his head.
“I will hit the third of the flying geese,” said he. He shot; and the third fell.
“Fine!” cried all the assembly as one voice. But Zhang Bao was enraged.
Leaping on his steed, he seized the long octane-serpent halberd left him by his father, crying, “Dare you try a real combat?” Guan Xing took up the challenge at once.
He sprang into the saddle, took his great saber, and galloped out. “You can use the spear, think you that I cannot wield a sword?” cried he.
The two impetuous youths were on the point of a battle when the First Ruler bade them hold. “Do not behave so badly!” cried he.
Both dropped out of the saddle, threw aside their weapons, ran to his feet, and begged pardon.
“Young men, from the time I left my native place Zhuo and swore brotherhood with your fathers, they were as my own flesh and blood.
You two are also brothers, and you should help each other in vengeance rather than quarrel and dispute.
You have lost the sense of rectitude while your fathers' deaths are still recent, and what will happen in future?” Both fell at his feet and implored forgiveness.
“Which of you two is the elder?” asked the First Ruler.
“I am the elder by a year,” said Zhang Bao.
The First Ruler then bade Guan Xing bow to Zhang Bao as to an elder brother, and there, in front of all, they broke an arrow as a pledge that each would always succor the other.
Then the First Ruler issued a mandate appointing Wu Ban leader of the van, and the two young men were enrolled as his own escort.
The advance began on land and on water, and they made a brave show as they moved against the land of Wu.
In the meantime the two assassins, with the grim evidence of their deed, duly reached Wu and told their story to the Marquis who received them.
Then Sun Quan said to his assembled officers, “Liu Bei has declared himself Emperor and is leading against us in person a great host of more than seven hundred thousand. What shall we do, for the danger is imminent?” They all turned pale and looked one at another. Then Zhuge Jin spoke out.
“I have been in your service these many years and have never justified the favor you have shown me.
I will risk my life and go to this Liu Bei of Shu that I may talk to him plainly and prove to him the advantages of friendship and alliance against Cao Pi.” This offer pleased Sun Quan, who then appointed Zhuge Jin as his messenger to try to induce the First Ruler to keep the peace.
Messengers pass when states are at wrangle; May this one succeed and unravel this tangle!
What fortune attended this messenger will be related in the next chapter. CHAPTER 82.
Sun Quan Submits To Wei, Receiving The Nine Dignities; The First Ruler Attacks Wu, Rewarding Six Armies. In the eighth month of the first year of Manifest Might , through the Kui Pass. His advanced guard had gone beyond the Lands of Rivers when his attendants told him that Zhuge Jin had come as a messenger from Wu. He told them not to admit him.
But Huang Quan said, “His brother being your Prime Minister, Zhuge Jin is certainly come on some important mission.
Your Majesty ought to see him and hear what he says.
If his proposals are admissible, then agree; if not, he can be made use of to take knowledge of your intentions to Sun Quan and let Sun Quan know that you intend to punish his crime.” Then the First Ruler gave way, and the messenger was brought in.
He bowed down to the earth.
“Zhuge Jin, you have come a long journey; what is its object?” said the First Ruler.
“My brother has long served Your Majesty; I have come at the risk of my life to discuss Jingzhou affairs.
When Guan Yu was at Jingzhou, my master repeatedly sought to ally the two families by marriage, but was refused.
When Guan Yu attacked Xiangyang, Cao Cao wrote again and again urging my master to attack Jingzhou.
But the Marquis was unwilling, and it was the enmity between your brother and Lu Meng that led to the attack and the unfortunate success.
“My master is now very sorry for it, but it was Lu Meng's doing.
However, Lu Meng is now dead and his enmity has died with him.
Moreover, Lady Sun is always thinking over returning to you.
My master now proposes to send back the lady, to bind and hand over to you those officers who surrendered, and to restore Jingzhou.
If the two houses swear perpetual amity, then they may join forces against Cao Pi and punish his usurpation.” To this harangue the First Ruler only replied, “You of Eastern Wu killed my brother; yet you dare to come with your artful talk!” Zhuge Jin said, “I only wish to discuss the relative importance of the issues.
Your Majesty is an Imperial Uncle, and Cao Pi has seized the throne of your House.
Yet you do not think of destroying the usurper, but on the other hand you disregard the most honorable position in the world for the sake of a so-called brother, a connection of another name. Surely this is rejecting the chief for the subordinate, the main issue for a detail.
“The Middle Land is the biggest part of the empire, and the two capitals, Luoyang and Changan, are both famous as places whence the two, one the Founder, the other the Restorer, of the Hans, initiated their mighty task. Your Majesty takes no thought of these, but would dispute over Jingzhou; in other words, the important is abandoned for the worthless.
“All the world knows of your assumption of the dignity of Emperor and that you will assuredly restore the Hans and rescue their territory; only now you do not try to deal with Wei, you only desire to attack Wu. I venture to think you have made a bad choice.” All this argument only added fuel to the fire.
“The slayer of my brother shall not live in the same world as I. You ask me not to fight.
I will cease when I have slain your master.
Were it not for the sake of your brother, I would behead you at once.
As it is, you may go; and you may tell your master to cleanse his neck ready for the blade of the executioner.” Zhuge Jin saw that the position was hopeless and took his leave to return to the South Land.
But while Zhuge Jin had been absent, Zhang Zhao said to Sun Quan, “He knows something of the strength of the armies of Shu, and he made this mission of his an excuse to get out of danger.
He will not return.” The Marquis replied, “He and I are sworn friends—friends to the death.
I shall not wrong him, nor will he betray me.
When he was at Chaisang and Zhuge Liang came to our country, I wanted my friend Zhuge Jin to persuade his brother to remain with me.
His reply was that his brother would not remain any more than he himself would go: each would be faithful to his salt.
That was quite clear enough. How could he desert me after that?
Our friendship has something of the divine in it, and no talk from outside can sow dissension between us.” Even as Sun Quan spoke, the servants told him that Zhuge Jin had returned.
“What do you think now?” said Sun Quan. Zhang Zhao retired overwhelmed with shame.
The luckless messenger unfolded his tale of failure.
“Then the South Land is in great danger,” said Sun Quan, as he heard the story.
But a certain man here interposed, saying, “I have a way out of the difficulty.” He was Counselor Zhao Zi.
“What good scheme do you propose, friend Zhao Zi?” said Sun Quan.
“Let my lord draw up a document, which I will take to Cao Pi in Wei, making a full statement of the case, and get him to attack Hanzhong and so draw off the danger from our land.” “Though the suggestion is good, yet shall we not lose something of our dignity by that?” said Sun Quan.
“If there is any such thing, I will simply jump into the river—I could not look the South Land's people in the face again.” Sun Quan was satisfied and composed the memorial, styling himself “Minister.” Therein Zhao Zi was duly appointed messenger.
He took the document and soon reached Capital Xuchang, where he first sought out the High Minister Jia Xu, and then saw the others.
Next day, Jia Xu stood forth one day at court and said, “Eastern Wu has sent a high officer, Zhao Zi, with a memorial.” “Because he wants the armies of Shu driven off,” said Cao Pi, smiling, and as if completing the sentence.
But he summoned Zhao Zi, who, having prostrated himself in the outer court, handed in his memorial.
After reading it, Cao Pi said, “What sort of an over-lord is the Marquis?” “Intelligent, clear-sighted, wise, brave, and perspicacious,” was the reply.
Cao Pi laughed, “Your praise is none too enthusiastic.” “I do not wish to overstate,” replied Zhao Zi, “but my master has shown various qualities at different times.
He made use of Lu Su among the officials of high ranks, which shows his intelligence.
He chose Lu Meng as leader of all armies, which showed his clear-sightedness.
He captured Yu Jin but did not hurt him, which shows his kindliness.
He took Jingzhou without slaughter, which shows his wisdom.
He maintains the Three Rivers so as to command the respect of the empire, which shows his boldness.
Lastly, he bows before Your Majesty, which shows his perspicacity.
You see now that my epithets are justifiable.” “Is he at all learned?” “Sire, remember he commands a large fleet of ten thousand battleships and a huge army of million armored soldiers. He endeavors to find wise and capable people to help him, and his mind is full of plans and projects.
When he has a little leisure, he reads the histories and the annals, for the sake of the general lessons to be learned therefrom.
He is no dryasdust pedant seeking remarkable passages and culling model sentences.” “Do you think I could overcome Wu?” “If a large state has military force to attack, a small one has also preparations for defense.” “Does Wu fear Wei?” “How can you think so, considering our army of million armored soldiers and the defensive moats we have in the River Han and the Great River?” “How many such persons as high minister does Wu possess?” “Nearly a hundred intelligent and specially qualified ministers like your servants; of my sort of ordinary knowledge there are too many to reckon up.” Cao Pi sighed, saying, “The book says 'Going on mission without losing the dignity of the master.' That is the sort of man you are!” Thereupon he issued the mandate ordering Xing Zhen, Minister of Ceremonies and Sacrifices, to be his ambassador to Wu, bearing for Sun Quan the title of “Prince of Wu” and allowing him to use the “Nine Signs of Honors.” But when the messenger had gone out of the city, Liu Ye went to remonstrate, saying, “Sun Quan has done this for fear of the armies of Shu.
In my opinion, if Shu and Wu fight, heaven will make an end of one country.
If you will send an army across the river to attack, and Shu attack at the same time, Wu as a state will disappear.
If Wu goes, then Shu will be left alone and can be dealt with when you will.” “But I cannot attack Sun Quan now that he has come over to my side. It would prevent anyone else from doing so.
No; I will really accept his submission.
It is the best course.” Liu Ye said, “After all, though talented, he is but a General of the Flying Cavalry and Lord of Nanzhang of the decadent days of Han.
His rank is low and his influence small, yet he still wants to contest the Middle Land.
If you promote him to princely rank, he is only one step below yourself. While doubting the reality of his submission, you give him an exalted rank and increase his influence.
Surely this is only giving wings to a tiger.” “Not at all; I am helping neither Wu nor Shu.
I am waiting till they are at grips, and if one goes under, there will be only one left to destroy. That will be easy.
However, say no more, for I have decided.” Whereupon Xing Zhen was bidden to take the mandate and the Nine Dignities and accompany Zhao Zi to Wu.
Sun Quan assembled his officers to discuss how the armies of Shu could be driven off.
Then came the news of princely rank conferred by Wei; and by the rules of courtesy, the messenger bearing the edict should be met at a great distance from the capital. Gu Yong was opposed to accepting the rank. “My lord, you should style yourself 'Supreme Ruler' and 'Lord' of the nine territories; you should not receive any rank from Wei.” “But on one occasion Liu Bang received the princedom of Han  from Xiang Yu; it depends upon the times.
Why refuse?” Sun Quan discussed the matter no more, but went out at the head of a great gathering of officers to welcome the messenger.
Xing Zhen, the bearer of the mandate from Wei, on first arrival comported himself haughtily as the representative of a superior country and an imperial ambassador. And when he entered the city, he did not descend from his carriage. Wherefore Zhang Zhao ventured to rebuke him. “Everyone must obey the rules of courtesy as everyone must respect the laws.
You, Sir, are behaving proudly as if there was no such thing as a sword in this country.” Immediately the messenger descended from his chariot and was presented to Sun Quan. Afterwards they went in side by side.
As the cavalcade proceeded, a loud voice was heard in the rear of the two carriages, crying, “Here we are prevented from risking our lives in smashing Wei and swallowing Shu; and our lord receives a title from another man.
Are not such things shameful?” The man was Xu Sheng.
And the messenger sighed, saying, “If all the leaders and ministers of the South Land are like this, the lord of the country will not long be content to obey another.” However, the title was accepted.
And when he had received the felicitations of his officers, Sun Quan gave orders to collect beautiful works in jade and brilliant pearls, which were sent to Wei as return gifts. Not long after came tidings of the forces under the ruler of Shu:
“The First Ruler, together with King Shamo Ke of the Mang nations, leads his own army and a large number of tribesmen from the east and south; furthermore, he is aided by the two Han generals of Dongxi, Liu Ning and Du Lu, with their cohorts. They advance both by land and by water, a mighty host, of which the shouting shakes the heavens.
The naval force has already come out at Wukou, and the land force has reached Zigui.” Although Sun Quan had been created a prince, yet Emperor Pi would not send a relieve army.
And when the news came, the Prince of Wu asked present advice from his officers, but there was none to help him; they only muttered and were silent.
“Ah!” sighed he.
“After Zhou Yu I had Lu Su, and Lu Meng succeeded Lu Su.
But now they have all three gone, and there is no one to share my troubles!” But just then a very youthful general stepped out from the ranks of the officials and said, with a lowly obeisance, “Though I am young, I am not a little versed in the books of war, and with a few legions I could destroy the power of Shu.” Sun Quan recognized Sun Huan, the son of Yu He.
Sun Ce loved the youth and gave him his own family name of Sun and so made him a member of his own clan.
Yu He had four sons, of whom Sun Huan was the eldest. He was an expert archer and horseman and had accompanied his protector in several campaigns, where he had distinguished himself right well and had been given a rank.
At this time he was twenty-five.
“How do you think you can overcome them?” “There are two able commanders under my command named Xie Jing and Li Yi, both very brave.
With a few legions I will capture Liu Bei.” “Though you are brave, nephew, yet you are young and ought to have an assistant.” Thereupon Tiger General Zhu Ran stepped forward, saying, “Let me go.” Sun Quan consented, and he told off fifty thousand of soldiers and marines, over whom he placed Sun Huan and Zhu Ran as joint commanders. They were to start as soon as possible.
The scouts reported that the army of Shu was camped at Yidu, and Sun Huan, Commander of the Left, led half his army to the borders of that county and camped in three stockades.
Now the Shu General Wu Ban had received his seal as leader of the van. From the day he left the borders of the Lands of Rivers, he had had uninterrupted success. Everyone had submitted at the mere rumor of his coming. He had conducted his campaign with unstained swords as far as Yidu.
When he heard that Sun Huan was camped there to oppose his progress, he sent back rapid messengers to the First Ruler, who was then at Zigui.
The First Ruler got angry, saying, “So they think this youth is able to withstand me?” “Since this nephew of Sun Quan has been made a leader,” said Guan Xing, “it is unnecessary to send a leader of high rank; let me go.” “I was just wishing to see what you could do,” said the First Ruler, and he gave him orders to go.
Just as Guan Xing was leaving, Zhang Bao stepped forth and asked permission to go too.
“Then both go, my nephews,” said the Emperor.
“But you must be prudent and not hasty.” So they took leave, collected their troops and advanced.
Sun Huan, hearing of the coming of a large army, called out all his troops and drew up his array.
His two famous generals, Li Yi and Xie Jing, were placed by the great standard. They watched the soldiers of Shu filing out and noted two leaders in silver helmets and silver armors, riding on white horses, and the flags were white. First came Zhang Bao with a long spear, and then Guan Xing carrying a great saber.
“Sun Huan, you tiny rascal, your time has come!” cried Zhang Bao abusively.
“How dare you stand against the forces of Heaven?” “Your father is a headless devil,” cried Sun Huan, no way backward in reviling, “and you are going just now to join him; don't you see?” Then Zhang Bao rode at Sun Huan.
From behind his chief, Xie Jing dashed out to meet him.
They fought nearly forty bouts, and then Xie Jing ran away with Zhang Bao in pursuit.
When Li Yi saw his comrade overcome, he whipped up his steed and came into the fray, whirling his silvered battle-ax.
Zhang Bao fought twenty bouts with him, but neither got the better.
Then in the army of Wu, a marching general named Tan Xiong, seeing that his two comrades could not overcome Zhang Bao, shot a treacherous arrow from the ranks and wounded Zhang Bao's steed.
Feeling the pang of the wound, the horse bolted back to its own side, but fell before it reached it, throwing its rider sprawling on the ground.
Seeing this, Li Yi turned and rode toward the prostrate leader to slay him with his battle-ax. But just as he was about to deliver his blow, lo! a red flash came between, and his head rolled along the earth. The red flash was Guan Xing's great sword.
Seeing the horse fall and Li Yi coming up, he had rushed in and dealt that fatal blow. And he had saved Zhang Bao from death.
Then they attacked and lay on so that Sun Huan suffered a great defeat.
Then each side beat the retreat and drew off.
Next day Sun Huan came out to offer battle again, and the two cousins went forth together.
Guan Xing, from horseback by the main standard, challenged his enemy.
Sun Huan rode out fiercely, and they two fought near thirty bouts. But Sun Huan was not strong enough and drew off. The two youths followed and reached his camp.
Wu Ban, together with Feng Xi and Zhang Nan, also launched another attack.
Zhang Bao helped them with all his force and was the first to force his way into the ranks of Wu. He came across Xie Jing, whom he slew with a spear thrust.
The soldiers of Wu scattered and fled, and the victory was on the side of Shu.
But Guan Xing was missing.
Zhang Bao was desperate, saying, “If something wrong happens to Guan Xing, I will not live!” So he girded on his huge spear and rode far and wide seeking him.
Presently he met Guan Xing, bearing his sword in his left hand, while his right held a captive.
“Who is this?” asked Zhang Bao.
“In the melee I met an enemy,” cried Guan Xing, “and I took him prisoner.” Then Zhang Bao recognized Tan Xiong, the man who had let fly the treacherous arrow that had brought down his horse.
The two returned to camp, where they slew their prisoner and poured a libation of his blood to the dead horse.
After this they drew up a report of the victory for the First Ruler.
Sun Huan had lost his generals—Li Yi, Xie Jing, and Tan Xiong—as well as many other officers and many troops. His army was too weakened to continue the campaign, so he halted and sent back to Wu for reinforcements.
Then Generals Zhang Nan and Feng Xi said to Wu Ban, “The power of Wu is broken; let us raid their encampment.” But Wu Ban said, “Though so many have been lost, there are many left.
Zhu Ran's marine force is in a strong position on the river and is untouched.
If you carry out your plan and the marines land in force and cut off our retreat, we shall be in difficulties.” “That is easily met,” said Zhang Nan.
“Let each of the two leaders Guan Xing and Zhang Bao take five thousand troops and go into ambush in the valleys to guard against any such move.” “I think it better to send some persons to pretend to be deserters.
Let them tell Zhu Ran of the plan to raid the camp, and Zhu Ran will come to the rescue as soon as he sees fire. Then the ambushing soldiers can attack him.” They thought this a fine plan, and they made the necessary arrangements.
Hearing of the ill success and losses of his colleague, Commander of the Right Zhu Ran was already thinking of going to his help, when a few deserters appeared and hoarded his ship.
He questioned them, and they said, “We are Feng Xi's soldiers, and we have deserted because of unfair treatment.
We have a secret to tell.” “What secret can you betray?” “Tonight Feng Xi is going to make an attack upon General Sun Huan's camp; he thinks it is a good chance. They are going to raise a fire as a signal.” Zhu Ran saw no reason to doubt the men, and he sent off at once to tell Sun Huan.
But the messenger never arrived, as Guan Xing intercepted and slew him. Then Zhu Ran deliberated upon going to help.
“You cannot trust what those soldiers said,” said Cui Yu, one of the commanders.
“Both army and navy will be lost if anything goes wrong.
No, General; rather keep careful watch and let me go.” Zhu Ran saw this was the wiser plan, so he gave Cui Yu ten thousand troops, and Cui Yu left.
That night Wu Ban, Zhang Nan, and Feng Xi made an attack on Sun Huan's camp from three directions, and the soldiers were scattered and fled. Then the three generals set the whole camp on fire.
Cui Yu saw the flames as he marched and pressed on.
Then just as he was passing some hills, he came upon the ambush, and Guan Xing and Zhang Bao poured out from left and right.
Taken by surprise, Cui Yu could only try to flee, but he met Zhang Bao, who made him prisoner.
When Zhu Ran heard the news, he was panic-stricken and dropped downriver twenty miles.
The remnant of Sun Huan's troops ran away, following their leader. As they went, Sun Huan inquired, “Is there any city ahead that has good defense and granary?” They told him, saying, “To the north is Yiling, where we can camp.” So they went thither.
Just as they reached the wall, their pursuers came up and the city was besieged in all four sides.
Guan Xing and Zhang Bao brought the captive Cui Yu back to Zigui and saw the First Ruler, who rejoiced at their success. The prisoner was put to death, and the soldiers were rewarded.
The effect of these victories spread far, so that the leaders in Wu had no inclination to fight.
When the Prince of Wu received Sun Huan's call for help, he was frightened and knew not what to do. So he called a great council, and he said, “Sun Huan is besieged in Yiling, and Zhu Ran has been defeated on the river; what can be done?” Then Zhang Zhao said, “Though several of your commanders are dead, yet have you some left. Half a score is enough to relieve your anxiety.
Send Han Dang as Commander, with Zhou Tai as his second, Pan Zhang as Van Leader, Ling Tong as Rear Guard; Gan Ning in reserve. You want one hundred thousand troops.” Sun Quan made the appointments as proposed.
Gan Ning was very seriously ill just then, but he accepted the task.
Now the First Ruler had made a line of forty camps from Wukou and Jianping to Yiling, spreading twenty-five miles of distance.
He was exceedingly pleased with his two nephews, who had distinguished themselves again and again, and he said, “The generals that have followed me since the early days have got aged, and thus no longer a big use.
But now that I have such two valorous nephews, I have no fear for Sun Quan.” When he heard of the coming of Sun Quan's army under Han Dang and Zhou Tai, he wished to select a commander to oppose the Wu army. Then those near him reported:
“Huang Zhong and a half dozen other officers have run off to Wu.” “Huang Zhong is no traitor;” said the First Ruler, smiling, “it is only that he heard what I happened to say about old and useless leaders.
He will not confess he is old and wants to prove he is not.” Then he called Guan Xing and Zhang Bao and said to them, “Huang Zhong may fail in this enterprise of his, so I hope you two will not mind going to his assistance.
As soon as there is some success to report, get him to return and do not let him come to grief.” So the two got their troops together and went off to assist the aged warrior.
When young, success is easy, thine at will, The aged servant fails, though willing still.
The next chapter will relate the outcome of Huang Zhong's expedition.
CHAPTER 83. Fighting At Xiaoting, The First Ruler Captures An Enemy; Defending The Three Gorges, A Student Takes Supreme Command. In spring, the first month of the second year of Manifest Might , the veteran warrior Huang Zhong was among the officers who followed the First Ruler to war against Wu.
When he heard his master talk of old and incapable leaders, he girded on his sword and with a few faithful followers made his way to the camps at Yiling.
He was welcomed by Wu Ban, the commander in charge of the siege there. “For what reason do you come, O Veteran General?” asked he.
“I have followed the Emperor ever since he left Changsha, and I have done diligent service.
I am now over seventy, but my appetite is still good for ten pounds of meat, and I can still stretch the strongest bow, and I can still ride five hundred miles without fatigue. I am not weak or worn out.
But our master has been talking of old and useless leaders, and I am come to take part in the fight with Wu.
If I slay one of their leaders, he will see I may be old but not worn out.” Just about that time the leading division of the Wu army drew near the camp.
Huang Zhong hastily rose, went out of the tent, and mounted to go into the battle.
“Aged General, be careful,” said the generals. But Huang Zhong paid no attention and set off at full speed.
However, Wu Ban and Feng Xi rode out to help him.
As soon as he saw the array of the enemy, he pulled up and challenged Commander Pan Zhang of the vanguard.
Pan Zhang sent out one of his generals, Shi Ji, to take the challenge.
Shi Ji despised his seed antagonist and rode lightly forth with his spear set, but in the third bout Huang Zhong cut him down.
This angered Pan Zhang who flourished the green-dragon saber, the great sword of the old warrior Guan Yu which had passed into his possession, and took up the battle.
These two fought several bouts, and neither was victor, for Huang Zhong was brimful of energy.
His antagonist, seeing that he could not overcome the old man, galloped off.
Huang Zhong pursued and smote his army and scored a full victory.
On his way back Huang Zhong fell in with the two youthful generals, Guan Xing and Zhang Bao.
“We come by the sacred command to aid you if necessary.
And now that you have scored so complete a victory, we pray you return to the main camp,” said they. But the veteran would not.
Next day Pan Zhang came to challenge again, and Huang Zhong at once accepted.
Nor would he allow Guan Xing and Zhang Bao to come with him, or accept assistance from any other.
He led out five thousand troops.
Before many bouts had been exchanged, Pan Zhang made a feint and got away. Huang Zhong pursued, shouting to him not to flee.
“Flee not, for now will I avenge the death of Guan Yu!” cried he.
Huang Zhong pursued some ten miles, but presently he fell into an ambush and found himself attacked from all sides—Zhou Tai on the left, Han Dang on the right, Ling Tong from behind, and the erstwhile flying Pan Zhang turned to attack the front—, so that Huang Zhong was surrounded and hemmed in.
Huang Zhong forced his way to retreat. But suddenly a great storm came on, the wind blowing violently, and as Huang Zhong was passing some hills, an enemy cohort led by Ma Zhong came down the slopes, and one of the arrows wounded the veteran in the armpit. He nearly fell from his horse with the shock.
The soldiers of Wu, seeing Huang Zhong wounded, came on all together, but soon the two youthful generals, Guan Xing and Zhang Bao, drove them off and scattered them. Thus they rescued Huang Zhong. He was taken back to the main camp.
But he was old and his blood was thin, and the wound gaped wide, so that he was near to die.
The First Ruler came to visit him and patted his back and said, “It is my fault, O Veteran General, that you have been hurt in the battle!” “I am a soldier,” said the old man.
“I am glad that I could serve Your Majesty.
But now I am seventy-five, and I have lived long enough.
Be careful of your own safety for the good of the state.” These were his last words.
He became unconscious and died that night. A poem was written of him:
First among veterans stands Huang Zhong, Who won great merit in the conquest of Shu. Old, he still donned his coat of mail. And laid his hand to the curving bow. His valor was the talk of all the North, Fear of his might maintained the West.
Tardy he bowed his snow-white head to death, Fighting to the end—in very truth a hero.
The First Ruler was very sad when he heard of Huang Zhong's death and made him a grave in Chengdu.
“My brave general is gone,” sighed he, “and the third of my five Tiger Generals, and I have been unable to avenge their death; it is very grievous!” So the Emperor led the Imperial Guard to Xiaoting, where he summoned a great assembly. He divided his forces into eight parts ready for an attack by land and water.
The marines were placed under Huang Quan, and he himself led the land forces.
It was then the second month of the second year.
When Han Dang and Zhou Tai heard that the army of Shu was approaching, they marched toward it. When near, the two armies were arrayed.
The two leaders of Wu rode out and saw the First Ruler riding out under the great standard with his staff about him. A silken umbrella splashed with gold was over his head; right and left were white banners, golden axes, and other insignia of an emperor.
Then Han Dang spoke, “Your Majesty is now Ruler of Shu; why do you risk your life in the battlefield?
It would be most regrettable if any untoward event happened.” The First Ruler pointed the finger of scorn at the speaker and said, “You rats of Wu bereft me of my brother, and I have sworn that you shall not live with me under the same sky!” “Who dares plunge in among the enemy?” asked Han Dang, turning to those in his train.
The Marching General Xia Xun set his spear and rode to the front, and as he did so Zhang Bao with a roar galloped out to meet him.
But this thunderous voice affrighted Xia Xun, and he sought to flee.
Then Zhou Tai's brother, Zhou Ping, seeing that his colleague was panic-stricken, flourished his sword and rode out too. At once Guan Xing dashed to the front.
Zhang Bao roared again and thrusting at Xia Xun and unhorsing him.
This disconcerted Zhou Ping and enfeebled his defense, so that Guan Xing speedily slew him with a slash.
Then the two youths rode furiously at Han Dang and Zhou Tai. They sought refuge in their battle array.
“The tiger fathers have not begotten curs of sons,” said the First Ruler with a sigh of satisfaction.
Then he waved his whip as a signal to fall on, and the Wu army suffered a great defeat.
The Shu force of the eight divisions was irresistible as a river in flood, and the slaughter was immense.
Gan Ning was in his ship ill, but he roused himself when he heard the armies of Shu had come, and mounted to go into the battle. Soon he met a cohort of the Mang soldiers. These warriors wore their hair loose and went barefoot. Their weapons were bows and crossbows and long spears and swords and axes. And they had shields to ward off blows.
They were led by their own King Shamo Ke. His face was spotted with red as if splashed with blood, and his eyes were green and big. He rushed among Gan Ning's troops wielding a spiked iron mace with bone pendants, and he had two bows slung at his belt. He was terrible to look upon.
Gan Ning recognized that he had no chance of victory against such a man and did not engage Shamo Ke, but turned his steed to flee.
But as Gan Ning fled, Shamo Ke shot an arrow that pierced Gan Ning's skull.
Wounded as he was, Gan Ning rode on to Fuchikou, but there he dismounted and sat under a tree, where he died.
On the tree were many hundreds of crows, and they gathered round the corpse as if to protect the corpse.
The Prince of Wu was sore grieved at the news of Gan Ning's death, and had the remains buried honorably. Moreover, he raised a temple in Fuchikou to Gan Ning's memory. Gan Ning was first of warriors in Wu, With silken sails he stemmed the Great River's tide, Right loyally he served his prince, and true, He made two ill friends put their hate aside.
Light horse led he by night a camp to raid, And first he warmed his soldiers with generous wine.
In his resting place the holy crows welcome guests, And fragrant incense smolders at his shrine.
This victory gave the First Ruler possession of Xiaoting.
But at the muster after the battle, Guan Xing did not appear.
Search parties were sent to find him, and they went far and wide beating the country around. However, the dashing young soldier was only following in his father's foe.
When Guan Xing had got in among the army of Wu, he had caught sight of Pan Zhang, his especial enemy, and galloped in pursuit.
In terror, Pan Zhang took to the hills and disappeared in one of the valleys.
In seeking him, Guan Xing lost his way and went to and fro till it grew dark without finding a way out.
It was clear moonlight. Near midnight he came to a farm, where he dismounted and knocked at the door.
A venerable old man appeared and asked who he was.
“I am a leader of the army, and I have lost my way. I beg a meal, for I am starving,” said Guan Xing.
The old man led him into a hall lit by many candles, and there he saw in the family altar a picture of Guan Yu.
At once he began to wail and bowed before it.
“Why do you wail thus?” asked the old man.
“This is my father,” said Guan Xing.
At this, the old man prostrated himself before his guest.
“Why should you treat my father with such respect?” asked Guan Xing.
“This place is sacred to his honored spirit.
While he lived the people served him, and now that he is a spirit should they not revere him the more?
I have been waiting for the armies of Shu to avenge his death, and it is indeed the great good fortune of the people that you have come.” Then the host brought forth wine and food and served his guest. Moreover, he unsaddled and fed his horse.
In the third watch a knocking came at the door, and when the old man opened it, the visitor was no other than Pan Zhang, the General of Wu. He also asked shelter.
As Pan Zhang came in, Guan Xing recognized him and drew his sword, crying, “Stay, you ruffian! Do not flee!” Pan Zhang turned and would have gone out, but on the threshold suddenly appeared a figure of ruddy complexion with bright eyes and heavy eyebrows, and a long, flowing beard. And it wore a green robe and golden armor and was armed with a huge sword.
Pan Zhang shrank back, for he recognized that was Guan Yu in spirit form.
He uttered a shriek and became as one distraught, but before he could turn, Guan Xing raised his sword; it fell, and Pan Zhang lay dead.
Taking the heart-blood of his dead enemy, Guan Xing poured it in libation before the picture of his father.
After that he took possession of his father's greendragon saber, curved as the young moon. Having hacked off the head of his fallen enemy, he fastened it to his bridle. Then he took leave of his aged host, saddled his enemy's horse, and rode away toward his own camp.
The old man dragged the corpse of the dead commander outside and burned it.
Guan Xing had not gone very far when he heard the neighing of horses and soon met a troop led by Ma Zhong, one of Pan Zhang's generals, who was looking for his chief.
Ma Zhong fell into a great rage when he saw the head of Pan Zhang swinging at the neck of Pan Zhang's horse and Guan Xing beheld the famous sword in his hand.
Ma Zhong galloped up furiously, and Guan Xing, who recognized an enemy of his late father, rushed to meet him.
Just as he would strike, however, Ma Zhong's troops galloped up to support their general, and Guan Xing was surrounded.
He was in dire danger, but just opportunely came up a troop of horse led by his cousin Zhang Bao.
At this, Ma Zhong, thinking discretion the better part, drew off his army and rode away. The two cousins pursued him.
Before they had gone far, they met another force under Mi Fang and Fu Shiren, who had come out to seek Ma Zhong.
The two bodies of soldiers met and fought, but the troops of Shu were too few for victory and drew off. Thence they made their way to headquarters in Xiaoting, where they told their adventures and presented the head of Pan Zhang.
The First Ruler was very pleased and rewarded all armed forces.
Ma Zhong went back and rejoined Han Dang and Zhou Tai.
Then they collected their troops, many wounded, and stationed them in various points.
Ma Zhong, together with Mi Fang and Fu Shiren, marched to the river bank and encamped.
The night they arrived, many soldiers were groaning with the pain of their wounds.
Mi Fang, who was listening unknown to them, heard one of them say, “We are Jingzhou soldiers and victims of Lu Meng's vile machinations. If we had only remained under Liu Bei! Now he is Emperor and has set out to destroy Wu, and he will do it one day.
But he has a special grudge against Mi Fang and Fu Shiren.
Why should we not kill these two and go over to Shu?
They will think we have done well.” Another said, “Do not be hasty; we will do it presently when there is a chance.” Mi Fang started as he heard this.
He told Fu Shiren, saying, “The troops are mutinous, and we ourselves are in danger.
Ma Zhong is an object of especial hatred to the Ruler of Shu; suppose we kill him and surrender.
We can say we were compelled to give in to Wu, but as soon as the news of the Emperor came near we wanted to get back.” “It will not do,” said Fu Shiren. “If we go, they will kill us.” “No; the Ruler of Shu is liberal and kind. And the heir, Liu Shan, is my nephew.
They will surely not do any harm to a connection.” In the end they decided to go.
And in the third watch they made their way into their chief's tent and stabbed him to death. Then they cut off his head, and with their grisly trophy and a few followers they set off for the camp of the Ruler of Shu.
They arrived at the outposts and were taken to see Zhang Nan and Feng Xi, to whom they told their tale.
Next day they went into the main camp and were admitted to the presence of the First Ruler, to whom they offered their trophy. And they threw themselves on the ground and wept, saying “We are not traitors.
We were the victims of Lu Meng's wickedness. He said that Guan Yu was dead and tricked us into giving up the city. We could not help surrendering.
When we heard the Sacred Chariot had come, we slew Ma Zhong to satisfy your vengeance, and we implore forgiveness.” But the First Ruler was angry, and said, “I left Chengdu a long time ago; why did you not come to confess your fault before?
Now you find yourselves in danger and so you come with this specious tale to try to save your lives.
If I pardon you, how shall I look my brother in the face when we meet beneath the Nine Golden Springs?” Then he bade Guan Xing set up an altar to his father in the camp, and thereon the First Ruler offered the head of Ma Zhong in sacrifice before the tablet of Guan Yu.
This done, he had Guan Xing strip the two deserters make them kneel before the altar, and presently with his own hand he hewed them in pieces as a sacrifice.
Presently Zhang Bao came in and wailed before him, saying, “The two enemies of my uncle have been slain, but when will vengeance be taken upon those of my father?” “Do not grieve, my nephew,” said the First Ruler, “I am going to lay waste the South Land and slay the whole of the curs that live there.
I will assuredly capture the two murderers of your father, and you shall hack them to pieces as a sacrifice.” Zhang Bao went away, still weeping.
About this time the fear of the First Ruler was very great among the people of the South Land, who stood in dread of him so that they grieved night and day.
Han Dang and Zhou Tai were rather frightened too, and they sent a report to their master of the assassination of Ma Zhong and what had befallen the assassins.
Then Sun Quan was distressed and called together his counselors. At this meeting Bu Zhi proposed submission and self-humiliation for the sake of peace.
Said he, “There were five persons—Lu Meng, Pan Zhang, Ma Zhong, Mi Fang, and Fu Shiren—whom Liu Bei had a grudge against, and they are all dead. Now the objects of his hate are the murderers of Zhang Fei—Fan Jiang and Zhang Da.
Why not send back Zhang Fei's head, and these two assassins, and give up Jingzhou and restore Lady Sun and ask for peace and alliance against Wei? This will make the army of Shu retire, and we shall have peace.” This proposal seemed good.
So the head of Zhang Fei was enclosed in a sandalwood box; Fan Jiang and Zhang Da were bound and put in a cage-cart. All these were sent, with letters, by the band of Cheng Bing to the camp at Xiaoting.
The First Ruler was about to march farther east when they told him that a messenger had come from the South Land and what he had brought.
The Ruler struck his forehead with both hands, saying, “This is the direct gift of Heaven through my youngest brother's spirit.” He bade Zhang Bao prepare an altar whereon to sacrifice the heads of his father's assassins.
When he opened the box and saw the fresh features of Zhang Fei, he broke into wailing for the dead.
Then the son hewed Fan Jiang and Zhang Da in pieces and offered them upon the altar.
But this sacrifice did not appease the First Ruler's anger, and he still desired to destroy Wu. Whereupon Ma Liang remonstrated.
“Your enemies are now all dead: you are avenged.
Wu has sent a high officer with large concessions and awaits your reply.” But the First Ruler angrily replied, “The one I would grind to pieces is Sun Quan.
To act as he proposes and enter into alliance would be treachery to my two brothers and a breach of our oath.
Now I will exterminate Wu, and Wei shall follow.” He wished also to put the messenger to death to annihilate all emotions with Wu, but relented when his officers insistently interceded. Poor Cheng Bing ran off terrified, glad to escape with life. He went back and told the Prince of Wu how implacable his enemy seemed.
Said he, “The Ruler of Shu, not listening to words of peace, was determined to level Wu before attacking Wei.
Those under him protested in vain.
What is to be done?” Sun Quan was frightened and bewildered.
Seeing this, Kan Ze stepped forward and said, “Since there is a skysupporting pillar, why not use it?” “Whom do you refer to?” asked Sun Quan.
“You once had perfect confidence in Zhou Yu, and he was followed by Lu Su, equally able.
Lu Meng succeeded and you pinned your faith upon him.
Though now Lu Meng is dead, yet there is Lu Xun. And he is quite near, in Jingzhou.
He is reputed to be a scholar, but really he is a bold and capable man, no whit inferior to Zhou Yu, in my opinion.
The plan that broke Guan Yu was his.
If anyone can destroy Shu, it is he.
If he fails, then I will stand the same punishment as may be his.” “If you had not spoken thus, my whole scheme might have gone amiss,” said Sun Quan.
“Lu Xun is a student,” said Zhang Zhao. “He is no match for Liu Bei.
You may not use him.” Gu Yong also said, “He is too young and too inexperienced.
I fear he will not be obeyed, and that will be mischievous.” Bu Zhi also said, “He is well enough to control a region, but he is not fit for a big matter.” Kan Ze got desperate, shouting, “It is the only hope.
I will guarantee him with the lives of all my house!” “I know he is able,” said Sun Quan, “and I have now made up my mind he is the man.
Gentlemen, that is enough.” Lu Xun was called home.
Lu Xun was originally named Lu Yi.
He was a native of Wu County in Wu, grandson of Lu Jun, who was Commandant of the City Gates, and son of Lu Yu, Commander of Jiujiang.
He was eight spans in height, with a beautiful face, like the finest jade.
When Lu Xun arrived at court and made his bow, Sun Quan said to him, “I wish to send you in supreme command of all the forces against Shu.” “Sir, you have numerous old and tried officers under your command; I am very young and not at all clever,” replied Lu Xun.
“Kan Ze goes bail for you and pledges his whole house. Moreover, I know your abilities.
You must be Commander-in-Chief and may not refuse the appointment.” “But what will happen if the officers do not support me?” “Here is authority!” said Sun Quan, taking his own sword from his side and giving it to Lu Xun.
“Slay the disobedient and report afterwards.” “I am grateful for this proof of confidence, but I dare not accept forthwith.
I pray you assemble all the officers and confer the office upon me in their presence.” Said Kan Ze, “The ancient fashion was to set up a platform and thereon present to the leader-elect a white yak's tail and a golden ax with the seal of office and commission. Thereafter his dignity and the reverence due from others were beyond all question.
It would be well, O Prince, to follow the old rule. Choose a good day and appoint Lu Xun before all the world, and no one will refuse support.” An altar was begun at once.
They worked at it day and night, and as soon as it was finished a great assembly was called. Then Lu Xun was requested to ascend and make his bow on receiving his appointment as Commander-inChief, Leader of the Senior, General Who Guards the West, and Lord of Fenglou. The sword of authority and the seal of office were presented. His powers extended over the six territories and the eighty-one counties of the South Land, over the forces in Jingzhou and Wu.
And in charging him Sun Quan said, “Domestic affairs belong to me; outer affairs are under your direction.” Lu Xun then descended.
He chose Xu Sheng and Ding Feng as commanders of his guards, and the army lost no time in taking the field.
The various dispositions of horse and foot were made, and dispatches were sent to the outlying commanders.
When the dispatch reached Han Dang and Zhou Tai, who were camping near Xiaoting, they were alarmed, saying, “Why did the Prince appoint a mere bookish student to the commandership of all armed forces?” So when the new Commander-in-Chief came, they showed their discontent by a lack of hearty support.
Lu Xun went to his tent to receive the reports, and there the majority of the officers manifested only sullen respect and unwilling deference.
Then Lu Xun addressed them, saying, “By order of my superior I am Commander-in-Chief, and my commission is to destroy Shu.
You, gentlemen, all know the ordinary military rules, and you would do well to obey them.
The law is no respecter of persons, as those who disobey will find out. Do not have to regret when it is too late.” They nodded in sullen acquiescence.
Then Zhou Tai said, “There is Sun Huan, nephew of our Prince; he is surrounded at Yiling and is short of food.
I venture to request you to send relief to him and get him out, so that the Prince's heart may be comforted.” “I know all about him. His soldiers are faithful, and he can easily maintain his position. There is no need to go to his aid.
When Shu is broken, he will be free to come out.” They all sniggered as they left the tent, and Han Dang did not fail to express his contempt for the newly appointed Commander-in-Chief.
“This will be the end of Wu,” said he to his colleague.
“Did you note what he said?” “I tried him just to see what he would do,” said Zhou Tai. “You see he had no plan ready; he destroys Shu indeed!” Next day general orders were issued for defense and prohibitions against giving battle, which provoked more laughter at the incapable pedant, as they thought him in command, and secret resolves to disobey. Moreover, the officers showed their contempt by a general disregard of orders.
So once more Lu Xun assembled them and said, “You know I am in command; yet the recent orders for defense have been disregarded.
Why?” Then Han Dang spoke up, “Some of us followed General Sun Ce when he first subdued the South Land.
Others won fame in destroying rebels, or in following the present Prince in his campaigns. All of us have donned our armors and gripped our weapons in many a bloody fight.
Now, Sir, you have been placed in supreme command to repulse Shu, and there should be some plan of campaign made for us at once, some dispositions of our forces, and some definite advance toward that end. Instead of that we are told to strengthen our defenses and are forbidden to fight. What are we to wait for?
Will Heaven destroy our opponents for us?
We are not afraid to die. Why is our keenness left to be eaten away and our energies wasted in idleness?' All the others applauded this speech and cried that the speaker had expressed their own ideas.
“General Han Dang just says what we think:
let us fight a decisive battle,” they cried. The new general waited till the uproar had subsided; then drawing his sword, he shouted, “That I am a student is true. But I have been entrusted with a great task, a task for which the Prince of Wu considers me competent and for the performance of which I am prepared to bear all the responsibilities.
As for you, you will do well to act on the defensive as I ordered and not allow yourselves to be led astray into any attacks. And I shall put the disobedient to death!” This speech had little effect, and they dispersed grumbling and murmuring.
Meanwhile the Ruler of Shu had made a long chain of forty camps from Xiaoting to the borders of the Lands of Rivers, spreading out two hundred miles. These base camps looked very imposing with their fluttering banners by day and their fires at night. Then the spies came in and reported:
“Wu appointed Lu Xun as Commander-in-Chief.
Lu Xun ordered his commanders to defend strategic points and not to engage in battle.” “What sort of a man is this Lu Xun?” said the First Ruler.
“He is a scholar among the people of Wu, and, though young, he is very talented,” replied Ma Liang. “His schemes are very deep.
He was the author of the villainous and crafty plan of attack on Jingzhou.” “His crafty scheme caused the deaths of my brothers; but now I shall have him,” said the First Ruler angrily.
He gave orders to advance.
But Ma Liang ventured to remonstrate and dissuade him.
“Be very careful;” said he, “this Lu Xun is no whit inferior to Zhou Yu.” “I have grown old in the field,” said the Emperor.
“Don't you think me a match for this callow youth?” He confirmed the order to go forward, and they attacked passes and fords and redoubts wherever they were.
Han Dang notified his chief of the movement of the Shu army, and Lu Xun, still rather dubious of the strict obedience to his orders, hastened to the point of danger.
He found Han Dang on a hill surveying the enemy's force, which advanced like a great wave.
Amidst the army they saw a wide yellow umbrella, and Han Dang pointed it out. “That must be Liu Bei,” said he.
“I should like to kill him.” “Careful,” said Lu Xun. “So far he has scored victory after victory, and his soldiers are very keen and confident. Maintain a careful defense on high grounds and do not go out to battle. If you do, you will lose.
Impress that upon your officers and soldiers and make them understand the strategy while you follow the enemy's moves.
They are hastening into the wide open space, and I do not wish to hinder them.
Nor will I accept any challenge to battle, but wait till they have moved their camps into the forest and among the trees. Then I shall have a scheme ready.” Han Dang agreed so far as words went, but in his heart he was still illconditioned. When the Shu army drew near, a small force came to challenge.
They shouted all sorts of abuse and hurled reproaches to put their opponents to shame, but Lu Xun took no notice and bade his troops stop their ears. He would not allow them to go out to battle, but he went from fort to redoubt, encouraging the soldiers to remain carefully on the defensive.
The First Ruler's heart burned within him at this refusal to come out to battle.
Said Ma Liang, “Lu Xun is a deep and crafty fellow.
He recognizes the disadvantages of Your Majesty's troops in being far from their base, and from spring to autumn he will not come out to fight till some move occurs that he may profit by.” “What ruse can he be contemplate?” said the First Ruler.
“The real fact is that he is afraid.
Their army has suffered nothing but defeat times and again.
They dare not meet us.” One day the leader of the van, Feng Xi, memorialized the First Ruler, saying, “The weather is scorching, and the troops are camped in the full glare of sun.
Beside, water is scarce and hard to get.” Thereupon orders were given to move the camps into the shade of the forest close by and near the streams till the summer heats should have passed.
This order given, Feng Xi moved the camp to a retired and shady spot for his troops.
Ma Liang said, “If our soldiers move, the enemy will rush out on us and we shall be hard set.” “I will provide for that,” said the First Ruler.
“I will send Wu Ban with ten thousand of our inferior troops to camp near their lines.
But I will choose eight thousand of veterans and place them in ambush.
Wu Ban will have orders to flee before the soldiers of Wu and lead them into my ambush if they come out, and I will cut off their retreat.
We ought to capture this precocious youth.” “A genius in plans, a marvel of prevision!” cried ail those about him as this plan was unfolded.
“None of us can approach him in cleverness.” So they felicitated their ruler.
But Ma Liang said, “They say the Prime Minister is on a tour of inspection of the defenses in the eastern portion of Shu, seeing that they are in good order against any attack on the part of Wei.
Why not send him a sketch of your present dispositions of troops and ask his opinion?” “I also am not entirely ignorant of the art of war, and I see no reason to seek advice,” was the cold reply.
“There is an old saying about hearing both sides,” said Ma Liang.
“Well, then you go round to all the camps and make a map and take it to the Prime Minister.
If he finds any fault, you may come and tell me.” So Ma Liang went, while the First Ruler busied himself with getting his army into shelter from the fierce heat of summer.
His move was no secret, and the scouts soon told Han Dang and Zhou Tai, who rejoiced at the news and soon went to tell Lu Xun. “All the enemies' forty camps had been moved into the shade.
Now, Sir, you can attack!” said they.
That was not a bad plan, an ambush to set, Thus thought he his chiefest opponent to get.
Whether Lu Xun acted upon the suggestion of his subordinates will be seen in the next chapter. CHAPTER 84.
Lu Xun Burns All Consecutive Camps; Zhuge Liang Plans The Eight-Array Maze. The last chapter closed with the report that the First Ruler had shifted camp in search of cool shade, and the news was very welcome to Lu Xun.
He went forthwith to assure himself of the truth of the report and observe the new position.
A level plain lay at his feet, whereon he saw something short of ten thousand Shu troops, the greater part of whom appeared invalids. On the banner of their leader he read the name “Van Leader Wu Ban”.
“We consider these troops children,” said Zhou Tai.
“Let me and General Han Dang go out and smite them.
I will give the formal guarantee of victory.” The Commander-in-Chief made no reply, but remained gazing out before him.
Presently he said, “It seems to me that an air of slaughter is rising over there from that valley; surely there is an ambush there. These poor troops in the foreground are nothing but a bait.
No, Gentlemen; do not leave your positions.” Those who heard this took it only as another proof of the imbecility of their pedant commander.
Next day Wu Ban's soldiers approached closer and challenged to battle, swaggering about and brandishing their weapons and shouting volleys of abuse without end.
They manifested contempt by throwing off their armor and clothing and moving to and fro with the utmost carelessness, bare bodies and naked forms, blatantly unready to fight. Some even sat or lay asleep.
Xu Sheng and Ding Feng came to the commander's tent to complain, saying, “Those Shu soldiers despise us so much.
Let us go out and punish them!” But Lu Xun only smiled, saying, “You see everything from the point of view of brute courage. You seem not to know the principles of war laid down by Sun Zi and Wu Qi. This display is only meant to entice us into fight. You will see the pretense yourselves in about three days.” “In three days the change of camp will be complete, and the enemy will be too strongly posted for our success,” said they.
“I am just letting them move their camp.” Xu Sheng and Ding Feng left the tent also sniggering.
But on the third day the officers were assembled at a look-out point whence they saw that Wu's army had left.
“There is still a deadly look over the valley,” said Lu Xun.
“Liu Bei will soon appear.” Very soon they saw a whole army all well accoutered pass across the field escorting the First Ruler.
And the sight took away all their courage.
“That is why I would not listen to those of you who wanted to fight Wu Ban,” said Lu Xun.
“Now that the ambush has been withdrawn, we can settle them in about ten days.” “The proper time to attack was when they began to transfer their camp.
Now they are fully established with encampments stretching two hundred miles. Having spent seven or eight months in strengthening where they might be attacked, will it not be difficult to destroy them?” said they. “I see you do not understand how to carry on war. This man Liu Bei is a capable and crafty man. When he first started on this expedition his methods were of the best, and he kept to them for a long time, so we gave him no chance against us.
When his troops are worn out and his thoughts cease to be clear, that will be our day to attack.” At last they agreed with their chief.
The general discoursed on war, According to the book; Right craftily the bait for whales Was put upon the hook.
When kingdoms three were carved out, Though famous men were many, Lu Xun of Wu At least stands high as any.
Lu Xun had already had the plan whereby the Shu army was to be crushed, and at this stage he wrote to the Prince of Wu in full details, even naming a day for the victory.
“We have found another remarkably able leader,” said the Prince, “and I have no further anxiety.
They all said he was a useless pedant, and only I knew better.
Reading this letter shows him nothing at all of a pedant.” Then the Prince of Wu mustered the remainder of his soldiers to hold in reserve.
Meanwhile the First Ruler had sent orders to hasten the marines down the river and take up stations along the banks deep in the territory of Wu.
However, Huang Quan spoke against this, saying, “It is easy enough for the ships to go a down, but how about returning?
Let me make the first advance, and Your Majesty may follow.
That will make it more than probable that nothing will go wrong.” “Those Wu enemy are afraid,” objected the ruler, “and I want to make a dash at them.
Where is the difficulty?” Though many others had spoken against the proposal, the First Ruler did not give up the notion of going into the forefront of the attack.
Then dividing the army into two portions, he placed Huang Quan in command on the North of the Great River, to keep a watch on Wei, while he commanded on the South of the Great River. They made encampments and stations along the bank.
The spies of Wei duly reported these doings to the Ruler of Wei: “Shu marches against Wu, erecting forty base camps along two hundred miles of woods and hills. Moreover, the Ruler of Shu places Huang Quan in command of the North of the Great River.
Huang Quan's marines patrolled as far as thirty miles daily.
We do not know their intention.” The Ruler of Wei laughed aloud when he heard the details of the long line of camps and the encampments among the trees and all this. “Liu Bei is going to be defeated,” said he.
“How do you know?” asked his courtiers.
“Because Liu Bei does not know how to wage war.
How can he beat off an enemy along a front of two hundred miles?
The maxims of war forbid to camp in open plains, among marshes, amid precipitous heights and obstacles.
He will be defeated at the hand of Lu Xun, and we shall hear of it in about ten days.” His officers felt more than doubtful and entreated their master to prepare an army.
But the Ruler of Wei replied, “If successful, Lu Xun will lead all his force westward into the Western Land of Rivers, and his country will be defenseless.
I shall pretend to send an army to help. I shall send them in three divisions, and I shall overcome Wu easily.” They all bowed acquiescence and approval.
Then orders went out appointing Cao Ren to lead an army out by Ruxu, Cao Xiu to take a second out by Dongkou, and Cao Zhen to command a third to go through Nanjun, and the three armies were to combine on a given date for a sudden attack on Wu. The Ruler of Wei would himself bring up the reinforcement in this southern campaign. Reaching Chengdu, Ma Liang lost no time in seeing the Prime Minister and presenting the plan of the armies as they were in the field.
“Now the forces are on both sides of the Great River extending along a front of two hundred miles, with forty stations, each beside a mountain stream or in a pleasantly shaded forest. At our lord's command, I prepared this map, and he sent me to ask your opinion.” “Who advised such an arrangement?
He ought to be put to death, whoever it was,” cried Zhuge Liang sorrowfully, tapping the table at his side.
“It is entirely our lord's own work; no other had any hand in it,” said Ma Liang.
“The life and energy of the Hans are done indeed,” said Zhuge Liang. “He has committed those very faults which the rules of the Art of War lay down as to be particularly avoided.
The camps are made where free movement is impossible, and nothing can save him if the enemy use fire.
Beside, what defense is possible along a two-hundred-mile front?
Disaster is at hand, and Lu Xun sees it all, which explains his obstinate refusal to come out into the open.
Go back as quickly as you can and tell our lord that this will not do, that it must be changed at once.” “But if I am too late—if Wu has already attacked and won—, what then?” “The enemy will not dare to follow up their victory by a march on Chengdu.
So this capital is secure.” “Why will they not?” “Wei is behind their back; that is why.
Our lord will be compelled to shelter in Baidicheng.
I have already placed ten thousand troops in hiding at Fishbelly Creek.” “Have you?
I have been up and down that creek three or four times without seeing a soldier.
I do not see the reason of telling lies to me,” said Ma Liang.
“You will see; do not ask so many questions.” With the precious instructions which he had persuaded Zhuge Liang to draw up, Ma Liang hastened back to the imperial camp, while Zhuge Liang went to the capital to prepare a relief expedition.
The soldiers of Shu had become slack and idle and no longer maintained adequate defense, wherefore Lu Xun perceived that his moment had arrived, and called his generals to his tent to receive orders. “There has been no fighting since I received our lord's command.
I have spent the time in acquiring a knowledge of the enemy. As a preliminary operation I want to capture a camp on the south bank.
Who volunteers?” Out stepped Han Dang and Zhou Tai and Ling Tong, all three at once, each crying that he wanted to be sent.
But they were sent back; the Commander-in-Chief did not want any of them. Then he called up the junior general, Chunyu Dan, and said, “You will take the fourth camp on the south side; you may have five thousand troops. The commander of the post is Fu Tong.
I shall support you.” When Chunyu Dan had gone, Lu Xun summoned Xu Sheng and Ding Feng and said, “Each of you will take three thousand troops and bivouac two miles from the camp, so that if your colleague is repulsed and pursued, you can rescue him.” Chunyu Dan marched between the lights and reached the camp he was to capture just after the third watch.
His drums rolled, and he attacked at once.
The defenders came out led by Fu Tong, who, spear ready to thrust, rode straight toward the leader of the attack and forced him back.
Suddenly there arose the roll of other drums, and a cohort under Zhao Rong barred the way.
Chunyu Dan turned off along another road, escaping with loss of many troops. But he was not yet safe. Some distance farther he ran against the Mang tribesmen leader Shamo Ke.
However, Chunyu Dan avoided him also and went on his way, pursued now by three parties.
Soon he reached the spot two miles from the camp, and here the two leaders of Shu—Xu Sheng and Ding Feng—, who had been placed ready to afford succor, came out and stopped the pursuit. When the enemy had retired, Chunyu Dan was escorted back to camp.
He was wounded, and with the arrow still undrawn he appeared before Lu Xun and apologized for his failure.
“It was no fault of yours;” said the Commander-in-Chief, “I wanted to test the force of our enemy.
My plan of attack is quite ready.” “The enemy is very strong and will not be easily overcome,” said Xu Sheng and Ding Feng.
“We have now suffered great loss to no purpose.” “This plan of mine would not hoodwink Zhuge Liang, but happily he is not here.
His absence will allow me to score a great success.” Then he summoned his generals to receive orders: “Zhu Ran is to lead the marine force. He is to advance next day afternoon, when the southeast wind will serve. His ships are laden with reeds and straw, which are to be used as ordered.
Han Dang is to attack the north bank, Zhou Tai the south. Each soldier, in addition to his weapons, is to carry a bundle of straw or reeds, with sulfur and saltpeter hidden therein, and each has a piece of tinder. They are to advance, and, when they reach the Shu camps, they are to start a conflagration.
But they are to burn only alternate camps, twenty in all, leaving the others untouched.
They are to advance and only stop if they capture Liu Bei.” The leaders received the orders and so set out.
The First Ruler was in his own camp, pondering over a plan to destroy the armies of Wu, when suddenly the staff that bore the great standard in front of his own tent fell over and lay on the ground. There was no wind to account for this, so he turned to Cheng Ji and asked what it might portend.
“It means only one thing, that the troops of Wu will raid the camp tonight,” said Cheng Ji.
“They will not dare after the slaughter of yesterday.” “But suppose that was only a reconnaissance; what then?” Just then a report came in that some troops of Wu could be seen, very far off, going along the hills eastward.
“They are soldiers meant to put us in confusion,” said the First Ruler.
“Tell the generals not to move, but let Guan Xing and Zhang Bao, with a small mounted force, go out to reconnoiter.” It was dusk when these two returned, and they then reported:
“Fire is seen among the camps on the north bank.” The Emperor hastily bade Guan Xing go to the north camps and Zhang Bao to the south to find out what was really happening.
And they started.
About the middle of the first watch the wind got up and blew strong from the east.
Then fire arose from the camp on the left of the First Ruler's own.
He was starting to extinguish this flame when another fire began in the camp on his right.
With the aid of the strong breeze both fires became fierce, and soon the trees caught. A confused roar showed the gathering strength of the fire.
The soldiers of the burning camps were rushing into the First Ruler's own camp to escape the fire, and in their confusion they trampled on each other, so that many died.
Behind them came the troops of Wu bent on slaughter.
Ignorant of how many they might be, the First Ruler mounted and dashed for Feng Xi's camp, but that also was in flames, which seemed to rise to the very sky.
By this time flames were rising from both sides of the river, so that everything was as visible as by day.
Feng Xi leaped to his horse and fled, followed by a few of his mounted troops. This small force ran against the soldiers of Wu under Xu Sheng.
A melee ensued, thereupon the First Ruler turned and galloped west.
Xu Sheng then left Feng Xi and went in pursuit. Presently the Emperor saw a party of soldiers in the way and became greatly alarmed.
This was Ding Feng's army, and the First Ruler was between two foes.
In his terror he saw no possibility of safety, no road was open. Just at this moment another cohort broke through to his side and rescued him. The leader was Zhang Bao, and he led the Imperial Guards, who fled, taking the First Ruler with them.
As they marched along, they fell in with another force of Shu; the leader was Fu Tong, and he joined up with them.
The Wu army was still following when the fugitives reached Saddle Hill. The two leaders, Zhang Bao and Fu Tong, were urging their lord to go to the top of this out of immediate danger.
Soon Lu Xun arrived with his army and began to surround the hill.
Zhang Bao and Fu Tong held the road up the hill and kept the enemy from ascending.
From the summit could be seen flames all around, and the First Ruler witnessed the corpses of his soldiers lay about in heaps or floated in the streams.
Next day, the soldiers of Wu set themselves to firing the hill. The First Ruler's remaining escort fled for their lives like rats, and their lord was in despair.
Suddenly he saw a general followed by a few horsemen cutting an arterial alley through and coming up the hill. As he drew nearer the Emperor recognized Guan Xing.
Guan Xing quickly leapt down, prostrated himself and said, “Your Majesty, the fire is gaining all round, and this place is not safe.
I request you to try to reach Baidicheng, and as many as possible will gather there.” “Who will dare stay behind to keep off the enemy?” said the First Ruler.
Fu Tong volunteered, saying, “I will fight to death to guard the rear!” It was dusk when they started. Guan Xing led the way.
They got their lord safely down the hill and away. As soon as the troops of Wu noticed the flight, they pressed forward, each anxious to gain kudos by the capture of the Emperor's person. Great armies of Wu, blotting out the sky and hiding the earth, went westward in pursuit. The First Ruler ordered his soldiers to make fires of their clothing and other things in the road so as to hinder pursuit.
Zhu Ran marched up from the river to try to intercept the flight, and the noise of his drums was terrifying. The First Ruler thought there was no possibility of escape from this force, and cried, “This is the end!” His two nephews dashed to the front to try to cut a way through, but returned wounded and bleeding. And the noise of the pursuers came constantly nearer as they found their way along the valleys. About the first glimpse of dawn the case seemed quite desperate.
But just at the worst they saw Zhu Ran's soldiers suddenly begin to break up and scatter, tumbling into streams and rolling down precipices. Soon the reason was evident: a fearsome general leading a cohort came to their relief. Once again the First Ruler was rescued from pressing danger, and this time the rescuer was Zhao Yun.
He had been in Jiangzhou, and news of the straits of his lord had reached him there. He had set out forthwith. Then he had seen the glow of the burnings and had marched toward it. And thus he had arrived just at the moment to save his master when danger was most imminent.
As soon as Lu Xun heard that Zhao Yun had appeared, he ordered his troops to stop pursuit and retire.
Zhao Yun happening upon Zhu Ran, engaged him forthwith and in the first encounter slew Zhu Ran with a spear thrust.
And so the army of Wu were dispersed and retired, and the First Ruler got safely to the wall of Baidicheng. But on the way thither his thoughts went back to his companions in misfortune, and he inquired after them anxiously.
“Though I am safe, how about the other generals and soldiers?” asked the First Ruler.
“The pursuers are close upon us, and we cannot wait for anything,” said Zhao Yun.
“I wish Your Majesty to get into the city as quickly as possible; and while you are reposing yourself, we may try to rescue some of the leaders.” When the First Ruler entered Baidicheng, he was in sore straits, only having about a hundred men left.
A poet wrote concerning this victory of Lu Xun: He grips the spear, he kindles fire, the camps are swept away. Liu Bei to White Emperor City flees, lonely and sad today.
But Lu Xun's meteoric fame now shoots through Shu and Wei, For bookish people the Prince of Wu has naught but good to say.
But Fu Tong, who commanded the rearguard, was surrounded by the enemy in all eight directions. Ding Feng shouted to him, “You would better surrender.
Many of the soldiers of Shu have fallen, more have surrendered, and your lord is a prisoner.
You have no hope against us with your scanty force.” But Fu Tong replied, “Shall I, a servant of Han, give in to the cure of Wu?” Undaunted, he rode at his opponents and fought many bouts. But his strength and valor availed naught; struggle as he would, he could not make his way out. And so he fell among his enemies. A poem celebrates his valiancy:
Wu, at Yiling, strove with Shu, Flames, not swords, used crafty Lu Xun.
Worthy of a place among Han's bold generals is Fu Tong.
The Minister Cheng Ji, having got clear of the battle, rode swiftly to the river bank and called to the marines to join in the battle. They landed, but were soon scattered.
One of Cheng Ji's generals shouted to him:
“The soldiers of Wu are upon us; let find a way to escape.” But Cheng Ji shouted back, “Since I first followed my lord, I have never yet turned my back upon the foe.” The enemy surrounded Cheng Ji, and, as he could do no more, he took his sword and slew himself.
Noble among the warriors of Shu was Cheng Ji, He kept his sword for the service of his prince.
When danger pressed near he wavered not, Wherefore his fame remains forever bright.
Now Wu Ban and Zhang Nan had been besieging Yiling. Then came Feng Xi and told of the need of their lord, and they led off their army to rescue him. Whereupon Sun Huan was set free as Lu Xun had foretold would happen. As soon as Sun Huan was free, he set off in pursuit of Feng Xi and Zhang Nan.
These two marched until they met an army of Wu face to face, and so were between two forces.
A desperate battle was fought, and both these generals perished therein. Feng Xi was loyal without peer. Zhang Nan was righteous, few have equaled him.
In battle on the flaming shore they died, And the histories record their deeds. Wu Ban broke through.
He was pursued, but he luckily fell in with Zhao Yun and got safely to Baidicheng.
The Mang tribesmen King Shamo Ke was flying from the battle field when he met Zhou Tai, who slew him after a short fight.
The two Shu generals Du Lu and Liu Ning surrendered to Wu, as did many soldiers.
Of the stores and weapons in the camps of Shu nothing was saved.
When the story of the disaster to Shu reached the Southern Land, and with it the report that the First Ruler had been killed in battle, Lady Sun gave way to wild grief. She rode down to the river bank and, gazing westward, wept and lamented. Then she threw herself into the stream and was drowned.
Posterity erected a temple on the shore called “The Shrine of the Bold Beauty,” and one who described it wrote a poem:
The Ruler, defeated, fled to Baidicheng, Through thunderous tiding, Lady Sun committed suicide.
Today the water still flows by the carved stone To show where and why this heroine died. There could be no question that this exploit brought tremendous glory to Lu Xun.
Anxious to push his advantage as far as possible, he led his exultant army westward.
But as he drew near to Kui Pass, he suddenly pulled up his horse, remarking that he saw an aura of death about the mountain side in front.
“We may not yet advance farther; I suspect an ambush.” So they retreated three miles and camped in a wide open space.
And the army was arrayed ready against any sudden attack.
Meanwhile, scouts were sent out.
They returned reporting no soldiers. Lu Xun doubted and went up to the summit of a hill whence he could see over the country.
The aura was still visible to him, and so he dispatched other people to spy. But he received the same report; not a soldier, not a horse.
Still, as the sun got lower and lower in the west, he saw the same appearance accentuated, and he began to feel grave doubts. He sent a confidant to look once more.
This man came back, saying, “There is not a single soldier, but I have noticed on the river bank nearly a hundred heaps of boulders.” The Commander-in-Chief, still doubting, called in several of the natives and questioned them about the stones.
“Who put them there? Why did they look so ghastly?” asked Lu Xun. “We do not know.
This place is called Fishbelly Creek.
When Zhuge Liang was going west into the Lands of Rivers, he came along here with a lot of soldiers and heaped up the boulders like that above the Sandy Rapid.
We have seen vapors rising from the boulders; they seemed to come from inside them.” Lu Xun decided to go and look at these boulders himself. So he rode off, with a small escort. Looked down from a declivity, the stones were evidently arranged with a design related to the eight points of the compass. There were doors and door-sills and lintels.
“This looks likely to drive a person out of his senses;” he said, “I wonder whether it is any good.” They rode down with intent to examine the mysterious arrangement more closely and went in among the stones.
Presently one of the escort called attention to the increasing darkness and said, “The sun is setting; we ought to be returning to camp.” But as Lu Xun glanced round to look for an exit, a sudden squall came on and the dust whirled up, obscuring both sky and earth.
And in the swirl the stones reared themselves up like steep mountains, pointed like swords, and the dust and sand shaped themselves into waves and hillocks one behind the other.
The roar of the boiling river was as the drums before a battle.
“This is some trick of Zhuge Liang,” said Lu Xun in a scared voice, “and I have been caught.” He would go out, but he had quite lost his way and could find no exit.
As he stopped to consider what he should do, an old man suddenly appeared, who said, “Does the General wish to go out?” “I greatly desire that you would pilot me out, O Elder,” replied he.
Leaning on his staff, the old man led the way and with quiet dignity conducted Lu Xun outside. He had no difficulty in finding his way and paused not a single instant.
When they were once again on the slope, Lu Xun asked his aged guide who he was.
“I am Zhuge Liang's father-in-law; my name is Huang Chenyan.
My sonin-law placed these boulders here as you see them, and he said they represented the Eight-Array Maze.
They are like eight doors, and according to the scheme are named: Gate of Rest, Gate of Life, Gate of Injury, Gate of Obstruction, Gate of Prospect, Gate of Death, Gate of Surprise, and Gate of Openings.
“They are capable of infinite mutations and would be equal to a hundred thousand soldiers.
As he was leaving, he told me that if any leader of Wu became mazed in them, I was not to conduct him outside.
From a precipice near by I saw you, General, enter in at the Gate of Death; and as I guessed you were ignorant of the scheme, I knew you would be entangled.
But I am of a good disposition and could not bear that you should be entrapped without possibility of escape, so I came to guide you to the Gate of Life.” “Have you studied this matter, Sir?” asked Lu Xun.
“The variations are inexhaustible, and I could not learn them all.” Lu Xun dismounted, bowed low before the old man and then rode away. The famous poet Du Fu wrote some verses which run something like this:
Planner of three kingdoms; no small praise Is his—Inventor of the Eight Arrays.
And for that famous boulders, on the river's brim, Firm was set the denouncement of Wu's whim. Lu Xun took his way to his camp in deep thought.
“This Zhuge Liang is well named Sleeping-Dragon,” said he, “I am not his equal.” Then, to the amazement of all, he gave orders to retire.
The officers ventured to remonstrate, seeing that they had been so successful. “General, you have utterly broken the enemy, and Liu Bei is shut up in one small city; it seems the time to smite, and yet you retire because you have come across a mysterious arrangement of stones.” “I am not afraid of the stones, and it is not on their account that I retire. But I fear Cao Pi.
He is no less resourceful than his father, and when he hears I am marching into Shu, he will certainly attack us.
How could I return then?” The homeward march began.
On the second day the scouts brought a report: “Three Wei generals with three armies are debouching at three different points and moving toward the borders of Wu—Cao Ren from Ruxu, Cao Xiu from Dongkou, and Cao Zhen from Nanjun. Their intentions are unclear.” “Just as I thought,” said Lu Xun.
“But I am ready for them.” “And now the west is mine,” the victor thought, But danger from the north discretion taught.
The story of the retreat will be told in the next chapter. CHAPTER 85.
The First Ruler Confides His Son To The Guardian's Care; Zhuge Liang Calmly Settles The Five Attacks. In summer, the sixth month of the second year of Manifest Might  Lu Xun destroyed the army of Shu at Yiling.
The First Ruler sought refuge in Baidicheng, of which Zhao Yun then undertook the defense.
When Ma Liang returned only to find his lord defeated, he was more distressed than he could say. He announced what Zhuge Liang had said concerning the plans.
The First Ruler sighed, saying, “If I had listened to the Prime Minister's advice, the defeat would not have happened.
Now how can I face a return to my capital?” So he promulgated a command to change the guest-house into the Palace of Eternal Peace.
He was deeply grieved when they told him of the deaths Feng Xi, Cheng Ji, Fu Tong, Zhang Nan, King Shamo Ke, and many of his generals. Next he heard people say:
“Huang Quan, who had been given command of the army on the north bank, had given in to Wei.
Your Majesty should deliver his whole family to the authority and hold them responsible for the renegade.” But the First Ruler only said, “The army was quite cut off by Wu from the south bank, and he had no alternative but to surrender. Really, I betrayed him, not he me.
Why should I take vengeance on his family?” So he continued the issue of the renegade's pay to his family.
When Huang Quan surrendered, he was led into the presence of Cao Pi, who said, “You have surrendered to me because you desired to imitate the admirable conduct of Chen Ping and Han Xin of old.” But Huang Quan replied, weeping, “The Ruler of Shu has been very kind to me, and he gave me the leadership of the army on the North of the Great River.
Lu Xun cut me off so that I could not return to Shu, and I would not surrender to Wu, wherefore I have yielded to Your Majesty.
Defeated as I am, I should be only too happy if my life were spared, but I have no claim to the credit of the virtuous ones of old.” The reply satisfied the Ruler of Wei, and he conferred on him the title General Who Guards the South.
But Huang Quan, however, declined the offer.
Then one of the courtiers said, “A spy has reported that all of your family have been put to death by the Ruler of Shu.” But the leader replied that he could not believe it. “I have the greatest confidence in the clemency of the Ruler of Shu.
He knows I would not have surrendered of my own free will, and he would not injure my family.” And the Ruler of Wei agreed with his opinion. A poem has been written upbraiding Huang Quan:
That was a pity that Huang Quan grudged to die; Though he yielded to Wei, not Wu, Yet he crooked the knee in an alien court. Which the loyal cannot do.
Cao Pi sought advice from Jia Xu concerning his design of bringing the whole country under his own rule.
“I wish to bring the whole empire under my rule; which shall I first reduce, Shu or Wu?” “Liu Bei is an able warrior, and Zhuge Liang is a most capable administrator; Sun Quan possesses discrimination, and his general, Lu Xun, occupies all the strategic positions of importance. The natural obstacles, the intervening rivers and spreading lakes, would be hard to overcome.
I do not think you have any leader to match either of these two men.
Even with the prestige of Your Majesty's own presence, no one could guarantee the result.
The better course is to hold on and await the outcome of the struggle between those two.” “I have already dispatched three armies against Wu; can it be that they will fail?” The Chair of the Secretariat, Liu Ye, held the same opinion as his colleague.
Said he, “Lu Xun has just won a great victory over the great host of Shu, and all his army is full of confidence. Further, there are the lakes and the rivers, which are natural difficulties hard to cope with.
And again, Lu Xun is resourceful and well prepared.” The Ruler of Wei said, “Formerly, Sir, you urged me to attack Wu; why do you now give contrary advice?” “Because times have changed.
When Wu was suffering defeat after defeat, the country was depressed and might be smitten.
Now this great victory has changed all that, and their morale has increased a hundred times.
I say now they may not be attacked.” “Well; but I have decided to attack. So say no more,” said the Ruler of Wei.
He then led the Imperial Guards out to support his three armies. But the scouts soon brought news justifying the opinion of his advisers: “A force of Wu has been sent to oppose each of our three armies.
Lu Fan leads an army against Cao Xiu at Dongkou, Zhuge Jin against Cao Zhen at Nanjun, and Zhu Huan against Cao Ren at Ruxu.” Liu Ye pointed this out and again said, “Wu has prepared, and no success can be expected.” Still Cao Pi was obstinate, and marched.
The Wu leader, Zhu Huan, who had been sent against Cao Ren at Ruxu, was a young man of twenty-seven. He was bold and resourceful, and Sun Quan held him in great regard.
Hearing that Cao Ren was going to attack Xianxi, Zhu Huan led the bulk of his troops to defend it, leaving only five thousand troops in Ruxu.
Then he heard that the van of the enemy, fifty thousand under Commander Chang Diao, with the aid of Zhuge Qian and Wang Shuang, had made a dash for Ruxu, so he hastened back and found the officers were in great fear.
Drawing his sword, he made a speech, “Success depends upon the leader rather than on the number of soldiers.
The Art of War says that the value of one soldier who inhabits the place equals that of two soldiers who come from afar; and those who are in possession, however in small number, can overcome those who come from afar.
Now the enemy is weary from a long march, and I and you, my men, can hold this place together. We have the Great River to defend us on the south, and we are backed by the mountains on the north. Success should be ours easily, and we are as hosts at home awaiting the arrival of our weary visitors. This will give us victory in every fight.
Even if Cao Pi comes, we need feel no anxiety.
How much less care we for Cao Ren and his troops?” Zhu Huan he issued orders to furl all the banners and to silence all the drums as if the city was empty of defenders.
In time, Chang Diao and his veterans of the van came to the city. Not a person was visible, and he hastened forward with all speed.
But as he neared the city, suddenly a bomb went off.
Immediately up rose a forest of flags, and out dashed Zhu Huan with his sword drawn. And he made for Chang Diao.
In the third encounter Zhu Huan cut down Chang Diao, and the troops of Wu, rushing to the attack, thoroughly routed the invaders, slaying innumerable soldiers.
Beside scoring a complete victory, Zhu Huan took much spoil of flags and weapons and horses.
Cao Ren himself, coming up later, was attacked by the troops from Xianxi and was also routed. He fled home to his master with the news of defeat and destruction.
And before the Ruler of Wei could decide what course to take in regard to this loss, the news came of the defeat of his another army:
“Cao Zhen and Xiahou Shang were besieging Nanjun when Zhuge Jin from within and Lu Xun from without attacked in concert. The two generals suffered a great loss.” Immediately, another report came:
“Cao Xiu has been defeated by Lu Fan at Dongkou.” So all three had failed and were lost, and Cao Pi sighed and said sadly, “This has come from my willfulness and neglect of advice of Jia Xu and Liu Ye.” The summer of that year was very unhealthy, and a pestilence swept away the soldiers more than half the number. So they were marched home to Capital Luoyang. The two countries were at enmity though they were not fighting.
Meanwhile the First Ruler was failing. He remained in his Palace of Eternal Peace and presently was confined to his couch. Gradually he became worse, and in the fourth moon of the third year of Manifest Might  his condition became serious. He himself felt the end was near, and he was depressed and wept for his two lost brothers till the sight of his eyes suffered.
He was morose and ill-tempered: he could not bear any of his court near him, drove away his servants and lay upon his couch sad and solitary.
One evening as thus he lay, a sudden gust of wind came into the chamber, almost extinguishing the candles. As they burned bright again, he saw two men standing in the shade behind them.
“I told you I was worried,” said the First Ruler, “and bade you leave me; why have you come back?
Go!” But they remained and did not go.
Wherefore the First Ruler rose and went over to look at them. As he drew near he saw one was Guan Yu and the other Zhang Fei.
“Are you still alive, then, brothers?” said he.
“We are not men; we are shades,” said Guan Yu.
“The Supreme One has conferred spirithood upon us in consideration of our faithfulness throughout life, and ere long, Brother, we three shall be together again.” The First Ruler clutched at the figures and burst into tears; then he awoke.
The two figures were no longer there.
He called in his people and asked the hour; they told him the third watch.
“I am not much longer for this world,” said he with a sigh.
Messengers were sent to Capital Chengdu to summon the Prime Minister and other high officers of state to receive the Emperor's last instructions.
They came, Zhuge Liang bringing the two younger sons, Prince of Lu Liu Yung and Prince of Liang Liu Li. The eldest, the heir-apparent, was left in charge of the capital.
Zhuge Liang saw at once that his master was very ill. He bowed to the ground at the foot of the Dragon Couch.
The dying Emperor bade him come near and sit beside him, and he patted his Minister on the back, saying, “The attainment of emperorship was your work.
Little thought you that I should prove so stupid as not to follow your advice and so bring about the late disasters.
But I am deeply sorry, and now I shall not live long.
My heir is a degenerate, but I must leave him to do the best he can with the great inheritance.” And the tears flowed in streams.
“I trust Your Majesty will fulfill the hopes of the people by a speedy recovery,” said Zhuge Liang, also in tears.
Turning his head, the First Ruler saw Ma Su, Ma Liang's brother, at the bedside. He bade him retire.
When Ma Su had left the chamber, the First Ruler said, “Do you think Ma Su is clever?” “He is one of the ablest people in the world,” said Zhuge Liang. “I do not think so.
I think his words exceed his deeds. Do not make much use of him.
Watch him carefully.” Having said this, he bade them summon the high officers of state to the chamber.
Taking paper and pen, the First Ruler wrote his testament. He handed it to the Prime Minister with a sigh and said, “I am no great scholar, and I only know the rough outlines of what should be known. But the Teacher has said:
'A bird's song is sad when death is near, and a dying person's words are good.' I was waiting that we might aid each other in the destruction of the Caos and the restoration of the Hans, but ere the work is complete I am called away, and this last command of mine I confide to you as Prime Minister to be handed to my son and heir, Liu Shan. My words are to be taken seriously.
I trust that you will instruct and guide my son.” Zhuge Liang and all those present wept and prostrated themselves, saying, “We pray Your Majesty repose yourself.
We will do our utmost whereby to prove our gratitude for the kindness we have received.” At the First Ruler's command the attendants raised Zhuge Liang from the earth.
With one hand the dying man brushed away the falling tears, while with the other he grasped Zhuge Liang's hand and said, “The end is near; I have something more to say as to a close general.” “What holy command has Your Majesty to give?” “You are many times more clever than Cao Pi, and you must safeguard the kingdom and complete the great work.
If my son can be helped, help him.
But if he proves a fool, then take the throne yourself and be a ruler.” Such a speech almost startled Zhuge Liang out of his senses.
A cold sweat broke out all over his body, and his limbs threatened to cease to support him. He fell on his knees, saying, “I could never do otherwise than wear myself to the bone in the service of your son, whom I will serve till death.” He knocked his head upon the ground till blood ran down.
The dying man called Zhuge Liang closer, and at the same time making his two sons come near, he said to them, “My sons, remember your father's words. After my death you are to treat the Prime Minister as you would your father and be not remiss, for thereby you will fulfill your father's hopes.” He made the two Princes pay to Zhuge Liang the obeisance due to a father.
Said Zhuge Liang, “Were I destroyed and ground into the earth, I should be unable to repay the kindness I have experienced.” Turning to the assembled officers, the First Ruler said, “As you have seen, I have confided my orphan son to the care of the Prime Minister and bidden my sons treat him as a father.
You too, Sirs, are to treat him with deference.
This is my dying request and charge to you.” Turning to Zhao Yun, he said, “You and I have gone together through many dangers and difficulties. Now comes the parting of our ways.
You will not forget our old friendship, and you must see to it that my sons follow my precepts.” “I shall never dare to give other than my best,” said Zhao Yun.
“The fidelity of the dog and horse is mine to give and shall be theirs.” Then the First Ruler turned to the others, “Noble Sirs, I am unable to speak to you one by one and lay a charge upon each individual; but I say to you: Maintain your self-respect.” These were his last words.
He was sixty-three, and he died on the twentyfourth day of the fourth month . A poem was written by Du Fu on his death:
The Emperor set out to destroy the land that lay through the Three Gorges, Failed he and breathed his last in the palace of Eternal Peace, The palace fair of his thoughts lay not this side the highlands.
Beautiful chambers are vainly sought in his rural temple, Now are the pines near his shrine nesting places for herons, Through the courts aged peasants saunter, enjoying their leisure, Nearby often is found a shrine to this strategist famous, Prince and minister's needs are now but offerings in season.
Thus died the First Ruler. All present lifted up their voices and wept.
The Prime Minister led the procession that escorted the coffin to the capital, and the heir, Liu Shan, came to the outskirts of the city, as a dutiful son should, to receive the remains with due respect. The coffin was laid in the Great Hall of the palace, wherein they lamented and performed the ceremonies appointed.
At the end of these the testament was opened and read:
“I first fell ill from a simple ailment.
Other disorders followed, and it became evident that I should not recover.
“They say that death at fifty cannot be called premature; and as I have passed three score, I may not resent the call.
But when I think of you and your brothers I regret. Now I say to you, strive and strive again.
Do no evil because it is a small evil; do not leave undone a small good because it is a small good.
Only with wisdom and virtue people can be won.
But your father's virtue was but slender, and do not imitate. “After my death you are to conduct the affairs of the state with the Prime Minister.
You are to treat him as a father and serve him without remissness.
You and your brothers are to seek instructions.
This is my final and simple command.” When this had been read, Zhuge Liang said, “The state cannot go a single day without a ruler, wherefore I beg you to install the heir as successor to the great line of the Hans.” Thereupon the ceremony was performed, and the new Emperor took his place.
The style of the reign was changed to “Beginning Prosperity.” Zhuge Liang was made Lord of Wuxiang and Imperial Protector of Yiazhou.
Then they buried the late Emperor at Huiling with the posthumous style of Liu Bei the Glorious Emperor.
The Empress, of the Wu family, was formally created Empress Dowager.
The late Consort Gan became the Glorious Empress, and the Lady Mi was granted similar, also posthumous, rank.
There were promotions in rank and rewards for all, and a general amnesty was proclaimed.
Before long, knowledge of these things came to the Middle Land, and a report was sent to Capital Luoyang and made known to the Ruler of Wei.
Cao Pi felt relieved and was glad of the death of his rival, saying, “Liu Bei is dead: I am no longer worried.
An attack during the critical moment can bring a victory over Shu.” But Jia Xu dissuaded him, saying, “Liu Bei is gone, but surely he has confided the care of the state to Zhuge Liang, who is indebted to him so deeply.
He will exhaust every effort to support his young lord.
You may not hastily attack.” As Jia Xu tendered this remonstrance, a man suddenly stepped out from the serried ranks of courtiers and said fiercely, “If you neglect this moment, can you expect a more favorable opportunity?” All eyes turned to the speaker; it was Sima Yi.
The interruption greatly pleased Cao Pi, who at once asked how it was to be done. He propounded his plan in the following speech:
“It would be very difficult to obtain success with our own resources. Hence we must use five armies and attack all round at the same time, so as to divide Zhuge Liang.” “Where are the five armies to come from?” said Cao Pi. Sima Yi went on, “The first is to be got from Liaodong, from the Xianbi State.
You must write to King Kebi Neng and send him presents of gold and silks so that he may send one hundred thousand Qiang troops from Liaoxi to attack Xiping Pass.
Secondly, the king of the Mang Tribes, Meng Huo, must be persuaded to lead one hundred thousand troops to attack the south of Shu —Yiazhou, Yongchang, Zangge, and Yuesui. Thirdly, you must send an ambassador to Wu with fair promises of an increase of territory, and so induce Sun Quan to march one hundred thousand troops to the attack of the Three Gorges, making Fucheng his objective.
The fourth army can be got from General Meng Da in Shangyong, who can muster one hundred thousand troops to attack Hanzhong.
Lastly, our own force of one hundred thousand troops may be placed under Cao Zhen, who will attack by way of Yangping Pass.
With five hundred thousand troops making simultaneous attacks along five different directions, it would be hard for Zhuge Liang to hold his own, even if he had the talent of Lu Wang himself.” The scheme delighted Cao Pi, who at once cast about for four glib-tongued messengers.
He also issued a commission to Cao Zhen as Commander-inChief with the order to take Yangping Pass.
At this time Zhang Liao and most others of the veterans who had served Cao Cao were keeping watch in various stations and passes and fords in Jizhou, Xuzhou, Qingzhou, and Hefei. They were not summoned for this expedition to the west.
After the accession of Liu Shan, the Latter Ruler, many of those who had served his father gradually died after the decease of their master.
The work of the administration of the country, the choice of officials, law-making, taxation, decision of legal cases, was all done by the Prime Minister.
As the Latter Ruler had no consort, the courtiers, headed by Zhuge Liang, proposed, saying, “The daughter of the late General of the Chariot and Cavalry Zhang Fei prudent, and she is now seventeen. Your Majesty should make her Empress.” So Lady Zhang was married to the Emperor and so became Empress Zhang.
It was in the autumn of the first year of Beginning Prosperity  that the Latter Ruler heard of the plans and intentions of Wei against his state.
The persons who told him gave him full details of the five armies and said they had previously told the Prime Minister. “But his conduct puzzles us,” said the informers.
“We do not know why he does not take some action instead of remaining shut up in his palace all the time.” The Latter Ruler became really alarmed, and he sent one of his personal attendants to call the Prime Minister to court.
The servant was gone a long time, and then returned to say:
“The servants in the Prime Minister Palace said the Prime Minister was ill and not to be seen.” The young Emperor's distress increased, and he sent two high ministers— Dong Yun and Du Qiong—to Zhuge Liang, saying they were to see him even if he was on his couch and tell him the dreadful news of invasion. They went; but they got no farther than the gate. The keepers of the gate refused them admission.
Then they confided their message in brief to the wardens of the gate, who went inside with it.
After keeping them waiting a long time, the wardens returned, saying, “The Prime Minister is rather better and will be at court in the morning.” The two ministers sighed deeply as they wended their way to the Emperor's palace.
Next morning a great crowd of officers assembled at the gate of the Prime Minister's residence to wait for him to appear. But he did not come out.
It began to grow late, and many of them were tired of waiting, when at last Du Qiong went again to the Emperor and suggested, saying, “Your Majesty should go in person and try to get Zhuge Liang to say what should be done.” The Latter Ruler then returned to his palace with the officials and told the Empress Dowager his trouble. She was also alarmed. “What can he mean?” said she.
“This does not look like acting in the spirit of the charge laid upon him by the late Emperor.
Let me go myself.” “Oh no,” said Dong Yun. “Your Majesty must not go.
We think all is well, and the Prime Minister certainly understands and will do something.
Beside, you must let His Majesty go first, and if the Prime Minister still shows remissness, then Your Majesty can summon him to the Temple of the Dynasty and ask him.” So it was left at that.
And the next day the Emperor rode in his chariot to the gate of his minister.
When the doorkeepers saw the imperial chariot appear, they fell upon their knees to welcome the Emperor.
“Where is the Prime Minister?” asked he.
“We do not know.
But we have orders not to let in the crowd of officers.” The Emperor then descended and went on foot right in to the third gate. Then he saw Zhuge Liang leaning on a staff beside a fishpond looking at the fishes.
The Latter Ruler approached, and stood behind him for a long time. Presently the Latter Ruler said slowly and with dignity, “Is the Prime Minister really enjoying himself?” Zhuge Liang started and looked round.
When he saw who the speaker was, he suddenly dropped his staff and prostrated himself. “I ought to be put to death ten thousand times,” said Zhuge Liang.
But the Emperor put forth his hand and helped him to rise, saying, “Cao Pi threatens immediate invasion from five points; why will you not come forth and attend to business?” Zhuge Liang laughed.
He conducted the Emperor into an inner room, and, when he was seated, Zhuge Liang addressed the Emperor, saying, “Could it be possible that I was ignorant of these five armies? I was not looking at the fishes; I was thinking.” “But, this being so, what shall we do?” “I have already turned back that Kebi Neng of the Qiangs, and Meng Huo of the Mangs, and the rebel leader Meng Da, and the army from Wei.
I have also thought out a plan to circumvent the army from Wu, but I need a special sort of person to carry it out. I want an envoy, an able talker, one capable of persuading other people.
It was because I have not found such a person yet that I was so deeply in thought.
But Your Majesty may set your mind at rest and not be anxious.” The Latter Ruler heard this half terrified and half glad. “Surely your superhuman devices are too deep for mortal human.
But may I ask how these armies have been made to turn back?” “Since His late Majesty bade me take the best care of your welfare, I dare not be remiss for a single moment.
Some officers in Chengdu are ignorant of that refinement of war which consists in not allowing the enemy to guess your plans. How could I let them know anything?
When I heard that Kebi Neng, the king of Qiangs, might invade, I remembered that Ma Chao's forefathers were friendly with those tribespeople and they had a high opinion of Ma Chao, thinking him a leader of supreme prestige. So I sent orders by dispatch to Ma Chao to hold the Xiping Pass, and to prepare ambushes in certain places and change them daily so as to keep the Qiangs off. That settled them.
“I sent hastily to the south to order Wei Yan to move certain bodies of troops about through the southwest territories, to be seen and then to disappear, to go in and come out, and to march to and fro, so that the Mangs should be perplexed. The Mangs are brave, but prone to doubts and hesitations, and they would not advance in the face of the unknown. Hence there is nothing to fear in that quarter.
“I also knew that Meng Da and our Li Yan were sworn friends.
I had left Li Yan in charge of the Palace of Eternal Peace.
I sent Li Yan a letter and urged him to write to Meng Da, so that Meng Da would feign illness and not move his army.
“I sent Zhao Yun to occupy Yangping Pass and all the strategic positions on the way by which Cao Zhen would march, and bade him defend only and not go to the battle.
If our troops refuse to come out, Cao Zhen will certainly have to retire.
So all those four are settled.
But for greater security I have sent Zhang Bao and Guan Xing each with thirty thousand troops to camp at points whence they can quickly help any of the others who may need it. And none of these arrangements are known here. “Now there is only Wu left to deal with.
Had the other four armies succeeded and Shu been in danger, Sun Quan would have come to the attack.
If the others fail, I know he will not budge, for he will remember that Cao Pi has just sent three armies to attack his country. And this being so, I want some one with a ready tongue and ingenious mind to go and talk plainly to Sun Quan. So far I have not found such a person, and I am perplexed.
I regret that I have given Your Majesty occasion to make this journey.” “The Empress Dowager also wanted to come,” said the Emperor.
“But now you have spoken, O Minister Father, I am as one awakened from a dream; I shall grieve no more.” They two drank a few cups of wine together, and the Prime Minister escorted his master to his chariot.
A ring of courtiers were waiting, and they could not help remarking the happiness that shone in their master's face. The Latter Ruler took his leave and returned to his palace, but the courtiers did not know what to think.
Now Zhuge Liang had noted a certain man among the crowd who smiled and looked quite happy.
Zhuge Liang looked at him intently and then recollected his name, which was Deng Zhi of Xinye, a descendant of Regent Marshal Deng Yu of Han.
Zhuge Liang sent a man privately to detain Deng Zhi, and when all the others had gone, Zhuge Liang led him into the library for a chat. Presently he came to the matter near his heart. “The three states have become a fact,” said Zhuge Liang.
“Now if our state wanted to absorb the other two and restore the condition of one rule, which country should it attack first?” “Though Wei is the real rebel, yet Wei is strong and would be very difficult to overthrow. Any move against it would have to develop slowly.
As our Emperor has but lately succeeded his father and the people are none too decided in his favor, I should propose a treaty of mutual defense with Wu.
This would obliterate the enmity of His late Majesty and would have important results. However, you, Sir, may have another opinion.
What is it?” “That is what I have been thinking of this long time, but I had not the person for the task.
Now I have found him.” “What do you want the person to do?” said Deng Zhi.
“I want him to go as envoy to Wu to negotiate such a treaty.
As you understand the position so well, you will surely do honor to your prince's commission as envoy.
There is no other who would succeed.” “I fear I am not equal to such a task:
I am not clever enough and too ignorant.” “I will inform the Emperor tomorrow and beg him to appoint you.
Of course you will accept.” Deng Zhi consented and then took his leave.
As promised, Zhuge Liang memorialized, and the Latter Ruler consented that the mission should be entrusted to Deng Zhi. And he started.
The din of war will cease in Wu, When Shu's desires are known.
For the success or failure of this mission read the next chapter. CHAPTER 86.
Using Words, Qin Mi Overcomes Zhang Wen; Setting Fire, Xu Sheng Defeats Cao Pi.
After his recent exploits, Lu Xun became the one hero of Wu. He was given the title General Who Upholds the State, was ennobled as Lord of Jiangling, and received the Governorship of Jingzhou. He became Supreme Commander of all the military forces. Zhang Zhao and Gu Yong, thinking the moment opportune for enhancing their lord's dignity, sent in a memorial proposing that his rule should be designated by a distinctive style, and Sun Quan assumed Yellow Might as his reign style .
Then arrived a messenger from Wei, and he was called in to an assembly and bidden to state his business.
The messenger said, “Recently Shu sent to Wei for help, and, the situation being misunderstood, the Ruler of Wei dispatched a force against Wu.
Now this action is greatly regretted. In Wei it is thought desirable to set four armies in motion against Shu to capture it; and if Wu will assist, and success crown these efforts, Wei and Wu will share the conquered territory.” Sun Quan listened, but was not prepared to give a decided answer.
He betook himself to his counselors, Zhang Zhao and Gu Yong, who said, “Lu Xun is the man of profound knowledge; he should be consulted.” So Lu Xun was called, and his speech ran thus:
“Cao Pi is too firmly established in the Middle Land to be upset now; and if this offer of his be refused, we shall provoke his enmity.
Neither Wei nor Wu, so far as I see, has any one fit to oppose Zhuge Liang.
We must perforce consent and put our army in order.
But we can wait till we see how the four armies speed. If Shu seems likely to fall and Zhuge Liang is outmaneuvered, then our army can be dispatched and we will take Capital Chengdu.
If the four armies fail, we shall have to consider.” So Sun Quan said to the envoy of Wei, “We are not ready at the moment, so we will choose a day to start later.” And with this answer the envoy left. Next they made careful inquiries about the success or failure of the four armies against Shu.
The spies reported:
“The western Qiangs under Kebi Neng have turned back when they saw Ma Chao in command at Xiping Pass.
The southern Mangs led by Meng Huo have been perplexed at the tactics of Wei Yan and have retreated to their territories.
The Shangyong leader, Meng Da, have set out, but half way have fallen ill and gone back.
And Cao Zhen's army, while marching toward Yangping Pass, have been brought to a halt by the defensive preparations of Zhao Yun, who has garrisoned every pass and occupied every point of vantage; they have eventually retreated, after being camped in the Xie Valley for some time.” Knowing all this, Sun Quan said to his officials, “Lu Xun's words were indeed prophetic; he made most perfect deductions.
Any rash action on my part would place me on bad terms with Shu.” Just then the coming of an envoy from Shu was announced.
Said Zhang Zhao, “This mission is also part of Zhuge Liang's scheme to divert danger from Shu. Deng Zhi has come as envoy.” “That being so, how should I reply?” asked Sun Quan. “I will tell you.
Set up a large cauldron and pour therein a quantity of oil. Light a fire beneath.
When the oil is boiling, choose a goodly company of your tallest and brawniest fighting guards, arm them and draw them up in lines between the palace gate and your throne room. Then summon Deng Zhi; but before he can say a word, forewarn him that he will have the same fate of being boiled in oil if being guilty of the same sort of treachery as Li Yiji when he was a persuader to the state of Qi.
Then see what Deng Zhi will say.” Sun Quan followed this advice, and prepared the cauldron of oil and had the strong guards ready. Then he bade them introduce the envoy.
Deng Zhi came, his ceremonial dress in perfect order, and advanced as far as the gate.
Seeing the grim array of fighting men armed, some with gleaming swords, some with great axes, some with long spears, and some with short knives, he understood at once what was meant, but he never blenched.
He advanced quite steadily and bravely till he reached the door of the hall.
Even when he saw the boiling cauldron of oil and the savage executioners glaring at him, he only smiled.
He was led to the front of the curtain behind which sat the Prince of Wu, and he made the ordinary salutation of raising his extended arms, but he did not bow in obeisance.
The Prince bade his attendants roll up the curtain, and called out, “Why do you not make an obeisance?” Deng Zhi boldly replied, “The envoy of the superior state does not make an obeisance to the ruler of a smaller country.” “If you do not control that tongue of yours, but will let it wag, you will be like that fellow Li Yiji who went to talk to Qi.
You will soon find yourself in the cauldron.” Then Deng Zhi laughed aloud, saying, “People say there are many sages in Wu; no one would believe that they would be frightened of a simple scholar.” This reply only increased Sun Quan's anger, and he said, “Who fears an unmerited fool like you?” “If you fear not the envoy, why so anxious about what he may have to say?” “Because you come here as spokesman of Zhuge Liang, and you want me to sever with Wei and turn to your country; is not that your message?” “I am a simple scholar of Shu, and I am come to explain matters to the state of Wu. But here I find armed guards and a boiling cauldron all prepared against a simple envoy.
How can I form any other opinion than that you will not allow me to speak?” As soon as Sun Quan heard these words, he bade the soldiers go, and called the envoy into the hall.
There he invited him to a seat and said, “What is the real matter between Wei and Wu?
I desire that you would inform me.” Then Deng Zhi replied, “Do you, great Prince, desire to discuss peace with Wei or with Shu?” “I really desire to discuss peace with the Ruler of Shu.
But he is young and inexperienced and ignorant, and unable to carry a matter through.” “Prince, you are a valiant warrior, just as Zhuge Liang is a great minister.
Now Shu has the strength of its mountainous geography just as Wu has the protection of its three rivers. If these two countries are at peace, they are mutually protective. They may swallow up the rest of the empire, or they may stand secure alone.
If you send tribute to Wei and acknowledge yourself one of its ministers, you will be expected to attend at court, and your heirapparent will become a servant in that court; and if you disobey, an army of Wei will be sent to attack you.
Shu also will come down the river and invade your country. Then this country will be yours no longer.
And if you listen not to these words of mine, and refuse my offer, I shall commit suicide before your face and so justify the post I have as an envoy.” As Deng Zhi spoke these last words, he gathered up his robes and marched down the hall as though he was just going to jump into the cauldron.
“Stop him!” cried Sun Quan, and they did so. Then he requested Deng Zhi to go into an inner apartment, where he treated the envoy as a guest of the highest honor.
“O Master,” said Sun Quan, “your words exactly express my thoughts, and I desire to make a league of peace with your country.
Are you willing to be the intermediary?” “Just now it was you, O Prince, who wished to boil this poor servant; now it is also you who wish to use him.
How can such a doubtful person be trusted?” “My mind is made up,” replied Sun Quan.
“Do not doubt me, Master.” Deng Zhi was detained, and a conclave of officers gathered.
Said Sun Quan to the assembly, “Under my hand are all eighty-one counties of the southeast, and I have the lands of Jingzhou to boot, yet I am not so well off as that little country of Shu, for Shu has Deng Zhi for an envoy, and he glorifies his lord.
I have no one to send to declare my wishes to Shu.” Then one stepped forth and said he would go.
The speaker was Zhang Wen of Wucheng, who held the office of Imperial Commander.
“Sir, I fear that when you reach Shu and are in the presence of Zhuge Liang, you will not explain my real sentiments,” said Sun Quan.
Zhang Wen replied, “Think you that I shall fear him?
He also is but a man.” Sun Quan conferred great gifts on Zhang Wen, and sent him on the return mission to Shu to negotiate the league of peace.
While Deng Zhi was absent, Zhuge Liang said to his lord, “This mission to Wu will succeed, and of the many wise people in the east one will come as return envoy.
Your Majesty should treat him with courtesy, and let him return to Wu to complete the league.
For if we have an alliance with Wu, Wei will not dare to send an army against us. And if we are safe from those quarters, I will lead an expedition to subdue the Mangs in the south country. After that we can deal with Wei.
If Wei is reduced, Wu will not last long, and the whole empire will again be under one ruler.” Presently the report reached the capital that Deng Zhi and Zhang Wen, as envoy of Wu, would soon arrive.
The Latter Ruler assembled the courtiers to receive them honorably. The envoy of Wu carried himself as one who had attained his desires, and advanced boldly.
Having made his salute, the Latter Ruler gave him to sit on a brocaded stool on his left hand. A banquet followed at which Zhang Wen was treated with much honor.
At the end of the banquet, the whole court escorted the envoy to the guest-house where he was to lodge.
On the second day there was a banquet at the Prime Minister's palace, and Zhuge Liang broached the real business.
He said, “Our First Ruler was not on friendly terms with Wu. But that is all changed, as is demonstrated by these banquets, and our present Emperor is disposed to be very friendly. It is hoped that the former enmity may be entirely forgotten and the two countries swear eternal friendship and alliance in their common end—the destruction of Wei.
I look to you, Sir, to speak in favor of this league.” Zhang Wen said that he would support the plan.
The wine went merrily round, and as the envoy became mellow, he laughed freely and swaggered and put on a proud demeanor.
Next day the Latter Ruler gave Zhang Wen rich presents of gold and studs and prepared a parting banquet for him in the south guest-chamber, and all the court assembled to take leave of him.
The Prime Minister paid him assiduous attention and pressed him to drink.
While this banquet was in progress, a man suddenly came in as if he were already drunk, made a proud sort of salutation to the company and at once took a seat.
His conduct seemed strange to Zhang Wen, who asked, “Who is the new comer, Sir Prime Minister?” “He is a man named Qin Mi, a Doctorate Academician of Yiazhou,” replied Zhuge Liang.
“He may be that,” said Zhang Wen with a laugh, “but I wonder if he has any learning at all inside him.” Qin Mi listened without changing countenance, and said, “Since our children are all learned, of course I am more so.” “What may have been your special studies, Sir?” said Zhang Wen. “Everything:
astronomy on one hand, geography on the other, the three teachings and the nine systems, all the philosophers, history all through, and all sacred books and traditions.
There is nothing I have not read.” “Since you talk so big,” said Zhang Wen, “I should like to ask you a few questions on celestial matters.
Now has the sky a head?” “Yes; it has a head.” “Where is it?” “In the western quarter; the Odes say, 'God turns his head kindly toward the west,' and further it follows from this that the head is in the west.” “Well; has the sky ears?” “Oh, yes. The sky is above and listens to all things below.
The Odes say, 'The crane calls from the midst of the marsh, its cry is heard by the sky.' How could the sky hear without ears?” “Has the sky feet?” “It has; the Odes say, 'Heaven treads down difficulties.' If there were no feet, how could it tread?” “Has heaven a name?” “Why not?” “Then what is it?” “Liu.” “How do you know that?” “Because the Emperor's family name is Liu, and he is the Son of Heaven.
That is how I know.” “Does the sun spring from the east?” “Though it does, yet it sets in the west.” All this time Qin Mi's repartees had flashed back clear and perfect; they came so naturally as to astonish all the guests. Zhang Wen had no word to reply to them.
Then it became Qin Mi's turn, “You are a famous scholar in your own land, Sir; and since you have asked so many questions about Heaven, I take it you are I well up in all celestial matters.
When original chaos resolved into its two elements, negativity and positivity , the lighter portion rose and became sky, and the grosser sank and solidified into earth.
When Gong Gong's rebellion was crushed, his head struck the Imperfect Mountain, the pillar, which upholds heaven, was broken and the bonds of earth were destroyed. Heaven fell over to the northwest, and earth sank into the southeast.
Since heaven was ethereal and had floated to the top, how could it fall over?
Another thing I do not know is what is beyond the ether.
I should be glad if you would explain, Master.” Zhang Wen had no reply ready, but he rose from his place and bowed his acknowledgment, saying, “I knew not that there was so much ability in this land.
I am happy to have heard such a discourse.
Now all obstructions have disappeared, and I see quite clearly.” But Zhuge Liang, fearing lest the guest should feel mortified, soothed him with fair words, saying, “This is all play upon words, the sort of puzzles one propounds at a merry feast.
You, honored Sir, know that the tranquillity and safety of states are no matters to joke with.” The envoy bowed.
Then Deng Zhi was ordered to return to Wu and thank its ruler for his courtesy, and he was to accompany Zhang Wen.
So both, having taken leave of the Prime Minister, set out on their journey to the east. In the meantime Sun Quan was beginning to feel perplexed at the long delay of his envoy.
He had summoned a council to discuss this question, when the report came that his own envoy had returned, and Deng Zhi was with him.
They were brought in forthwith; and Zhang Wen, having made his obeisance, began to discourse upon the virtue of the Ruler of Shu and Zhuge Liang and to lay before his lord the proposal for a league of peace.
Deng Zhi, the Chair of the Secretariat, was empowered to discuss this matter.
Turning to Deng Zhi, Sun Quan said, “Would it not be a happy result if tranquillity should be restored to the empire by the destruction of Wei, and Wu and Shu should share its administration?” “The sky knows not two suns,” replied Deng Zhi, “nor can the people recognize two kings.
If Wei be destroyed, no one can say upon whom the divine command will devolve.
But one who becomes a prince must perfect his virtue, and those who become ministers must be wholly loyal.
In this way strife will cease.” Sun Quan smiled, saying, “And your sincerity is beyond question.” Deng Zhi was dismissed with rich gifts, and after this Wu and Shu were good friends. The negotiations between his two rivals were reported in Capital Luoyang without loss of time, and Cao Pi was very angry.
“If they have made an alliance, it can only mean that they cherish the intention of swallowing the Middle Land.
My best move is to strike first.” He called a great council.
This council lacked the presence of Regent Marshal Cao Ren and High Counselor Jia Xu, who had both died.
In the council Counselor Xin Pi stepped forward and said, “The country is extensive, but the population so sparse that no successful army could be raised just now.
My advice is to wait ten years, spending that period in forming an army and in cultivating the land till stores and weapons shall have been accumulated.
Then both our rivals may be destroyed.” “This is only the distorted opinion of a perverted pedant. Having made this league, Shu and Wu may fall upon us at any moment.
This matter cannot be postponed for ten years,” said the Ruler of Wei.
An edict appeared commanding the enlistment of soldiers and the formation of an army to subdue Wu.
Sima Yi then said, “Battleships are necessary, as Wu is protected by the Great River.
Your Majesty must lead small and big vessels. The navy can advance by way of River Huai, taking Shouchun. When you reach Guangling, the river is to be crossed and Nanxu is to be captured.
Then Wu will be subdued.” This plan was accepted, and the construction of dragon ships was put in hand and went on day and night. Ten were built two hundred spans long to carry two thousand marines each. They also collected three thousand fighting ships.
In the autumn of the fifth year of Yellow Dawn  the various generals assembled, and Cao Zhen was appointed leader of the first corps. Zhang Liao, Zhang He, Wen Ping, and Xu Huang were Chief Commanders; Xu Chu and Lu Qian were guards of the center army; and Cao Xiu commanded the rear guard; the strategists were Liu Ye and Jiang Ji.
In all, land and marine forces numbered over three hundred thousand troops.
When the starting day was decided upon, Sima Yi was made Chair of the Secretariat and left in the capital with the powers of Regent Marshal.
The spies told the Prince of Wu's attendants of the dangers, and the latter hastened to inform the Prince. They said, “Cao Pi is leading the dragon fleet and commanding three hundred thousand marines and ground forces against the South Land, and the danger is very great.” When Sun Quan met his council, Gu Yong said, “My lord, you can call upon Shu for help according to the treaty.
Write to Zhuge Liang and get him to send out an army through Hanzhong so as to divert part of Wei's army.
Also you send an army to Nanxu to oppose them there.” “I shall have to recall Lu Xun,” said the Prince.
“He is the only man to undertake this great task.” “Do not move him if you can help it; he is necessary for the protection of Jingzhou.” “Yes, I know; but there is no other strong enough to help me.” At these words Xu Sheng advanced, saying, “I know I am not very able, but I desire to be given an army to meet this danger.
If Cao Pi crosses the river in person, I will make him prisoner and present him at the gate of your palace.
If he does not come over here, I will slay so many of his soldiers that his army shall not dare even to look southward.” Sun Quan was pleased to find a willing volunteer, and replied, “Noble Sir, what anxiety need I feel if I have your protection?” Xu Sheng was given the title of General Who Protects the East and made Chief Commander of all the forces in Nanxu and Jianye.
As soon as he had received his orders, he retired.
He gave command to gather enormous quantities of weapons, and had many flags and banners made for the protection of the river banks.
But another impetuous young leader was anxious to take more vigorous measures, and he stood forth, saying, “My lord has laid upon you, O General, a heavy responsibility; but if you really desire to destroy the invading force and capture Cao Pi, you should send an army to meet him on the north side in the South of River Huai.
I fear failure if you wait till the northern troops have come this far.” The young man was Sun Shao, nephew of the Prince of Wu.
He had already the title of General Who Possesses Wide Prestige, and was in command at Guangling.
Though young and impetuous, he was very valiant.
“Cao Pi's army is strong and its leaders famous.
I hold that we may not cross the river to meet him, but wait the arrival of his ships on the other side.
Then I shall carry out my plan,” said Xu Sheng. “I have three thousand troops of my own, and I know the country about Guangling thoroughly. Let me go across the river and fight a battle.
I will willingly undergo the penalty if I fail,” said Sun Shao.
However, Xu Sheng refused, and all the pleadings of his impetuous general were vain.
And when he still persisted, the Commander grew angry and said, “What control shall I have if you are allowed to disobey orders?” Xu Sheng ordered the lictors to take Sun Shao out and put him to death. They led him away, and forthwith the black flag was hoisted.
But one of Sun Shao's generals went off in hot haste to tell Sun Quan, who came immediately to try to save his favorite. Happily the execution had not been accomplished when the Prince appeared on the scene, and he bade the executioners disperse. The youth was saved.
Sun Shao began to press his claim to the Prince, saying, “I have been at Guangling, and if we do not attack the enemy there, but let him get down to the river, there will be an end of Wu.” Sun Quan went into the camp, and Xu Sheng came to receive him.
When the Prince was seated in his tent, Xu Sheng said, “O Prince, you placed me in command of the force to repulse Wei.
Now this general of mine, Sun Shao, is disobedient and should suffer death.
I would ask why he should be pardoned.” “He is naturally hot and impetuous.
He has been guilty of disobedience, but I hope you will overlook his fault.” “The law is none of my making, nor is it yours, O Prince; it is a state penalty, and if relationship is enough to evade it, where is discipline?” “He has offended, and you have the right to judge and punish.
But although his real name is Yu Shao, yet my brother Sun Ce loved him and gave him our family name.
He has rendered me good service, and if he should be put to death, I should fail in my fraternal duty.” “Since you have intervened, O Prince, I remit the death penalty.” Sun Quan bade his nephew thank his chief, but the youth would not make an obeisance. On the contrary, he loudly maintained the correctness of his view.
“I can only lead my troops against Cao Pi and so die,” cried Sun Shao.
“I cannot consent to the other plan.” Xu Sheng's countenance changed. The recalcitrant young man was ordered to leave the tent by Sun Quan.
“He will not be any loss,” said Sun Quan, “and I will not employ him again.” Then the Prince left and returned to his own place.
That night they reported to Xu Sheng that Sun Shao had gone secretly over the river with his own three thousand troops, and the Commander, who did not wish him to come to harm, as evidently that would displease the Prince, sent a force to support him. Ding Feng was chosen to command this reinforcement, and he was told what to do.
The Ruler of Wei, in his dragon ships, reached Guangling, and the van got to the river bank. He came to survey the position.
“How many soldiers are on the other bank?” asked Cao Pi.
Cao Zhen replied, “I have not seen a single one; nor are there any flags or encampments.” “That is a ruse; I will go and find out.” So Cao Pi set out to cross the river in one of the dragon ships.
He anchored under the bank. On his boat were displayed the imperial emblems of dragon, phoenix, sun, moon, and they shone out bravely.
Seated in the ship, the Emperor looked up and down the south bank, but not a man was visible.
“Do you think we should cross?” asked the Emperor of his strategists.
“If the rules of war mean anything, they ought to be prepared.
We think Your Majesty should exercise caution.
Wait a few days and watch.
Then perhaps the van might be sent to make a reconnaissance.” “So I think,” said the Ruler of Wei.
“But as it is now late, we will pass the night on the river.” It was a dark night, and the ships was brilliantly lighted up; it seemed like day on board.
But all along the south bank there appeared no glimmer of light. “What do you think it means?” said Cao Pi.
The courtiers replied, “They heard that Your Majesty's heavenly army was coming, and ran away like so many rats.” The Ruler of Wei laughed to himself.
When daylight came there came with it a thick fog, so that nothing on the bank could be seen.
After a time, a breeze blew off the fog, and then, to their immense surprise, they found that the whole length of the South of the Great River as far as they could see was one battlement, with towers at intervals, while spears and swords glittered in the sun and flags and pennons fluttered in the breeze.
In just a short time several reports came: “A long wall by the Great River has grown up in a night and stood there with carts and masts of ships lying along it, stretching some one hundred miles from Shidou to Nanxu.” The fact was that the wall was an imitation, and the warriors that manned it were bundles of reeds dressed in soldiers' uniforms. But the sight chilled the ardor of the invaders. “My hosts of troops are no use against such warriors; we can do nothing against those talents of the South Land,” said Cao Pi.
He thought over this sadly enough. But now the wind had increased in force, and white combers began to heave up in the river, and waters broke over his boat, drenching the dragon robes. The ship seemed as if it would roll right over.
So Cao Zhen sent out small boats to rescue his master and his people. But they were too affrighted to move.
Wherefore Wen Ping, who was in charge, leaped on board and helped the Emperor down into one of the smaller craft, which then flew away before the wind and got safely into a creek. Soon came a hasty messenger to report:
“Zhao Yun is marching out through Yangping Pass and threatening Changan.” This frightened Cao Pi so badly that he decided to retreat, and gave orders to retire.
The whole army were in a mood to run away, and moved off toward the north, pursued by the troops of Wu.
To hasten the march, the Ruler of Wei bade his soldiers abandon all the imperial paraphernalia and impediments.
The dragon ships withdrew into River Huai one by one. As they moved in disorder, suddenly arose the sounds of an enemy force, shouts and the rolling of drums and the blaring of trumpets, and a cohort marched down obliquely on to their line. And at the head was Sun Shao.
The troops of Wei could make no effective stand, and many were slain, while large numbers were driven into the river and drowned.
By dint of great efforts, the Emperor was saved and got away up the river.
But when they had sailed about ten miles, they saw ahead a tract of blazing reeds. The enemy had poured fish oil over the dry reeds and set them afire.
The wind was spreading the flames down river toward the fleet of Wei, and the heat was intense. The dragon ships had to stop.
Cao Pi was put into a smaller craft and taken on shore; his larger ships were presently set on fire and destroyed.
They mounted the Emperor on a horse and moved along the bank, but soon they fell in with another body of troops.
This time it was the supports under Ding Feng.
Zhang Liao rode ahead to engage the leader, but was soon wounded by an arrow of Ding Feng in the loins. However, he was helped away by Xu Huang, and the Ruler of Wei was got safely out of the turmoil.
The loss of soldiers was heavy, and a huge booty of horses, carts, ships, and weapons fell to the victors.
So the Wei armies went away north thoroughly beaten, while Xu Sheng had scored a great success.
Sun Quan richly rewarded him. Zhang Liao got to Xuchang, but only to die from the effects of his wound. He was honorably buried by the Ruler of Wei.
It has been said that Zhao Yun was threatening Changan; but soon after he went through Yangping Pass, the Prime Minister of Shu sent a dispatch to recall him because Veteran General Yong Kai in Yiazhou had joined himself with the Mangs and invaded the four southern territories.
So Zhao Yun returned.
Meanwhile Ma Chao was ordered to take command of Yangping Pass. The Prime Minister was about to go to subdue the nations along the south border. He was then preparing at Chengdu for this expedition.
First Wu met Wei and drove them north, Then Shu against the Mangs went south.
The story of this campaign will follow in the next chapters.
CHAPTER 87. Conquering The South Mang, The Prime Minister Marches The Army; Opposing Heaven Troops, The King Of The Mangs Is Captured. With Prime Minister Zhuge Liang's administration of affairs in the two Lands of Rivers began a period of happiness and prosperity for the people.
Tranquillity prevailed, and the state of society was well nigh perfect: doors unbolted at night, property left by the roadside remaining untouched till the owner returned for it.
Moreover, the harvests were rich year after year, and old and young, with fair, round bellies, well lined, simply sang with joy. The people hastened to fulfill their state duties and vied with each other in the performance of all arts.
As a natural consequence all military preparations were perfect, the granaries bursting with grain and the treasury full to overflowing.
Such was the state of things when, in the third year of Beginning Prosperity , the news came from Yiazhou to the capital to report: “The Mang King, Meng Huo, leading one hundred thousand Mang tribesmen, has invaded the south and is laying waste the country; Yong Kai, the Governor of Jianning, a descent of the Han Lord Yong Chi of Shifang, had joined Meng Huo to rebel.
Zhu Bao and Gao Ding, the Governors of Zangge and Yuesui, have yielded to the invaders; but the Governor of Yongchang, Wang Kang, is staunchly holding out.
The three rebels—Yong Kai, Gao Ding, and Zhu Bao—, who had joined the invaders, are now acting as guides and assisting in the attack on Yongchang, which has remained faithful.
Governor Wang Kang, ably assisted by Lu Kai, one of his subordinates, is making a desperate effort to defend the city with only its ordinary inhabitants as fighting men.
The position is very desperate.” When this news came, Zhuge Liang went into the palace and thus memorialized to his lord, “The contumacy of the Mangs is a real danger to our state.
I feel it incumbent upon me to lead an expedition to reduce the tribespeople to obedience.” But the Latter Ruler was afraid, and said, “Sun Quan is in the east, and Cao Pi the north; if you abandon me and either of them comes, what shall do?” “Your Majesty need have no fear.
We have just concluded a league of peace with Wu, and I think they will be true to their pledge.
Li Yan in Baidicheng is quite a match for Lu Xun.
Cao Pi's recent defeat has taken the keenness out of his army, so that he will not feel inclined to make any expeditions further.
Ma Chao is in command at the passes between Wei and Hanzhong.
I shall also leave Guan Xing and Zhang Bao with forces to reinforce any point where danger may appear. I can assure Your Majesty that no untoward event will happen. “I am going to sweep clean the Mang country, so that we may have a free hand to attack Wei when the day comes.
Thus I shall be enabled to requite the honor paid me by your father the First Ruler, who came thrice to seek me and who doubled my obligation when he confided to me the care of his son.” “Indeed I am young and ignorant,” replied the Latter Ruler, “and can only exist with you to decide for me.” At that moment Counselor Wang Lian, a man of Nanyang, stepped forward, crying, “No, no, Sir; you may not go!
The South Mang is a wild country reeking with malaria.
It is wrong that an officer of state in such an exalted and responsible position should go away on a distant expedition.
These rebels and barbarians are but an irritation, not a disease, and an ordinary leader would be enough to send against them.
He would not fail.” Zhuge Liang replied, “This country of the Mangs is distant and mostly uncivilized. To reduce them to reasonableness will be difficult, and I feel I ought to go.
When to be harsh and when to show leniency are matters to be decided on at the moment, and instructions cannot be easily given to another.” Zhuge Liang steadily opposed all Wang Lian's efforts to bring about a change of intention, and he soon took leave of the Latter Ruler and made ready to start.
Jiang Wan was Army Counselor of the expedition; Fei Yi, Recorder; Fan Jian and Dong Jue, Army Inspectors; Zhao Yun and Wei Yan, Commanders; Wang Ping and Zhang Yi, Deputy Generals.
Beside these were other half a hundred leaders and officers of Shu, and the whole force was five hundred thousand troops.
Soon after the force marched south to Yiazhou, Guan Suo, the third son of Guan Yu, appeared and wished to see Zhuge Liang, and he said, “After the fall of Jingzhou, I was hidden by the Bao family from where I wanted to go to the Lands of Rivers to ask for a revenge for my father; but I fell in illness, which was long and severe, and I only just recovered. I was then traveling toward Chengdu to meet with the Emperor, when I met the army in the south expedition. I know that vengeance has been taken on the murderers of my father.
And now I want to present myself to the Prime Minster.” Zhuge Liang was greatly affected to see him.
He sent news of the young man's arrival to the court and gave Guan Suo a post of Van Leader.
The army, foot and horse, marched in the best of order, eating when hungry, drinking when thirsty, camping at night, and moving by day. No plundering was permitted, and the people suffered not at all.
When Yong Kai and his fellow rebels heard that Zhuge Liang was marching against them, they called their troops together and formed three divisions, Gao Ding in the center, Yong Kai on the left, and Zhu Bao on the right.
They mustered about fifty thousand troops in each army, and they went to oppose the march of the Shu army.
Gao Ding sent E Huan to lead the van.
This E Huan was nine spans tall in stature, but savage of countenance. His weapon was a two-bladed halberd. He was very valiant and could face many warriors. He led his own cohort out in advance of the main body and fell in with the leading bodies of the Shu army immediately after they had got into Yiazhou.
The two sides drew up for battle; and, the arrays being complete, Wei Yan rode out and vilified the rebels, shouting, “O Malcontent!
Be quick to surrender!” Instead, E Huan galloped out and fought with Wei Yan.
After a few bouts Wei Yan seemed to be bested and fled. But this was only a ruse.
As E Huan followed, the gongs clanged and from left and right poured out Zhang Yi and Wang Ping.
Wei Yan turned around, and three generals besieged and captured E Huan.
He was taken to the tent of Zhuge Liang, who bade his attendants loose his bonds, gave him wine and comforted him.
Then Zhuge Liang asked, “Whom do you belong to?” E Huan replied, “I am one of the generals under Gao Ding.” “I know Gao Ding as a loyal and good sort, but he has been led away by this Yong Kai.
Now I shall release you, but you are to bring Gao Ding to his senses and see to it that he comes to surrender and avoids grave disaster.” E Huan thanked him and withdrew. He went to his own side and soon saw Gao Ding. He told Gao Ding what Zhuge Liang had said, and Zhuge Liang's kindly feeling deeply affected Gao Ding.
Next day, Yong Kai came over to Gao Ding's camp to visit him.
After the exchange of salutations, Yong Kai asked, “How did E Huan manage to return?” “Zhuge Liang released him out of pure kindness,” replied Gao Ding.
“This is a ruse of his to separate you from me:
he wishes to make us enemies.” Gao Ding almost believed this too, and he was much perplexed.
Just then the watchers reported that the leaders of Shu had come up and were offering battle. So Yong Kai led out thirty thousand troops to take up the challenge. But after the third encounter he fled. Wei Yan pursued him and smote for a distance of seven miles.
Next day Yong Kai challenged, but the soldiers of Shu refused to fight, and remained within their lines for three days.
On the fourth day Yong Kai and Gao Ding divided their troops into two parts and came to attack the camp.
Now Zhuge Liang had told Wei Yan to wait for this double attack, and so when it came to pass, both divisions fell into an ambush and suffered great loss, many being killed and more captured.
The prisoners were taken to the camp, and the soldiers belonging to the two leaders—Yong Kai and Gao Ding—were confined separately.
Then Zhuge Liang told the soldiers to let it be known that only those belonging to Gao Ding would be spared, the others would be put to death. When time had been given for this story to spread among the prisoners, Yong Kai's troops were brought up to the commander's tent.
“Whose soldiers were you?” asked Zhuge Liang.
“Gao Ding's,” cried they all, falsely.
Then they were all pardoned, and, after being given wine and food, they were taken to the frontier and set free.
Next the real Gao Ding's soldiers were brought forward, and the same question was put to them.
“We all really belong to Gao Ding's command,” said they.
In like manner they were pardoned and refreshed with wine and food.
Then Zhuge Liang addressed them, saying, “Yong Kai has just sent a messenger to ask that he may surrender, and he offers to bring with him the heads of Gao Ding and Zhu Bao as a proof of merit.
But I will not receive him, and you, since you are Gao Ding's soldiers, shall be released and allowed to return to him.
But let there be no ingratitude and fighting again, for if there is, I certainly will not pardon you next time.” So they thanked their liberator and went away.
As soon as they reached their own camp, they told the whole story. Then Gao Ding sent a spy to the camp of Yong Kai to find out what was doing.
There the spy met those who had been released, and they were all talking about Zhuge Liang's kindness, and many of them were inclined to desert their own camp for the other.
Although this seemed very satisfactory, yet Gao Ding did not feel convinced, and he sent another man to Zhuge Liang's camp to try to verify the rumor.
But this man was captured and taken before the Commander-inChief, who pretended that he thought the spy belonged to Yong Kai, and said to him, “Why has your leader failed to send me the heads of Gao Ding and Zhu Bao as he promised?
You lot are not very clever, and what are you come to spy out?” The soldier muttered and mumbled in confusion.
But Zhuge Liang gave the man wine and food, and then wrote a letter which he handed to the spy, saying, “You give this letter to your commander, Yong Kai, and tell him to get the job done quickly.” The spy took the letter and got away.
As soon as he reached camp, he gave the letter to Gao Ding and also the message.
Gao Ding read the missive and became very angry. “I have ever been true to him, and yet he wants to kill me. It is hard to be either friendly or reasonable.” Then he decided to take E Huan into his confidence, and called him.
E Huan was much prejudiced in favor of Zhuge Liang, and said, “Zhuge Liang is a most benevolent man, and it would be ill to turn our backs upon him.
It is Yong Kai's fault that we are now rebels, and our best course would be to slay him and betake ourselves to Zhuge Liang.” “How could it be done?” asked Gao Ding. “Invite him to a banquet.
If he refuses, it means he is a traitor, and then you can attack him in front while I will lie in wait behind his camp to capture him as he runs away.” They agreed to try this plan; the banquet was prepared and Yong Kai invited.
But as Yong Kai's mind was full of suspicion from what his returned soldiers had said, he would not come.
That night, as soon as darkness fell, Gao Ding attacked his camp.
Now the soldiers who had been released were imbued with the goodness of Gao Ding all quite ready to help him fight.
On the other hand, Yong Kai's troops mutinied against him, and so Yong Kai mounted his steed and fled.
Before he had gone far, he found his road blocked by the cohort under E Huan, who galloped out with his halberd and confronted the fugitive. Yong Kai could not defend himself, and was struck down. E Huan decapitated him.
As soon as they knew he was dead, his troops joined themselves to Gao Ding, who then went and surrendered to Zhuge Liang.
Zhuge Liang received Gao Ding sitting in state in his tent, but at once ordered the lictors to decapitate Gao Ding.
But Gao Ding said, “Influenced by your kindness, Sir, I have brought the head of my colleague as a proof of the sincerity of my surrender; why should I die?” “You come with false intent; do you think you can hoodwink me?” said Zhuge Liang, laughing. “What proof have you that I am false?” Zhuge Liang drew a letter from his box, and said, “Zhu Bao sent this secretly to say he wished to surrender, and he said you and Yong Kai were sworn friends to death. How could you suddenly change your feelings and slay him?
That is how I know your treachery.” “Zhu Bao only tried to make trouble,” cried Gao Ding, kneeling. Zhuge Liang still refused to believe him, and said, “I cannot believe you without more solid proof.
If you would slay Zhu Bao, I could take that as proving you were sincere in your surrender.” “Do not doubt me.
What if I go and capture this man?” “If you did that, my doubts would be set at rest.” Thereupon Gao Ding and his subordinate, E Huan, led away their troops to the camp of Zhu Bao.
When they were about three miles from his camp, Zhu Bao appeared with a cohort.
As soon as they recognized each other, Zhu Bao hastily came forward to parley.
But Gao Ding cried out to him, “Why did you write a letter to the Prime Minister and so intrigue with him to get me killed?” Zhu Bao stared open mouthed and could not reply.
Then E Huan rode out from behind his chief and struck Zhu Bao with his halberd so that he fell to the ground.
Thereupon Gao Ding shouted, “The soldiers should either yield or be slain!” And they yielded in a body. Gao Ding then went back to Zhuge Liang and offered the head of the man just slain. Zhuge Liang laughed again.
“I have made you kill both these as a proof of loyalty.” Then he created Gao Ding Governor of Yiazhou and chief of three territories, while E Huan was made General.
Thus the three divisions were disposed of and troubled the peace no more.
Governor Wang Kang of Yongchang then came out of the city and welcomed Zhuge Liang; and, when Zhuge Liang had made his entry into that city, he called Wang Kang and asked, “Who has aided you in the defense of this city?” The Governor said, “The safety of this city is due entirely to Lu Kai.” So Lu Kai was called.
He came and bowed.
Zhuge Liang said, “Long since I heard of you as a remarkable person of this area. We are greatly indebted to you for its safety.
Now we wish to conquer the Mangs; have you any advice to offer?” Lu Kai then produced a map of the country and presented it, saying, “From the time of my appointment, I have felt certain that the southern tribespeople would rise against you, and so I sent secret agents to map out the country and find the strategic points.
From that information I prepared this map, which I call 'The Plan to Subdue the Mangs.' I beg you, Sir, to accept it, as it may be of use.” Then Zhuge Liang took Lu Kai into his service as Military Adviser and Guide.
With Lu Kai's help, Zhuge Liang advanced and penetrated deeply into the country.
While the army was advancing, there came a messenger from the court.
When he appeared, Zhuge Liang saw it was Ma Su, and he was clothed in white. He was in mourning for his brother, Ma Liang, who had just died.
He said, “I come by special command of the Emperor with gifts of wine and silks for the soldiers.” When the ceremonies proper on receipt of a mandate from the Emperor had been performed, and the gifts distributed as instructed, Ma Su was asked to remain to talk over matters.
Zhuge Liang said, “I have His Majesty's command to conquer these Mangs.
I hear you have some advice to offer, and I should be pleased if you would instruct me.” “Yes; I have one thing to say that may be worth thinking over.
These people refuse to recognize our supremacy, because they think their country is distant and difficult.
If you should overcome them today, tomorrow they would revolt.
Wherever your army marches, they are overcome and submit; but the day you withdraw the army and attack Cao Pi, they will renew their attack.
In arms even it is best to attack hearts rather than cities; to fight with sentiment is better than to fight with weapons.
It will be well if you can win them over.” “You read my inmost thoughts,” said Zhuge Liang.
Then Ma Su was retained with the army as Military Adviser, and the army marched on.
When the King of the Mangs, Meng Huo, heard how cleverly Zhuge Liang had got rid of Yong Kai, he called together the leaders of the “Three Ravines” to discuss matters.
The chief of the first Ravine was Jinhua Sanjie, of the second Dongtu Na, and of the third Ahui Nan.
These having come to the King's place, he said to them, “Zhuge Liang and his Grand Army has invaded our country, and we must exert our united strength to drive out the invaders.
You three must lead your forces, and whoever conquers the enemy shall be chief of chiefs.” It was arranged that Jinhua Sanjie should march in the center division, Dongtu Na on the left, and Ahui Nan on the right. Each division was fifty thousand tribesmen.
When the scouts made out that the Mang armies were coming, they at once told Zhuge Liang, who called Zhao Yun and Wei Yan to his side, but gave them no orders.
Next he sent for Wang Ping and Ma Zhong, and said to them, “I cannot send Zhao Yun and Wei Yan against the Mangs because they do not know the country.
You two are to go, one against each wing, and the two veteran warriors shall support you.
Get your troops ready and start tomorrow at dawn.” Wang Ping and Ma Zhong took the orders and went out. Then Zhang Yi and Zhang Ni were given orders:
“You two are to march against the center army; you are to act with Wang Ping and Ma Zhong tomorrow.
I want to send Zhao Yun and Wei Yan, but I am still afraid they do not know the country well.” Zhang Yi and Zhang Ni also received the orders and went out.
Zhao Yun and Wei Yan now began to feel hurt.
Noticing this, Zhuge Liang said, “I have no wish to pass you over, you two, but I fear that if you get too deeply into the country and should fall victims to the Mangs, it will have an ill effect on the others.” “But what if we did know the geography of the country?” said Zhao Yun.
“All I say to you is to be careful how you do anything,” replied Zhuge Liang.
The two soldiers left and went together to the camp of Zhao Yun. Zhao Yun said, “We are greatly ashamed at being put in the background because we do not know the country. We cannot bear this.” “Then let us ride out and survey,” said his colleague.
“Let us capture a few natives and make them show us the road, and let us defeat these tribesmen.” They rode off.
Before they had gone far they saw a cloud of dust in the distance.
Climbing a hill to get a better view, they saw a small party of mounted Mangs coming toward them.
The two waited till they were near and then suddenly burst out.
The Mangs, taken entirely by surprise, ran away all but a few, who yielded themselves prisoners. The two warriors returned to camp. The prisoners were given wine and food; and when they had satisfied their hunger, they were questioned.
Said they, “The camp of Chief Jinhua Sanjie is just in front, just by the entrance to the mountains.
Near the camp, running east and west, is the Five Valleys.
The camps of the other two chiefs—Dongtu Na and Ahui Nan—are behind.” Having listening to this information, Zhao Yun and Wei Yan got together five thousand troops, took the captured men as guides, and marched out about the second watch.
It was a clear night, and the moon gave light to march by.
The first camp was reached about the fourth watch. The Mang soldiers were already awake and preparing their morning meal, as they intended to attack at daylight.
Suddenly Zhao Yun and Wei Yan gave a signal of attack, and their troops poured forward. The vigorous and unexpected attack of the two generals threw the camp into confusion.
Zhao Yun fought into the center of the camp and encountered Jinhua Sanjie.
Both leaders engaged, and Zhao Yun slew Jinhua Sanjie by a spear thrust. Then Zhao Yun dismounted and cut off the head of the Chief.
Then Wei Yan took half the force and went west to the second camp, while Zhao Yun marched east to the third one.
By the time they reached the camps, day had dawned. The Mangs also had news of Wei Yan's coming, and drew up the camp to oppose.
But when they had got clear, there was a great uproar behind them at the stockade gates, and confusion followed.
The reason was the arrival of Wang Ping.
Between the two bodies, the Mangs were beaten.
Their Chief, Dongtu Na, forced his way out and got away. Wei Yan's soldiers followed, but they could not catch him. When Zhao Yun led his troops east to attack the third camp in the rear, Ma Zhong made an attack on the front.
They scored a success, but the Chief Ahui Nan escaped.
They returned to headquarters, and Zhuge Liang said, “The three parties of Mangs have fled, and Dongtu Na and Ahui Nan escaped; where is the head of Jinhua Sanjie?” Zhao Yun produced it. At the same time he reported:
“Dongtu Na and Ahui Nan escaped by abandoning their horses and going over the hills.
Therefore, we could not be followed.” “They are already prisoners,” said Zhuge Liang with a laugh. The fighting men could not credit it.
But soon after Zhang Ni brought out Dongtu Na, and Zhang Yi Ahui Nan.
When the Shu leaders expressed surprise and admiration, Zhuge Liang said, “I had studied the map and knew the positions of the camps. I taunted Zhao Yun and Wei Yan into making a supreme effort into the camp of Jinhua Sanjie; at the same time that I sent other forces under Wang Ping and Ma Zhong, with the purpose to support Zhao Yun and Wei Yan and to force Dongtu Na and Ahui Nan to flee.
I felt certain the two chiefs would run away along those small roads, and I set soldiers under Zhang Ni and Zhang Yi on those roads to wait for them.
They also were supported.” They all bowed, saying, “The Prime Minister's calculations are divine and incomprehensible.” The two captive chiefs were then called.
As soon as they appeared, Zhuge Liang loosed their bonds, gave them refreshments and released them, bidding them offend no more. They thanked him for their liberty, and disappeared along a by-road.
Then Zhuge Liang said to his generals, “Tomorrow Meng Huo will come in person to make an attack.
We shall probably capture him again.” Then he summoned Zhao Yun and Wei Yan and gave them orders. They left, each with five thousand troops. Next he sent Wang Ping.
And then he sat in his tent to wait for the result.
The King of the Mangs was sitting in his tent when the scouts told him that his three chiefs had been captured and their armies scattered.
It made him very angry, and he quickly got his army ready to march. Soon he met Wang Ping, and, when the armies were arrayed, Wang Ping rode out to the front, saber in his hand.
The flaunting banners of the array formation of his foes then opened out, and he saw their ranks.
Many generals were on horseback on both sides. In the middle was the King, who advanced to the front. He wore a golden, inlaid head-dress; his belt bore a lion's face as clasp; his boots had pointed toes and were green; he rode a frizzy-haired horse the color of a red hare; he carried at his waist a pair of swords chased with the pine amber. He looked haughtily at his foes, and then, turning to his generals, said, “It has always been said that Zhuge Liang is a wonderful soldier, but I see that is false.
Look at this array with its banners all in confusion and the ranks in disorder.
There is not a weapon among all the swords and spears better than ours.
If I had only realized this before, I would have fought them long ago.
Who dares go out and capture a Shu general to show them what sort of warriors we are?” At once a general rode toward the leader Wang Ping.
His name was Mangya Chang; his weapon was a huge headsman's sword, and he rode a dun pony. Riding up to Wang Ping, the two engaged.
Wang Ping only fought a short time, and then fled.
Meng Huo at once ordered his troops on in quick pursuit, and the troops of Shu retreated seven miles or so before the Mangs were near enough to fight.
Just as the Mangs thought their enemies were in their power, a great shouting arose and two cohorts appeared, Zhang Ni from the left and Zhang Yi from the right, and attacked. The Mangs could not retreat, and as the force under Wang Ping and Guan Suo also turned upon them, the Mangs were surrounded and lost the day.
Meng Huo and some of his generals fought their way out and made for the Brocade Mountains.
The troops of Shu followed and forced them forward, and presently there appeared, in front, Zhao Yun.
Meng Huo hastily changed his route to go deeper into the mountains, but Zhao Yun's soldiers spread around, and the Mangs could not make a stand. Here many were captured.
Meng Huo and a few horsemen got away into a valley, which, however, soon became too narrow for the horses to advance.
Meng Huo then left his horse and crawled up the mountains, but very soon he fell upon Wei Yan, who had been sent with five hundred troops to lie in wait in that very valley. Meng Huo tried to struggle but soon was captured. The King and his followers were taken to the main camp, where Zhuge Liang was waiting with wine and meat ready for the captives.
But his tent was now guarded by soldiers all well armed with snow-glittering weapons, beside the lictors bearing the golden axes, a present from the Emperor, and other insignia of rank.
The feather-hatted drummers and clarion players were in front and behind, and the Imperial Guards were extended on both sides. The whole was very imposing and awe-inspiring.
Zhuge Liang was seated at the top of it all and watched the captives as they came forward in crowds. When they were all assembled, he ordered their bonds to be loosed, and then he addressed them. “You are all simple and well-disposed people who have been led into trouble by Meng Huo.
I know your fathers and mothers, your brothers and wives, and your children are anxiously watching from the doorways for your return, and they are cut to dear suffering that the news of defeat and capture has reached their ears. They are weeping bitter tears for you.
And so I will set you all free to go home and comfort them.” After they had been given food and wine and a present of grain, he sent them all away.
They went off grateful for the kindness shown them, but they wept as they thanked Zhuge Liang. Then the guards were told to bring the King before the tent.
He came, bound, being hustled forward.
He knelt in front of the Commander-in-Chief, who said, “Why did you rebel after the generous treatment you have received from our Emperor?” “The two Lands of the Rivers belonged to others, and your lord took it from them by force, and gave himself the title of Emperor.
My people have lived here for ages, and you and yours invaded my country without the least excuse.
How can you talk of rebellion to me?” “You are my prisoner; will you submit or are you still contumacious?” “Why should I submit?
You happened to find me in a narrow place; that is all.” “If I release you, what then?” “If you release me I shall return, and when I have set my army in order, I shall come to fight you again.
However, if you catch me once more, I will submit.” The King's bonds were loosed; he was clothed and refreshed, given a horse and caparisons, and sent with a guide to his own camp.
Once more the captured chieftain is let go, To yield tribesmen are ever slow.
Further results of this war will be related in the next chapter. CHAPTER 88.
Crossing River Scorpio—The Mang King Is Bound The Second Time; Recognizing A Pretended Surrender—Meng Huo Is Captured The Third Time. The officers did not approve of the release of the King of the Mangs, and they came to the tent of Zhuge Liang and said, “Meng Huo is the most important personage of all the Mangs, and his capture is the key to restoring order in the south.
Why then, O Minister, did you release him?” “I can capture him just as easily as I can get something out of my pocket.
What I want to do is to overcome and win his heart, so that peace may follow of itself.” They listened, but they had no great confidence in the success of the policy of conciliation.
In the meantime Meng Huo had reached the River Lu, and there he fell in with some of his defeated leaders, who were trying to get news of their King's fate.
They were surprised, but glad, to see him, and asked, “How were Your Highness able to get back?” The King lied, saying, “They confined me in a tent, and I broke out in the night.
I slew more than ten guards and ran.
And then I met one of their sentries, killed him, and that is how I got this horse.” They never doubted his word, and very joyfully they hurried him over the river to a camping place.
Then all the notables assembled from the various ravines, and the soldiers that had escaped death were mustered and got into shape as a fighting force.
The two leaders in the late campaign, Dongtu Na and Ahui Nan, were in one of the ravines, and Meng Huo sent to ask them to come.
They were afraid, but they could not disobey, and they came with an escort. When all had assembled, the King proclaimed as follows:
“I know Zhuge Liang is too full of ruses for us to conquer him in a fight; we should only fall victims to other base devices.
However, we must remember that his soldiers have marched far and the weather is sultry, which are factors in our favor.
Beside, River Lu is our rampart. We will have boats and rafts on the south side, and we will build a mud wall. With such good defenses we can afford to wait and see what the enemy intends.” His speech met with approval, and his plan was carried out.
The wall was supported by the hills and strengthened by fighting turrets, upon which were placed large bows and crossbows and arrows and stones. The defenses looked as if they were permanent.
Moreover, each ravine sent supplies in plenty.
And having made these preparations, Meng Huo felt comfortable and safe. Zhuge Liang had advanced, and his leading division was now close to the river. Spies came back to report:
“No boats or rafts can be found to cross, and the current is too strong to think of fording.
Beside, we can see the formidable defenses on the farther bank, the mud wall and the turrets all fully manned.” The weather was burning hot, for it was the fifth mouth, and the soldiers could not tolerate their armor nor even their clothing. When Zhuge Liang had inspected the river, he returned to his tent and assembled his officers, to whom he read this order: “The enemy is securely established on the south bank ready to repel our attack.
Yet, having come so far, we cannot return empty.
For the present you will all seek what shelter you can find in the forests, and rest and refresh your people.” Then he sent Lu Kai to a distance to select a cool stretch of thirty miles, and there he made four stockades.
Within the stockades he built huts for the soldiers and sheds for the horses, so that they were sheltered from the intense heat. The four camps were stationed by Wang Ping, Zhang Ni, Zhang Yi, and Guan Suo. However, Jiang Wan, observed these shelters and went to Zhuge Liang, saying, “These shelters of Lu Kai are very unsuitable. He has made the same mistake as that which led to the defeat of the First Ruler at the hands of Wu.
He has not taken into account the surroundings of the stockades, and if the Mangs should come over and start a fire, there could be no rescue.” “Do not anticipate trouble,” said the Commander-in-Chief, smiling.
“I have provided against all such dangers.” Jiang Wan did not know what the chief meant to do, but he said no more.
Then Ma Dai arrived from the Lands of Rivers, and he brought summer medicines and further supplies of grain.
He saw Zhuge Liang, and then proceeded to distribute the supplies he had brought according to orders.
Then Zhuge Liang said, “What force have you brought?” “Three thousand,” was the reply. “My people are weary and worn out; I want to use yours.
You have no objections?” “Of course not; they are equally government troops.
They are ready even to die for you if you wish.” “This Meng Huo is established on the river, and we have no means of crossing. But I am anxious to intercept his supplies, so that his troops may mutiny.” “How can you do it?” “Some fifty miles lower down River Lu there is a place called Shakou, where the current is slow; you could cross there on rafts.
I wish you and your soldiers to cross and cut the road of supplies.
After that you are to arrange with the two leaders—Dongtu Na and Ahui Nan—whose lives I spared, to be your allies on the inside, and we shall succeed.” Ma Dai went off gladly enough, and marched his troops to Shakou, where they set about the crossing at once.
And as the water was shallow, they did not trouble to make rafts, but just tucked up their clothes and waded in. But halfway across, the men began to fall over; and when they had been rescued and taken to the bank, many of them began to bleed from the nose and mouth and died.
In great alarm, Ma Dai sent hasty messages to Zhuge Liang, who called in the native guides and asked what this meant. They told him, “It happens so every year.
In the hot season, poisonous miasma collects over the waters of the River Lu, especially during the heat of the day.
Anyone who drinks the water will surely die.
Travelers who wish to cross have to wait till night, because the cooler waters do not breathe out the poisonous vapors. Further, the crossing should be attempted on a full stomach.” Zhuge Liang bade the local guides point out the best crossing place.
He sent some well-seasoned soldiers to Ma Dai to lash together poles into rafts at Shakou, and in the night the crossing was safely accomplished. Further, the guides then led the three thousand men of Shu over to where the grain road of the Mangs led through a narrow valley, called Jiashan Gorge, where, for part of the way, only single file was possible as the road was only wide enough for a soldier and a horse.
Ma Dai at once occupied this valley and stationed a force there.
And a stockade was put up with tents inside. Presently a convoy of grain came along, and it was captured, more than a hundred wagons. The guards ran off to Meng Huo's great camp and told him.
Meng Huo, thinking all was safe during the hot season, was enjoying himself; wine and music were the order of the day, and military matters were far from his thoughts. In his cups he admitted Zhuge Liang was ruseful, but said his army had nothing to fear. “If I attempt to oppose Zhuge Liang, I shall certainly fall a victim to some wile of his. However, my waiting policy is a safe one.
With our defenses, and the river to back them, we can wait for the heat to overcome these men of Shu, who cannot stand the hot season.
They will have to retreat, and then we can harass them.
And we will capture this Zhuge Liang.” He lay back and laughed at the thought.
However, one chief, more prudent than the others, stood forth and said, “Remember the shallows at Shakou; it would be very serious if the soldiers of Shu got across there secretly. It ought to be guarded.” “You belong to these areas.
Do you not know that I want the enemy to try to get across there?
Why, they will all perish in the water.” “But what if the natives tell them to cross only in the night?” “Do not be so anxious,” said Meng Huo.
“Our own people will not help the enemy that far.” It was just then that intelligence came:
“The troops of Shu, unknown in number, have crossed the river and, moreover, have seized the Jiashan Gorge. The flags show the words 'General Ma Dai Who Pacifies The North.'“ Meng Huo affected indifference.
“This sort of fellow is not worth talking about,” said he. He sent General Mangya Chang with three thousands troops to recapture the gorge and reopen the grain road.
When Ma Dai saw the Mang soldiers approaching, he placed two thousand troops in front of the hills and drew up the troops in formal array. Then Mangya Chang rode out to give battle.
This was but a small engagement, as the general of the tribespeople fell at the first stroke of Ma Dai's sword. The Mangs ran away at once. They returned to the King's camp and told him what had happened.
Whereupon he called up all his generals and asked for another to go up against Ma Dai.
“I will go,” cried Dongtu Na.
The King gave him three thousand troops. After he had gone, Meng Huo thought it would be wise to keep others from crossing the river.
So he sent a force of three thousand under Ahui Nan to guard Shakou.
Dongtu Na duly arrived at the gorge and made a camp. Ma Dai came out to meet him.
Among the soldiers in his cohort were some who recognized the leader of the Mangs and told Ma Dai certain things about how he had been captured and liberated.
So Ma Dai galloped toward him, shouting, “O you ingrate! How could you forget the debt to the Prime Minister?
Have you known no shame?” Dongtu Na was very greatly ashamed and turned red in the face, and turned his horse before striking a blow.
Ma Dai followed and fell on, slaying many of the Mangs. Then both sides withdrew.
Dongtu Na went back and told the King that Ma Dai was too strong for him. But Meng Huo was angry, and cried, “You are a traitor!
I know Zhuge Liang was good to you, and that is why you would not fight.” Meng Huo ordered Dongtu Na out to execution.
However, the notables and chiefs interceded, and the death penalty was remitted, but the unhappy leader was severely beaten, one hundred strokes with the heavy staff. The chiefs were mostly on the side of the beaten general and against the King's policy.
They went to the tent of Dongtu Na and said, “Though we live in the Mang country, we have never had any thoughts of rebellion against the Imperial Government, nor has the Middle Empire ever encroached upon our land.
We must own that Meng Huo's superior power forced us into this rising, and we could not help ourselves.
Zhuge Liang is too clever for us, and no one can guess what he may do. Even Cao Cao and Sun Quan fear him; how much more must we?
Moreover, we have received kindness at his hands and owe him our lives. We ought to show our gratitude.
Now let us at all risks slay this Meng Huo and submit to Zhuge Liang so that our people may not suffer.” Dongtu Na said, “I do not know your inner sentiments.” At this, all those who had been prisoners and released cried with one voice, “We desire to go to Meng Huo.” Thereupon Dongtu Na took in his hand a sharp sword, placed himself at the head of more than a hundred malcontents, and rushed into the great camp. At that moment Meng Huo was, as usual, intoxicated and lay in his tent. The mutineers rushed in. They found two generals on guard.
“You also received kindness from Zhuge Liang and ought to repay it,” cried Dongtu Na.
They replied, “You do not have to slay him; let us carry him a prisoner to the Prime Minister.” So they bound the King securely, took him down to the river, and crossed in a boat to the northern bank. There they halted while they sent a messenger to Zhuge Liang.
Now Zhuge Liang knew what had been happening, and he had issued orders for every camp to prepare their weapons. All being ready, he told the chiefs to bring up their prisoner, and bade the others return to their camps.
Dongtu Na went first and told the matter to Zhuge Liang, who praised his zeal and gave him presents.
Then he retired with the chiefs, and the executioners brought in Meng Huo.
“You said once before that if you were captured again, you would give in,” said Zhuge Liang, smiling.
“Now will you yield?” “This capture is not your work,” replied Meng Huo.
“It is the work of these minions of mine who want to hurt me.
I will not yield on this.” “If I free you again, what then?” “I am only a Mang, I know, but I am not wholly ignorant of war.
If you, O Minister, let me return to my ravines, I will muster another army and fight a decisive battle with you.
If you capture me again, then I will incline my heart and own myself beaten and yield.
I will not go back on my promise again.” “If you refuse to yield next time you are captured, I shall hardly pardon you.” At Zhuge Liang's orders the cords were loosed and refreshments were brought for the prisoner.
“Remember,” said Zhuge Liang, “I have never failed yet. I have never failed to win a battle or to take a city I have assaulted.
Why do you Mangs not yield?” Meng Huo only nodded his head; he said nothing.
After the wine, Zhuge Liang and Meng Huo rode round the camps together, and the King saw all the arrangements and the piles of stores and heaps of weapons.
And after the inspection Zhuge Liang said, “You are silly not to yield to me.
You see my veteran soldiers, my able generals, my stores of all kinds and war gear; how can you hope to prevail against me?
If you will yield, I will inform the Emperor, and you shall retain your kingship, and your sons and grandsons shall succeed as perpetual guardians of the Mang country.
Do you not think it would be well?” Meng Huo replied, “If I did yield, the people of my valleys would not be content.
If you release me once more, I will see to it that my own people keep the peace and bring them round to unanimity of feeling, and then they will not oppose any more.” Zhuge Liang was glad, and they returned to the main camp to feast until dusk, when Meng Huo took his leave.
Zhuge Liang ordered a craft and went to see him across River Lu.
But Meng Huo's first act on his return to his own camp was to send one of his people to Dongtu Na's and Ahui Nan's camps, and pretend to ask them to come to meet a messenger from Zhuge Liang. When the two generals came, Meng Huo ordered assassins who had been placed hidden to do away with the two leaders. Their corpses were thrown into a gully. Then he sent his friends to guard the most important strategic points, while he marched to fight a battle with Ma Dai.
But when he got near the valley, he saw no signs of the enemy, and, on questioning an inhabitant, he heard that the Shu army, with all their stores, had recrossed the river and joined the main body in the northern bank.
Meng Huo then returned to his own ravine and discussed matters with his brother, Meng You, saying, “I know all the details of the enemy's force from what I saw in their camp.” And Meng Huo gave his brother certain instructions, which Meng You at once began to carry out.
Meng You loaded a hundred men with gold and jewels and pearls and ivory and rhinoceros horn, crossed River Lu, and was on his way to the main camp of the Shu army, when he heard the sound of drums and a cohort under Ma Dai poured out to stop him. Meng You did not expect to meet an enemy, and was surprised.
But Ma Dai only asked what he had come for. And when he had heard, Meng You was detained while a message was sent to Zhuge Liang. The messenger arrived while a council was in progress, the matter under discussion being how to reduce the Mangs.
When the messenger had announced that Meng You had come bearing gifts of gold and pearls and such things, Zhuge Liang turned to Ma Su, saying, “Know you why this man has come?” “I dare not say plainly; but let me write it,” said Ma Su.
“Write it, then.” So Ma Su wrote and handed the paper to his chief, who had no sooner read it than he clapped his hands with joy, crying, “What you say is exactly what I think.
But you may know I have already made arrangements for the capture of Meng Huo.” Then Zhao Yun was called, and some orders were whispered into his ear.
Next Wei Yan came, and he also went off with secret orders.
Wang Ping, Ma Zhong, and Guan Suo also came, and left with particular instructions. All these things done, the bearer of gifts was called.
Meng You came and bowed low at the door of the tent, saying, “The brother of my house, Meng Huo, having received great kindness at your hands in sparing his life, feels bound to offer a paltry gift. He has presumed to collect a few pearls and some gold and other trifling jewels by way of something to give your soldiers.
And hereafter he will send tribute to your Emperor.” “Where is your brother at this moment?” asked Zhuge Liang.
“Having been the recipient of your great bounty, he has gone to the Silver Pit Hills to collect some treasures.
He will soon return.” “How many soldiers have you brought?” “Only about a hundred; I should not dare to bring any large number.
They are just porters.” They were brought in for Zhuge Liang's inspection. They had blue eyes and swarthy faces, auburn hair and brown beards. They wore earrings, their hair was fuzzy, and they went barefoot. They were tall and powerful.
Zhuge Liang made them sit down, and bade his generals press them to drink and treat them well and compliment them. Meng Huo was anxious about the reception that would be given to his brother and the treatment of his gifts, so he sat in his tent expecting the messenger at any moment. Then two men came, and he questioned them eagerly.
They said, “The presents have been accepted, and even the porters have been invited to drink in the tent and have been regaled with beef and flesh in plenty.
O King, your brother sends the news that all will be ready at the second watch for the attack.
He will support you from within.” This was pleasing news, and Meng Huo prepared his thirty thousand troops ready to march out to the camp. They were divided into three divisions.
The King called up his chieftains and notables, and said, “Let each army carry the means of making fire, and as soon as they arrive let a light be shown as a signal.
I am coming to the main camp to capture Zhuge Liang.” With these orders they marched, and they crossed River Lu at sunset.
The King, with a hundred generals as escort, pressed on at once toward the main camp of Shu. They met with no opposition.
They even found the main gate open, and Meng Huo and his party rode straight in. But the camp was a desert; not a soldier was visible. Meng Huo rode right up to the large tent and pushed open the flap.
It was brilliantly lighted with lamps, and lying about under their light were his brother and all his men, dead drunk.
Zhuge Liang had ordered Ma Su and Lu Kai to entertain Meng You and his men with wine and dance performances. The wine they had been pressed to drink while the plays were going on had been heavily drugged, and they had fallen down almost as soon as they had swallowed it. One or two who had recovered a little could not speak:
they only pointed to their mouths.
Meng Huo then saw that he had been the simple victim of another ruse.
However, he picked up his brother and the others and started off to return to his main army. But as he turned, torches began to flash out and drums to beat. The Mangs were frightened and took to their heels.
But they were pursued, and the pursuing cohort was led by Wang Ping. The King bore away to the left to escape, but again a cohort appeared in front of him; Wei Yan was there. Meng Huo tried the other side; and was stopped by Zhao Yun.
He was in a trap; and attacked on three sides and no fourth to escape by, what could he do?
He abandoned everything, making one wild rush for the River Lu.
As he reached the river bank, he saw a bark on the river with Mang soldiers on board. Here was safety. He hailed the boat and jumped on board as soon as it touched the bank.
No sooner had he embarked than suddenly he was seized and bound.
The boat, which Ma Dai had provided and prepared, was part of the general plan, and the Mang soldiers therein were Ma Dai's soldiers disguised.
Many of Meng Huo's troops accepted the chance of surrender held out by Zhuge Liang, who soothed them and treated them well and did not injure one of them.
The remains of the conflagration were stamped out, and in a short time Ma Dai brought along his prisoner.
At the same time Zhao Yun led in his brother, Meng You.
Wei Yan, Ma Su, Wang Ping, and Guan Suo also brought their prisoners, chiefs or notables, to the camp of the Prime Minister.
Zhuge Liang looked at the King and laughed. “That was but a shallow ruse of yours to send your brother with presents to pretend to submit to me; did you really think I should not see through it?
But here you are once more in my power; now do you yield?” “I am a prisoner owing to the gluttony of my brother and the power of your poisonous drugs.
If I had only played his part myself and left him to support me with soldiers, I should have succeeded.
I am the victim of fate and not of my own incapacity.
No; I will not yield.” “Remember this is the third time; why not?” said Zhuge Liang.
Meng Huo dropped his head and made no answer. “Ah, well; I will let you go once more,” said Zhuge Liang.
“O Minister, if you will let me and my brother go, we will get together our family and clients and fight you once more.
If I am caught that time, then I will confess myself beaten to the ground, and that shall be the end.” “Certainly I shall scarcely pardon you next time,” said Zhuge Liang.
“You would better be careful. Diligently tackle your Book of Strategy; look over your list of confidants. If you can apply a good plan at the proper moment, you will not have any need for late regrets.” Meng Huo and his brother and all the chiefs were released from their bonds.
They thanked Zhuge Liang for his clemency and went away.
By the time the released prisoners had got back to the river, the army of Shu had crossed to the farther side and had captured the Mang defenses, the Shu flags fluttering in the breeze.
As Meng Huo passed the camp, he saw Ma Dai sitting in state.
Ma Dai pointed his sword at the King as he passed, and said, “Next time you are caught, you will not escape.” When Meng Huo came to his own camp, he found Zhao Yun in possession and all in order.
Zhao Yun was seated beneath the large banner, with his sword drawn, and as the King passed, he also said, “Do not presume on the kindness of the Prime Minister because you have been generously treated.” Meng Huo grunted and passed on.
Just as he was going over the frontier hills, he saw Wei Yan and a company drawn up on the slopes. Wei Yan shouted, “See to it; we have got into the inmost recesses of your country and have taken all your defensive positions.
Yet you are fool enough to hold out.
Next time you are caught, you will be quite destroyed.
There will be no more pardons.” Meng Huo and his company ran away with their arms over their heads. Each one returned to his own ravine.
In the fifth moon, when the sun is fierce, Marched the army into the desert land, Marched to the River Lu, bright and clear, But deadly with miasma.
Zhuge Liang the leader cared not, Pledged was he to subdue the south, Thereby to repay the First Ruler's deference with service. Wherefore he attacked the Mangs. Yet seven times he freed their captured king. After the crossing of the river, the soldiers were feasted. Then Zhuge Liang addressed his officers:
“I let Meng Huo see our camp the second time he was our prisoner, because I wanted to tempt him into raiding it.
He is something of a soldier, and I dangled our supplies and resources before his eyes, knowing he would try to burn them and that he would send his brother to pretend to submit that thereby he could get into our camp and have a chance to betray us.
I have captured and released him three times, trying to win him over. I do not wish to do him any harm.
I now explain my policy that you may understand I am not wasting your efforts and you are still to work your best for the government.” They all bowed, and one said, “O Minister, you are indeed perfect in every one of the three gifts: wisdom, benevolence, and valor. Not even Lu Wang or Zhang Liang can equal you!” Said Zhuge Liang, “How can I expect to equal our men of old?
But my trust is in your strength, and together we shall succeed.” This speech of their leader's pleased them all mightily.
In the meantime Meng Huo, puffed up with pride at getting off three times, hastened home to his own ravine, whence he sent trusted friends with gifts to the Eight Nations and the Ninety-three Sees and all the Mang quarters and clans to borrow shields and swords and warriors and braves. He got together one hundred thousand soldiers. They all assembled on an appointed day, massing like clouds and sweeping in like mists gathering on the mountains, each and all obeying the commands of the King Meng Huo.
And the scouts knew it all, and they told Zhuge Liang, who said, “This is what I was waiting for, that the Mangs should have an opportunity of knowing our might.” Thereupon he seated himself in a small carriage and went out to watch.
O let our enemy's courage glow That our greater might may show.
The story of the campaign will be continued in the next chapter. CHAPTER 89.
The Lord of Wuxiang Uses The Fourth Ruse; The King of Mang Is Captured The Fifth Time. Zhuge Liang's small carriage was escorted by only a few horsemen.
Hearing that a sluggish river, the Western River, lay in the way, and having no boat, Zhuge Liang bade the escort cut down some trees and make a raft. They did so, but the raft sank.
So Zhuge Liang turned to Lu Kai, who said, “There is close by a mountain covered with bamboos. I have heard of these bamboos, and some are several spans in girth.
We can make a bridge of them for the army to cross.” So thirty thousand soldiers were sent to the mountains, where they cut down many thousands of bamboos, and floated them down river. Then at the narrowest point they made a bridge a hundred spans or so in length.
Next the main army was brought down to the river and camped in line along the bank. The camp was protected by a moat, crossed by a floating bridge, and a mud rampart.
On the south bank they constructed three large stockades so as to prepare for the coming of the Mang soldiers. They had not long to wait.
Meng Huo was hot with rage and came quickly.
As soon as he got near the river, he led out ten thousand fierce warriors, armed with big swords and shield, and challenged the first stockade.
Zhuge Liang went forth in simple state. He wore a silk cap and a cranewhite robe and held in his hand a feather fan. He sat in a four-horse carriage, and his generals rode right and left.
The King of the Mang was clad in mail of rhinoceros hide and wore a bright red casque. In his left hand he bore a shield, and his right gripped a sword. He rode a red ox.
As soon as he saw his enemies, he opened his mouth and poured forth abuse and insults, while his warriors darted to and fro brandishing their weapons.
Zhuge Liang at once ordered the army to retire within the stockades and bar the gates.
The Mangs came close up to the stockade and pranced about naked, shouting in derision.
Within the stockade the Shu generals grew very angry, and they went in a body to their leader to beg that he would withdraw the order to remain on the defensive.
But Zhuge Liang would not listen.
Presently he said, “These men are not submissive to the Empire Government and are naturally fierce and turbulent. In that mood we are no match for them.
But all we have to do is to remain on guard for a few days till their ferocity has spent itself.
Then I have a plan that will overcome them.” Days passed, and the army of Shu made no move; they only maintained the defensive. Zhuge Liang watched the besiegers from an eminence, and saw the first vigor of their advance give way to careless idleness.
Then Zhuge Liang called together his generals and asked, “Dare you give battle now?” They all rejoiced at the suggestion; so he called them two by two or one by one and gave them secret orders.
Zhao Yun and Wei Yan went in first.
Wang Ping and Ma Zhong followed.
To Ma Dai he said, “I am going to abandon these stockades and retire north of the river.
As soon as we have crossed, you are to cut loose the floating bridge and move it down the stream so that Zhao Yun and Wei Yan may cross.” To Zhang Yi he said, “You are to remain by the camp and light it up at night—as if it is still occupied.
When Meng Huo pursues, then you are to cut off his retreat.” Last of all, Guan Suo was to escort Zhuge Liang's carriage.
The soldiers marched out of the camp at evening, and the lamps were hung up as usual.
The Mangs saw this from a distance and dared not attack. But the next morning at dawn Meng Huo led his troops to the stockades and found all was quiet. He went close up and saw they were all empty and bare; not a soldier was there. Grain and fodder lay about among empty carts; all was in confusion, suggesting hasty departure.
“They have abandoned the camp,” said Meng You.
“But this is only a ruse.” Said Meng Huo, “I think that Zhuge Liang has important news from the capital that has made him leave without his baggage train like this. Either Wu has invaded or Wei has attacked.
They left these lamps burning to make us think the camps were occupied, but they ran away leaving everything behind.
If we pursue we cannot go wrong.” So the King urged his army onward, himself heading the leading division.
When they reached the Western River bank, they saw on the farther side that the camps were all in order and the banners flying as usual like a brightly tinted cloud of silk.
Along the bank stood a wall of cloth.
They dared not attack.
Meng Huo said to his brother, “This means that Zhuge Liang fears lest we may pursue. That is only a temporary halt, and they will retire in a couple of days.” The Mangs camped on the river bank while they sent into the mountains to cut bamboos to make rafts.
The boldest of the soldiers were placed in front of the camp till the rafts should be ready to cross.
Little did Meng Huo suspect that the army of Shu was already within his borders.
One day was very stormy.
Then the Mangs saw great flames spring up around them, and at the same time the rolling of drums heralded an attack. The Mangs, instead of going out to meet the enemy, began to force their way out of the Shu attack. Meng Huo became alarmed and fled with all his clans and dependents. They fought their way through and made a dash for their former camp.
Just as they reached it, there appeared a cohort of the enemy led by Zhao Yun.
Meng Huo turned off west and sought refuge in the mountains.
But he was fiercely attacked by a cohort under Ma Dai.
With a small remnant of followers, he got away into a valley.
Soon he saw in the west, north and south clouds of smoke rising and the glow of torches, so that he was forced to halt. However, the east remained clear, and presently he fled in that direction. As he was crossing the mouth of a gully, he noticed a few horsemen outlined against a thick wood and saw they were escorting a small carriage. And in that carriage sat Zhuge Liang.
Zhuge Liang laughed, and said, “So King of the Mangs has got here! How does Heaven make you defeated so?
I have waited for you a long time.” Meng Huo angrily turned to his followers and said, “Thrice have I been the victim of this man's base wiles and have been put to shame.
Now chance has sent him across my path, and you must attack him with all your energy.
Let us cut him to pieces and those with him.” The Mang horsemen, with Meng Huo shouting to encourage them, pushed forward in hot haste toward the wood. But in a few moments they all stumbled and disappeared into some pits that had been dug in the way. And just then Wei Yan emerged from the wood. One by one the Mangs were pulled out of the pits and bound tight with cords. Zhuge Liang returned to his camp, where the captors of the King could bring in their prisoner.
Zhuge Liang busied himself in soothing the other Mang prisoners. Many of the notables and chiefs of the tributaries had betaken themselves to their own ravines and villages with their followers.
Many of those who remained came over and yielded to Shu. They were well fed and assured of safety, and allowed to go to their own. They went off gladly enough.
By and by Zhang Yi brought up the King's brother, Meng You. Zhuge Liang reproached him for his brother's behavior.
“Your brother is a misguided simpleton; you ought to remonstrate with him and persuade him to change his course.
Here you are, a captive for the fourth time; are you not ashamed?
How can you have the effrontery to look anyone in the face?” A deep flush of shame passed over Meng You's face, and he threw himself to the earth begging forgiveness.
Zhuge Liang said, “If I put you to death, it shall not be today.
This time I pardon you, but you are to talk to your brother.” So Meng You was loosed from his bonds and allowed to get up.
He went away weeping.
Very soon Wei Yan brought up Meng Huo, and to him Zhuge Liang simulated great rage, saying, “What can you say now? You see you are in my hands again.” “I am again an unfortunate victim,” said Meng Huo.
“Once more I have blundered into your net, and now I shall die with no one to close my eyes.” Zhuge Liang shouted to the lictors to take him away and behead him.
Meng Huo never blenched at the sentence, but he turned to his captor and said, “If you freed me only once more, I would wipe out the shame of all four captures.” Zhuge Liang smiled at the bold reply and bade the lictors loose his bonds, and the attendants served him with wine. Meng Huo was invited to sit in the commander's tent.
Said Zhuge Liang, “Four times you have been treated generously and yet you are still defiant.
Why?” “Though I am what you call a barbarian, I would scorn to employ your vile ruses.
And that is why I remain defiant.” “I have liberated you four times; do you think you can give battle again?” “If you catch me again I will incline my heart to yield and I will give everything in my ravine to reward your army.
I will also take an oath not to cause any further trouble.” Zhuge Liang smiled, but let him go.
The King thanked him and left.
As soon as he was set at liberty, Meng Huo got together several thousand of his adherents and went away southward.
Before long he fell in with his brother, Meng You, who had got together an army and was on his way to avenge his brother.
As soon as they saw each other, the brothers fell upon each other's necks and wept. They related their experiences. Meng You said, “We cannot stand against the enemy. We have been defeated several times.
Now I think we would better go into the mountains and hide in some dark gully where they cannot find us.
Those soldiers of Shu will never stand the summer heat; they must retire.” “Where can we hide?” asked his brother.
“I know a valley away southwest from us called 'Bald Dragon Ravine,' and the King, Duo Si, is a friend of mine. Let us take refuge with him.” “Very well; go and arrange it,” said Meng Huo. So Meng You went.
When he got there and talked to the chief, King Duo Si lost no time, but came out with his soldiers to welcome Meng Huo, who then entered the valley.
After the exchange of salutations, Meng Huo explained his case.
Duo Si said, “O King, rest content.
If those men from the Lands of Rivers come here, I will see to it that not one goes home. And Zhuge Liang will meet his death here too.” Naturally, Meng Huo was pleased; but he wanted to know how his host could feel so secure.
Duo Si said, “In this ravine there are only two roads, the one you came by and another by the northwest. The road you traveled along is level and soft, and the waters are sweet. Humans and horses may both use it.
But if we close the mouth of the ravine with a barricade, then no one, however strong, can get in.
The other road is precipitous, dangerous, and narrow.
The only path is beset with venomous serpents and scorpions, and as evening comes on there are malarial exhalations which are dangerous till past noon the next day. The road is only practicable between two watches before sunset.
Then the water is undrinkable. The road is very difficult.
“Then again there are four streams actually poisonous. One is called 'The Dumb Spring.' Its water is pleasant to the palate, but it makes people dumb and they die in a few days.
A second fountain is called 'The Spring of Destruction' and is hot. But if a person bathes therein, his flesh rots till his bones protrude and he dies.
The third is 'The Black Spring.' Its waters are greenish. If it be sprinkled on a person's body, his limbs turn black and presently he dies.
The fourth is 'The Spring of Weak Water,' ice cold. If a person drink of this water his breath is chilled, he becomes weak as a thread and soon dies.
Neither birds nor insects are found in this region, and no one but the Han General Ma Yuan, who was styled General Who Quells the Waves for this exploit, has ever passed.
Now the northeast road shall be blocked, and you may hide here perfectly safe from those troops of Shu, for, finding that way blocked, they will try the other road, which is waterless save for the four deadly springs.
No matter how many they be, they will perish, and we need no weapons.” “Now indeed I have found a place to live in,” cried Meng Huo, striking his forehead.
Then looking to the north he said, “Even Zhuge Liang's wonderful cunning will be of no avail.
The four springs alone will defeat him and avenge my army.” The two brothers settled down comfortably as guests of King Duo Si, with whom they spent the days in feasting.
In the meantime, as the Mangs did not appear, Zhuge Liang gave orders to leave the Western River and push south.
It was then the sixth month, and blazing hot.
A poet sang about the bitter heat of the south: The hills are sere, the valleys dry, A raging heat fills all the sky, Throughout the whole wide universe No spot exists where heat is worse.
Another poem runs: The glowing sun darts out fierce rays.
No cloud gives shelter from the blaze, In parching heat there pants a crane, The whale swims through the hissing main.
The brook's cool margin now I love, Or idle stroll through bamboo grove.
I would not march to deserts far In leathern jerkin donned for war.
Just at the moment of setting out southward, the spies brought news of Meng Huo's retreat into the Bald Dragon Ravine and the barricading of one entrance.
They also said, “The valley is garrisoned, the hills are precipitous and even impassable.” So Zhuge Liang called in Lu Kai and questioned him, but he did not know exactly the conditions.
Then out spoke Jiang Wan, saying, “Meng Huo's repeated captures have broken his spirit so that he dare not take the field again.
Our soldiers are exhausted with this intense heat, and little is to be gained by prolonging the campaign.
The best move would be to return to our own country.” “If we do this, we shall fall victims to Meng Huo's scheme,” said Zhuge Liang.
“If we retreated, he would certainly follow.
Beside, having advanced so far, it would be fruitless to turn back now.” Wang Ping was sent on with the advanced guard and some of the Mangs as guides to seek an entrance on the northwest.
They found the road and came to the first spring—the Dumb Spring—, of which the thirsty men and horses drank freely.
Wang Ping returned to report his success, but by the time he reached camp, he and all his soldiers were speechless.
They could only point to their mouths. Zhuge Liang knew they had been poisoned, and was alarmed. He went forward in his light chariot to find out the cause. He came to the spring. The water was very deep and dark green. A mass of vapor hung about the surface rising and falling. They would not touch the water.
Zhuge Liang went up the hills to look around, but could see nothing except a rampart of mountains. A deep silence hung over all, unbroken by the cry even of a bird. He was perplexed.
Presently he noticed an old temple away up among the crags.
By the aid of the lianas and creepers he managed to clamber up, and in a chamber hewn out of the rock he saw the figure of an officer. Beside it was a tablet saying the temple was dedicated to Ma Yuan, the famous general who had preceded him in that country. The natives had erected it to sacrifice to the leader who had headed the campaign against the Mangs.
1 Zhuge Liang, much impressed, bowed before the image of the great leader, and said, “Your humble servant received a sacred trust, the protection of the son of the First Ruler.
That son, the present Emperor, sent him here to subdue the Mangs that the land might be free from peril when he decided to attack Wei and take possession of Wu and thereby restore the glory of the Hans.
But the soldiers are ignorant of the country, and some of them have drunk of a poisonous spring so that they have become dumb.
Your servant earnestly prays your honored spirit, out of regard for the kindness and justice of the present Emperor, to reveal your spiritual character and manifest your holiness by safeguarding and assisting the army.” Having prayed thus, Zhuge Liang left the temple.
While seeking some native whom he might question, he saw in the distance, on a hill opposite, an aged man leaning on a staff. He approached, and as he drew nearer, Zhuge Liang noted his extraordinary appearance.
When he had reached the temple, Zhuge Liang asked the venerable visitor to walk in. After the salutations, the old man sat on the stones, and Zhuge Liang opened the conversation with the usual questions.
The old gentleman replied, “Sir Minister, I know you well by repute, and am happy to meet you.
Many of the Mangs owe their lives to you, and all have been deeply impressed by your kindness.” Then Zhuge Liang returned to the matter nearest his heart, the mystery of the spring.
The old man told him, “That is the Dumb Spring that your soldiers have drunk, and they will die in a few days.
Besides that, there are other three poisonous streams called Spring of Destruction, Black Spring, and Spring of Weak Water.
All miasma gathers there in the four streams, and it only vaporizes during the two watch before sunset.” “In short, the Mangs cannot be conquered,” said Zhuge Liang when the old man had finished.
“And Wu cannot be repressed, nor Wei overcome. And the Hans cannot be restored. So, I fail in the task set me by my Prince.
Wish that I might die?” “Be not so cast down, O Minister,” said the aged one.
“I can lead you to a place where you may counteract all this.” “I would ask for your instruction, Venerable One,” said Zhuge Liang. “What exalted advice have you to confer upon me?
I hope you will instruct me.” “West of this, not far off, is a valley, and seven miles from its entrance is a stream called the 'Spring of Eternal Peace,' near which there lives a recluse known as the Hermit of the Stream.
He has not left the valley these twenty years.
Behind his hut there gushes out a spring of water, called the 'Spring of Peace and Joy.' This is the antidote to your poison. Bathing in its waters is a cure for skin diseases and for malaria.
Moreover, near the hut grows an herb called the 'garlic-leaved fragrance.' Chewing a leaf of this safeguards one from malaria.
You can do no better than go to the hut of the recluse forthwith and get these remedies.” Zhuge Liang humbly thanked his aged counselor, and said, “Venerable Sir, I am profoundly affected by your merciful kindness and compassion.
May I ask again by what name may call you?” The old man rose and entered the temple, saying, “I am the Spirit of this mountain, sent by Ma Yuan to guide you.” As he said this, he shouted at the solid rock behind the temple, and it opened of itself and let him in.
Zhuge Liang's astonishment was beyond words. He made another obeisance to the Spirit of the temple and went down by the way he had come. Then he returned to his camp.
Next day, bearing incense and gifts, Wang Ping and his stricken men went west to the spot which the old man had indicated.
They luckily found the valley and followed its narrow road till they came to a small, farm-like enclosure, where tall pines and lofty cypresses, luxuriant bamboos, and gorgeous flowers sheltered a few simple huts.
An exquisite perfume pervaded the whole place. Zhuge Liang rejoiced to recognize the spot and at once knocked at the door.
A lad answered his knock, and Zhuge Liang was telling his name when the host came out quickly, saying, “Surely my visitor is the Prime Minister of the Han Dynasty?” Zhuge Liang saw at the door a man with a bamboo comb holding back his hair, grass shoes on his feet, and a robe of white girded in by a black girdle. He had green eyes and yellowed hair.
“Great Scholar, how did you know who I was?” said Zhuge Liang.
“How could I not have heard of your expedition to the south?” He invited Zhuge Liang to enter, and when they had seated themselves in their relative positions as host and guest, Zhuge Liang said, “My former Prince, the First Ruler, confided to me the care of his son and successor.
That son, now Emperor, gave me a command to lead an army to this country, get the Mangs on our side and spread our culture among them.
But now to my disappointment Meng Huo, the King, has hidden himself in the Bald Dragon Ravine, and some of my soldiers on the way to seek him drank of a certain fountain and are dumb.
But last evening the former leader of an expedition, Ma Yuan, manifested his sacred presence and told me that you, Exalted Sir, had a remedy for this evil, and I pray you of your pity to give me of the potent fluid whereby my soldiers' lives may be saved.” The recluse replied, “I am only a worthless old man of the wild woods and unworthy of the visit of such as you, O Minister.
The water you desire flows out at the back of my cottage and you may take what you will of it.” The serving lad then showed Wang Ping and his dumb companions to the Spring of Peace and Joy, and he dipped up the waters for them to drink.
As soon as they had drunk, they coughed up some poisoned mucus and could speak.
The lad also led the soldiers to the Spring of Eternal Peace where they could bathe.
In the cottage the recluse regaled Zhuge Liang with tea made of cypress seeds and a conserve of pine flowers.
He also told his guest, saying, “In this region, the lands are full of serpents and scorpions, and the lily flowers blown into the springs by the wind make them unfit to drink.
However, if you dig wells, you will find good water.” Then Zhuge Liang begged some of the garlic-leaved herb as an antidote against malaria. The recluse said the soldiers could pluck as much as they wanted.
And so every one put a leaf in his mouth and thus became malariaproof.
Zhuge Liang, with a low bow then begged to be told the name of his benefactor. “I am Meng Huo's eldest brother,” said the recluse, smiling.
“My name is Meng Jie.” Zhuge Liang started. “Do not be afraid,” said the recluse. “Let me explain. We were three brothers of the same parents, the eldest being myself.
Our parents are both dead.
My brother Meng Huo, being headstrong and vicious, has never been amenable to culture. I have talked to him many times, but he kept his own course.
Finally, under an assumed name, I retired to this spot.
I am ashamed for my brother's rebellion, which has put you, O Minister, to the trouble of making this expedition into a barren country, but it has given me the privilege of seeing you.
For my responsibility in this I deserve to die a thousand times, as I own to your face, and I beg your pardon.” Zhuge Liang sighed, saying, “Now I believe that story of the robber Liu Zhi and the noble Liu Xiahui; this is the same thing over again.
People renowned for villainy and virtue may come from the same stock.” Then he said to his host, “Would you wish me to represent your merits to the Emperor and get you created a king?” “How can you think I desire honors or wealth when I am here because of my contempt for all such things?” Zhuge Liang then wished to make him certain presents, but the recluse would have none of them.
So taking leave of his host, Zhuge Liang went back to his camp.
In the southern expedition when the Mangs were subdued, Zhuge Liang found a high-born recluse in a shady solitude.
Up till then the gloomy forests were thought destitute of men, That no curling smoke wreath ever floated upwards from the glen.
As soon as Zhuge Liang reached camp, he set the soldiers digging for water.
They dug to a great depth but found none; nor were they more successful when they tried other places.
They were very discouraged.
Then Zhuge Liang in the depths of the night burned incense and prayed to God: “Unworthy as is thy servant Zhuge Liang, he has received favor from the Great Hans and now has been ordered to subdue the Mangs.
Now our water is spent and my soldiers and animals are parched with thirst.
If Thy will be to preserve the line of Han, then give, I beseech Thee, sweet water; but if their course is run, then may Thy servant and those with him die in this place.” The morning after this prayer the wells were full of sweet water.
The Mangs must be conquered; Zhuge Liang led a great array, Though his skill was superhuman, yet he held the righteous way; As the wells gave forth sweet water when Geng Gong's head bowed full low, So the reverent prayers of Zhuge Liang made the lower springs to flow.
The soldiers' spirits revived with the supply of water, and the army soon advanced by hill paths to the Valley of the Bald Dragon, where they camped. When Meng Huo heard the news, he was greatly taken aback.
“These troops do not appear to have suffered either thirst or fever,” said he.
“Our springs have lost their power.” King Duo Si heard it, but doubted. He and Meng Huo ascended into a high hill whence they could see their enemies.
They saw no signs of illness or distress; all went on calmly and quietly in the camps, water carrying and cooking, eating and attending to the cattle.
Duo Si's hair stood on end as he looked at them. “These are not human soldiers,” said he, shivering.
“They must be sent from Heaven.” “Our two brothers will fight one fierce battle with these troops of Shu and die therein,” said Meng Huo, “We cannot wait calmly to be put into bonds.” “But, O King, if your army should be beaten, my whole family will also perish.
Let us encourage the people of the ravines. Let us kill bullocks and slaughter horses to feed them, and urge them to go through fire and water to rush right up to the camp of the enemy and seize upon victory.” So there was great feasting before the Mangs took the field.
Just as this was going on, there arrived one Yang Feng, King of twenty-one ravines in the west, and he led thirty thousand troops.
Meng Huo rejoiced exceedingly at this unexpected addition to his army and felt sure of victory.
So he and Duo Si went out of their own valley to welcome Yang Feng, who said, “I have with me thirty thousand troops in iron mail, brave and intrepid warriors, who can fly over mountains and bound across the peaks; they of themselves are a match for the enemy even if the enemy numbered a hundred legions.
And, moreover, my five sons, all trained in arms, are with me, all to help you, O Kings.” The five sons were brought in and presented. They were handsome young fellows, bold and martial looking. Father and sons were entertained at a banquet. Halfway through the feast Yang Feng proposed a diversion. “There is but scanty amusement in the field,” said Yang Feng, “and so I have brought along some native singing girls who have been taught fencing and such things.
If you care for it, they might give an exhibition.” The feasters hailed the suggestion with joy, and soon thirty maidens came to the front of the tent. Their hair hung about their shoulders, and they were barefooted. They danced and skipped and went through their performance outside. The guests inside clapped their hands and applauded their skill, and the soldiers joined in the choruses.
Presently, at a signal from their father, two of Yang Feng's sons bore two goblets to Meng Huo and Meng You.
Meng Huo and Meng You took the cups and were raising them to their lips when Yang Feng shouted a single word of command, and, instantly, the cupbearers had the two brothers out of their seats and helpless in their hands.
At this, Duo Si jumped up to run away, but Yang Feng gripped him, and he was a prisoner too.
The Mang maidens ranged themselves in a line along the front of the tent so that none dared approach.
“When the hare dies the fox mourns,” said Meng Huo. “One sympathizes with one's own as a rule. We are both chiefs and have been friends.
I know not why you should injure me.” “I had to repay Zhuge Liang the Minister for his compassion on me and my people, and there was no way till you rebelled.
Why should I not offer up a rebel in propitiation?” Leaving Meng Huo, Meng You, and Duo Si in the hands of Yang Feng, the Mang warriors dispersed, each man returning to his own valley.
Yang Feng then took the prisoners to the camp of Shu, where he bowed at the tent door, saying, “I and my sons and the sons of my brother are grateful to you for much kindness, wherefore we bring to you as an offering the persons of these rebels.” Zhuge Liang rewarded Yang Feng and bade them bring forward Meng Huo. “This time are you prepared to yield?” said the Prime Minister.
“It is not your ability, but the treachery of my own people that has brought me to this.
If you wish to slay, slay; but I will not yield.” “You know you were the cause of my army entering into a waterless land, where there were those four evil streams, and yet my soldiers were not poisoned and came to no harm. Does it not seem to you like evidence of a superior protecting power?
Why will you follow this misguided road and always be obstinate?” Meng Huo replied, “My fathers have long held the Silver Pit Hills, and the three rivers and the two forests are their ramparts.
If you can take that stronghold, then will I and my heirs for ever acknowledge your power and yield.” “I am going to liberate you once more,” said Zhuge Liang, “and you may put your army in order if you will and fight a decisive battle.
But after that, if you are my prisoner and are still refractory and unsubmissive, I shall have to exterminate your whole family.” Zhuge Liang ordered the lictors to loose the prisoner's bonds and let him go.
After he had gone, the other two, Meng You and Duo Si, were led in and they also received their liberty. They were given wine and food. but they were confused and could not look Zhuge Liang in the face.
They were given horses to travel on. The way has been long and now danger is near, But faith in their leader banishes fear.
The next chapter will tell how Meng Huo reorganized his army and whose the victory was. CHAPTER 90.
Chasing Off Wild Beasts, The Prime Minister Defeats The Mangs For The Sixth Time; Burning Rattan Armors, Zhuge Liang Captures Meng Huo The Seventh Time. All the prisoners were released; and Yang Feng and his sons were rewarded with ranks, and his people were given presents.
They expressed their gratitude and returned to their own, while Meng Huo and his brother hastened home to Silver Pit Hills.
Outside this ravine were three rivers—River Lu, River Gannan, and River Xicheng.
These three streams united to form Three Rivers.
Close to the ravine on the north was a wide and fruitful plain; on the west were salt wells.
The River Lu flowed about seventy miles to the southwest, and due south was a valley called the Liangdu Ravine.
There were hills in, as well as surrounding, the ravine, and in these they found silver; whence the name “Silver Pit.” A palace complex had been built in the ravine, which the Mang kings had made their stronghold, and there was an ancestral temple, which they called “Family Spirits,” where they solemnized sacrifices of bulls and horses at the four seasons.
They called these sacrifices “Inquiring of the Spirits.” Human sacrifices were offered also, humans of Shu or of their own people belonging to other villages.
The sick swallowed no drugs, but prayed to a chief sorcerer, called “Drug Demon.” There was no legal code, the only punishment for every transgression being death.
When girls are grown and become women, they bathe in a stream. Men and women are kept separate, and they marry whom they will, the parents having no control in that particular. There was no formal vocational training.
In good seasons the country produces grain, but if the harvest fails, they make soup out of serpents and eat boiled elephant flesh.
All over the country the head of the family of greatest local consideration is termed “King of the Ravine,” and the next in importance is called a “Notable.” A market is held in the city of Three Rivers, on the first day of every moon, and another on the fifteenth; goods are brought in and bartered.
In his own ravine, Meng Huo gathered his family and clan to the number of a thousand or more and addressed them: “I have been put to shame by the leaders of Shu many times, and I have sworn to take revenge for the insults.
Has anyone any proposal to make?” Thereupon a certain one replied, saying, “I can produce a man able to defeat Zhuge Liang.” The assembly turned to the speaker, who was a brother of Meng Huo's wife.
He was the head of eight tribes of the Southern Mangs, and was named Chief Dai Lai.
“Who is the man?” asked Meng Huo.
Chief Dai Lai replied, “He is Mu Lu, King of the Bana Ravine. He is a master of witchcraft who can call up the wind and invoke the rain. He rides upon an elephant and is attended by tigers, leopards, wolves, venomous snakes, and scorpions.
Beside, he has under his hand thirty thousand superhuman soldiers. He is very bold.
O King, write him a letter and send him presents, which I will deliver.
If he will consent to lend his aid, what fear have we of Shu?” Meng Huo was pleased with the scheme and ordered Dai Lai to draft a letter.
Then he ordered Duo Si to defend Three Rivers and make the first line of defense. Zhuge Liang led his troops near the city of Three Rivers.
Taking a survey of the country, he noted that the city was surrounded by the three rivers and could only be reached by a bank on one face, so he sent Wei Yan and Zhao Yun to march along the road and attack.
But when they reached the rampart, they found it well defended by bows and crossbows. The defenders of the city were adepts in the use of the bow, and they had one sort which discharged ten arrows at once.
Furthermore, the arrows were poisoned, and a wound meant certain death. The two generals saw that they could not succeed, and so retired. When Zhuge Liang heard of the poisoned arrows, he mounted his light chariot and went to see for himself. Having regarded the defenses, he returned to his camp and ordered a retirement of three miles.
This move delighted the Mangs, who congratulated each other on their success in driving off the besiegers, who, as they concluded, had been frightened away. So they gave themselves up to rejoicing and kept no watch. Nor did they even send out scouts.
The army of Shu made a strong camp in their new halting place and closed the gates for defense.
For five days they gave no sign.
One evening, just at sunset, a slight breeze began to blow. Then Zhuge Liang issued an order: “Every man should provide himself with a coat by the first watch.
If any one lacks, he will be put to death.” None of the generals knew what was in the wind, but the order was obeyed.
Next, each man was ordered to fill his coat with earth.
This order appeared equally strange, but it was carried out. When all were ready, they were told:
“You are to carry the earth to the foot of the city wall, and the first arrivals will be rewarded.” So they ran with all speed with the dry earth and reached the wall.
Then with the earth they were ordered to make a raised way, and the first soldier on the wall was promised a reward.
The whole of the one hundred thousand troops of Shu, and their native allies, having thrown their burdens of earth near the wall, then quickly rushed up the incline, and with one great shout were on the wall.
The archers on the wall were seized and dragged down; those who got clear ran away into the city.
King Duo Si was slain in the melee that followed on this attack.
The soldiers of Shu moved through the city slaying all they met.
Thus was the city captured and with it great booty of jewels, which were made over to the army as a reward for their prowess.
The few soldiers who escaped went away and told Meng Huo what had happened to the city and King Duo Si.
Meng Huo was much distressed. Before he had recovered, they told him that the army of Shu had come over and were encamped at the mouth of his own ravine.
Just as he was in the very depths of distress, a laugh came from behind the screen, and a woman appeared, saying, “Though you are brave, how stupid you are!
I am only a woman, but I want to go out and fight.” The woman was his wife, Lady Zhurong.
She was a descendant of the Zhurong family of the Southern Mang.
She was expert in the use of the flying sword and never missed her aim.
Meng Huo rose and bowed to her.
Lady Zhurong thereupon mounted a horse and forthwith marched out at the head of a hundred generals, leading fifty thousand troops of the ravines, and set out to drive off the troops of Shu.
Just as the host got clear of the Silver Pit Palace, it was stopped by a cohort led by Zhang Ni.
At once the Mangs deployed, and the lady leader armed herself with five swords such as she used. In one hand she held an eighteen-foot signal staff, and she sat a curly-haired, reddish horse.
Zhang Ni was secretly troubled at the sight before him, but he engaged the lady commander.
After a few passes the lady turned her steed and bolted.
Zhang Ni went after her, but a sword came flying through the air directly at him.
He tried to fend off with one hand, but it wounded his arm, and he fell to the ground.
The Mangs gave a loud shout; some of them pounced on the unlucky leader and made him prisoner.
Then Ma Zhong, hearing his comrade had been taken, rushed out to rescue, but only to be surrounded.
He saw the lady commander holding up her staff and made a dash forward, but just then the Mangs threw hooks and pulled down his steed, and he was also a prisoner. Both generals were taken into the ravine and led before the King.
He gave a banquet in honor of his wife's success, and during the feast the lady bade the lictors put the two prisoners to death. They hustled the two generals in and were just going to carry out their orders when Meng Huo checked them.
“No; five times has Zhuge Liang set me at liberty. It would be unjust to put these to death.
Confine them till we have taken their chief; then we may execute them.” His wife was merry with wine and did not object. So their lives were spared. The defeated soldiers returned to their camp.
Zhuge Liang took steps to retrieve the mishap by sending for Ma Dai, Zhao Yun, and Wei Yan, to each of whom he gave special and private orders.
Next day the Mang soldiers reported to the King that Zhao Yun was offering a challenge.
Lady Zhurong forthwith mounted and rode out to battle. She engaged Zhao Yun, who soon fled.
The lady was too prudent to risk pursuit, and rode home.
Then Wei Yan repeated the challenge; he also fled as if defeated.
But again the lady declined to pursue.
Next day Zhao Yun repeated his challenge and ran away as before.
Lady Zhurong signaled no pursuit.
But at this Wei Yan rode up and opened a volley of abuse and obloquy.
This proved too much, and she gave the signal to go after him and led the way.
Wei Yan increased his pace, and the lady commander doubled hers, and she and her followers pressed into a narrow road along a valley.
Suddenly behind her was heard a noise, and Wei Yan, turning his head, saw the lady tumble out of her saddle. She had rushed into an ambush prepared by Ma Dai; her horse had been tripped up by ropes.
She was captured, bound, and carried off to the Shu camp. Some of her people endeavored to rescue her, but they were driven off. Zhuge Liang seated himself in his tent to see his prisoner, and Lady Zhurong was led up. He bade them remove her bonds, and she was conducted to another tent, where wine was laid before her.
Then a message was sent to Meng Huo to say that she would be exchanged for the two captive leaders. The King agreed, and they were set free.
As soon as they arrived, the lady was escorted by Zhuge Liang himself to the mouth of the ravine, where Meng Huo welcomed her half gladly, half angrily. Then they told Meng Huo of the coming of the King of the Bana Ravine, and he went out to meet Mu Lu.
Mu Lu rode up on his white elephant, dressed in silks, and with many gold and pearl ornaments. He wore a double sword at his belt, and he was followed by the motley pack of fighting animals that he fed, gamboling and dancing about him.
Meng Huo made him a low obeisance and then poured out his tale of woes.
Mu Lu promised to avenge his wrongs and was led off to a banquet which had been prepared.
Next day the deliverer went out to battle, with his pack of wild creatures in his train.
Zhao Yun and his colleague Wei Yan quickly made their array of footmen and then took their station in front side by side and studied their opponents. The Mang banners and weapons were all extraordinary.
Most of the warriors wore no armor and none wore any clothing. Their faces were sunburned.
They carried four sharp pointed knives in their belts.
Signals were not given by drum or trumpet, but by a gong.
King Mu Lu had two swords in his belt and carried a hand bell. He urged his white elephant forward and emerged from between his flags.
“We have spent all our life in the battlefields, but we have never seen the like of that before,” said Zhao Yun.
As they talked to one another, they noticed that the opposing leader was mumbling something that might be a spell or a curse, and from time to time he rang his bell.
Then suddenly the wind got up, stones began to roll and sand to fly, and there was a sound as of a heavy shower of rain.
Next a horn rang out, and thereupon the tigers and the leopards, and the wolves and the serpents, and all the other wild beasts came down on the wind snapping and clawing.
How could the soldiers of Shu stand such a thing as that?
So they retreated, and the Mangs came after them fiercely, chasing and slaying their enemies as far as the city of Three Rivers.
Zhao Yun and Wei Yan mustered their defeated troops and went to their leader to confess their failure. Zhuge Liang, however, was neither angry nor dejected.
“The fault is not yours,” he said.
“Long ago, when I was still in my rustic hut, I knew the Mangs possessed certain powers over beasts, and I provided against this adventure before we left Shu.
You will find twenty big sealed carts in the baggage train.
We will use half of them now.” He bade his staff bring forward ten of the red box-carts.
They all wondered what would happen. Then the carts were opened, and they turned out to be carved and colored models of huge wild beasts, with coats of worsted, teeth and claws of steel; each could accommodate ten people.
Choosing one hundred beasts, he told off a thousand troops and bade them stuff the mouths of the beasts full of inflammables.
Next day the army of Shu marched out to the attack and were arrayed at the entrance to the Silver Pit Hills.
The Mang soldiers went into the ravine and told their king. Mu Lu, thinking himself perfectly invincible, did not hesitate, but marched out, taking Meng Huo with him.
Zhuge Liang, dressed in the simple robe of a Taoist, went out in his light chariot. In his hand he held a feather fan. Meng Huo, who recognized his enemy, pointed him out to Mu Lu.
“That is Zhuge Liang in that small chariot.
If we can only capture him, our task is done.” Then Mu Lu began to mutter his spells and to ring his bell.
As before, the wind got up and blew with violence, and the wild beasts came on.
But at a wave of the simple feather fan, lo! the wind turned and blew the other way. Then from out of the host of Shu there burst the horrible wild beasts.
The real wild beasts of the Mang saw rushing down upon them huge creatures, whose mouths vomited flames and whose nostrils breathed out black smoke. They came along with jingling bells, snapping and clawing, and the real beasts turned tail and fled in among the host of their own side, trampling them down as they sped.
Zhuge Liang gave the signal for a general onset, and his troops rushed forward with beating drums and blaring trumpets. Mu Lu was killed in the melee.
Meng Huo's whole clan fled in panic and tore up among the hills out of the way.
And thus the Silver Pit Hill was taken.
Next day, as Zhuge Liang was telling off parties to search for and capture the King, it was announced that the brother-in-law of Meng Huo, Chief Dai Lai, having vainly tried to persuade the King to yield, had made prisoners of him and his wife and all his clan and were bringing them to Zhuge Liang.
Hearing this, Zhang Ni and Ma Zhong were called and received certain orders, upon which they hid themselves in the wings of the tent with a large body of sturdy warriors.
This done, Zhuge Liang ordered the keepers to open the gates, and in came Chief Dai Lai with Meng Huo and his people in custody.
As Dai Lai bowed at the entrance of the hall, Zhuge Liang called out, “Let my strong captors appear!” At once out came the hidden men, and every two of them laid hands upon a prisoner and bound him.
“Did you think your paltry ruse would deceive me?” said Zhuge Liang.
“Here you are a second time captured by your own people and brought before me that you might surrender. The first time I did not hurt you.
But now I firmly believe this surrender is part of a plot to kill me.” Then he called out to his guards to search the prisoners.
They did so, and on every man they found a sharp knife.
“Did you not say that if your family were taken prisoners you would yield? How now?” said Zhuge Liang.
“We have come of our own will and at the risk of our lives; the credit is not yours.
Still I refuse to yield,” replied Meng Huo. “This is the sixth time I have captured you, and yet you are obstinate; what do you expect?” “If you take me a seventh time, then I will turn to you and never rebel again.” “Well, your stronghold is now destroyed. What have I to fear?” said Zhuge Liang.
He ordered the bonds to be loosed, saying, “If you are caught again and lie to me once more, I shall certainly not be inclined to let you off.” Meng Huo and his people put their hands over their heads and ran off like rats.
The defeated Mangs who had fled were of thousands, and more than half of them were wounded.
They fell in with their King, who restored what order was possible and felt glad that he had still some leaders left. Then he and the Chief Dai Lai took counsel together.
“Whither can we go?” said Meng Huo.
“Our stronghold is in the hands of the enemy.” Dai Lai replied, “There is but one country that can overcome these troops; that is the Wugo Kingdom. It lies two hundred miles to the southeast.
The King of that state is named Wutu Gu. He is a giant of twelve spans. He does not eat grain, but lives on serpents and venomous beasts.
He wears scaly armor, which is impenetrable to swords and arrows.
His warriors wear rattan armor.
This rattan grows in gullies, climbing over rocks and walls.
The inhabitants cut the rattans and steep them in oil for half a year. Then they are dried in the sun.
When dry they are steeped again, and so on many times. Then they are plaited into helmets and armor.
Clad in this, the men float across rivers, and it does not get wet. No weapon can penetrate it. The soldiers are called the Rattan Army.
You may seek aid from this king, and with his help you can take Zhuge Liang as easily as a sharp knife cleaves a bamboo.” Meng Huo went to the Wugo Kingdom and saw the King.
The people of this country do not live in houses, but dwell in caves.
Meng Huo told the story of his woes and obtained a promise of help, for which he expressed great gratitude.
Wutu Gu called up two generals named Xi Ni and Tu An and gave them thirty thousand of the rattan-armored soldiers and bade them march northeast.
They came to a river called the River of Peach Flowers, on both banks of which grow many peach trees. Year after year the leaves of these trees fall into the river and render it poisonous to all but the natives. But to the natives it is a stimulant which doubles their vigor.
They camped on the bank of this river to await the coming of the army of Shu.
Now Zhuge Liang was informed of the journey of Meng Huo and its results, and he knew when the rattan-clad army camped at the ford.
He also knew that Meng Huo had collected all the soldiers of his own that he could help.
Zhuge Liang at once marched to the ford.
He questioned the natives, and they told him that the peach leaves were falling and the water of the river was undrinkable. So he retired two miles and camped. Only Wei Yan was left to hold the bank of Peach Flowers.
Next day Wutu Gu led the Wugo warriors across the stream, and, with a rolling of drums, Wei Yan went out to meet them.
The Wugo men approached bent double.
The soldiers of Shu shot at them, but neither arrows nor bolts penetrated their armors; they rolled off harmless.
Nor could swords cut or spears enter.
The enemy, thus protected and armed with big swords and prongs, were too much for the troops of Shu, who had to run away.
However, they were not pursued.
When, on the retreat, they came to Peach Flower Ford, they saw the Mangs crossing as if walking on the water.
Some of them were tired, so they took off their rattan breastplates, sat upon them and floated to the other side.
When Zhuge Liang heard the report of his general, he summoned Lu Kai and called in some natives.
Lu Kai said, “I have heard of the Wugo Kingdom as perfectly barbarous, the people having no codes of law as they are understood in the Middle Empire.
I have also heard of the rattan armor, which can withstand all thrusts, and the harmful River of Peach Flowers. The Southern Mangs are so untameable that victory will mean little.
We would rather retreat.” “No, no,” said Zhuge Liang merrily, “we have had too much difficulty in getting here to go back so easily.
I shall have a counter-plan for these people tomorrow.” Having provided for the defense of his camp, he gave strict orders to his generals not to go out to fight, Zhuge Liang went to reconnoiter. He rode in his light chariot with a few natives as guides. He came to the ford, and from a secluded spot in the mountains on the north bank, he looked about him.
The whole country was mountainous and difficult, impassable for any carriage. So he got out and went afoot.
Presently, from a hill he saw a long winding valley, like a huge serpent. The sides were very precipitous and bare. However, a road ran through the middle.
“What is the name of the valley?” asked Zhuge Liang.
“It is called 'Coiled Serpent Valley,'“ said the guides.
“At the other end you come into the high road to Three Rivers. The road goes by a valley called 'Talang See.'“ “The very thing,” cried Zhuge Liang. “Surely this is providence. I shall score a great success here.” Having seen enough, he retraced his steps, found his chariot, and returned to camp. Arrived at the camp, Ma Dai was called and put in charge of the preparations. Zhuge Liang gave him an order:
“I will give you the ten black painted carts, and you are to get a thousand long bamboo poles. Open the carts, and follow my instructions there.
Then you are to keep the two ends of the Coiled Serpent Valley.
Half a month is the deadline, and all of these must be performed with the most perfect secrecy under military law and punishment.” Next Zhao Yun was sent to a point on the Three River road; Wei Yan to camp at the Peach Flowers Ford.
Zhuge Liang told Wei Yan, “If the Mangs come over the river, you are to abandon the camp and march toward a certain white flag you will see.
Further, in half a month you would have to acknowledge defeat some fifteen times and abandon seven camps.
On no account are you to come to interview me even after fourteen defeats.” Wei Yan went off, not a little hipped at the prospect, but prepared to obey.
Next, Zhang Yi was sent to make a stockade at a certain indicated point, and Zhang Ni and Ma Zhong was told to lead the Mang soldiers who had surrendered, and other orders were given.
Meng Huo had begun to have a real terror of Zhuge Liang, and he warned King Wutu Gu of Wugo, saying, “This Zhuge Liang is exceedingly crafty.
Ambush is one of his favorite ruses, so you should warn your soldiers that on no account should they enter a valley where the trees are thick.” “Great King, you speak with reason,” said Wutu Gu. “I have always heard that the people of the Middle Empire are full of wiles, and I will see that your advice is followed.
I will go in front to fight, and you may remain in the rear to give orders.” Presently the scouts told them of the arrival of the troops of Shu on the bank of the Peach Flowers River.
Wutu Gu sent his two generals—Xi Ni and Tu An—to cross the river and engage them.
The two sides met, but Wei Yan soon suffered a defeat and left the field.
The Mangs were afraid to pursue as they dreaded an ambush.
In the meantime, Wei Yan laid out another camp.
The Mangs crossed the river in greater force. Wei Yan came out to meet them, but again fled after a very short fight.
This time the Mangs pursued, but having lost their hold of the enemy after three miles, and coming then to the late camp of the Shu army, which seemed quite safe, they occupied it.
Next day Xi Ni and Tu An asked their King Wutu Gu to come to the camp, and they reported what had happened.
Wutu Gu decided to make a general advance to drive the troops of Shu before him. They fled, even casting aside their breastplates and throwing away their arms; they were in such haste to flee.
And the troops of Shu went toward a white flag that appeared in the distance.
They found a camp already made, which they occupied.
Soon, however, Wutu Gu came near, and as he pressed forward Wei Yan abandoned this camp and fled.
When the Mangs reached the camp, they took up quarters therein.
Soon after they set out to renew the pursuit, but Wei Yan turned back and checked them. This was only a temporary check, for he fled after three encounters, going toward a white flag in the distance.
This sort of thing continued daily until the soldiers of Shu had been defeated and driven out of the field fifteen times and had abandoned their camp on seven different occasions.
The Mangs were now hot in pursuit and pressed on with all their might, Wutu Gu being in the forefront of the pursuers.
But then they came to a thick umbrageous wood; and he halted, for he saw flags moving about behind the sheltering trees. “Just as you foretold,” said Wutu Gu to Meng Huo. “The men of Shu like using ambush.” “Yes; Zhuge Liang is going to be worsted this time.
We have beaten off his troops now daily for half a month and won fifteen successive victories. His troops simply run when they hear the wind.
The fact is he has exhausted all his craft and has tried every ruse.
Now our task is nearly done.” Wutu Gu was greatly cheered and began to feel contempt for his enemy.
The sixteenth day of the long fight found Wei Yan leading his oft-defeated troops once more against the rattan-protected foe. King Wutu Gu on his white elephant was well in the forefront. He had on a cap with symbols of the sun and moon and streamers of wolf's beard, a fringed garment studded with gems, which allowed the plates or scales of his cuirass to appear, and his eyes seemed to flash fire. He pointed the finger of scorn at Wei Yan and began to revile him.
Wei Yan whipped up his steed and fled.
The Mangs pressed after him.
Wei Yan made for the Coiled Serpent Valley, for he saw a white flag calling him thither.
Wutu Gu followed in hot haste, and as he saw only bare hills without a sign of vegetation, he felt quite confident that no ambush was laid.
So he followed into the valley. There he saw some score of black painted carts in the road.
The soldiers said to each other, “The carts must be the commissariat wagons of the enemy, abandoned in their hasty flight when they heard of the coming of Your Majesty.” This only urged the King to greater speed, and he went on toward the other mouth of the valley, for the soldiers of Shu had disappeared.
However, he saw piles of timber being tumbled down across the track and great boulders rolled down the hill side into the road.
The pursuers cleared away the obstacles. When they had done so and advanced a little, they saw certain wheeled vehicles in the road, some large, some small, laden with wood and straw, which was burning. Wutu Gu was suddenly frightened and ordered a retreat. But he heard much shouting in the rear, and they told him:
“The exit has been blocked with wood-laden carts, which on being broken open are found to contain gunpowder, and they are all on fire.” However, seeing that the valley was barren and devoid of grass and wood, Wutu Gu was not in the least alarmed and merely bade his soldiers search for a way round.
Then he saw torches being hurled down the mountain side. These torches rolled till they came to a certain spot, where they ignited the fuses leading to the powder. Then the ground suddenly heaved with the explosion of bombs beneath.
The whole valley was soon full of flames, darting and playing in all directions, and wherever they met with rattan armor the rattan caught fire, and thus the whole army, huddled and crowded together, burned in the midst of the valley.
Zhuge Liang looked on from the heights above and saw the Mangs burned. Many of the dead had been mangled and torn by the explosions of the mines. The air was full of suffocating vapor.
Zhuge Liang's tears fell fast as he saw the slaughter, and he sighed, saying, “Though I am rendering great service to my country, yet I have sacrificed many lives. My life may be shortened for this.” Those who were with him were also deeply affected.
King Meng Huo was in his camp awaiting news of success when he saw a crowd of Mang soldiers come along, and they bowed before him and told him, “King Wutu Gu is fighting a great battle and is about to surround Zhuge Liang in the Valley of the Coiled Serpent. But he needs help.
We are the natives of the local ravines, and we ourselves had no alternative when we yielded to Shu.
But now we have returned to your allegiance and are willing to come to help Your Majesty.” So Meng Huo placed himself at the head of his clansmen and those who had just come to him, and lost no time in marching out.
He bade them lead him to the spot.
But when he reached the valley and saw the destruction, he knew he had been made a victim again. As he made to retire, there appeared a body of his enemies on each side under Zhang Ni and Ma Zhong, and they began to attack. Meng Huo was making what stand he could when a great shouting arose.
The Mangs were nearly all disguised soldiers of Shu, and they quickly surrounded him and his clansmen to make them prisoners.
Meng Huo galloped clear and got into the hills.
Presently he fell upon a small chariot, with a few guards about it, and therein sat Zhuge Liang, simply dressed and holding a fan.
“What now, rebel Meng Huo?” cried he.
But Meng Huo had galloped away.
He was soon stopped by Ma Dai and lay a helpless prisoner bound hand and foot. His wife, Lady Zhurong, and the other members of his family were also taken. Zhuge Liang returned to camp and seated himself in the high place in his own tent.
He was still sad at the thought of the sacrifice of life, and he said to his officers, “There was no help for it; I had to use that plan. But it has sadly injured my inner virtue.
Guessing that the enemy would suspect an ambush in every thicket, I sent people to walk about in wooded places with flags. Really there was no ambush.
I bade Wei Yan lose battle after battle just to lead the enemy on and harden their hearts.
When I saw the Valley of the Coiled Serpent, with its bare sides of smooth rock and the road in its depths, I recognized what could be done and sent Ma Dai to arrange the contents of the black carts, the mines, which I had prepared long ago for this purpose. In every bomb were nine others, and they were buried thirty paces apart. They were connected by fuses laid in hollow bamboos that they might explode in succession, and the force was enormous.
Zhao Yun prepared those carts laden with straw and rolled down the piles of timber and boulders that blocked the mouth.
Wei Yan led Wutu Gu on and on till he had enticed the King into the valley, when he took up a position to escape.
Then the burning began.
They say that what is good for water is not much good for fire, and the oil-soaked rattan, excellent as a protection against swords and arrows, was most inflammable, catching fire at sight.
The Mangs were so stubborn that the only way was to use fire, or we should never have scored a victory.
But I much regret that the destruction of the people of Wugo has been so complete.” The officers were deeply moved.
Then Meng Huo was summoned.
He appeared and fell upon his knees.
His limbs were freed from the bonds, and he was sent into a side tent for refreshment.
But the officers told off to entertain him received certain secret orders.
The chief prisoners were Meng Huo, Lady Zhurong, Meng You, and Dai Lai. There were many of his clan as well.
As they were eating and drinking, a messenger appeared in the door of the tent and addressed the King: “The Prime Minister is ashamed and does not wish to see you again, Sir.
He has sent me to release you. You may enlist another army if you can and once more try a decisive battle.
Now you may go.” But instead of going Meng Huo began to weep.
“Seven times a captive and seven times released!” said the King. “Surely there was never anything like it in the whole world.
I know I am a barbarian and beyond the pale, but I am not entirely devoid of a sense of propriety and rectitude.
Does he think that I feel no shame?” Thereupon he and all his followers fell upon their knees and crawled to the tent of the Commander-in-Chief and begged pardon, saying, “O Minister, you are the majesty of Heaven. We people of the south will offer no more opposition.” “Then you yield?” said Zhuge Liang, sighing.
“I and my children and grandchildren are deeply affected by your allpervading and life-giving mercy.
Now how can we not yield?” Zhuge Liang asked Meng Huo to come up into the tent and be seated, and he prepared a banquet of felicitation.
Also he confirmed Meng Huo in his kingship and restored all the places that had been captured.
Everyone was overwhelmed with Zhuge Liang's generosity, and they all went away rejoicing. A poem has praised Zhuge Liang's action:
He rode in his chariot green, In his hand just a feather fan, Seven times he released a king As part of his conquering plan.
Having chosen a beautiful spot Where the valleys debauch on the plain, Lest his kindness should ever be forgot, The vanquished erected a fane.
The High Counselor Fei Yi ventured to remonstrate with Zhuge Liang on his policy.
He said, “You, O Minister, have led the army this long journey into the wilds and have reduced the Mang country, and have brought about the submission of the king; why not appoint officials to share in the administration and hold the land?” Zhuge Liang replied, “There are three difficulties.
To leave foreigners implies leaving a guard for them; there is the difficulty of feeding a guard.
The Mangs have lost many of their relatives. To leave foreigners without a guard will invite a calamity; this is the second difficulty.
Among the Mangs, dethronements and murders are frequent, and there will be enmities and suspicions. Foreigners and they will be mutually distrustful; this is the third difficulty.
If I do not leave our people, I shall not have to send supplies, which makes for peace and freedom from trouble.” They had to agree that the policy was wise.
The kindness of the conqueror was rewarded by the gratitude of these southern people, and they even erected a shrine in his honor, where they sacrificed at the four seasons.
They called him their “Gracious Father", and they sent gifts of jewels, cinnabar, lacquer, medicines, plowing cattle, and chargers for the use of the army. And they pledged themselves not to rebel.
When the feastings to the soldiers were finished, the army marched homeward to Shu.
Wei Yan was in command of the advanced column. He marched to the River Lu. But on his arrival the clouds gathered and a gale blew over the face of the waters. Because of the force of the gale, the army could not advance.
Wei Yan then returned and reported the matter to his chief.
Zhuge Liang called in Meng Huo to ask what this might mean.
The Mangs beyond the border have yielded now at last, The water demons raging mad won't let the Shu men go past.
The next chapter will contain Meng Huo's explanation. CHAPTER 91. Sacrificing At River Scorpio, The Prime Minister Marches Homeward; Attacking Wei, The Lord Of Wuxiang Presents A Memorial.
Meng Huo at the head of the Mang Chieftains and Notables attended to do honor to the army of Shu on its departure.
They reached the River Lu in autumn, the ninth month. But on trying to cross the river, a tremendous storm came and hindered them.
Wei Yan having reported his difficulty to Zhuge Liang, Meng Huo was asked if he knew of any reason for such a storm.
Meng Huo replied, “Wild spirits have always troubled those who would cross this river; it is necessary to propitiate them with sacrifices.” “What is the sacrifice?” asked Zhuge Liang.
“In the old days when malicious spirits brought misfortune, they sacrificed humans to the number of seven sevens and offered their heads. They also slew a black ox and a white goat. Sacrifice thus; the wind will subside and the waters come to rest.
The same used to be done to secure a plenteous harvest.” “How can I slay a single man without good reason now that fighting is done and peace has returned?” said Zhuge Liang.
Zhuge Liang went down to the river to see for himself.
The north wind was blowing hard, and the waves were high. Both humans and horses seemed frightened.
He himself was perplexed. Then he sought out some of the natives and questioned them.
They said, “We have heard the demons moaning every night since the army crossed the river.
The cries begin at dusk and continued till dawn.
There are many dark demons in the malarial vapors and no one dared cross.” “The sin is mine,” said Zhuge Liang, “for more than a thousand soldiers of Ma Dai perished in these waters beside the southern people. Their poor distressed souls are not yet freed.
Therefore I will come this night and sacrifice to them.” “According to the ancient rule the number of victims ought to be fortynine; then the spirits will disperse,” said the natives.
“As the resentful demons are here because of the deaths of people, where is the sense in slaying more humans?
But this will I do.
I will make balls of flour paste after the manner of human heads and stuff them with the flesh of oxen and goats.
These shall be used instead of human heads, for indeed they be called 'mantou' or 'human heads.'“ By nightfall, an altar had been set up on the bank of the river with the sacrificial objects all arranged. There were also forty-nine lamps. Flags were flying to summon the souls.
The “mantou” were piled up on the ground.
In the middle of the third watch, at midnight, Zhuge Liang, dressed in Taoist garb, went to offer the sacrifice in person, and he bade Dong Jue read this prayer:
“On the first day of the ninth month of the third year of the era Beginning Prosperity of the Han Dynasty, I, Zhuge Liang, Prime Minister of Han, Lord of Wuxiang, Imperial Protector of Yiazhou, reverently order this sacrifice to appease the shades of those soldiers of Shu who have died in their country's service and those of the southern people who have perished. “I now declare to you, O ye shades, the majesty of my master, the Emperor of the mighty Han Dynasty, excelling that of the Five Feudatories and brilliantly continuing the glory of the three ancient kings.
Recently, when the distant south rebelliously invaded his territory, contumeliously sent an army, loosed the venom of their sorcery, and gave free rein to their savagery in rebellion, I was commanded to punish their crimes.
Wherefore my brave armies marched and utterly destroyed the contemptible rebels.
My brave soldiers gathered like the clouds, and the insensate rebels melted away.
Hearing of the easy successes I won, they were entirely demoralized.
“My army consists of heroes from the Nine Regions and officers and people are famous in the empire; all are expert in war and skilled in the use of arms; they go whither light leads them and serve the Emperor. All have exerted themselves to obey orders and carried out the plans for the seven captures of Meng Huo.
They were whole-hearted in their service and vied in loyalty.
Who could foresee that you, O Spirits, would be sacrificed in the strategy and be involved in the enemies' wicked wiles?
Some of you went down to the deep springs wounded by flying arrows; others went out into the long night hurt by lethal weapons. Living you were valorous, dead you left behind a name. “Now we are returning home. The victors' song is in our mouths and our prisoners accompany us.
Your spirits are with us still and certainly hear our prayers. Follow the banners, come with the host, return to your country, each to his own village, where you may enjoy the savor of the meat offerings and receive the sacrifices of your own families.
Do not become wandering ghosts in unfamiliar hamlets of restless shades in strange cities.
I will memorialize our Emperor that your wives and little ones may enjoy his gracious bounty, every year gifts of food and clothing, every month donations for sustenance.
Comfort yourselves with this provision.
“As for you, Spirits of this place, shades of the departed people of the south, here is the usual sacrifice. You are near home.
Living you stood in awe of the celestial majesty, dead you come within the sphere of refining influence. It is right that you should hold your peace and refrain from uttering unseemly cries.
With bowed head I pray you partake of the sweet savor of this sacrifice.
“Alas, ye dead!
To you this offering!” Zhuge Liang broke into loud lamentations at the end of this prayer and manifested extreme emotion, and the whole army shed tears.
Meng Huo and his followers also moaned and wept, and amid the sad clouds and angry mists they saw the vague forms of many demons floating away on the wind till they disappeared.
The material portion of the sacrifice was then thrown into the river.
Next day the army stood on the south bank with a clear sky over their heads and calm waters at their feet, the clouds gone and the winds hushed; and the crossing was made without misadventure.
They continued their way, whips cracking, gongs clanging, spurs jingling, and ever and anon the song of victory rising over all.
Passing through Yongchang, Wang Kang and Lu Kai were left there in command of the four territories—Yiazhou, Yongchang, Zangge, and Yuesui. And then Meng Huo was permitted to leave.
He was ordered to be diligent in his administration, maintain good control, and soothe and care for the people left to him to govern and to see to it that agriculture was promoted.
He took leave with tears rolling down his cheeks. When the army neared Capital Chengdu, the Latter Ruler came out ten miles in state to welcome his victorious minister.
The Emperor stood by the roadside as Zhuge Liang came up, and waited.
Zhuge Liang quickly descended from his chariot, prostrated himself and said, “Thy servant has offended in causing his master anxiety; but the conquest of the south was long.” The Emperor took Zhuge Liang kindly by the hand and raised him. Then the chariots of the Son of God and his minister returned to Chengdu side by side. In the capital were great rejoicings with banquets and rewards for the army.
Henceforward distant nations sent tribute to the Imperial Court to the number of two hundred.
As proposed in a memorial, the Emperor provided for the families of the soldiers who had lost their lives in the expedition, and they were made happy.
And the whole land enjoyed tranquillity. The Ruler of Wei, Cao Pi, had now ruled seven years, and it was the fourth year of Beginning Prosperity in Shu-Han calendar.
Cao Pi had taken to wife a lady of the Zhen family, formerly the wife of the second son of Yuan Shao. He had discovered Lady Zhen at the sack of Yejun and had married her.
She bore him a son, Cao Rui, who was very clever and a great favorite with his father.
Later Cao Pi took as Beloved Consort a daughter of Guo Yong in Guangzong.
Lady Guo was a woman of exceeding beauty, whom her father said, “She is the king among women,” and the name “Female King” stuck to her.
But with Lady Guo's arrival at court, Lady Zhen fell from her lord's favor, and the Beloved Consort's ambition led her to intrigue to replace the Empress. She took Zhang Tao, a minister at the court, into her confidence.
At that time the Emperor was indisposed, and Zhang Tao alleged, saying, “In the palace of the Empress has been dug up a wooden image with Your Majesty's date of birth written thereon.
It is meant to exercise a maleficent influence.” Cao Pi in his anger forced his Empress to commit suicide; and he set up the Beloved Consort in her place. But Lady Guo had no issue.
Wherefore she nourished Cao Rui as her own.
However, loved as Cao Rui was, he was not then named heir.
When he was about fifteen, Cao Rui, who was an expert archer and a daring rider, accompanied his father to the hunt. In a gully they started a doe and its fawn.
Cao Pi shot the doe, while the fawn fled. Seeing that the fawn's course led past his son's horse, Cao Pi called out to him to shoot it.
Instead the youth bursts into tears. “Your Majesty has slain the mother; how can one kill the child as well?” The words struck the Emperor with remorse.
He threw aside his bow, saying, “My son, you would make a benevolent and virtuous ruler.” From this circumstance Cao Pi decided that Cao Rui should succeed, and conferred upon him the princedom of Pingyuan.
In the fifth month the Emperor fell ill, and medical treatment was of no avail. So the chief officers were summoned to the bedside of the Emperor. They were Commander of the Central Army Cao Zhen, General Who Guards the West Chen Qun, and Grand Commander Sima Yi. When they had come, the Emperor's son was called, and the dying Emperor spoke thus: “I am grievously ill, and my end is near.
I confide to your care and guidance this son of mine; you must support him out of good feeling for me.” “Why does Your Majesty talk thus?” said they.
“We will do our utmost to serve you for a thousand autumns and a myriad years.” “No; I know that I am about to die,” said the Emperor.
“The sudden fall of the gates of Xuchang this year was the omen, as I well knew.” Just then the attendants said that General Who Conquers the East Cao Xiu had come to ask after the Emperor's health. They were told to call Cao Xiu into the chamber.
When he had entered, Cao Pi said to him, “You and these three are the pillars and cornerstones of the state. If you will only uphold my son, I can close my eyes in peace.” These were his last words.
A flood of tears gushed forth, and Cao Pi sank back on the couch dead.
He was forty years of age and had reigned seven years . The four ministers raised the wailing for the dead and forthwith busied themselves with setting up Cao Rui as the Emperor of Great Wei.
The late Emperor received the posthumous style of “Emperor Pi.” The late Empress, the consort who had suffered death, was styled “Empress Zhen.” Honors were distributed freely in celebration of the new reign.
Zhong Yao was made Imperial Guardian; Cao Zhen, Regent Marshal; Cao Xiu, Minister of War; Hua Xin, Grand Commander; Wang Lang, Minister of the Interior; Chen Qun, Minister of Works; Sima Yi, Imperial Commander of the Flying Cavalry; and many others, conspicuous and obscure, were promoted.
A general amnesty was declared throughout all the land.
About this time a vacancy existed in the governorship of Xizhou and Xiliang.
Sima Yi asked for the post and got it.
He left for his new office as soon as he had received the appointment. In due time the news of all these doings reached Zhuge Liang and perturbed him not a little. He was anxious, saying, “Cao Pi is dead, and his son Cao Rui has succeeded him. But that is not my concern. Only I am worried about Sima Yi, who is very crafty and skillful in the art of war, and who, in command of all western forces of Xizhou and Xiliang, may prove a serious danger to Shu. This Sima Yi ought to be attacked at once.” Counselor Ma Su spoke of this matter.
“You, O Minister, have just returned from an arduous and exhausting expedition, and you should take time to recuperate before you undertake such another.
However, I have a scheme by which Cao Rui may be brought to work the destruction of Sima Yi. May I lay it before you?” “What plan have you?” said he.
“The young emperor has no confidence in Sima Yi although Sima Yi is a high minister of state.
Now send someone secretly to Luoyang and Yejun to disseminate reports that Sima Yi is about to rebel.
Further, prepare a proclamation in his name and post it up so as to cause Cao Rui to mistrust him and put him to death.” Zhuge Liang adopted the suggestion.
Whence it came about that a notice suddenly appeared on the city gate of Yejun.
The wardens of the gate took it down and sent it to Cao Rui. This is what it said:
“I, Sima Yi, Imperial Commander of the Flying Cavalry, Commander of the Forces of Xizhou and Xiliang, confident in the universal principles of right, now inform the empire, saying: “The Founder of this Dynasty, Emperor Cao, established himself with the design of recurring the empire to the Lord of Linzi Cao Zhi.
Unfortunately, calumny spread abroad, and the Emperor could not manifest himself for many years.
His grandson, Cao Rui, does not follow a virtuous course, though sitting in the high place, and has not fulfilled the great intention of his ancestor.
Now I, in accordance with the will of Heaven and favoring the desires of the people, have decided upon a day to set my army in motion in order to secure the wish of the people; and when that day arrives, I call upon each one to gather to his lord; and I will destroy utterly the family of any who shall disobey.
You are hereby informed that you may all know.” This document frightened the young Emperor, and he turned pale. At once he called a council of his officials to consider it.
Hua Xin said, “That was the reason for his having requested the governorship of Xizhou and Xiliang.
Now Emperor Cao, the Founder of Great Wei, frequently said to me that Sima Yi was ambitious and hungry, and should not be entrusted with military authority lest he harm the state. This is the first beginning of rebellion, and the author should be put to death.” Wang Lang said, “Sima Yi is a master of strategy and skilled in tactics.
Moreover, he is ambitious and will cause mischief if he be allowed to live.” Wherefore Cao Rui wrote a command to raise an army, which he would lead to punish the minister.
Suddenly Cao Zhen stood forth from the rank of military officers and said, “What you advise is impossible.
His late Majesty, Emperor Pi, confided his son to the care of certain officers of state, of whom Sima Yi is one, wherefore it is certain that he felt sure of his probity.
So far nothing is known certainly. If you hastily send an army to repress him, you may force him into rebellion.
This may be but one of the base tricks of Shu or Wu to cause dissension in our midst so that occasion be found to further their own aims.
As no one knows, I pray Your Majesty reflect before you do anything.” “Supposing Sima Yi really contemplates a revolt; what then?” said Cao Rui.
Cao Zhen replied, “If Your Majesty suspects him, then do as did Liu Bang the Supreme Ancestor of Han when, under pretense of taking a trip on the Lake Yunmeng, he summoned his vassals—and seized Han Xin, who had been denounced.
Go to Anyi; Sima Yi will assuredly come out to meet you, and his actions and demeanor may be watched closely.
He can be arrested if needed.” Cao Rui changed his mind.
Leaving Cao Zhen to regulate the affairs of state, the young Emperor went out with the Imperial Guards, to the number of one hundred thousand, and traveled to Anyi.
Ignorant of the reason of the Emperor's coming, and anxious to show off his dignity, Sima Yi went to welcome his ruler in all the pomp of a commander of a great army.
As Sima Yi approached, the courtiers told the Emperor, saying, “Sima Yi's defection is certain since such a large army can only mean that he is prepared to resist.” Whereupon Cao Xiu, with a large force, was sent in front to meet him.
Sima Yi thought the Imperial Chariot was coming, and he advanced alone and stood humbly by the roadside till Cao Xiu came up.
Cao Xiu advanced and said, “Friend, His late Majesty entrusted you with the heavy responsibility of caring for his son; why are you in revolt?” Sima Yi turned pale, and a cold sweat broke out all over him as he asked the reason for such a charge.
Cao Xiu told him what had occurred.
“This is a vile plot on the part of our rivals, Shu and Wu, to cause dissension,” said Sima Yi. “It is a design to make the Emperor work evil upon his ministers that thereby another may profit.
I must see the Son of Heaven and explain.” Ordering his army to retire, Sima Yi went forward alone to the Emperor's chariot, bowed low and said, weeping “His late Majesty gave me charge of his son; could I betray him? This is a wile of the enemy.
I crave permission to lead an army, first to destroy Shu and then to attack Wu, whereby to show my gratitude to the late Emperor and Your Majesty and manifest my own true heart.” However, Cao Rui did not feel quite convinced, and Hua Xin said, “In any case withdraw his military powers and let him go into retirement.” And thus it was decided.
Sima Yi was forced to retire to his native village.
Cao Xiu succeeded to his command, and Cao Rui returned to Luoyang. Zhuge Liang rejoiced when they told him of the success that had attended the ruse. “Sima Yi and the forces he commanded in Xizhou and Xiliang have been the obstacles in my long-wished-for attack on Wei.
Now he has fallen, I have no more anxiety.” At the first great assembly of officers at court, Zhuge Liang stepped forth and presented to the Ruler of Shu a memorial on the expedition he contemplated.
“The First Ruler had accomplished but half his great task at his death.
At this moment the empire is in three parts, and our country is weak; it is a most critical moment for us.
Still, ministers are not remiss in the capital, and loyal and devoted soldiers sacrifice their lives abroad, for they still remember the special kindness of the First Ruler and wish to show their gratitude to him by service to Your Majesty.
Therefore it would be indeed fitting that you should extend your holy virtue to glorify his virtuous memory in the stimulation of the will of your purposeful officers.
Your Majesty should not lose yourself in the pursuit of mean things, quoting phrases to confound the eternal principles of rectitude and so preventing remonstrance from honest people.
One rule applies to the palace of the Emperor and the residence of a courtier; there must be one law rewarding the good and punishing the evil.
Evil-doers and law-breakers, as also true and good people, should be dealt with according to their deserts by the officers concerned in order to manifest Your Majesty's impartial and enlightened administration.
Partiality is wrong, as is one law for the court and another for the regions.
“The High Ministers Fei Yi, Guo Youzhi, and Dong Yun are honest men, devotedly anxious to be loyal to the last degree; wherefore His late Majesty chose them in his testament.
My advice is to consult them in all palace matters, great or small, before taking action. Your Majesty will reap the enormous advantage of having any failings corrected.
“General Xiang Chong is a man of well-balanced temperament, versed in military matters, to whom, after testing him, the late Emperor applied the epithet 'capable.' The consensus of opinion is that he should be Commanderin-Chief.
My advice is to consult him in all military matters, great or small, whereby your military forces will yield their maximum, each one being employed to the best advantage.
“Attract worthy people; repel mean ones. This policy achieved the glory of the Former Hans, while its reversal ruined the Latter Hans.
When the late Emperor was with us, he often discussed this with your servant, and he took much to heart the story of Emperors Huan and Ling. “The Chair of the Secretariat Chen Zhen, Commander Zhang Yi, and Minister Jiang Wan are both incorruptible and enlightened people, honest to the death. I wish that Your Majesty should have them near and hold them in confidence. If this be done, then the glory of the House of Han will be quickly consummated.
“I was originally a private person, a farmer in Nanyang, concerned only to secure personal safety in a troubled age and not seeking conversation with the contending nobles.
His late Majesty, the First Ruler, overlooking the commonness of my origin, condescended to seek me thrice in my humble cot and consult me on the trend of events. His magnanimity affected me deeply, and I consented to do my utmost for him.
Then came defeat, and I took office at a moment of darkest outlook and at a most difficult crisis. This is twentyone years ago.
The First Ruler recognized my diligent care, and when dying he confided the great task to me.
From that day I have lived a life of anxiety lest I should fail in my trust and so dim his glory.
“That is why I undertook the expedition to the lands beyond the River Lu.
Now the Southern Mang has been quelled, and our army is in good condition. I ought to lead it against the north, where I may meet with a measure of success in the removal of the wicked ones, the restoration of Han and a return to the old capital. This is my duty out of gratitude to the late Emperor and loyalty to Your Majesty.
As to a discussion of the pros and cons and giving a true version of the whole matter, that belongs to Guo Youzhi and Fei Yi and Dong Yun.
I desire Your Majesty to confide to me the task of slaying the rebels and restoring the Hans. If I fail, then punish me by telling the spirit of the late Emperor.
If you know not what restoration implies, that is the fault of your advisers.
“Your Majesty should take pains to be guided into the right path and examine carefully what is laid before you, carefully remembering the late Emperor's testament.
“I cannot express what would be my delight if you had the goodness to accept and act on my advice.
“Now I am about to depart on a distant expedition, I write this with tears and clearly know what I have said.” The Emperor read it through and said, “My Father-Minister, you have only just returned from a distant and fatiguing expedition against the Southern Mangs; you are not yet refreshed, and I fear this march to the north will be almost too much even for you.” Zhuge Liang replied, “The heaviest responsibility lies upon me, the wellbeing of Your Majesty confided to me by the First Ruler.
My efforts may not be relaxed night or day.
The south is at rest, at home is no anxiety; what better time could be hoped for to destroy the rebels and recover the capital?” Forth from the ranks of courtiers stood Minister Qiao Zhou and said, “I have studied the aspect of the stars; the northern quarter is brilliant and strong.
The scheme will not speed.” Then turning toward the Prime Minister, he continued, “You, O Minister, understand the mysteries of the skies; why do you oppose the stars?” “Because the stars are in infinite changes,” replied Zhuge Liang. “One may rely on the stars too much.
Moreover, I have already sent the army into Hanzhong, where I shall act as soon as I have studied what is afoot.” Qiao Zhou pleaded in vain; Zhuge Liang was too strongly set upon his purpose to yield.
So Guo Youzhi, Dong Yun, and Fei Yi were ordered to attend to matters in the palace; Xiang Chong was to control all military affairs and forces; Jiang Wan was made Military Adviser; Chen Zhen became Chair of the Secretariat; Zhang Yi, Controller of the Prime Minister's palace; Du Qiong, Imperial Censor; Du Wei and Yang Hong, Ministers; Meng Guang and Lai Min, Libationers; Yin Mo and Li Zhuan, Academicians; Xi Zheng and Fei Shi, General Secretaries; Qiao Zhou, Imperial Recorder; and others to the number of over a hundred, all to manage the administration of Shu in the absence of Zhuge Liang.
After having received his Emperor's command to lead an expedition against the North, Zhuge Liang returned to his palace and summoned the officers of the army to listen to the orders.
And they came, and to each was appointed a duty in the great army of Zhuge Liang, Commander-in-Chief of the North-conquering Expedition, Prime Minister of Shu, Lord of Wuxiang, Imperial Protector of Yiazhou, Director of Internal and External Affairs.
Wei Yan was made Commander of the Front Army; Li Hui, Commander of the Rear Army; Ma Dai, Commander of the Left Army; Ma Zhong, Commander of the Right Army; Liu Yan, Deng Zhi, and Ma Su, Commanders of the Central Army; Guan Xing, Commander of the Left Guard; Zhang Bao, Commander of the Right Guard; Zhang Ni, Wang Ping, Wu Yi, Wu Ban, Liao Hua, Liu Ba, Gao Xiang, and others, Marching Generals; Yan Yan, Hu Ji, Cuan Xi, Yang Yi, and others, Military Counselors; Fan Jian, Dong Jue, Guan Yong, and others, Secretaries and Recorders; Ding Xian and others, Officers of the Commissariat.
Li Yan was given the task of guarding the passes against Wu. All being ready, a day was chosen for the start:
the fifth year, the third month, on the day of “tiger.” After the appointments had all been made, there came forward a veteran who had listened in vain for the duty assigned him.
“Old I may be,” said he, “yet have I still the valor of Lian Po and the heroism of Ma Yuan.
Why am I thought useless any more than these two who refused to acknowledge old age?” It was Zhao Yun.
Zhuge Liang said, “I have lost my friend Ma Chao by illness since I returned from the Southern Expedition, and I feel as I had lost an arm.
Now, General, you must own that the years are mounting up.
Any slight lapse would not only shake the life-long reputation of yourself, but might have a bad effect on the whole army.” Zhao Yun replied bitterly, “I have never quailed in the presence of the enemy from the day I first joined the First Ruler; I have ever pressed to the front.
It is a happy ending for a person of valor to die on the frontier. Think you that I should resent it?
Let me lead the van, I pray.” Zhuge Liang used all his skill to dissuade the veteran, but in vain; he was set on it, threatening suicide if this honor was refused him. At last Zhuge Liang yielded an the condition that he would accept a colleague. “I will go to help the veteran leader,” cried Deng Zhi, without a moment's hesitation.
“I am not worth much, but I will help lead the attack on the enemy.” Accordingly five thousand of veterans were chosen for the advanced guard, and with them, to assist Zhao Yun, went Deng Zhi and ten other generals.
After the vanguard had set out, the main body marched by the north gate, the Emperor himself going to see his minister start. The farewell was taken three miles from the gate, in the face of the grand army with its banners and pennons flaunting in the wind, and spears and swords gleaming in the sun. Then they took the road leading to Hanzhong.
Naturally, this movement was duly reported in Luoyang at a court held by Cao Rui, when a minister said, “A report from the border stations says that Zhuge Liang has marched three hundred thousand troops into Hanzhong.
Zhao Yun and Deng Zhi are leading the advanced guard.” The report alarmed the Emperor, and he asked, “Who can lead an army to repel the advance?” At once out spoke one, saying, “My father died in Hanzhong, and to my bitter resentment his death is unavenged.
Now I desire to lead the army against Shu, and I pray that the armies west of the Pass may be given me for this purpose. I shall render a service to the state, as well as taking vengeance for my father.
I care not what fate may befall me.” The speaker was Xiahou Yuan's son, Xiahou Mao.
He was by nature very impulsive and also very miserly. When young he had been adopted by Xiahou Dun.
When Xiahou Yuan was killed by Huang Zhong, Cao Cao was moved and married Xiahou Mao to one of his daughters, Princess Qinghe, so that he was an Emperor's son-in-law. As such he enjoyed great deference at court.
But although he held a military commission, he had never been with the army.
However, as he requested the command, he was made Commander-inChief to get the western army ready to march.
The Minister Wang Lang spoke against the appointment, saying, “The appointment is wrong.
Xiahou Mao, the Son-in-Law, has never seen a battle and is unsuitable for this post, especially when his opponent is the clever and crafty Zhuge Liang, a man thoroughly versed in strategy.” “I suppose you have arranged with Zhuge Liang to be his ally,” sneered Xiahou Mao.
“Ever since I was a boy, I have studied strategy, and I am well acquainted with army matters.
Why do you despise my youth?
Unless I capture this Zhuge Liang, I pledge myself never again to see the Emperor's face.” Wang Lang and his supporters were silenced.
Xiahou Mao took leave of the Ruler of Wei and hastened to Changan to get his army in order. He had two hundred thousand troops from the western areas.
He would go to battle, take the signal flags in grip, But could he play the leader, he a lad with callow lip?
The next chapter will deal with this campaign. CHAPTER 92.
Zhao Yun Slays Five Generals; Zhuge Liang Takes Three Cities. Zhuge Liang's army marched northward, passing through Mianyang, where stood Ma Chao's tomb. In honor of the dead Tiger General, Zhuge Liang sacrificed there in person, Ma Chao's cousin—Ma Dai—being chief mourner for the occasion.
After this ceremony, when the Commander-in-Chief was discussing his plans, the spies came in to report:
“The Ruler of Wei, Cao Rui, has put in motion all western forces under Xiahou Mao.” Then Wei Yan went in to offer a plan, saying, “Xiahou Mao is a child of a wealthy family, soft and stupid.
Give me five thousand troops, and I will go out by Baozhong, follow the line of the Qinling Mountains east to the Ziwu Valley and then turn north. In ten days I can be at Changan.
Hearing of my intent, Xiahou Mao will hasten to vacate the city. Then he must flee by way of Royal Gate.
I will come in by the east, and you, Sir, can advance by the Xie Valley.
In this way and all west of Xianyang will be ours in just one move.” Zhuge Liang smiled at the suggestion. “I do not think the plan quite perfect,” said he. “You are gambling by thinking there is no northerner worth considering guarding Changan.
If anyone suggests sending a force across to block the exit of the mountains, I am afraid we should lose five thousand troops, to say nothing of the check to our elan.
The plan will not do.” “If you, O Minister, march by the high road, they will bring against you the whole host within the passes and will thus hold you indefinitely; you will never get to the Middle Land.” “But I shall go along the level road on the right of Longyou.
I cannot fail if I keep to the fixed rules of war.” Wei Yan withdrew, gloomy and dissatisfied.
Then Zhuge Liang sent Zhao Yun orders to the advanced guard to move.
Xiahou Mao was at Changan preparing his force.
There came to him a general from Xiliang, named Han De, a man of great valor, whose weapon was a mighty battle-ax called “Mountain Splitter.” He brought with him eighty thousand of the Qiang tribesmen and offered his services.
They were gladly accepted, and his army was made the van of the attack.
This Han De had four sons, all very expert in archery and horsemanship. They were named Han Ying, Han Yao, Han Qiong, and Han Qi, and they came to serve under their father.
Han De led his sons and the eighty thousand troops by the road to Phoenix Song Mountain, where they were near the army of Shu, and here they drew up the array. When the battle line was in order, the father, with his four sons, rode to the front and began to revile their enemy, shouting, “Rebels and raiders!
How dare you invade our territory?” Zhao Yun quickly lost his temper, rode forward and challenged.
The eldest son, Han Ying, accepted and galloped out; but he was slain in the third bout.
Immediately his brother Han Yao went out, whirling his sword.
But now Zhao Yun's blood was up, and the old dash and vigor came upon him so that the young man had no chance to win the battle.
Then the third son, Han Qiong, took his great halberd and dashed out to his brother's aid.
Zhao Yun had now two opponents; nevertheless he held his own, nor blenched nor failed a stroke.
Seeing that his two brothers were nearing defeat, the fourth son Han Qi went to join in the fray with his pair of swords that he had named “Sun and Moon.” And there was the veteran warrior with three against him, and he still kept them at bay.
Presently a spear thrust got home on Han Qi, who fell. Another general then coming out to take his place.
Zhao Yun lowered his spear and fled.
Han Qiong then took his bow and shot three arrows at the fugitive, who turned them aside so that they fell harmless.
Angry at this, Han Qiong again seized his halberd and went in pursuit.
But Zhao Yun took his bow and shot an arrow that wounded his pursuer in the face. So Han Qiong fell and died. Han Yao then galloped up and raised his sword to strike, but Zhao Yun slipped past, got within his guard and made Han Yao a prisoner.
Zhao Yun quickly galloped into his own array with his captive, dropped him and then, dashing out, recovered his spear, which had fallen when he seized his man.
Han De was overwhelmed with the loss of all his sons and went behind the battle array.
His Qiang tribesmen were too frightened at the prowess of Zhao Yun to be of any use in battle, and no one dared to meet the old warrior.
So they retired, while Zhao Yun rode to and fro among them slaying at his will.
I thought of brave old people, of Zhao Yun, Who, spite of numbered years three scores and ten, Was marvelous strong in battle; who one day Slew four opposing generals, as great as When at Dangyang he had saved his lord.
Seeing the successful battle that Zhao Yun was waging, Deng Zhi led on his troops to join in the fight. This completed the discomfiture of the Xiliang army, and they ran away.
Han De, seeing the danger of being captured, threw off his armor and went on foot. The soldiers of Shu drew off and returned to their camp.
In camp Deng Zhi felicitated his veteran colleague.
“For a man of seventy years, you are unique and wonderful,” said he. “You are as much the hero as you ever were.
It is almost an incomparable feat to have slain four generals in one day.” “Yet the Prime Minister thought me too old and did not wish to employ me.
I had to give him a proof.” The captive Han Yao was sent to the main body with the messenger who bore an account of the victory.
In the meantime, Han De led his defeated army back to his chief, to whom he related his sad story with many tears.
Then Xiahou Mao got angry and decided to lead his own army out against Zhao Yun.
When the scouts reported his coming, Zhao Yun took his spear and mounted his steed.
He led one thousand troops out to Phoenix Song Mountain, at the foot of which he made his array.
Xiahou Mao was wearing a golden casque, riding a white horse, and carrying a huge sword.
From his place beneath the great standard, he saw Zhao Yun galloping to and fro. He was going out to give battle, when Han De checked him.
“Is it not mine to avenge my four sons?” said Han De.
Han De seized his mountain-splitter ax, and rode directly at the warrior, who advanced with fury.
The contest was but short, for in the third encounter Zhao Yun's spear thrust brought Han De to the earth.
Without waiting a moment he made for Xiahou Mao, who hastily dashed in behind his ranks and so escaped. Then Deng Zhi led on the main body and completed the victory.
The force of Wei retired three miles and made a camp. This first battle having gone against him, Xiahou Mao called his officers to consult.
He said, “I have heard Zhao Yun long ago, but have never met face-toface.
Now though that warrior is old, he still has incredible prowess.
The story of Dangyang where he alone fought against a whole host and came out victor is really not fabricated.
But what to be done against such a champion?” Then Cheng Wu, son of Cheng Yu, said, “My opinion is that this Zhao Yun, though brave in the field, is lacking in the council chamber. Really he is not greatly to be feared.
Give battle again soon, but first prepare a twopronged ambush. You can retreat and so draw him into it.
Then go up on the hill top and direct the attack from that point of vantage so that he may be hemmed in on all sides and be captured.” The necessary plans for this were made, and two parties of thirty thousand each, led by Dong Xi and Xue Ze, went into ambush right and left.
The ambush laid, Xiahou Mao advanced once more to attack, drums rolling and flags flying.
As soon as he appeared, Zhao Yun and Deng Zhi went to meet him.
Deng Zhi said, “The army of Wei were beaten only yesterday. This renewed attempt must mean that they are trying some trick.
You should be cautious, General.” “I do not think this youth, with the smell of mother's milk still on his lips, worth talking about. We shall surely capture him today.” Zhao Yun pranced out, and Pan Sui came to meet him from the side of Wei.
But Pan Sui made no stand and quickly ran away.
Zhao Yun plunged in to try to capture Xiahou Mao. Then there came out to stop him no less than eight generals of Wei, all of whom passed in front of Xiahou Mao. But one by one they too fled.
Zhao Yun pressed forward at full speed, Deng Zhi coming up behind.
When Zhao Yun had got deeply involved, with the battle raging all around him, Deng Zhi decided to retire.
This was the signal for the ambush to come out, Dong Xi from the right and Xue Ze from the left.
Deng Zhi was so hampered that he could not attempt to rescue his colleague. Zhao Yun was thus entirely surrounded.
However, he struggled on, losing men at every dash, till he had but one thousand troops left.
He was then at the foot of the hill whence Xiahou Mao was directing operations, and observing his enemy from this point of vantage, Xiahou Mao sent troops to check Zhao Yun whithersoever he went.
Zhao Yun decided to charge up the hill, but was stopped by rolling bulks of timber and tumbling rocks. The battle had lasted long, and Zhao Yun was fatigued.
So he halted to rest a time, intending to renew the struggle when the moon should be up.
But just as he had taken off his armor the moon rose and, with it, his enemies began to attack with fire as well, and the thunder of the drums was accompanied by showers of stones and arrows.
The oncoming host shouted, “Zhao Yun! Why don't dismount and be bound?” However, Zhao Yun did not think of that, but got upon his steed to strive once more to extricate himself.
And his enemies pressed closer and closer, pouring in flights and flights of arrows.
No advance was possible, and the end seemed very near. “I refused the repose of age,” sighed he, “and now my end will come to me here!” Just then he heard new shouting from the northeast, and the array of Wei became disordered. To his joy, Zhao Yun saw Zhang Bao coming toward him, the octane-serpent halberd in his hand, and a man's head hanging at his bridle.
Soon Zhang Bao reached the veteran general's side and cried, “The Prime Minister feared some misfortune had befallen you, so he sent me to your help; I have five thousand troops here. We heard that you were surrounded.
On the way I met Xue Ze and slew him.” Zhao Yun's courage revived, and he and the young general went on toward the southwest, driving the soldiers of Wei before them in disorder. Soon another cohort came in from the side, the leader wielding the greendragon saber.
This was Guan Xing, and he cried, “The Prime Minister sent me with five thousand troops to your aid. On the way I encountered Dong Xi and slain him. Here is his head; and the Prime Minister is coming up too.” “But why not press on to capture Xiahou Mao since you have had such wonderful success?” cried Zhao Yun. Zhang Bao took the hint and went forward.
Guan Xing followed.
“They are as my own children,” said Zhao Yun to those who stood near. “And they press on wherever there is merit to be won.
I am an old leader and high in rank, but I am not worth so much as these two youths.
Yet will I risk my life once more for the sake of my old lord the First Ruler.” So he led the remnant of his troops to try to capture Xiahou Mao.
During that night the army of Wei was smitten till corpses covered the earth and gore ran in rivers. Xiahou Mao was unskillful, and young, and inexperienced in battle.
His army was in utter rout, and he could not think but only flee. At the head of a hundred cavalries, he made for Nanan. His army, leaderless, scattered like rats.
Zhang Bao and Guan Xing set out for Nanan.
At the news of their coming, Xiahou Mao closed the city gates and urged his soldiers to defend.
Zhao Yun soon joined the generals, and they attacked on three sides.
Deng Zhi arrived also, and the city was quite surrounded.
After vain efforts for ten days, they heard the news:
“The Prime Minister has stationed the rear army in Mianyang, the left army in Yangping Pass, the right army in Shicheng. He himself is leading the central army toward Nanan.” The four generals went to visit Zhuge Liang and told him their failure at the city.
He got into his light chariot and rode out to view the city, after which he returned and summoned the officers to his tent.
Zhuge Liang said, “The moat is deep, the walls are steep; wherefore the city is well defended and difficult to take. My present plan omits this place.
If you persist in the attack and the Wei armies march to try for Hanzhong, our army will be in danger.” “Consider what the capture of Xiahou Mao would mean,” said Deng Zhi.
“He is an Imperial Son-in-Law, and worth more than slaying a hundred ordinary leaders. We have begun the siege, and I do not like to raise it.” Zhuge Liang said, “I have other plans.
West of this lies Tianshui and north Anding; does any one know the governors of these two places?” “Ma Zun is the Governor of Tianshui, Cui Liang that of Anding,” replied a scout.
Zhuge Liang then called to him one by one—Wei Yan, Zhang Bao, Guan Xing, and two trusted subordinates—and gave each certain instructions.
They left to carry out their orders.
Next Zhuge Liang ordered the soldiers to pile up beneath the walls heaps of firewood and straw, saying he was going to burn the city. The defenders on the wall derided him. Cui Liang, the Governor of Anding, was much frightened when he heard that Xiahou Mao was besieged, and began to see to his own defenses.
He mustered his four thousand soldiers, resolved to defend his city as long as possible.
Then there came a man from the south direction, who said he had secret letters.
Cui Liang had him brought into the city, and, when questioned, the man said, “I am one of Xiahou Mao's trusted soldiers and named Pei Xu.
I was sent to beg for help from Tianshui and Anding.
The city of Nanan is hard pressed; every day we have raised fires to call the attention of your cities to our plight, but our signals have all failed. No one has come.
I was ordered to fight my way through the besiegers and come to tell you.
You are to give assistance immediately, and our General will open the gates to help you.” “Have you a letter from the General?” asked Cui Liang.
A letter was produced from inside the man's dress, all moist with perspiration.
After the Governor had read it, the soldier took it back and went on to Tianshui.
Two days later a mounted messenger came to say: “Governor Ma Zun of Tianshui with his troops have already started for Nanan. The troops of Anding should march at once to their aid.” Cui Liang took the advice of his officers.
Most of them said, “If you do not go, and Nanan is taken, we shall he blamed for giving up the Imperial Son-inLaw.
He must be rescued.” Thereupon Cui Liang marched; the civil officers were left in charge of the city.
The army took the high road to Nanan. They saw flames shooting up to the sky all the time, and the Governor urged the army to march faster. When fifteen miles from the city, there was heard the drums of an attacking force, and the scouts came to say that the road ahead was held by Guan Xing, while Zhang Bao was coming up quickly in their rear.
At this news the soldiers scattered in all directions.
Cui Liang had a hundred men left with whom he tried to cut his way out that he might return to his own city. He got through.
But when he came to his own city, a flight of arrows greeted him from the wall, and Wei Yan shouted to him, saying, “I have taken the city; you would better yield!” This was what had happened.
Wei Yan and his soldiers, disguised as an Anding soldiers, in the darkness of the night had beguiled the wardens of the gate into opening it, and the men of Shu had got in.
Cui Liang set off for Tianshui.
But one march away a cohort came out, and beneath the great flag he saw a light chariot. In the chariot sat a man in Taoist robe with a feather fan in his hand.
Cui Liang at once recognized Zhuge Liang, but as he turned, up came Guan Xing and Zhang Bao, who summoned him to surrender. As he was entirely surrounded, no other course was open to him, so he gave in.
He went to the great camp with Zhuge Liang, who treated him with courtesy.
After a time Zhuge Liang said, “Is the Govenor of Nanan a friend of yours?” “He is one Yang Ling, a cousin of Yang Fu.
Being neighboring counties, we are very good friends.” “I wish to trouble you to persuade him to capture Xiahou Mao; can you?” “If you, O Minister, order me to do this, I would ask you to withdraw your troops and let me go into the city to speak with him.” Zhuge Liang consented and ordered the besiegers to draw off seven miles and camp.
Cui Liang himself went to the city and hailed the gate. He entered and went forthwith to his friend's residence. As soon as he had finished the salutations, he related what had happened.
“After the kindness we have received from Wei, we cannot be traitors,” said Yang Ling.
“But we will meet ruse with ruse.” He led Cui Liang to the Commander-in-Chief and told the whole story.
“What ruse do you propose?” asked Xiahou Mao. “Let us pretend to offer the city, and let the army of Shu in. Once they are in, we can massacre them.” Xiahou Mao agreed to plot the scheme.
Cui Liang went back to Zhuge Liang's camp, where he said, “Yang Ling wants to offer the Prime Minister the city.
He also wants to capture Xiahou Mao, but he is so afraid of having few soldiers that he has made no hasty move.” “That is simple enough,” replied Zhuge Liang. “Your hundred troops are here.
We can mix with them some of my generals dressed as your officers and so let them get into the city.
They can hide in Xiahou Mao's dwelling and arrange with Yang Ling to open the gates in the night.
And my grand army will come in to make the capture for you.” Cui Liang thought within himself, “If I do not take the Shu generals, they will arouse suspicion.
I would rather take them and will kill them as soon as they get within the walls. Then, I will give the signal and beguile Zhuge Liang to enter, and so dispose of him.” So Cui Liang consented to Zhuge Liang's proposal, and Zhuge Liang gave him instructions, saying, “I will send my trusty Guan Xing and Zhang Bao with you. You will pass them off as the rescuers just to set Xiahou Mao's mind at rest.
But when you raise a fire, I shall take that as my signal and come in.” At dusk the two trusty generals, having received their secret orders, put on their armor, mounted, took their weapons, and got in among the Anding troops. Cui Liang led the small force to the gate. Yang Ling was on the wall. The drawbridge was hoisted. He leaned over the guard rail and scanned those below. “Who are you?” asked he.
“We are rescuers from Anding.” Now Cui Liang shot an arrow over the wall, to which a secret letter was bound, saying, “Zhuge Liang is sending two generals into the city that they may help him to get in, but do nothing till we get inside lest the ruse gets known and the game be spoiled.” Yang Ling went to show this letter to Xiahou Mao, who said, “Then Zhuge Liang is going to be our victim.
Put a company of ax and bill men in the palace, and as soon as these two generals get inside, shut the gates and fall on. Then give the signal.
As soon as Zhuge Liang gets inside the gate, seize him.” All arrangements being made, Yang Ling went back to the wall and said, “Since you are Anding troops, you may be allowed in.” The gate was thrown open and, while Guan Xing followed close after Cui Liang, Zhang Bao was a little way behind.
Yang Ling came down to the gate to welcome them.
As soon as Guan Xing got near, he lifted his sword and smote Yang Ling, who fell headless; Cui Liang was startled and lashed his steed to flee. Zhang Bao cried, “Scoundrel!
Did you think your vile plot would be hidden from the eyes of our Prime Minister?” With that Cui Liang fell from a spear thrust of Zhang Bao.
Then Guan Xing went up on the wall and lit the fire.
Soon the army of Shu filled the city.
Xiahou Mao could make no defense, so he tried to fight his way through the south gate.
There he met Wang Ping and was captured. Those with him were slain.
Zhuge Liang entered the city and at once forbade all plunder. The various generals reported the deeds of valor.
The captive Commander-in-Chief was placed in a prisoner's cart.
Then Deng Zhi asked, “O Minister, how did you know the treachery of Cui Liang?” “I knew the man was unwilling in his heart to yield, so I sent him into the city that he might have a chance to weave a counter plot with Xiahou Mao.
I saw by his manner he was treacherous, and so I sent my two trusty generals with him to give him a feeling of security.
Had he been true to me, he would have opposed this; but he accepted it gaily and went with them lest I should suspect him.
He thought they could slay my two leaders and entice me in.
But my two leaders already had orders what to do.
Everything turned out as I thought, and as they did not expect.” The officers bowed their appreciation of his wonderful insight.
Then Zhuge Liang said, “I sent one of my trusty people to pretend he was a certain Pei Xu of Wei and so deceive this Cui Liang.
I also sent another to Tianshui to do the same, but nothing has happened yet; I do not know the reason. We will take this opportunity to capture that place.” It was decided to take Tianshui next, and thither they moved.
Wu Yi and Liu Yan were to guard Nanan and Anding. Wei Yan was ordered to move toward Tianshui.
When Ma Zun, Governor of Tianshui, heard of Xiahou Mao's being besieged in Nanan, he called a council at which one party—headed by Yin Shang and Liang Xu—were strongly of opinion that a rescue should be attempted.
“If anything sinister happens to the Imperial Son-in-Law, 'Golden Branch' and 'Jade Leaf' as he is, we shall be held guilty of having made no attempt to save him.
Wherefore, O Governor, you must march all the forces you have to his rescue,” said Yin Shang and Liang Xu.
Ma Zun found decision difficult, and while thinking over what was best to do, the arrival of Pei Xu, a messenger from Xiahou Mao, was announced. Pei Xu was taken to the Governor's residence and there produced his dispatch and asked for aid.
Soon came another man saying that the Anding troops had set out and calling upon Ma Zun to hasten.
This decided him, and he prepared his army. Then an outsider came in and said, “O Governor, you are the sport of one of Zhuge Liang's wiles.” All looked at him with surprise. He was one Jiang Wei.
His father was Jiang Jiong, a former local official who had died in the Emperor's service while quelling one of the Qiang rebellions.
Jiang Wei was well up in books, seeming to have read everything, and was also skilled in all warlike exercises. He had studied books on war.
He was a very filial son and much esteemed.
He held military rank of General.
Jiang Wei said to the Governor, “I hear Zhuge Liang is attacking Xiahou Mao, who is now in Nanan most closely besieged. How then can this messenger have got out?
Pei Xu is an unknown officer whom no one has heard of, and the other messenger from Anding bears no dispatch.
The fact is the men are imposters sent to beguile you into leaving your city undefended so that it may be the more easily captured.” The Governor began to understand.
He said, “Were it not for you, I would fall into a ruse.” Then Jiang Wei said, “But do not be anxious; I have a scheme by which we can capture Zhuge Liang and relieve Nanan.” The fates all changing bring the man that's needed, And warlike skill comes from a source unheeded. The next chapter will unfold the ruse proposed by Jiang Wei.
CHAPTER 93.
Jiang Wei Goes Over To Zhuge Liang; Zhuge Liang's Reviles Kill Wang Lang. Jiang Wei propounded his scheme of defense, saying, “Zhuge Liang will lay an ambush behind the city, induce our soldiers to go out and then take advantage of its undefended state to capture it.
Now give me three thousand good soldiers, and I will place them in ambush at a certain critical place.
Lead your troops out, but go slowly and not further than ten miles, and then turn to retire.
However, look out for a signal, and if you see one, attack, for the attack will be double.
If Zhuge Liang is there himself, we shall capture him.” The Governor adopted this plan, gave the needed troops to Jiang Wei, who marched at once, and then Ma Zun went forth himself with Liang Qian.
Only two civil officials—Liang Xu and Yin Shang—were left to guard the city.
Zhao Yun had been sent to lie in ambush in a secret place among the hills till the Tianshui army left the city, when he was to rush in and capture it.
His spies reported the departure of the Governor, and Zhao Yun sent on the news to those who were acting with him, Zhang Yi and Gao Xiang, that they might attack Ma Zun.
Zhao Yun and his five thousand troops then quickly marched to the city wall and called out, “I am Zhao Yun of Changshan; you have fallen into our trap, but if you will surrender quickly, you will save many lives.” But instead of being alarmed, Liang Xu looked down and said, “On the contrary, you have fallen into our trap; only you do not know it yet.” Zhao Yun began his attack on the walls.
Soon there was heard a roar, and fire broke out all round, and forth came a youthful leader armed with a spear, riding a curvetting steed.
“Look at me, Jiang Wei of Tianshui!” cried he.
Zhao Yun made at him, but after a few bouts he found Jiang Wei was getting very eager.
He was surprised, and wondered, “No one knows there is such an able man in Tianshui.” As the fight went on, along came the two other forces under Ma Zun and Liang Qian, now returning.
As Zhao Yun found he could not prevail, he set to cut an arterial alley through and lead off his defeated troops.
He was pursued, but Zhang Yi and Gao Xiang poured forth to save him, and he got away safely. Zhuge Liang was surprised when he heard what had happened.
“Who is this,” said he, “who has thus seen into the dark depths of my secret plan?” A man of Nanan, who happened to be there, told him, “He is Jiang Wei from Jicheng.
He is very filial to his mother. Civil skill and military prowess, wisdom and courage, he has all.
Truly, he is a hero of the age.” Zhao Yun also praised his skill with the spear, which was superior to any other's.
Zhuge Liang said, “I want to take Tianshui now; I did not expect to find such a man as this.” The Shu army then advanced in force.
Jiang Wei went back to Ma Zun and said, “Zhao Yun's defeat will bring up Zhuge Liang with the main body.
He will conclude that we shall be in the city, wherefore you would better divide your force into four.
I, with one party, will go into hiding on the east so that I may cut off our enemies if they come that way.
You, O Governor, and Liang Qian and Yin Shang will lie in ambush on the other sides of the city.
Let Liang Xu and the common people go up on the wall to make the defense.” Ma Zun agreed to the plan and prepared everything.
Due to Jiang Wei, Zhuge Liang himself led the main army to Tianshui. When they reached the city, Zhuge Liang gave a general orders:
“Attacking a city must be proceeded as soon as the army reaches it; and at the rolling of drums, incite and urge the soldiers to advance with a rush.
The keenness of the soldiers will be spoiled by any delay.” So this time also the army came straight up to the rampart.
But they hesitated and dared not attack when they saw the flags flying in such good order and apparently such thorough preparation.
About the middle of the night, fires started up all around and a great shouting was beard. No one could see whence the Wei soldiers were coming, but there were answering shouts from the wall. The soldiers of Shu grew frightened and ran.
Zhuge Liang mounted a horse and, with Guan Xing and Zhang Bao as escort, got out of danger.
Looking back, they saw many mounted troops with torches winding along like a huge serpent.
Zhuge Liang bade Guan Xing find out what this meant, and Guan Xing report:
“These are Jiang Wei's troops.” Zhuge Liang remarked, “An army owes more to its leading than to its numbers.
This Jiang Wei is a true genius.” Zhuge Liang led the army back to camp, and then he thought for a long time. Suddenly he called up one of the Anding men and said, “Where is the mother of this Jiang Wei?” “She lives in Jicheng,” replied he.
Zhuge Liang called Wei Yan and said to him, “March off with a body of troops, giving out that you are going to take Jicheng.
If Jiang Wei comes up, let him enter the city.” Then Zhuge Liang asked, “What is the most important place in connection with this place?” The man from Anding replied, “The storehouse of Tianshui is at Shanggui; if that is taken, the supplies are cut off.” This was good news, so Zhao Yun was sent to attack Shanggui, while Zhuge Liang made a camp ten miles south of the city. The spies took the news of the movements of these three forces into Tianshui.
When Jiang Wei heard that one army was to attack his own place, he pleaded with Ma Zun, saying, “My mother is in Jicheng, and I am worried about the attacking force.
Let me go to its defense, that I may keep the city and do my duty by my mother at the same time.” So Jiang Wei received command of three thousand troops and marched toward his home. When Jiang Wei came near the walls, he saw a cohort under Wei Yan.
He attacked. After a show of defense Wei Yan retreated, and Jiang Wei entered the city. He closed the gates and prepared to defend the wall. Then he went home to see his mother.
In the same way Liang Qian was allowed to enter Shanggui.
Then Zhuge Liang sent for his prisoner, Xiahou Mao, and, when he was brought to his tent, Zhuge Liang said suddenly, “Are you afraid of death?” Xiahou Mao prostrated himself and begged for his life. “Well, Jiang Wei of Tianshui, who, is now gone to guard Jicheng, has sent a letter to say that he would surrender if only that would secure your safety.
Now I am going to let you go if you will promise to induce Jiang Wei to come over to me.
Do you accept the condition?” “I am willing to induce him to yield to you,” said Xiahou Mao.
Zhuge Liang then gave his prisoner clothing and a horse and let him ride away. Nor did he send anyone to follow him, but let him choose his own road.
Having got outside, Xiahou Mao wanted to get away, but he was perfectly ignorant of the roads and knew not which to take.
Presently he came across some people, apparently in flight, and he questioned them.
“We are Jicheng people,” said they.
“Jiang Wei has surrendered the city and deserted to Zhuge Liang. The troops of Shu are looting and burning, and we have escaped.
We are going to Shanggui.” “Do you know who is holding Tianshui?” “Governor Ma Zun is in there,” said they.
Hearing this, Xiahou Mao rode quickly toward Tianshui.
Presently he met more people, evidently fugitives, leading sons and carrying daughters, who told the same story.
By and by he came to the gate of the city, and, as he was recognized, the wardens of the gate admitted him, and the Governor came to greet him and asked of his adventures.
He told all that had happened, that Jiang Wei had surrendered and related what the fugitives had said.
“I did not think Jiang Wei would have gone over to Shu,” said the Governor sadly.
“It seems he thought by this to save you, Sir Commander-in-Chief,” said Liang Xu.
“I am sure he has made only a pretense of surrendering.” “Where is the pretense when it is a fact that he has surrendered?” said Xiahou Mao. They were all perplexed.
Then at the third watch the troops of Shu came to begin an attack.
The fires round the wail were very bright, and there in the glare was seen Jiang Wei, armed and riding up and down under the ramparts calling out for Xiahou Mao.
Xiahou Mao and Ma Zun ascended the wall, whence they saw Jiang Wei swaggering to and fro. Seeing the chiefs on the wall, Jiang Wei called out, “I surrendered for the sake of you, O General; why have you gone back on your word?” “Why did you surrender to Shu after enjoying so much of Wei's bounty?” said Xiahou Mao.
“And why do you talk thus?” “What do you mean talking thus after writing me a letter telling me to surrender? You want to secure your own safety by involving me.
But I have surrendered, and as I am a superior general in their service now, I see no sense in returning to Wei.” So saying, he urged the soldiers on to the attack.
The assault continued till dawn, when the besiegers drew off.
Now the appearance of Jiang Wei in this fashion was but a ruse. Zhuge Liang had found among his men one who resembled Jiang Wei and had disguised him so that Jiang Wei appeared to be leading the attack on the ramparts. In the smoke and fire during the night no one could penetrate the disguise.
Zhuge Liang then led the army to attack Jicheng.
The grain in the city was insufficient to feed the people.
From the wall Jiang Wei saw wagons of grain and forage being driven into the Shu camp, and he determined to try to secure some.
So he led three thousand troops out of the city to attack the train of wagons.
As soon as he appeared, the convoy abandoned the carts and fled.
Jiang Wei seized them, and was taking them into the city, when he was met by a cohort under the command of Zhang Yi. They plunged into battle. After a short time Wang Ping came to reinforce Zhang Yi, so that Jiang Wei was attacked on two sides.
All Jiang Wei's efforts were vain, and he had to abandon the spoil and try to reenter the city.
But as he drew near, he saw the walls were decorated with Shu ensigns, for Wei Yan had captured the place and was in possession. By desperate fighting Jiang Wei got clear and set off for Tianshui. But he only had a few score horsemen left.
Presently the small force fell in with Zhang Bao, and at the end of this engagement Jiang Wei found himself alone, a single horseman. He reached Tianshui and hailed the gate.
The watchers above the gate knew him and went to tell the Governor.
“This fellow has came to beguile me into opening the gate,” said Ma Zun.
So Ma Zun ordered the defenders to shoot at the fugitive.
Jiang Wei turned back, but there were the army of Shu close at hand. He set off as fast as he could for Shanggui. But when he got there Liang Qian hurled a volley of abuse at him. “You traitor,” cried Liang Qian.
“Dare you come to try to cajole me out of my city?
I know you have surrendered to Shu.” Liang Qian's soldiers also began to shoot at the hapless fugitive. Jiang Wei was helpless. He could not explain the real truth to those who doubted him.
Lifting his eyes to heaven, while tears rolled down his cheeks, he whipped up his steed and rode off toward Changan.
Before he had got very far, he came to a spot where were many heavy foliaged trees. From among these appeared a company of soldiers, led by Guan Xing.
Weary as were both horse and rider, there was no chance of successful resistance, and Jiang Wei turned back.
But soon appeared a small chariot in which sat Zhuge Liang, dressed simply as usual in a white robe and carrying his feather fan.
“Friend Jiang Wei,” said Zhuge Liang, “is it not time to yield?” Jiang Wei stopped and pondered. There was Zhuge Liang, and Guan Xing's troops were behind him. There was no way out. So he dismounted and bowed his head in submission.
Zhuge Liang at once got out of the chariot and bade him welcome, taking him by the hand and saying, “Ever since I left my humble cottage, I have been seeking some worthy person to whom I might impart the knowledge that my life has been spent in acquiring.
I have found no one till this moment, and now my desire is attained.
You are the one.” Jiang Wei bowed and thanked him, and they two returned to camp.
Soon after their arrival, the new recruit and Zhuge Liang consulted how to capture Tianshui and Shanggui.
Jiang Wei had a scheme.
“The two civil officers in charge of the city, Yin Shang and Liang Xu, are excellent friends of mine,” said he, “and I will write a letter to each, shoot it over the wall tied to an arrow, and ask them to help by raising a revolt within the city.” They decided upon this, and two secret letters were duly written and sent flying over the ramparts, where they were found and taken to the Governor. Ma Zun was doubtful what action to take and consulted with Xiahou Mao, asking him to decide.
“Put both the men to death,” Xiahou Mao replied.
But Yin Shang heard what was toward and said to Liang Xu, “The best course for us is to yield the city to Shu and trust to them to treat us well as our recompense.” That evening Xiahou Mao sent many times to summon the two officers to him, but they thought it too great a risk to answer the call.
Instead, they armed themselves and rode at the head of their own soldiers to the gates, opened them and let in the troops of Shu.
Ma Zun and Xiahou Mao fled by the west gate with a hundred faithful followers and sought refuge with the Qiang tribespeople.
Liang Xu and Yin Shang welcomed Zhuge Liang, who entered the city, restored order, and calmed the people.
This done, Zhuge Liang asked how he might capture Shanggui.
Liang Xu said, “My brother, Liang Qian, holds that city, and I will call upon him to yield it.” Thereupon Liang Xu rode over to Shanggui and called out his brother to submit.
Zhuge Liang rewarded the two brothers and then made Liang Xu Governor of Tianshui; Yin Shang, Magistrate of Jicheng; and Liang Qian, Magistrate of Shanggui. Next the army prepared to advance.
His officers asked, “O Minister, why do you not pursue and capture Xiahou Mao?” Zhuge Liang replied, “I let him go as I would release a duck; in my friend Jiang Wei I recognized a phoenix.” Such awe and fear seized upon the country around when these exploits of Zhuge Liang were heard of that many other cities simply opened their gates without making any resistance.
Zhuge Liang brought all soldiers from Hanzhong, horse and foot, and marched on to Qishan.
When the Shu army reached the west bank of River Wei, the scouts reported their movements in Luoyang, and, at a court held in the first year of the era of Calm Peace , a minister told the Ruler of Wei of the threatened invasion.
He said, “Xiahou Mao, the Imperial Son-in-Law, has lost the three cities and fled to the Qiangs.
The enemy has reached Qishan, and their advanced columns are on the west bank of River Wei.
I pray that an army be sent to repulse them.” The Emperor, Cao Rui, was alarmed and asked for some general to go out and drive off the enemy.
Minister Wang Lang stepped forward and said, “I observed that whenever General Cao Zhen was sent by the late Emperor on any expedition he succeeded; why not send him to drive off these soldiers of Shu?” Cao Rui approved of the suggestion, whereupon he called up Cao Zhen and said to him, “The late Emperor confided me to your guardianship; you cannot sit by while the enemy ravages the country.” Cao Zhen replied, “Your Majesty, my talents are but poor and unequal to the task you propose.” “You are a trusted minister of state, and you may not really refuse this task.
Old and worn as I am, I will use the little strength left me to accompany you,” said Wang Lang.
“After the bounties I have received I cannot refuse,” replied Cao Zhen.
“But I must ask for an assistant.” “You have only to name him, O noble One,” said the Emperor.
So Cao Zhen named Guo Huai, a man of Yangqu, whose official rank was Lord of Sheting; he was also Imperial Protector of Yongzhou.
Thereupon Cao Zhen was appointed Commander-in-Chief, and the ensigns of rank were conferred upon him.
Guo Huai was appointed his second, and Wang Lang was created Instructor of the Army.
Wang Lang was then already old, seventy-six.
The army of Cao Zhen consisted of two hundred thousand troops, the best from both capitals.
His brother, Cao Zun, was made leader of the van with an assistant, Zhu Zan, General Who Opposes Brigands.
The army moved out in the eleventh month of that year, and the Ruler of Wei went with it to the outside of the west gate.
Cao Zhen marched by way of Changan and camped on the west bank of the River Wei.
At a council, which the Commander-in-Chief called to consider the best mode of attack, Wang Lang asked that he might be allowed to parley with the enemy.
“Let the army be drawn up in complete battle order and unfurl all the banners.
I will go out and call a parley with Zhuge Liang, at which I will make him yield to us without a blow, and the army of Shu shall march home again.” Cao Zhen agreed that the aged counselor should try.
So orders were given to take the early meal at the fourth watch and have the men fall in with their companies and files at daylight, all in review order. Everything was to be grand and imposing, the flags fluttering and the drums rolling, every man in his place.
Just before this display, a messenger was to deliver a declaration of war.
Next day, when the armies were drawn up facing each other in front of the Qishan Mountains, the soldiers of Shu saw that their enemies were fine, bold warriors, very different from those that Xiahou Mao had brought against them.
Then after three rolls of the drums, Minister Wang Lang mounted his horse and rode out, preceded by the Commander-in-Chief and followed by Guo Huai.
The two leaders of the van remained in charge of the army.
Then an orderly rode to the front and called out in a loud voice, “We request the leader of the opposing army to come out to a parley.” At this, an opening was made at the main standard, through which came out Guan Xing and Zhang Bao, who took up their stations right and left.
Then followed two lines of generals, and beneath the standard, in the center of the array, was seen a four-wheeled carriage wherein sat Zhuge Liang, with turban, white robe and black sash; and the leather fan was in his hand. He advanced with the utmost dignity.
Looking up, he saw three commander umbrellas and flags bearing large white characters. In the middle was an aged figure, Minister Wang Lang.
“He intends to deliver an oration,” thought Zhuge Liang.
“I must answer as best I may.” His carriage was then pushed to the front beyond the line of battle, and he directed one of his officers to reply, saying, “The Prime Minister of the Hans is willing to speak with Minister Wang Lang.” Wang Lang advanced.
Zhuge Liang saluted him from the carriage with raised hands, and Wang Lang replied from horseback with an inclination. Then Wang Lang began his oration.
“I am happy to meet you, noble Sir; your reputation has been long known to me.
Since you recognize the decrees of Heaven and are acquainted with the conditions of the world, why do you, without any excuse, lead out such an army?” Zhuge Liang replied, “How mean you no excuse?
I hold an edict to destroy rebels.” Wang Lang replied, “Heaven has its mutations, and change its instruments from time to time; but the supreme dignity comes at last to the person of virtue. This is the inevitable and immutable law.
In the days of Emperors Huan and Ling arose the Yellow Scarves rebellion, and the whole earth was involved in wrangling and warfare.
Later, in the eras of Inauguration of Tranquillity and Rebuilt Tranquillity, Dong Zhuo arose in revolt, a revolt which Li Jue and Guo Si continued after Dong Zhuo had been destroyed.
Next Yuan Shu usurped the imperial style, and his brother Yuan Shao played the man of might and valor in the land of Yejun.
Liu Biao occupied Jingzhou, and Lu Bu seized and held Xuzhou. Thus rebels have arisen in the land like swarm of wasps and bold spirits have followed their own will, to the danger of the supreme dignity and the peril of the people.
“Then the Founder of Wei, the Emperor Cao, swept away rebellion, purged the land, and restored order.
All hearts turned to him in gratitude, and the people of the four quarters admired his virtue.
He gained his position by no manifestation of force; it was simply the will of Heaven. His son and successor, Emperor Pi, was wise and warlike, adequate to the great heritage and fitted to wield supreme power.
Wherefore, in accordance with the will of Heaven and the desires of humans, and following the example of the earliest emperors, he took his place as arbiter of the Central Government, whereby the myriad countries are ordered and governed.
Can any maintain that it was not the desire of Heaven and the wish of the people? “Noble Sir, you are a man of natural talent and acquired attainments, worthy, you say yourself, to be compared with Guan Zhong and Yue Yi. Why then place yourself in opposition to the decree of Heaven and turn away from the desire of humankind to do this thing?
You cannot be ignorant of the wise old saying that he who accords with the Heavens shall flourish, while he who opposes shall be destroyed.
“Now the armies of Wei are countless legions, and their able leaders are beyond number.
Can the glowworm in the parched stubble rival the glorious moon in the sky?
If you will turn down your weapons and throw aside your armors and dutifully yield, you shall not lose your rank.
The state will have tranquillity and the people rejoice.
Is not that a desirable consummation?” Zhuge Liang laughed. Said he, “I regarded you as an old and tried servant of the Han Dynasty and thought you would hold some noble discourse. Could I imagine you would talk so foully?
I have a word to say that all the armies may hear. In the days of Emperors Huan and Ling the rule of Han declined, the officers of state were the authors of evil, the government fell into confusion, and misfortune settled on the country.
Trouble was rife in every quarter. The rebels you mentioned arose one after another, deposing the emperor and afflicting the people.
Because the household officers were corrupt and foolish, and the court officials were as brute beasts, living only that they might feed; because people, wolfishly cruel in their hearts, savagely mean in their conduct, were in office one after another, and slavish flatterers bending slavish knees confounded the administration, therefore the Throne became as a waste heap, and the people were trodden into the mire. “I know all about you.
You came from the eastern seashore; you got into office with a low degree; you properly aided your sovereign and supported the state, cared for the tranquillity of Han and magnified the Lius.
But could one have imagined that you would turn and assist rebels and enter into a plot to usurp the Throne?
Indeed your crime is great and your guilt heavy.
Heaven and earth will not suffer you; the inhabitants of this country would devour you.
“But happily the design of Heaven is to retain the glorious dynasty.
The late Emperor Bei continued the line in the Lands of Rivers, and I have been entrusted by the present Emperor with the task of destroying you rebels.
“Since you are such a false and specious minister, you have but to hide your body and cover your head, concern yourself about your belly and your back.
Do not come out before the armies to rave about the decrees of Heaven.
You fool and rebel! Mark you, today is your last day; this day even you descend to the Nine Golden Springs.
How will you stand before the two scores and four emperors of Latter Han that you will meet there?
Retire, you rebel!
Go tell your rebellious companions to come and fight one battle with me that shall decide the victory.” Fierce wrath filled the old man's breast.
With one despairing cry Wang Lang fell to the earth dead. This exploit of Zhuge Liang's has been lauded in verse:
In west Qin, when the armies met in the field, He, the bold one, singly faced a myriad warriors, And with a simple weapon, just his tongue, He did to death an old and wicked man.
After Wang Lang had fallen, Zhuge Liang waved the fan toward Cao Zhen and said, “As for you, I leave you alone for this occasion.
Go and get your army in order for tomorrow's battle.” The chariot turned and left the ground; both armies retired for that day.
To Cao Zhen fell the melancholy duty of rendering the last services to the aged counselor and setting his coffin on its journey to Changan.
Then said General Guo Huai, “Zhuge Liang will certainly think the army occupied with mourning and make a night attack. Let us anticipate him and set out an ambush about our camp.
Let two bodies of our troops be hidden outside and two others take the occasion to raid the camp of the enemy.” “I thought of such a scheme myself,” said Cao Zhen.
“It exactly suits my plans.” So Cao Zhen gave order to Cao Zun and Zhu Zan: “You are to take ten thousand troops each, get away by the rear of the mountain, and look out for the passing of the soldiers of Shu.
When they have gone by, you are to make for their camp.
But you are only to attempt a raid if they have left.” Cao Zun and Zhu Zan took the order and left. Then the Commander-inChief arranged with Guo Huai each to lead a force and hide outside the camp to wait for the raid of Shu.
Only a few soldiers were to be left within to make a fire if the enemy were seen to be coming.
And all generals set about the necessary preparations.
When Zhuge Liang reached his tent, he called to him Zhao Yun and Wei Yan, and said to them, “You two are to make a night attack.” “Cao Zhen is a man of experience and will be on the lookout,” ventured Wei Yan. “But that is just what I want; I want him to know we shall attack tonight.
He will then put some troops in hiding in rear of the Qishan Mountains, who will make for our camp as soon as they see us pass toward theirs.
I am sending you to let yourselves be seen passing the hill. but you are to camp behind it and at a distance.
When the soldiers of Wei attack this camp, you will see a signal. Then Wei Yan will hold the approach to the hill, and Zhao Yun will make his way back in fighting order.
He will meet the army of Wei returning and will let them pass. The enemy will assuredly fall to fighting among themselves, and we shall finish the battle.” These two having gone away to carry out their portions of the plan, Zhuge Liang next called up Guan Xing and Zhang Bao: “You are to take each ten thousand troops and hide in the high road to the mountain.
When the troops of Wei come, let them pass and then march along the road they came by to their camp that they have just left.” These two having left, Zhuge Liang placed Ma Dai, Wang Ping, Zhang Ni, and Zhang Yi in ambush about the camp.
Within the camp the tents and shelters were left standing as if the camp was occupied, while wood and straw were heaped up ready to give the signal.
This done, Zhuge Liang and his officers retired to the rear of the camp to watch proceedings.
On the side of Wei the two van-leaders, Cao Zun and Zhu Zan, left at dusk and hastened toward the camp of Shu.
About the second watch they saw troops busily moving about in front of the hill.
Cao Zun thought to himself, “Commander Guo Huai is an excellent strategist and of wonderful prevision.” Then he hastened the march, and in the third watch reached the camp of Shu. He at once dashed into the enclosure, but only to find it totally deserted. Not a man was visible.
At once he knew he had stumbled into a trap, and began to withdraw.
Then the flames sprang up.
Zhu Zan arrived already to fight, and the two bodies of troops, thrown into confusion, fought with each other till the two leaders met, when they found out they were fighting their own men.
As they were restoring order, on came the four bodies of troops of Shu under Ma Dai, Wang Ping, Zhang Ni, and Zhang Yi who had lain in ambush ready for them.
Cao Zun and Zhu Zan, with more than a hundred of those nearest to them, ran away to get to the high road. But before long the rolling drums announced another body of their enemy, and their flight was stopped by Zhao Yun. “Whither go ye, O rebel leaders?” cried Zhao Yun.
“Stop, for here is death!” But Cao Zun and Zhu Zan still fled. Then came up a force led by Wei Yan and completed the defeat.
The soldiers of Wei were wholly beaten and ran away to their own camp.
But the guard left in the camp thought they were the enemy come to raid, so they lit the fires, and at this signal Cao Zhen rushed up from one side and Guo Huai from the other, and a fierce fight with their own troops began.
While this was going on, three cohorts under Wei Yan, Guan Xing, and Zhang Bao arrived from three points, and a great and confused battle began.
The soldiers of Wei were driven off and chased for three miles.
In the fight Wei lost many leaders, and Zhuge Liang gained a great success.
Cao Zhen and Guo Huai got together their beaten troops and went back to their own camp. When they discussed the fight, Cao Zhen said, “The enemy are too strong for us.
Have you any plan to drive them away?” Replied Guo Huai, “Our defeat is one of the ordinary events of war. Let us not be cast down.
I have a plan to suggest that will disorder them so that one body cannot help the other, and they will all be compelled to flee.” Wei leaders fail and sadly send To pray tribespeople help to lend.
The plan will be unfolded in the next chapter. CHAPTER 94.
Zhuge Liang Defeats The Qiangs In A Snowstorm; Sima Yi Quickly Captures Meng Da. The scheme by which Guo Huai proposed to overcome the army of Shu he laid before his colleague, saying, “The Qiang tribes have paid tribute regularly since the days of the Founder of Wei. Emperor Pi regarded them with favor.
Now let us hold such points of vantage as we may, while we send secret emissaries to engage their help in exchange for kindly treatment. We may get the Qiangs to attack Shu and engage their attention, while we gather a large army to smite them at another place.
Thus attacking, how can we help gaining a great victory?” A messenger was sent forthwith bearing letters to the Qiang tribespeople.
The King of the western Qiangs was named Cheli Ji. He had rendered yearly tribute since the days of Cao Cao.
He had two ministers, one for civil and the other for military affairs, named, respectively, Prime Minister Ya Dan and Chief Leader Yue Ji.
The letter was accompanied by presents of gold and pearls, and when the messenger arrived, he first sought Prime Minister Ya Dan, to whom he gave gifts and whose help he begged. Thus he gained an interview with the King, to whom he presented the letter and the gifts.
The King accepted both and called his counselors to consider the letter.
Ya Dan said, “We have had regular intercourse with the Wei nation.
Now that Cao Zhen asks our aid and promises an alliance, we ought to accede to his request.” Cheli Ji agreed that it was so, and he ordered his two chief ministers to raise an army of two hundred fifty thousand of trained soldiers, archers and crossbowmen, spearmen and swordsmen, warriors who flung maces and hurled hammers.
Beside these various weapons, the tribesmen used chariots covered with iron plates nailed on. They prepared much grain and fodder and many spare weapons, all of which they loaded upon these iron-clad chariots. The chariots were drawn by camels or teams of horses.
The carts or chariots were known as “iron chariots.” The two leaders took leave of their King and went straightway to Xiping Pass.
The commander in charge of the Pass, Han Zhen, at once sent intelligence to Zhuge Liang, who asked, “Who will go to attack the Qiangs?” Guan Xing and Zhang Bao said they would go.
Then Zhuge Liang said, “You shall be sent; but as you are ignorant of the road and the people, Ma Dai shall accompany you.” To Ma Dai he said, “You know the disposition of the Qiangs from your long residence there; you shall go as guide.” They chose out five thousand of veterans for the expedition.
When they had marched many days and drew near their enemy, Guan Xing went in advance with a hundred horsemen and got first sight of them from a hill. The Qiangs were marching, the long line of iron chariots one behind another in close order.
Then they halted and camped, their weapons piled all along the line of chariots like the ramparts of a moated city. Guan Xing studied them for a long time quite at a loss to think how to overcome them.
He came back to camp and consulted with his two colleagues.
Ma Dai said, “We will see tomorrow what they will do when we make our array, and discuss our plans when we know more.” So the next day they drew up their army in three divisions, Guan Xing's division being in the center, Zhang Bao's in the left, and Ma Dai's in the right.
Thus they advanced. The enemy also drew up in battle order. Their military chief, Yue Ji, had an iron mace in his hand and a graven bow hung at his waist. He rode forward on a curvetting steed boldly enough.
Guan Xing gave the order for all three divisions to go forward.
Then the enemy's ranks opened in the center and out rolled the iron chariots like a great wave. At the same time the Qiangs shot arrows and bolts, and the men of Shu could not stand against them.
The wing divisions under Ma Dai and Zhang Bao retired, and the Qiangs were thus enabled to surround the center.
In spite of every effort, Guan Xing could not get free, for the iron chariots were like a city wall and no opening could be found.
The troops of Shu were absolutely helpless, and Guan Xing made for the mountains in hope of finding a road through.
As it grew dark a Qiang leader with a black flag approached, his warriors like a swarm of wasps about him.
Presently the leader cried out to him, “Youthful general, flee not; I am Yue Ji!” But Guan Xing only hastened forward, plying his whip to urge his steed.
Then he suddenly came on a deep gully, and there seemed nothing but to turn and fight.
Yue Ji come close and struck at him with the mace.
Guan Xing evaded the blow, but it fell upon his steed and knocked it over into water. Guan Xing went into the water too.
Presently he heard a great noise again behind him. Yue Ji and his troops had found a way down into the gully and were coming at him down the stream. Guan Xing braced himself for a struggle in the water.
Then he saw Zhang Bao and Ma Dai coming up on the bank fighting with, and driving off, the Qiangs. Yue Ji was struck by Zhang Bao, and he too fell into the gully.
Guan Xing gripped his sword and was about to launch a stroke at Yue Ji as he came up, when Yue Ji jumped out of the water and ran away.
At once Guan Xing caught the steed Yue Ji had left, led it up the bank and soon had it ready to mount. Then he girded on his sword, got on the horse, and joined the battle with his colleagues.
After driving off the Qiangs, Guan Xing, Zhang Bao, and Ma Dai gathered together and rode back. They quickly gained the camp.
“I do not know how to overcome these men,” said Ma Dai.
“Let me protect the camp while you go back and ask the Prime Minister what we should do.” Guan Xing and Zhang Bao started at once and made the best of their way back. They told Zhuge Liang what had happened.
He at once sent off Zhao Yun and Wei Yan to go into ambush.
After this he went himself with thirty thousand troops and Jiang Wei, Zhang Yi, Guan Xing, and Zhang Bao and soon came to Ma Dai's camp.
The day after, from the summit of a hill, Zhuge Liang surveyed the country and the enemy, who were coming on in a ceaseless stream.
“It is not difficult,” said Zhuge Liang.
He called up Ma Dai and Zhang Yi and gave them certain orders.
They having gone, he turned to Jiang Wei, saying, “My friend, do you know how to overcome them?” “The Qiangs only depend upon force or courage; they cannot understand this fine strategy.” was the reply.
“You know,” said Zhuge Liang, smiling.
“Those dark clouds and the strong north wind mean snow.
Then I can do what I wish.” The two leaders, Guan Xing and Zhang Bao, were sent into ambush, and Jiang Wei went out to offer battle. But he was to retire before the iron chariots.
At the entrance to the camp were displayed many flags, but the soldiers that should serve under them were not there.
It was now full winter, the twelfth month, and the snow had come.
The army of Shu went out to offer battle; and when the iron chariots came forward, they retired and thus led the Qiangs to the gate of the camp, Jiang Wei going to its rear.
The Qiangs came to the gate and stopped to look.
They heard the strumming of a lute, but there were no soldiers there; the flags meant nothing.
They told Yue Ji, and he suspected some ruse. Instead of entering, he went back to Prime Minister Ya Dan and told him.
“It is a ruse,” said Ya Dan.
“Zhuge Liang's base trick is the pretense of a pretense, and you would better attack.” So Yue Ji led his troops again to the camp gate, and there he saw Zhuge Liang with a lute just getting into his chariot. With a small escort, he went toward the back of the camp.
The tribesmen rushed into the camp and caught sight of the light chariot again just as it disappeared into a wood.
Then said Ya Dan, “There may be an ambush, but I think we need not be afraid of these soldiers.” Hence they decided to pursue.
Ahead of them they saw the division under Jiang Wei hastening off through the snow.
Yue Ji's rage boiled up at this sight, and he urged his men to go faster.
The snow had filled in the roads among the hills, making every part look like a level plain.
As they marched, one reported that some of the enemy were appearing from the rear of the hills.
Some thought this meant an ambush, but Ya Dan said it did not matter, and they need not fear. He urged them to hasten.
Shortly after this they heard a roaring as if the hills were rending asunder and the earth falling in, and the pursuers on foot fell one atop of the other into great pits that were invisible in the snow.
The iron chariots, being close behind and hurrying along, could not stop, and they went into the pits also. Those still farther in the rear halted, but just as they were facing about, Guan Xing and Zhang Bao came up, one on either side, and attacked. Myriads of bolts flew through the air.
Then three other divisions under Jiang Wei, Ma Dai, and Zhang Yi arrived and confusion was worse than ever.
The Qiang leader, Yue Ji, fled to the rear and was making for the mountains when he met Guan Xing, who slew him in the first encounter.
Prime Minister Ya Dan was captured by Ma Dai and taken to the main camp.
The soldiers scattered. Hearing of the capture of one leader, Zhuge Liang took his seat in his tent and bade them bring the prisoner.
He told the guards to loose his bonds, and he had wine brought to refresh him and soothed him with kindly words.
Ya Dan was grateful for this kindness, and felt more so when Zhuge Liang said, “My master, the Emperor of the Great Hans, sent me to destroy those who are in revolt; why are you helping them?
But I will release you, and you will return to your master and say that we are neighbors and we will swear an oath of everlasting friendship, and tell him to listen no more to the words of those rebels.” Ya Dan was released and so were all the soldiers that had been captured, and all their stuff was given back to them. They left for their own country.
The Qiangs being thus disposed of, Zhuge Liang quickly marched again to Qishan. He sent letters to Capital Chengdu announcing his success.
Meanwhile Cao Zhen anxiously waited for news of his expected allies. Then a scout came in with the news that the army of Shu had broken camp and were marching away.
“That is because the Qiangs have attacked,” said Guo Huai gleefully, and the two made ready to pursue.
Ahead of them the army of Shu seemed to be in confusion.
The van-leader Cao Zun led the pursuit. Suddenly, as he pressed on, there came a roll of drums, followed by the appearance of a cohort led by Wei Yan, who cried, “Stop! You rebels!” But Cao Zun did not obey the summons.
He dashed forward to meet the attack. He was killed in the third encounter.
His colleague Zhu Zan in similar fashion fell in with a cohort under Zhao Yun, to whose long spear he soon fell victim.
The loss of these two made Cao Zhen and Guo Huai hesitate, and they made to retire. But before they could face about, they heard the drums of an army in their rear, and Guan Xing and Zhang Bao came out and surrounded them.
Cao Zhen and Guo Huai made a stand for a time, but were soon worsted and fled.
The army of Shu pursued the beaten enemy to the banks of River Wei, where they took possession of the Wei camp.
Cao Zhen was greatly chagrined at his defeat and sad at the loss of his generals.
He send a report of his misfortune to his master and asked for reinforcements. At the court of Wei one of the ministers told the story of defeat of Cao Zhen and the allies, and asked the Ruler of Wei to decide upon the next step.
Cao Rui was alarmed and asked for someone to say how to drive off the victorious foe.
Thereupon Hua Xin said, “It will be necessary for Your Majesty to go in person. You should call together all the nobles, and each will have to exert himself.
Unless this is done, Capital Changan will be lost and the whole country be in danger.” But Imperial Guardian Zhong Yao opposed him.
Said he, “The knowledge of every leader must exceed that of those led; then only will he be able to control them. Sun Zi the Strategist sums it up very briefly:
'Know the enemy, know thyself; and every battle is a victory.' I know Cao Zhen has had great experience in the field, but he is no match for Zhuge Liang.
Still there is such a match, and I will pledge my whole family that he will succeed.
But Your Majesty may be unwilling to listen to me.” The Ruler of Wei replied, “You are a minister of high rank and old. If you know any wise person able to repel these soldiers of Shu, call him without delay and ease my mind.” Then said Zhong Yao, “When Zhuge Liang decided to invade us, he was afraid of the one man I will name. Wherefore he spread calumnies concerning him, raising suspicion in Your Majesty's mind that you might dismiss him. That done, Zhuge Liang invaded.
Now employ this man again, and the enemy will retire.” “Who is it?” asked the Ruler of Wei.
“I mean the Regent Marshal Sima Yi.” “I have long regretted my action,” said Cao Rui.
“Where now is friend Sima Yi?” “He is at the city of Wancheng, idle.” An edict was prepared recalling Sima Yi and restoring him to his rank and titles, and conferring upon him the new title Commander-in-Chief and General Who Pacifies the West. All troops of Nanyang were set in motion, and Cao Rui led them to Changan.
At the same time Cao Rui ordered Sima Yi to be there to meet him on a certain day.
And the orders were sent by a swift messenger to the city of Wancheng. At this time Zhuge Liang greatly rejoiced at the success he had had.
He was at Qishan, busy with plans for other victories, when Li Yan, who was in command at the Palace of Eternal Peace, sent his son Li Feng to the camp.
Zhuge Liang concluded that such a visit could only mean that Wu had invaded them, and he was in consequence cast down. However, he summoned Li Feng to his tent, and when asked the object of his mission, Li Feng replied that he had joyful news to impart.
“What is your joyful news?” said Zhuge Liang.
“Formerly Meng Da deserted to Wei, but only because he could do nothing else.
Cao Pi thought much of his capabilities, treated him most generously, kept him at his side, gave him titles of General Who Establishes Strong Arms and Lord of Pingyang, and appointed him to the posts of Governor of Xincheng and Commander of Shangyong and Jincheng, and so on. But when Cao Pi died, all was changed.
In Cao Rui's court were many who were jealous of Meng Da's influence and power, so that he enjoyed no peace.
“He used to talk about being originally one of the Shu leaders, and he was forced to do so-and-so. Lately he has sent several confidants with letters to my father asking that he would state his case to you as to the happenings when the five armies came upon Shu.
Now he is at Xincheng, and, hearing you are attacking Wei, he proposes to lead the army of the three counties about Xincheng, Jincheng, and Shangyong to attack Luoyang while you attack Changan, whereby both capitals will be taken.
I have brought with me his messenger and his letters.” This was good news, and the bearer was fittingly rewarded.
But at that moment came the news that Cao Rui was leading an army to Changan and had recalled the banished Sima Yi to office. This piece of bad news saddened Zhuge Liang not a little.
He told Ma Su, who said, “Cao Rui should not be your worry.
If he goes to Changan, we will march there and capture him on the road, and there will be an end of him.” “Do you think I fear him?” said Zhuge Liang bitterly.
“But the recall of Sima Yi is another matter; that troubles me.
And Meng Da's proposal will avail nothing if he comes across this man.
Meng Da is no match for him.
He will he captured, and, if he should be, the Middle Land will be hard to conquer.” “Why not put Meng Da on his guard then?” said Ma Su.
Zhuge Liang decided to write, and the letter was dispatched immediately.
Meng Da was then at Xincheng, anxiously expecting the return of his last confidential messenger, when, one day, the man returned and gave him this letter from Zhuge Liang himself:
“Your last letter has convinced me of your loyal rectitude, and I still remember with joy our old friendship.
If your plan succeeds, you will certainly stand in the first rank of most worthy ministers.
But I scarcely need impress upon you the extreme necessity for most perfect secrecy. Be very careful whom you trust. Fear everyone, guard against everyone.
This news of the recall of Sima Yi and the proposed junction of armies at Changan is very serious; and if a word reaches Sima Yi, he will come to you first.
Therefore take every precaution and do not regard this as a matter of unimportance.” “They say Zhuge Liang leaves nothing to chance,” said Meng Da, smiling as he read.
“This proves it.” He lost no time in preparing a reply, which he sent also by a trusty messenger. This letter was like this:
“I acknowledge your most valuable advice, but is it possible that I should be remiss?
For my part I do not think the Sima Yi's affair need cause anxiety, for Wancheng is three hundred miles from Luoyang and four hundred miles from Xincheng.
Should he hear anything, it would take a month to send a memorial to the capital and get a reply. My ramparts here are strong and my forces posted in the best positions.
Let him come! I am not afraid of the result, so you, O Minister, need feel no anxiety.
You have only to wait for the good news of success.” Zhuge Liang read the letter and threw it on the ground, stamping his foot with rage.
“Meng Da is a dead man;” said he, “a victim of Sima Yi.” “Why do you say that?” said Ma Su.
“What does the Art of War say?
'Attack before the enemy is prepared; do what he does not expect.' What is the use of reckoning upon a month's delay for sending up a memorial?
Cao Rui's commission has already gone, and Sima Yi may strike whom he will. He will not have to wait to memorialize the Throne.
Ten days after he hears of Meng Da's defection, he will be upon Meng Da with an army, and Meng Da will be helpless.”' The others agreed.
However, Zhuge Liang sent the messenger back again to say that if the matter had not yet actually started, no other person was to be told of it; for if anyone knew, it would certainly come to nothing.
And the man left for Xincheng.
In his idle retreat in Wancheng, Sima Yi had heard of his master's illsuccess against the armies of Shu, and the news made him very sad. He lifted up his eyes and sighed.
He had two sons, Sima Shi the elder and Sima Zhao, both clever and ambitious, and both earnest students of military books.
One day they were present when their father seemed very cast down, and Sima Shi asked his father the reason. “You would not understand,” said the father.
“I think you are grieving because the Ruler of Wei does not use you,” replied Sima Shi. “But they will send for you presently,” said Sima Zhao.
The prophecy was not long in fulfillment, for even then the bearer of the command stood at the gate, and the servant announced a messenger from the court bearing a commission.
As soon as he heard its terms, Sima Yi set about ordering the armies of Wancheng.
Soon came a messenger from Governor Shen Yi of Jincheng with a secret message for Sima Yi.
The messenger was taken into a private chamber, and his message was that Meng Da was on the point of rebellion.
The leakage of this news was due to Li Fu, a confidential subordinate of Meng Da, and Deng Xian, Meng Da's nephew. Li Fu and Deng Xian went to confess the plot in exchange for a promise of amnesty. Sima Yi smote his forehead.
“This is the Emperor's great good fortune, high as heaven itself.
Zhuge Liang's army is at Qishan already, and all people's courage is at the brink of breakdown.
The Emperor must go to Changan, and if he does not use me soon, Meng Da will carry out his plan; his plot will succeed and both capitals will be lost.
Meng Da is surely in league with Zhuge Liang, and if I can seize this Meng Da before he makes any move, that will damp Zhuge Liang's spirits and he will retreat.” His elder son Sima Shi remarked, “It is necessary to memorialize the Throne.” “No,” replied his father, “that would take a month, and delay would mean failure.” Sima Yi gave orders to prepare to advance by double-rapid marches and threatened death to all loiterers.
In order to avert suspicion, he sent letters to Meng Da by the hand of Military Adviser Liang Ji to tell Meng Da to prepare to join the expedition.
Sima Yi quickly followed Liang Ji.
After two days' march Sima Yi fell in with an army of General Xu Huang over the hills.
Xu Huang got an interview with Sima Yi, and he said, “The Emperor has arrived at Changan to lead an expedition against Shu.
Whither is the Commander-in-Chief going?” Sima Yi, in a low voice, said to him, “Meng Da is on the verge of rebellion, and I am going to seize him.” “Let me go as your van-leader,” said Xu Huang. So Xu Huang's troops were joined to the expedition and marched in the van.
Sima Yi commanded the center, and his sons brought up the rear.
Two days farther on, some of the scouts captured Meng Da's confidential messenger, and with him Zhuge Liang's reply.
Sima Yi promised the man his life if he would tell all he knew. So the messenger told all about the letters and messages he had taken from one to the other.
When Sima Yi read, he remarked, “All able people think the same way.
Our plan would have been foiled by Zhuge Liang's cleverness unless, by the good luck of the Emperor, this messenger had been captured. Now Meng Da will be helpless.” The army pressed on still more rapidly.
Meng Da had arranged for his stroke with Governor Shen Yi of Jincheng and Governor Shen Dan of Shangyong and was awaiting the day he had fixed.
But Shen Yi and Shen Dan were only pretending to abet him, although they went on training and drilling their troops to keep up appearances till the soldiers of Wei could arrive.
To Meng Da they pretended delay in their transport as the reason for being unable to start.
And he believed them.
Just then Liang Ji came, and when he had been ceremoniously received, he produced the order from Sima Yi and said, “The Commander-in-Chief has received the edict of the Emperor to call in all the forces in this area, and he has sent me to direct you to hold your troops in readiness to march.” “On what day does the Commander-in-Chief start?” asked Meng Da.
“He is just about starting now, and is on the way to Changan” replied Liang Ji. Meng Da smiled inwardly, for, this being so, he saw success before him.
He gave a banquet to Liang Ji; and after Liang Ji took his leave, Meng Da sent to his fellow conspirators—Shen Yi and Shen Dan—to say the first step must be taken next day by exchanging the banners of Wei for those of Han and marching to attack Luoyang.
Then the watchmen reported a great cloud of dust in the distance as though an army was coming.
Meng Da was surprised and went up on the ramparts to see for himself. Soon he made out the banner of Xu Huang leading. He ran down from the wall and in a state of trepidation ordered the raising of the drawbridge.
Xu Huang still came on and in due time stood on the bank of the moat.
Then Xu Huang called out, “Let the traitor Meng Da yield quickly!” Meng Da, in a rage, opened upon him with arrows, and Xu Huang was wounded in the forehead.
He was helped to a place of safety while the arrows flew down in great numbers.
When the soldiers of Wei retired, Meng Da opened the gates and went in pursuit. But the whole of Sima Yi's army soon came up, and the banners stood so thick that they hid the sun.
“This is what Zhuge Liang foresaw!” said Meng Da despairingly.
The gates were closed and barred.
Meanwhile the wounded general, Xu Huang, had been borne to his tent, where the arrow head was extracted and the physician attended to him.
But that night he died. He was fifty-nine.
His body was sent to Luoyang for burial.
Next day, when Meng Da went up on the wall, he saw the city was entirely surrounded as with a girdle of iron.
He was greatly perturbed and could not decide what to do. Presently he saw two bodies of troops coming up, their banners bearing the names of his fellow conspirators—Shen Yi and Shen Dan.
He could only conclude that they had come to his help, so he opened the gates to them and went out to fight.
“Rebel, stay!” cried they both as they came up.
Realizing that they had been false, he turned and galloped toward the city, but a flight of arrows met him, and the two who had betrayed him, Li Fu and Deng Xian, began to revile him. “We have already yielded the city!” they cried.
Then Meng Da fled.
But he was pursued, and as he and his horse were both exhausted, he was speedily overtaken and slain. They exposed his head, and his soldiers submitted.
Sima Yi was welcomed at the open gates.
The people were pacified, the soldiers were rewarded and, this done, a report of their success was sent to Cao Rui.
Cao Rui ordered the body of Meng Da to be exposed in the market place of Luoyang, and he promoted Shen Yi and Shen Dan and gave them posts in the army of Sima Yi.
He gave Li Fu and Deng Xian command of the cities of Xincheng and Shangyong.
Then Sima Yi marched to Changan and camped.
The leader entered the city to have audience with his master, by whom he was most graciously received.
“Once I doubted you;” said Cao Rui, “but then I did not understand, and I listened to mischief-makers. I regret it.
You have preserved both capitals by the punishment of this traitor.” Sima Yi replied, “Shen Yi gave the information of the intended revolt and thought to memorialize Your Majesty.
But there would have been a long delay, and so I did not await orders, but set forth at once.
Delay would have played into Zhuge Liang's hands.” Then Sima Yi handed in Zhuge Liang's letter to Meng Da, and when the Emperor had read that, he said, “You are wiser than both the great strategists of old—Wu Qi and Sun Zi.” The Ruler of Wei conferred upon the successful leader a pair of golden axes and the privilege of taking action in important matters without first obtaining his master's sanction.
When the order was given to advance against the enemy, Sima Yi asked permission to name his leader of the van, and nominated Zhang He, General of the Left Army.
“Just the man I wished to send,” said Cao Rui, smiling. And Zhang He was appointed.
Sima Yi took his army off Changan and marched it to the camp of the Shu army.
By strategy the leader shows his skill; He needs bold fighting men to work his will.
The result of the campaign will appear in the next chapter. CHAPTER 95.
Ma Su's Disobedience Causes The Loss Of Jieting; Zhuge Liang's Lute Repulses Sima Yi.
Beside sending Zhang He as van-leader of Sima Yi, Cao Rui appointed two other generals, Xin Pi and Sun Li, to assist Cao Zhen. Xin Pi and Sun Li each led fifty thousand troops.
Sima Yi's army was two hundred thousand strong. They marched out through the pass and made a camp. When encamped, Sima Yi summoned Zhang He to his tent and admonished him, saying, “A characteristic of Zhuge Liang is his most diligent carefulness; he is never hasty.
If I were in his place, I should advance through the Ziwu Valley to capture Changan and so save much time.
It is not that he is unskillful, but he fears lest that plan might miscarry, and he will not sport with risk.
Therefore he will certainly come through the Xie Valley, taking Meicheng on the way.
That place captured, he will divide his force into two, one part to take Chi Valley.
I have sent Cao Zhen orders to guard Meicheng strictly and on no account to let its garrison go out to battle.
The generals Sun Li and Xin Pi are to command the Chi Valley entrance, and should the enemy come, they are to make a sudden attack.” “By what road will you advance?” asked Zhang He.
“I know a road west of Qinling Mountains called Jieting, on which stands the city Liliu.
These two places are the throat of Hanzhong.
Zhuge Liang will take advantage of the unpreparedness of Cao Zhen and will certainly come in by this way.
You and I will go to Jieting, whence it is a short distance to Yangping Pass.
When Zhuge Liang hears that the road through Jieting is blocked and his supplies cut off, he will know that Xizhou is impossible to keep, and will retire without losing a moment into Hanzhong.
I shall smite him on the march, and I ought to gain a complete victory.
If he should not retire, then I shall block all the smaller roads and so stop his supplies.
A month's starvation will kill off the soldiers of Shu, and Zhuge Liang will be my prisoner.” Zhang He took in the scheme and expressed his admiration, saying, “O Commander, your calculation exceeds human!” Sima Yi continued, “However, it is not to be forgotten that Zhuge Liang is quite different from Meng Da; and you, as leader of the van, will have to advance with the utmost care.
You must impress upon your generals the importance of reconnoitering a long way ahead and only advancing when they are sure there is no ambush.
The least remissness will make you the victim of some ruse of the enemy.” Zhang He, having received his instructions, marched away.
Meanwhile a spy had come to Zhuge Liang in Qishan with news of the destruction of Meng Da and the failure of his conspiracy. “Sima Yi marched rapidly in eight days to Xincheng.
He had Shen Yi, Shen Dan, Li Fu, and Deng Xian plot against Meng Da from within. Meng Da had not been able to do anything and was killed.
Now Sima Yi has gone to Changan, when he has marched through the pass with Zhang He.” Zhuge Liang was distressed.
“Meng Da's destruction was certain,” said he. “Such a scheme could not remain secret.
Now Sima Yi will try for Jieting and block the one road essential to us.” So Jieting had to be defended, and Zhuge Liang asked who would go. Ma Su offered himself instantly. Zhuge Liang urged upon him the importance of his task.
“The place is small, but of very great importance, for its loss would involve the loss of the whole army.
You are deeply read in all the rules of strategy, but the defense of this place is difficult, since it has no wall and no natural defenses.” “I have studied the books of war since I was a boy, and I may say I know a little of the art of war,” Ma Su replied. “Why alone is Jieting so difficult to hold?” “Because Sima Yi is an exceptional man, and also he has a famous second in Zhang He as leader of the van.
I fear you may not be a match for him.” Ma Su replied, “To say nothing of these two, I would not mind if Cao Rui himself came against me.
If I fail, then I beg you to behead my whole family.” “There is no jesting in war,” said Zhuge Liang. “I will give a written pledge.” Zhuge Liang agreed, and a written pledge was given and placed on record.
Zhuge Liang continued, “I shall give you twenty-five thousand veterans and also send an officer of rank to assist you.” Next he summoned Wang Ping and said to him, “As you are a careful and cautious man, I am giving you a very responsible position.
You are to hold Jieting with the utmost tenacity. Camp there in the most commanding position so that the enemy cannot steal by.
When your arrangements are complete, draw a plan of them and a map of the local topography and let me see it.
All my dispositions have been carefully thought out and are not to be changed.
If you can hold this successfully, it will be of the first service in the capture of Changan.
So be very, very careful.” After Ma Su and Wang Ping had gone and Zhuge Liang had reflected for a long time, it occurred to him that there might be some slip between his two leaders, so he called Gao Xiang to him and said, “Northeast of Jieting is a city named Liliu, and near it an unfrequented hill path. There you are to camp and make a stockade.
I will give you ten thousand troops for this task; and if Jieting should be threatened, you may go to the rescue.” After Gao Xiang had left, and as Zhuge Liang thought Gao Xiang was not a match for his opponent Zhang He, he decided there ought to be additional strength on the west in order to make Jieting safe.
So he summoned Wei Yan and bade him lead his army to the rear of Jieting and camp there.
But Wei Yan thought this rather a slight, and said, “As leader of the van, I should go first against the enemy; why am I sent to a place where there is nothing to do?” “The leadership of the van is really a second-rate task.
Now I am sending you to support Jieting and take post on the most dangerous road to Yangping Pass. You are the chief keeper of the throat of Hanzhong. It is a very responsible post and not at all an idle one.
Do not so regard it and spoil my whole plan.
Be particularly careful.” Wei Yan, satisfied now that he was not being slighted, went his way.
Zhuge Liang's mind was at rest, and he called up Zhao Yun and Deng Zhi, to whom he said, “Now that Sima Yi is in command of the army, the whole outlook is different.
Each of you will lead a force out to Chi Valley and move about so as to mislead the enemy.
Whether you meet and engage them or not, you will certainly cause them uneasiness.
I am going to lead the main army through the Xie Valley to Meicheng.
If I can capture that, Changan will fall.” Zhao Yun and Deng Zhi took the orders and went off.
Zhuge Liang appointed Jiang Wei as leader of the van, and they marched to the Xie Valley.
When Ma Su and Wang Ping had reached Jieting and saw what manner of place it was, Ma Su smiled, saying, “Why was the Prime Minister so extremely anxious?
How would the Wei armies dare to come to such a hilly place as this?” Wang Ping replied, “Though they might not dare to come, we should set our camp at this meeting of many roads.” So Wang Ping ordered his soldiers to fell trees and build a strong stockade as for a permanent stay. But Ma Su had a different idea.
“What sort of a place is a road to make a camp in?
Here is a hill standing solitary and well wooded. It is a heaven-created point of vantage, and we will camp on it.” “You are wrong, Sir,” replied Wang Ping. “If we camp on the road and build a strong wall, the enemy cannot possibly get past.
If we abandon this for the hill, and the troops of Wei come in force, we shall be surrounded, and how then be safe?” “You look at the thing like a child,” said Ma Su, laughing.
“The rules of war say that when one looks down from a superior position, one easily overcomes the enemy.
If they come, I will see to it that not a breastplate ever goes back again.” “I have followed our Commander-in-Chief in many a campaign, and always he has carefully thought out his orders.
Now I have studied this hill carefully, and it is a critical point. If we camp thereon and the enemy cut off our water supply, we shall have a mutiny.” “No such thing,” said Ma Su.
“Sun Zi says that victory lies in desperate positions.
If they cut off our water, will not our soldiers be desperate and fight to the death?
Then everyone of them will be worth a hundred.
I have studied the books, and the Prime Minister has always asked my advice.
Why do you presume to oppose me?” “If you are determined to camp on the hill, then give me part of the force to camp there on the west so that I can support you in case the enemy come.” But Ma Su refused.
Just then a lot of the inhabitants of the hills came running along saying that the Wei soldiers had come.
Wang Ping was still bent on going his own way, and so Ma Su said to him, “Since you will not obey me, I will give you five thousand troops and you can go and make your own camp; but when I report my success to the Prime Minister, you shall have no share of the merit.” Wang Ping marched about three miles from the hill and made his camp.
He drew a plan of the place and sent it quickly to Zhuge Liang with a report that Ma Su had camped on the hill.
Before Sima Yi marched, he sent his younger son to reconnoiter the road and to find out whether Jieting had a garrison. Sima Zhao had returned with the information that there was a garrison.
“Zhuge Liang is rather more than human,” said his father regretfully when Sima Zhao gave in his report. “He is too much for me.” “Why are you despondent, Father?
I think Jieting is not so difficult to take.” “How dare you utter such bold words?” “Because I have seen. There is no camp on the road, but the enemy are camped on the hill.” This was glad news.
“If they are on the hill, then Heaven means a victory for me,” said his father.
At night Sima Yi changed into another dress, took a small escort, and rode out to see for himself.
The moon shone brilliantly, and he rode to the hill whereon was the camp and looked all round it, thoroughly reconnoitering the neighborhood.
Ma Su saw him, but only laughed. “If Sima Yi has any luck, he will not try to surround this hill,” said he. Ma Su issued an order to his generals:
“In case the enemy come, you are to look to the summit for a signal with a red flag, when you shall rush down on all sides.” Sima Yi returned to his camp and sent out to inquire who commanded in Jieting.
They told him Ma Su, brother of Ma Liang.
“A man of false reputation and very ordinary ability,” said Sima Yi.
“If Zhuge Liang uses such as Ma Su, he will fail.” Then he asked if there were any other camps near the place, and they told him Wang Ping was about three miles off.
Wherefore Zhang He was ordered to go and check Wang Ping from coming to rescue.
This done, Sima Yi ordered Shen Yi and Shen Dan to surround the hill and to block the road to the water supply.
Lack of water would cause a mutiny; and when that occurred, it would be time to attack. Zhang He marched out and placed himself between Wang Ping and the hill.
Then Sima Yi led the main body to attack the hill on all sides.
From the summit of his hill, Ma Su could see the banners of his enemy all round, and the country about was full of soldiers. Presently the hemming in was complete, and the soldiers of Shu became dejected.
They dared not descend to attack although Ma Su hoisted the red flag signaling for them to move.
The generals stood huddled together, no one daring to go first.
Ma Su was furious. He cut down two generals, which frightened the others to the point of descending and making one desperate rush.
But the troops of Wei would stand firm against their attack, and they reascended the hill.
Ma Su saw that matters were going ill, so he issued orders to bar the gates and defend till help should come from outside. When Wang Ping saw the hill surrounded, he started to go to the rescue, but Zhang He checked him, and after exchanging some ten encounters Wang Ping was compelled to retire whence he had come.
The Wei troops kept a close siege. The Shu soldiers in the hill camp, having no water, were unable to prepare food, and disorder broke out.
The shouting was audible at the foot of the hill and went on far into the night. The soldiers on the south side got out of hand, opened the gates and surrendered.
The men of Wei went round the hill setting fire to the wood, which led to still greater confusion in the beleaguered garrison.
At last Ma Su decided to make a dash for safety toward the west.
Sima Yi allowed him to pass, but Zhang He was sent to pursue and chased him for ten miles. But then there came an unexpected roll of drums.
Zhang He was stopped by Wei Yan while Ma Su got past.
Whirling up his sword, Wei Yan dashed toward Zhang He, who retired within his ranks and fled. Wei Yan followed and drove Zhang He backward toward Jieting.
The pursuit continued for fifteen miles, and then Wei Yan found himself in an ambush, Sima Yi on one side and Sima Zhao on the other. They went around the hill and closed in behind Wei Yan, and he was surrounded.
Zhang He then turned back, and the attack was now on three sides.
Wei Yan lost many troops, and all his efforts failed to get him clear of the press. Then help appeared in the person of Wang Ping.
“This is life for me,” said Wei Yan as he saw Wang Ping coming up, and the two forces joined in a new attack on the force of Wei.
So the troops of Wei drew off, while Wei Yan and Wang Ping made all haste back to their own camps—only to find them in the hands of the enemy.
Shen Yi and Shen Dan then rushed out and drove Wei Yan and Wang Ping to Liliu. There they were received by Gao Xiang who had come out to meet his unfortunate colleagues.
When Gao Xiang heard their story, he at once proposed a night attack on the Wei camp and the recovery of Jieting.
They talked this over on the hillside and arranged their plans, after which they set themselves to wait till it was dark enough to start.
They set out along three roads; and Wei Yan was the first to reach Jieting. Not a soldier was visible, which looked suspicious. He decided to await the arrival of Gao Xiang, and they both speculated as to the whereabouts of their enemy.
They could find no trace, and the third army under Wang Ping had not yet come up.
Suddenly a bomb exploded, and a brilliant flash lit up the sky; drums rolled as though the earth was rending, and the enemy appeared. In a trice the armies of Shu found themselves hemmed in. Both Wei Yan and Gao Xiang pushed here and shoved there, but could find no way out. Then most opportunely from behind a hill rolled out a thunder of drums, and there was Wang Ping coming to their rescue. Then the three forced their way to Liliu.
But just as they drew near to the rampart, another body of soldiers came up, which, from the writing on their flags, they read “Wei Commander Guo Huai”.
Now Guo Huai had talked over Sima Yi's recall with his colleague Cao Zhen, and, fearing lest the recalled general should acquire too great glory, Guo Huai had set out to anticipate him in the capture of Jieting.
Disappointed when he heard of Sima Yi's success there, he had decided to try a similar exploit at Liliu. So he had diverted his march thither.
He engaged the three Shu armies at once and slew so many of them that at Wei Yan's suggestion they all left for Yangping Pass, which might be in danger.
Guo Huai, pleased with his success, gathered in his army after the victory and said to his officers, “I was disappointed at Jieting, but we have taken this place, and that is merit of high order.” Thereupon he proceeded to the city gates.
Just as he arrived, a bomb exploded on the wall, and, looking up, he saw the rampart bedecked with flags. On the largest banner he read the characters “Sima Yi, General Who Pacifies the West”. At that moment Sima Yi himself lifted a board that hung in front of him and looked over the breast-high rail.
He looked down and smiled, saying, “How late you are, friend Guo Huai!” Guo Huai was amazed. “He is too much for me,” said he. So Guo Huai resignedly entered the city and went to pay his respects to his successful rival.
Sima Yi was gracious, and said, “Zhuge Liang must retire now that Jieting is lost.
You join forces with Cao Zhen and follow up quickly.” Guo Huai agreed and took his leave. Sima Yi called to him Zhang He, and said, “Cao Zhen and Guo Huai thought we should win too great merit, so they tried to get ahead of us here.
We are not the only ones who desire to achieve good service and acquire merit, but we had the good fortune to succeed.
I thought Wei Yan, Ma Su, Wang Ping, and Gao Xiang would first try to occupy Yangping Pass; and if I went to take it, then Zhuge Liang would fall on our rear.
It says in the books on war that one should crush a retreating enemy, not pursue broken rebels; so you may go along the by-roads and smite those withdrawing down the Chi Valley, while I oppose the Xie Valley army.
If they flee, do not press them too much, but just hold them up on the road and capture the baggage train.” Zhang He marched away with half the force to carry out his part of this plan, while Sima Yi gave orders to go to the Xie Valley by way of Xicheng, which though a small place, was important as a depot of stores for the Shu army, beside commanding the road to the three counties of Nanan, Tianshui, and Anding.
If this place could be captured, the other three could be recaptured.
Sima Yi left Shen Yi and Shen Dan to guard Liliu and marched his army toward the Xie Valley.
After Zhuge Liang had sent Ma Su to guard Jieting, his mind was constantly disturbed.
Then arrived the messenger with the topography and plan prepared by Wang Ping.
Zhuge Liang went over to his table and opened the letter. As he read it he smote the table in wrath.
“Ma Su's foolishness has destroyed the army!” he cried.
“Why are you so disturbed, O Minister?” asked those near.
“By this plan I see that we have lost command of an important road. The camp has been made on the hill; and if the Wei army come in force, our army will be surrounded and their water supply interrupted.
In two days the soldiers will be in a state of mutiny; and if Jieting shall be lost, how shall we be able to retire?” Here High Counselor Yang Yi said, “I am none too clever I know, but let me go to replace Ma Su.” Zhuge Liang explained to Yang Yi how and where to camp; but before he could start, a horseman brought the news of the loss of Jieting and Liliu.
This made Zhuge Liang very sad, and he sighed, saying, “The whole scheme has come to nought, and it is my fault.” Zhuge Liang sent for Guan Xing and Zhang Bao, and said, “Each of you takes three thousand of good soldiers and go along the road to Wugong Hills.
If you fall in with the enemy, do not fight, but beat drums and raise a hubbub and make them hesitate and be doubtful, so that they may retire.
Do not pursue, but when they retire, make for Yangping Pass.” He also sent Zhang Yi to put Saber Pass in order for retreat and issued instructions for making ready to march.
Ma Dai and Jiang Wei were told to guard the rear, but they were to go into ambush in the valleys till the whole army would have retreated.
Trusty messengers were sent with the news to Tianshui, Nanan, and Anding that the officers, army and people might go away into Hanzhong.
He also sent to remove to a place of safety in Hanzhong the aged mother of Jiang Wei.
All these arrangements made, Zhuge Liang took five thousand troops and set out for Xicheng to remove the stores.
But messenger after messenger, more than ten of them, came to report:
“Sima Yi is advancing rapidly on Xicheng with an army of one hundred fifty thousand troops.” No leader of rank was left to Zhuge Liang; he had only the civil officials and the five thousand soldiers, and as half this force had started to remove the stores, he had only two thousand five hundred left. His officers were all frightened at the news of near approach of the enemy. Zhuge Liang himself went up on the rampart to look around. He saw clouds of dust rising into the sky.
The Wei armies were nearing Xicheng along two roads.
Then he gave orders: “All the banners are to be removed and concealed.
If any officer in command of soldiers in the city moves or makes any noise, he will be instantly put to death.” Next he threw open all the gates and set twenty soldiers dressed as ordinary people cleaning the streets at each gate.
When all these preparations were complete, he donned the simple Taoist dress and, attended by a couple of lads, sat down on the wall by one of the towers with his lute before him and a stick of incense burning.
Sima Yi's scouts came near the city gate and saw all this. They did not enter the city, but went back and reported what they had seen.
Sima Yi smiled incredulously. But he halted his army and rode ahead himself.
It was exactly as the scouts had reported; Zhuge Liang sat there, his face with all smiles as he played the lute.
A lad stood on one side of him bearing a treasured sword and on the other a boy with the ordinary symbol of authority, a yak's tail. Just inside the gates a score of persons with their heads down were sweeping as if no one was about. Sima Yi hardly believed his eyes and thought this meant some peculiarly subtle ruse. So he went back to his armies, faced them about and moved toward the hills on the north.
“I am certain there are no soldiers behind this foolery,” said Sima Zhao.
“What do you retire for, Father?” Sima Yi replied, “Zhuge Liang is always most careful and runs no risks.
Those open gates undoubtedly mean an ambush; and if our force enter the city, they will fall victims to his guile.
How can you know?
No; our course is to retire.” Thus were the two armies turned back from the city, much to the joy of Zhuge Liang, who laughed and clapped his hands as he saw them hastening away.
The officials gasped with astonishment, and they asked, “Sima Yi is a famous general of Wei, and he was leading one hundred fifty troops.
By what reason did he march off at the sight of you, O Minister?” Zhuge Liang said, “He knows my reputation for carefulness and that I play not with danger.
Seeing things as they were made him suspect an ambush, and so he turned away.
I do not run risks, but this time there was no help for it.
Now he will meet with Guan Xing and Zhang Bao, whom I sent away into the hills to wait for him.” They were still in the grip of fear, but they praised the depth of insight of their chief and his mysterious schemes and unfathomable plans.
“We should simply have run away,” said they. “What could we have done with two thousand five hundred soldiers even if we had run? We should not have gone far before being caught,” said Zhuge Liang.
Quite open lay the city to the foe, But Zhuge Liang's lute of jasper wonders wrought; It turned aside the legions' onward march For both the leaders guessed the other's thought.
“But if I had been in Sima Yi's place, I should not have turned away,” said Zhuge Liang, smiling and clapping his hands.
He gave orders that the people of the place should follow the army into Hanzhong, for Sima Yi would assuredly return.
They abandoned Xicheng and returned into Hanzhong.
In due course the officials and soldiers and people out of the three counties also came in.
It has been said that Sima Yi turned aside from the city. He went to Wugong Hills.
Presently there came the sounds of a Shu army from behind the hills.
Sima Yi turned to his sons, saying, “If we do not retire, we shall yet somehow fall victims to this Zhuge Liang.” Then appeared a force advancing rapidly, the banners bearing the name of Zhang Bao.
The soldiers of Wei were seized with sudden panic and ran, flinging off their armors and throwing away their weapons.
But before they had fled very far, they heard other terrible sounds in the valley and soon saw another force, with banners of Guan Xing.
The roar of armed troops echoing up and down the valley was terrifying; and as no one could tell how many men there were bearing down on them, the panic increased.
The Wei army abandoned all the baggage and took to flight.
But having orders not to pursue, Zhang Bao and Guan Xing let their enemies run in peace, while they gathered up the spoils. Then they returned.
Seeing the valley apparently full of Shu soldiers, Sima Yi dared not marched by the main road. He hurried back to Jieting.
At this time Cao Zhen, hearing that the army of Shu was retreating, went in pursuit. But at a certain point he encountered a strong force under Ma Dai and Jiang Wei.
Valleys and hills seemed to swarm with enemies, and Cao Zhen became alarmed.
Then Chen Zao, his van-leader, was slain by Ma Dai, and the soldiers were panic-stricken and fled in disorder.
And the soldiers of Shu were hastening night and day along the road into Hanzhong.
Zhao Yun and Deng Zhi, who had been lying in ambush in Chi Valley, heard that their comrades were retreating.
Then said Zhao Yun, “The army of Wei will surely come to smite us while we are retreating.
Wherefore let me first take up a position in their rear, and then you lead off your troops and part of mine, showing my ensigns.
I will follow, keeping at the same distance behind you, and thus I shall be able to protect the retreat.” Now Guo Huai was leading his army through the Chi Valley.
He called up his van-leader, Su Yong, and said to him, “Zhao Yun is a warrior whom no one can withstand.
You must keep a most careful guard lest you fall into some trap while they are retreating.” Su Yong replied, smiling, “If you will help me, O Commander, we shall be able to capture this Zhao Yun.” So Su Yong, with three thousand troops, hastened on ahead and entered the valley in the wake of the Shu army.
He saw upon a slope in the distance a large red banner bearing the name of Zhao Yun.
This frightened him, and he retired.
But before he had gone far a great uproar arose about him, and a mighty warrior came bounding forth on a swift steed, crying, “Do you recognize Zhao Yun?” Su Yong was terrified. “Whence came you?” he cried.
“Is there another Zhao Yun here?” But Su Yong could make no stand, and soon fell victim to the spear of the veteran.
His troops scattered, and Zhao Yun marched on after the main body. But soon another company came in pursuit, this time led by a general of Guo Huai, named Wan Zheng.
As they came along Zhao Yun halted in the middle of the road to wait for the enemy.
By the time Wan Zheng had come close, the other Shu soldiers had gone about ten miles along the road.
However, when Wan Zheng drew nearer still and saw who it was standing in his path, he hesitated and finally halted. Presently he turned back and retired altogether, confessing on his return that he had not dared to face the old warrior, who seemed as terrible as ever.
However, Guo Huai was not content and ordered him to return to the pursuit of the retreating army.
This time Wan Zheng led a company of several hundred horsemen.
Presently they came to a wood, and, as they entered, a loud shout arose in the rear, “Zhao Yun is here!” Terror seized upon the pursuers, and many fell from their horses.
The others scattered among the hills. Wan Zheng braced himself for the encounter and went on. Zhao Yun shot an arrow which struck the plume on his helmet. Startled, Wan Zheng tumbled into a water stream.
Then Zhao Yun pointed his spear at him and said, “Be off! I will not kill you.
Go and tell Guo Huai to come quickly, if he is coming.” Wan Zheng fled for his life, while Zhao Yun continued his march as rearguard, and the retreat into Hanzhong steadily continued. There were no other episodes by the way.
Cao Zhen and Guo Huai took to themselves all the credit of having recovered the three counties—Nanan, Tianshui, and Anding.
Before the cautious Sima Yi was ready to pursue the army of Shu, it had already reached Hanzhong.
He took a troop of horse and rode to Xicheng and there heard from the few people who had formerly sought refuge in the hills, and now returned, that Zhuge Liang really had had no men in the city, with the exception of the two thousand five hundred soldiers, that he had not a single military commander, but only a few civil officers. Sima Yi also heard that Guan Xing and Zhang Bao had had only a few troops whom they led about among the hills making as much noise as they could. Sima Yi felt sad at having been tricked.
“Zhuge Liang is a cleverer man than I am,” said he with a sigh of resignation. He set about restoring order, and presently marched back to Changan.
He saw the Ruler of Wei, who was pleased with his success and said, “It is by your good service that Xizhou is again mine.” Sima Yi replied, “But the army of Shu is in Hanzhong undestroyed; therefore, I pray for authority to go against them that you may recover the Western Land of Rivers also.” Cao Rui rejoiced and approved, and authorized the raising of an army.
But then one of the courtiers suddenly said, “Your servant can propose a plan by which Shu will be overcome and Wu submits.” The generals lead their beaten soldiers home, The victors plan new deeds for days to come. Who offered this plan? Succeeding chapters will tell.
CHAPTER 96.
Shedding Tears, Zhuge Liang Puts Ma Su To Death; Cutting Hair, Zhou Fang Beguiles Cao Xiu. The proposer of the great plan that was to reunite the empire was the Chair of the Secretariat, named Sun Zi.
“Noble Sir, expound your excellent scheme,” said the Ruler of Wei. And Sun Zi said, “When your great progenitor, Emperor Cao, first got Zhang Lu, he was at a critical stage in his career, but thenceforward all went well.
He used to say the land of Nanzheng is really a natural hell.
In the Xie Valley there are one hundred fifty miles of rocks and caves, so that it is an impossible country for an army.
If Wei be denuded of soldiers in order to conquer Shu, then for sure we shall be invaded by Wu on the east.
My advice is to divide the army among the various generals and appoint each a place of strategic value to hold, and let them train their forces.
In a few years the Middle Land will be prosperous and wealthy, while the other two Shu and Wu, will have been reduced by mutual quarrels and will fall an easy prey.
I hope Your Majesty will consider whether this is not a superior plan.” “What does the General think?
said Cao Rui to Sima Yi.
He replied, “Minister Sun Zi says well.” So Cao Rui bade Sima Yi draw up a scheme of defense and station the soldiers, leaving Guo Huai and Zhang He to guard Changan.
And having rewarded the army, he the returned to Luoyang.
When Zhuge Liang got back to Hanzhong and missed Zhao Yun and Deng Zhi, the only two generals who had not arrived, he was sad at heart and bade Guan Xing and Zhang Bao go back to afford them assistance.
However, before the reinforcing parties could leave, the missing men arrived. Furthermore, they came with their army in excellent condition and not a man short, nor a horse nor any of their equipment.
As they drew near, Zhuge Liang went out of the city to welcome them.
Thereupon Zhao Yun hastily dismounted and bowed to the earth, saying, “The Prime Minister should not have come forth to welcome a defeated general.” But Zhuge Liang lifted him up and took his hand and said, “Mine was the fault, mine were the ignorance and unwisdom that caused all this. But how is it that amid all the defeat and loss you have come through unscathed?” And Deng Zhi replied, “It was because friend Zhao Yun sent me ahead, while he guarded the rear and warded off every attack. One leader he slew, and this frightened the others.
Thus nothing was lost or left by the way.” “A really great general!” said Zhuge Liang.
He sent Zhao Yun a gift of fifty ounces of gold, and to his army ten thousand rolls of silk.
But these were returned as Zhao Yun said, “All armies have accomplished nothing, and that is also our fault.
The rules for reward and punishment must be strictly kept.
I pray that these things be kept in store till the winter, when they can be distributed among the army.” “When the First Ruler lived, he never tired of extolling Zhao Yun's virtues; the First Ruler was perfectly right,” said Zhuge Liang.
And his respect for the veteran was doubled.
Then came the turn of the four unfortunate leaders Ma Su, Wang Ping, Wei Yan, and Gao Xiang to render account.
Wang Ping was called to the Commander-in-Chief's tent and rebuked. “I ordered you and Ma Su to guard Jieting; why did you not remonstrate with him and prevent this great loss?” “I did remonstrate many times.
I wished to build a rampart down in the road and construct a solid camp, but the Commander would not agree and showed ill temper.
So I led five thousand troops and camped some three miles off; and when the army of Wei came in crowds and surrounded my colleague, I led my army to attack them a score of times. But I could not penetrate, and the catastrophe came quickly. Many of our troops surrendered, and mine were too few to stand.
Wherefore I went to friend Wei Yan for help, but I was intercepted and imprisoned in a valley and only got out by fighting most desperately.
I got back to my camp to find the enemy in possession, and so I set out for Liliu.
On the road I met Gao Xiang, and we three tried to raid the enemy's camp, hoping to recover Jieting; but as there was no one soldier there, I grew suspicious.
From a hill I saw my colleagues had been hemmed in by the soldiers of Wei, so I went to rescue them.
Thence we hastened to Yangping Pass to try to prevent that from falling.
It was not that I failed to remonstrate.
And you, O Minister, can get confirmation of my words from any of the officers.” Zhuge Liang bade him retire, and sent for Ma Su.
He came, bound himself, and threw himself on the earth at the tent door.
Zhuge Liang got angry, saying, “You have filled yourself with the study of the books on war ever since you were a boy; you know them thoroughly.
I enjoined upon you that Jieting was most important, and you pledged yourself and all your family to do your best in the enterprise; yet you would not listen to Wang Ping, and thus you caused this misfortune.
The army is defeated, generals have been slain and cities and territory lost, all through you.
If I do not make you an example and vindicate the law, how shall I maintain a proper state of discipline?
You have offended and you must pay the penalty.
After your death the little ones of your family shall be my care, and I will see that they get a monthly allowance. Do not let their fate cause you anxiety.” Zhuge Liang told the executioners to take Ma Su away.
Ma Su wept bitterly, saying, “Pity me, O Minister, you have looked upon me as a son; I have looked up to you as a father.
I know my fault is worthy of death, but I pray you remember how King Shun employed Yu, after executing his father.
Though I die, I will harbor no resentment down in the depths of the Nine Golden Springs.” Zhuge Liang brushed aside his tears and said, “We have been as brothers, and your children shall be as my own. It is useless to say more.” They led the doomed man away. Without the main gate, just as they were going to deal the fatal blow, High Counselor Jiang Wan, who had just arrived from Capital Chengdu, was passing in.
He bade the executioners wait a while, and he went in and interceded for Ma Su.
“Formerly the King of Chu put Minister Chen Dechen to death, and his rival Duke Wen of Jin rejoiced.
There is great confusion in the land, and yet you would slay a man of admitted ability.
Can you not spare him?” Zhuge Liang's tears fell, but he said, “Sun Zi maintains that the one way to obtain success is to make the law supreme.
Now confusion and actual war are in every quarter; and if the law be not observed, how may rebels be made away with?
He must die.” Soon after they bore in the head of Ma Su as proof, and Zhuge Liang wailed bitterly.
“Why do you weep for him now that he has met the just penalty for his fault?” said Jiang Wan.
“I was not weeping then because of Ma Su, but because I remembered the words of the First Ruler. When in great stress at Baidicheng, he said: 'Ma Su's words exceed the truth, and he is incapable of great deeds.' It has come true, and I greatly regret my want of insight. That is why I weep.” Every officer wept.
Ma Su was but thirty-nine, and he met his end in the fifth month of the sixth year of Beginning Prosperity . A poet wrote about him thus:
That was pitiful that he who talked so glib Of war, should lose a city, fault most grave, With death as expiation.
At the gate He paid stern law's extremest penalty. Deep grieved, his chief recalled the late Prince's words. The head of Ma Su was paraded round the camps. Then it was sewn again to the body and buried with it. Zhuge Liang conducted the sacrifices for the dead and read the oration.
A monthly allowance was made for the family, and they were consoled as much as possible.
Next Zhuge Liang made his memorial to the Throne and bade Jiang Wan bear it to the Latter Ruler.
Therein Zhuge Liang proposed his own degradation from his high office. “Naturally a man of mediocre abilities, I have enjoyed your confidence undeservedly. Having led out an expedition, I have proved my inability to perform the high office of leader.
Over solicitude was my undoing.
Hence happened disobedience at Jieting and the failure to guard Chi Valley.
The fault is mine in that I erred in the use of people. In my anxiety I was too secretive.
The 'Spring and Autumn' has pronounced the commander such as I am is blameworthy, and whither may I flee from my fault?
I pray that I may be degraded three degrees as punishment. I cannot express my mortification.
I humbly await your command.” “Why does the Prime Minister speak thus?” said the Latter Ruler.
“It is but the ordinary fortune of war.” Minister Fei Yi said, “The ruler must enhance the majesty of the law, for without law how can people support him?
It is right that the Prime Minister should be degraded in rank.” Thereupon an edict was issued reducing Zhuge Liang to the rank of General of the Right Army, but retaining him in the same position in the direction of state affairs and command of the military forces. Fei Yi was directed to communicate the decision. Fei Yi bore the edict into Hanzhong and gave it to Zhuge Liang, who bowed to the decree. The envoy thought Zhuge Liang might be mortified, so he ventured to felicitate him in other matters.
“It was a great joy to the people of Shu when you, O Minister, captured the four northwest counties,” said he.
“What sort of language is this?” said Zhuge Liang, annoyed.
“Success followed by failure is no success.
It shames me indeed to hear such a compliment.” “His Majesty will be very pleased to hear of the acquisition of Jiang Wei.” This remark also angered Zhuge Liang, who replied, “It is my fault that a defeated army has returned without any gain of territory.
What injury to Wei was the loss of Jiang Wei?” Fei Yi tried again.
“But with an army of one hundred thousand bold veterans, you can attack Wei again.” “When we were at Qishan and Chi Valley, we outnumbered the enemy, but we could not conquer them. On the contrary, they beat us.
The defect was not in the number of soldiers, but in the leadership. Now we must reduce the army, discover our faults, reflect on our errors, and mend our ways against the future.
Unless this is so, what is the use of a numerous army? Hereafter every one will have to look to the future of his country.
But most diligently each of you must fight against my shortcomings and blame my inefficiencies; then we may succeed.
Rebellion can be exterminated and merit can be set up.” Fei Yi and the officers acknowledged the aptness of these remarks.
Fei Yi went back to the capital, leaving Zhuge Liang in Hanzhong resting his soldiers and doing what he could for the people, training and heartening his troops and turning special attention to the construction of apparatus for assaults on cities and crossing rivers. He also collected grain and fodder and built battle rafts, all for future use.
The spies of Wei got to know of these doings in the Lands of Rivers and reported to Luoyang. The Ruler of Wei called Sima Yi to council and asked how Shu might be annexed.
“Shu cannot be attacked,” was the reply.
“In this present hot weather they will not come out, but, if we invade, they will only garrison and defend their strategic points, which we should find it hard to overcome.” “What shall we do if they invade us again?” “I have prepared for that.
Just now Zhuge Liang is imitating Han Xin when he secretly crossed the river into Chencang.
I can recommend a man to guard the place by building a rampart there and rendering it absolutely secure. He is a nine-span man, round shouldered and powerful, a good archer and prudent strategist.
He would be quite equal to dealing with an invasion.” The Ruler of Wei was very pleased and asked for his name.
“His name is Hao Zhao, and he is in command at Hexi.” The Ruler of Wei accepted the recommendation, and an edict went forth promoting Hao Zhao to General Who Guards the West, and sending him to command in the county of Chencang.
Soon after this edict was issued, a memorial was received from Cao Xiu, Minister of War and Commander of Yangzhou, saying that Zhou Fang, the Wu Governor of Poyang, wished to tender his submission and transfer his allegiance, and had sent a man to present a memorandum under seven headings showing how the power of the South Land could be broken and to ask that an army be dispatched soon.
Cao Rui spread the document out on the couch that he and Sima Yi might read it.
“It seems very reasonable,” said Sima Yi. “Wu could be quite destroyed.
Let me go with an army to help Cao Xiu.” But from among the courtiers stepped out Jia Kui, who said, “What this man of Wu says may be understood in two ways; do not trust it.
Zhou Fang is a wise and crafty man and very unlikely to desert. In this is some ruse to decoy our soldiers into danger.” “Such words also must be listened to,” said Sima Yi.
“Yet such a chance must not be missed.” “You and he might both go to the help of Cao Xiu,” said the Ruler of Wei. Sima Yi and Jia Kui went.
A large army, led by Cao Xiu, moved to Huancheng.
Jia Kui, assisted by General Man Chong and Governor Hu Zhi of Dongwan, marched to capture Yangcheng, and facing the East Pass.
Sima Yi led the third army to Jiangling.
Now the Prince of Wu, Sun Quan, was at the East Pass in Wuchang, and there he assembled his officers and said, “The Governor of Poyang, Zhou Fang, has sent up a secret memorial saying that Cao Xiu intends to invade.
Zhou Fang has therefore set out a trap for Cao Xiu and has drawn up a document giving seven plausible circumstances, hoping thereby to cajole the Wei army into his power.
